I was sent that night to the apothecary's at Ludgate-hill. My mistress said she suspected a person she thought guilty of the fact.
Whether my mistress did not tell me that night, that if I could discover the persons who had been guilty of the offence, and they would restore the money, she would give them twenty pounds, and would not prosecute them?
The night the robbery was committed my mistress sent me on a message to Ludgate-hill; I left a strange man and woman drinking with the servants in the kitchen; I told them when I went out to take care of the doors; I was away about three quarters of an hour or an hour at most; when I returned I found the back door wide open; I went and sat down with the servants about three quarters of an hour. At about half after eight o'clock the cook went to light the man and woman out; when they were gone, I was going for some bread, I took a candle and lantern in my hand; as I was returning with the loaf under my arm, a man ran out at the door; I threw the lantern and bread down and laid hold of the man; he knocked me down, and when I was down he gave me a blow on my face; before I could recover myself he had run down the garden; one of the young ladies said she heard a man run down the gravel walk; I called out murder, thieves! and bid them shut the door; we searched every part of the house; then we went into the garden, and some of the things were scattered in the garden; I found the purse cut; some of the money was out and some in; I put the money into my pocket, and went and put it in the shed, not with an intent to keep it. My mistress said if I knew of any person who had done it she would not hurt them, but give them twenty pounds if they would restore the money. I hope and beg for mercy; I am a poor fellow and have no person to speak for me.
It was the woman who owned the spoon that spoke of the name.
Did not the woman offer the spoon?
It was the woman brought the spoon and carried it into the pawnbroker's shop.
I sold the goods to Mr. Goodman; he did not know me when I sold them to him, nor did I know the person I bought them of.
I bought them of a man whom I know not; I thought to get a shilling by them by selling them to Mr. Goodman.
I bought them at several times of the man I had them of.
From the prisoner. Please to ask her whether she did not drink with me at a publick house?
I am as innocent of the affair as any child in the world is; I stopped at the Red Lion in Piccadilly and remember seeing a woman there having a pot of beer at the door.
She lodges with my wife's mother; it is a piece of spite.
I have no witnesses here; I had been at Turnmill-street to get some beer and some victuals; coming down Turnmill-street I passed that gentleman's shop; they came out and ran after me and said I had stolen some liquor out of their house, and they took me to the distill house again, and then took me before the justice; I never had the keg.
It was lying along side a broad wheeled waggon when I took it up; I was coming from my work when it happened; there was no other man with me.
As I was coming up Hounsditch I saw these things lie in the street. This man came up to me and asked me what I was going to do with them, and where I got them? I said I picked them up; I told him I would go with him into a house, and if any body owned them they should have them.
I was employed by a gentleman to whitewash the house. There was a place where Mr. Jones put his lumbering things; I could not do it without removing some of Mr. Jones's things, such as chairs and other brokery things. Mr. Jones came and said I had taken some things; I said I had not; that if they had lost any thing I was sorry, I knew nothing of it. I moved the things as carefully as I could. As to the pieces of tin we swept them out; I took them up to be sure afterwards, I thought they were pieces of waste tin; I might move the tiles out of the way; I do not recollect it.
I have no friend in town; I came on Friday last from Northampton.
I am thirteen years old; I have a father but he has broke his thigh and cannot come here.
They said at the public house, before I went to the justice, it would be better for me to confess; both of these gentlemen made that promise.
Did not you both say it would be better for me to tell the truth?
They persuaded me to confess at the public house, and said, if I confessed, they might be of some service to me.
I was so much in liquor when I took the lady up that when I set her down I did not know whether I had my fair or not; I did not take the things meaning to keep them; I did not break open the box, I only drew one nail to see what was in the box.
That is, meaning I had good horses.
Whether I am the man she saw in the room with the white coat on.
I did not know the name of the building; I did not live far from it; I heard them cry, stop thief! as I came through the alley; I ran and I was knocked down; I kicked the keys before me going along Petty France, Westminster; the person who saw me pick them up is at Portsmouth.
I met this man and another coming across Honey Lane Market; this man ran up to me, and asked for the book-keeper of Blossom's Inn, I said I did not know where he was; I walked on and he followed me. I am warehouse-man to the Morning-Post office.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I went to see my children who are out at nurse; I staid there from four till eight o'clock at night; when I came home I found Carpmeal in the house. The things were brought while I was out. I am innocent of the affair. I was cruelly used when I was taken to Sir John Fielding 's. I have witnesses to prove that I was not at home at the time.
I have things of the same kind of my own, stockings and waistcoats; I have some things in prison which I believe will answer the same things.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
As I was going by the back of St. Paul's church, a man hired me to carry the hamper to Crooked-lane; the witness came up after me and said it belonged to him; I bid him ask the man behind about it. I went to look for the man, but he was gone.
Do you know the number of the watch?
My principal witness is not here; she is gone down to Portsmouth; she will be here in a week or two. I made application to the court to put my tryal off.
I know nothing of it more than the child unborn. I never saw the silk till I saw it at the Justice's.
I was at her house that night.
The apprentice boy was there too, and knows I was not out at all.
As I was going along by this corner I saw these shoes lying on the ground between the kirb-stone and the wall, I took them up and walked away gently. When I came by the Royal Exchange, they cried stop thief! and on their laying hold of me the shoes dropped.
I know nothing at all of it. I never saw any thing of the watch. They laid hold of me and said I should go with them to the house, and I consented to go with them.
I had this piece of checque to line a trunk with. I had more than I wanted. I took a piece to rub it down with, to make it lay smooth after it is lined. I put that piece into my pocket instead of the piece of white that I intended to wash out and bring to shop again. I took it home. My wife said it would serve to make the child a pin-cloth. I said I believed there would be a fine noise if I kept it. My master sent to my wife to send it back again. She sent it back directly. a piece of waste cheque is never looked on as any thing in the trade.
I wish to have the other witnesses examined separate.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
Did you employ me to load the cart?
He said he must make them good, and if I would deliver them up to him, he would be very friendly to me?
Whether the parcel was put in the cart?
I found the parcel in St. Martin's-lane. It was very wet. I carried it home and put it out of the paper into the bag. I did not know whose they were.
I know nothing of it.
I saw the carcass lie on the ground. I was going to pick it up. A person cried, Stop thief! and then I threw it down and ran away.
I have worked with Matthews three or four years; I sell things for him.
I went into this house to ask for Mrs. Smith, a washerwoman. As I went up stairs a young lad ran down. When I came down that man stopped me. I know nothing of the things.
I am the person who was convicted for shooting at that man, almost five years ago. I received his majesty's clemency for fourteen years transportation. I had not been in the country long before they compelled me to take up arms against my king and country. I took the first opportunity of deserting from their service and going over to the king's troops; I surrendered myself to Lord Cornwallis, and took the benefit of the proclamation which offered a free pardon, and leave to return to their own country, to all persons who would come over to the king's troops. I was innocent of the crime for which I was tried. George Hartley, who was convicted about two years ago, declared and took his sacrament upon it, that he was the man who shot at this man.
I picked up the pots in the street, and brought them into the house.
There was a woman came into into the publick-house, and said she saw a man with a bundle, and that I was not the man.
I am not guilty. I went to this place to ease myself; my foot slipped into the ditch. There was a cry of stop thief! I thought it was as well that I was there, as I thought had I been walking along the road they might have suspected me.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I know nothing of the trunk at all, they were hallooing out stop thief! I saw three or four running, and ran to see what was the matter, a man laid hold of me; the post boy ran four or five yards past me, crying stop thief! I know nothing of it.
The constable asked me what handkerchiefs I had about me? I told him two and no more. I pulled one out of one pocket, and the other out of the other, and then sat down again; He said had I no other pockets? I said I had no waistcoat pockets, and I never put a handkerchief in my breeches pocket. She said you have forgot to search your great coat pockets, I said I did not know that I had any great coat pockets; that I had borrowed the coat of a gentleman. I felt in the pocket and found this handkerchief there; I said it was not mine, I did not know whose it was.
Though I am before a court of judicature, I hope I have a jury which will look in an impartial manner on every thing; I went into the publick-house to have a pint of beer; meeting with some agreeable company, especially the prosecutor, I stayed the whole evening. I then was going away; a man who was there asked me where I was going. I went out with him; as I was going along he asked me to hold the bundle while he made water; as I was holding it, the publican came up, and the other man ran away.
I was coming past this cart; a man was standing by it; he said to me how far are you going? I said as far as Covent-garden. He said if I would carry the basket for him to the Barley-Mow, in Drury-lane, he would give me a shilling. I took the basket; this gentleman came up; he asked me no questions but knocked me down. He said I had stolen the basket; I said I had not, for a person had given it to me to carry to Drury-lane.
When that gentleman took the duplicate out of my pocket, I thought it was the duplicate of a watch which was my own, and which I had had about six months, that was the reason of my making that reply; but when I examined it in the morning I found it to be the duplicate of another watch which I had pawned for a man the night that that gentleman was robbed. I can prove that I was at No. 8, in Gerard-street, from near six in the evening till near eleven at night, except in the interim between eight and nine, when a young man called and asked if I was there; he was showed into the kitchen to me. He is a whitesmith by business; he had been in town some time, and was out of employ; he said he was going into the country to seek for some work. He said he would sell me his watch cheap as he was short of money and was going to seek for work. I said I had a watch of my own, and did not want to buy one, neither had I money to purchase it. He then asked me to pledge it for him, for as much as I could get upon it, and he would wait till my return. I said I would. I went to Mr. Priestman's and pledged it for a guinea and an half, and brought the money and the ticket back to him. He then said I should have the duplicate. I gave him half a crown for it. He sat down some little time, then took his leave and went away. I stayed there till near eleven o'clock.
Whether you did not see me give him a guinea and a half and a duplicate of the watch.
I did not carry my own watch to pawn myself, but I fancy it was pawned at Mr. Steel's, who lives going out of New Tothill-street, into the Ambury. I lost the duplicate a day or two before I was taken.
A gentleman asked me to go and see Mr. Wheeler's sale; I went there. The gentleman went from one place to another; he gave me these stockings to put into my pocket. Mr. Wheeler asked me if I had any of his stockings in my pocket? I said no. I gave him the stockings I had in my pocket, but I did not before know that they were Mr. Wheeler's.
You have sworn you saw me in the warehouse?
Did not you desire me to take these things to Mr. Cross?
Do you know the Windmill in Leather-lane?
Do you know Richard Mailling ?
Do you know Mr. Baxter?
The publican at Cow-cross?
Have you ever conversed with Elizabeth Parker about this prosecution?
When you desired me to hold these things for Thomas Cross , had not Mailling and you had some conversation about it the day before?
On Friday the 10th of March in the morning between five and six o'clock. I was going to Mr. Terry's, the pot-warehouse at Deptford, with my partner John Cox ; as I was going by the Ram-inn Beldom came to me and desired me to receive this box and parcel for Mr. Cross, who was going by the Northampton coach; and gave me two keys; as soon as I had got to the door he called to Mailling and said, here he is, I will send him to your place, and he took hold of me and carried me to the watch-house; they accused me of things I knew nothing of; and they said then they had me in their power to hang me. Richard Mailling , in September last, was convicted of buying my patterns that were taken out of my house in March last. William Walker , my nephew, and Canton were tried, and Walker was found guilty. Mailling used me very ill; I could never get my patterns from him; he was tried afterwards; the first time there was a flaw in the indictment, and he was acquitted; the second time he was indicted and found guilty; and after he was found guilty he put a knife into his throat; he recovered; and when Beldom took me, he said he had me in his power to hang me. I said my partner Mr. Cox was with me, and could tell where I got the things; they said they had got him pressed, and that now he could be of no service to me. On the Monday Cox was discharged, and was before the alderman, and told the affair: will your lordship be pleased to hear what he has to say. The clock struck five before I got out of bed to go to Deptford that morning. I hope you will look into this affair; it is Mailling and Beldom's doing. I saw Mailling as soon as I was taken to Guildhall; the moment I got in he set upon me, and said now he had me.
A Spanish nobleman brought me from my own country into a strange country. I know not the nature of the law. He kept me in misery and distress; he never paid me. Mr. Watkins used me ill; he struck me; I was obliged to leave him. I was born in Germany.
A man asked me to take this china up the street, I do not know the name of the street, and I was to leave them at the alehouse till he came.
I know nothing of the matter; the gentlewoman never saw me till she saw me at Sir John Fielding 's, I believe; at the time of this robbery I was ill in bed; the woman below bought these things; and, I believe, has a receipt for them.
What had I on at the time I was taken?
On the 1st of March, about nine o'clock, I was in Leadenhall-street, and supped at an acquaintance's, at the house of one Mrs. Hancock, who is a kind of a millener, or something in the linen way. I saw a person there I knew, with whom I stopped and had something to drink. I stayed till about ten o'clock; there was one Mrs. Young and one Mrs. Haley there; I believe they are both in court.
When I left Mrs. Hancock's it was past ten o'clock. I went to see a person I met with to the stage in Whitechapel, and then went to Bow.
Mr. Richards came to me to the prison and asked me, if I was the man that robbed him, and if I had his watch? I said I was not the man that did the robbery. He said, he was sorry I was in gaol on his account; that I was not the man that robbed him; he told several in the gaol that I was not the man that robbed him, and gave me a shilling to drink; he went between the gates and told the turnkey that I was not the man that robbed him.
I went up on the Monday for an examination; Mr. Richards was present. He said the night was so dark he could not swear to me, but he had his daughter in the coach who could swear to me, and he would bring her on the Friday. On the Friday he said his daughter could not swear to me, and he swore to me himself.
There were five windows in the room where I was in the prison, and it was twelve o'clock, and the windows were all open.
I met a man with two pigs. I asked him what he would have for one of them? He said five shillings; I bought it of him. I took it to a publick-house and shewed it to several people, and asked if I was taken in; they said no; but it was as much as it was worth. I took it to Lambeth; when they told me the pig was taken away I went voluntarily to Mr. Henderson.
I found the bag at the door, where we take the Public Ledger, with the money in it. I paid away six guineas of it; I did not know that it belonged to Farmer.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I have some of the same mark as that handkerchief in my pocket; they are marked I G.
I bought this lead; hearing the next day that some lead had been stolen off this house, I went up to satisfy my curiosity; and while I was there, they cried out
\There was a thief on the top of the house.\" I keep a broker's shop in Guy's-court, by Stratford-place."
Before Sir John Fielding he said he was very much in liquor.
Did not you say at Sir John Fielding 's that the man was bigger and stouter than me?
I was at my lodgings at Ealing that day. Would it not have been very proper for the coachman to attend as well as at the office. He declared I was not one of the men. I have subpoena'd him; his name is Samuel Downs ; I do not know whether he is here.
The time this robbery was committed I was incapable of committing such a robbery. On the Wednesday evening I had a terrible head-ach; I was never out of the house but to get a pitcher of water. I was not out till Saturday morning, when the officers came to apprehend me.
The first time he is pleased to say I confessed, the very expression I made use of was, that I never had defrauded him, nor ever intended it. If I had any elegant knee-buckles, where are they? I do not want to have things aggravated. And as for the watch I have had it many years.
In that list they are called eight gold ring.
It was entered in the day book where all other things are.
Things that are remnants are sold for no profit.
Whether this was sold in the day time or at night?
What day of the month?
Sunday or working day?
My character and reputation in life and my family, till this unhappy affair, have been unimpeached and unspotted. My prosecutor is very conscious that through my connections he has taken hundreds of pounds; and they are people of character and reputation; some are present in court, and there are many more. I hope that will be sufficient. I labour not with guilt, but under the utmost grief and anxiety of mind for my loss of reputation, which is dearer to me than life itself, and I trust to your humanity to shew some pity upon your unhappy prisoner. I refer the rest, under my present anxiety of mind to my counsel.
Whether Mr. Hooper has not taken through Mr. Long's recommendation and our family some hundred pounds?
The watch which is valued so high, I bought when I lived with Mr. Cawdron, it is an old French watch, I do not suppose the gold of it is worth two guineas.
I know nothing of it.
I asked my master on the Saturday to let me have two deals to do a job for myself. He went out of town on Monday. He came home on Wednesday, and asked me if I had had the deals; I told him I had not. He said I might have them when I pleased. I was doing the work for one Mr. Allen, a grocer.
The prosecutor has bribed David Jonas ; he has given him a new pair of shoes and stockings and some money.
I have my wife in court to prove I do not belong to the house.
I was coming along the quays, and a man hired me to take it to his house.
I was starving; I took it for want. I could get no business to do.
As I was going along a horse ran against me and knocked me down; I went into this yard to wash my hands; as I was wiping them on the tail of my coat, this man came came up and knocked me down without saying a word me; I was all of a gore of blood.
I cannot say but I did hit that man, because he said I had got the pins. Mr. Hall came and found the pins lie publickly. I had a board to paint for Mr. Parker the plaisterer, which I intended to finish on Saturday, and bring the pins back on Monday. I took them home; we were moving things backwards and forwards. I was afraid they would be lost.
I left the house that Sunday night at near seven o'clock and went to Tower-hill; I had a man with me in the, house who did a little business for me in the writiag way; we went out together; before we went out I locked the dog in the kitchen. When we came to Red-Lion-square, I recollected I had not left the key for my wife, and proposed to go back, the man persuaded me not, and we proceeded to Tower-hill, to the Hamburgh Arms; we got there about eight o'clock; we sat and drank together there till about ten o'clock, then we came away and came together as far as Aldgate, there we parted; I went to shoemaker-row, and staid about an hour, then I came through the city to Fleet-market; the clock struck eleven when I came through Temple-bar. I had a glass of gin, on the left-hand side by the New Church; then I went to the King's-Head in Covent-garden, I got there about half after eleven; I waited above half an hour for a pint of brandy hot. I fell partly asleep before I drank it; when I waked the house was full of people; the watchman was crying half after one o'clock. Then I proceeded home; as I went up Tottenham-court-road, the watchman was crying past two o'clock; when I came up to my door and put the key in, a man came up to me and said you have got a key; I said yes, the key of my own house. The man pushed me into the house, upon which two or three men ran up stairs together. I said what is this in the house? I was quite stagnated; they took me into the kitchen, and the landlord came and gave charge of me.
I had two suits of clothes of mine out at the scowerer's, and some I had sold to a clothes-seller.
My linen was in the house; the house might have been robbed.
That is a piece of a chain which my fellow- servant made to a pair of scissars; I have had it twelve years. I never saw the prosecutor till I saw him before the justice.
This is not the watch I pawned.
I know nothing of it.
I went into this shop and bought a trinket. When I got about twenty yards from the shop the prosecutor came after me and desired me to come back; I said I would. He said he had lost two watches. I had not any. He went after the other persons, but could not catch them, so he kept me.
I am thirteen years old. I was riding in the waggon; this parcel jostled out. The gentleman called out and I ran away for fear the waggoner should horsewhip me.
I beg I may be sent to sea.
I dug up the ground by the direction of the plumber; there was nothing that I saw in the cellar but brick rubbish, so help me God. Four weeks after, this gentleman came to accuse me.
As I was coming from Sadler's Wells, I heard the cry of Stop thief! I saw many people run; I ran likewise, and being nearly at the head of the mob, the people who ran said, Which way did he go? I said I do not know. I did not see him run; I did not see the man at all. Some people who were a-head, laid hold of me and said, I suppose this is the man. They held me till these people came up; the woman directly said, that is the man! that is the man! They searched me and took me to the watch-house. I never saw the watch nor the man neither. They searched me again at the watch-house to see if they could find arms or watch about me, but they found none.
I was going across the field and heard somebody cry out stop thief; there were two men running across the field; I ran away for fear they should think it was me.
This gentlewoman put it into the boy's head else he could not swear to me; the justice said if she swore to me she would be rewarded for her trouble.
Before the justice she said that she saw the boy pick the gentleman's pocket and give it to me.
I was going from my mother's in Black-friars up Fleet-street; near Temple-bar there was a fruit-basket; I stopped there and picked up this pocket book. I asked the woman if she knew any body who had lost any thing? She said, she did not. I asked several people; I thought to keep it till it was advertised and then that the owner might have his property again. I staid upon the spot near a quarter of an hour.
I am as innocent as the child unborn. I was going by and heard the cry of stop thief! That gentleman catched hold of me. As to having the things or knowing any thing of them. I was never in the place, and I know nothing of them.
Sowter the next day before the justice, acknowledged he called me to him, threw his money down upon the bench and his pocket-book. I know nothing of the watch.
As I was going through Broad-street I saw these things lie on the ground; I picked them up; I saw a man running before me; I ran after him. When I got into Wormwood-street I was knocked down.
I was going along Watling-street; they cried out stop thief, and I was secured.
A man gave me the box.
I leave my defence to my counsel. I know no more of the watches than the child unborn. As I was going into the park between seven and eight o'clock in the morning, I heard the cry of stop thief! I ran as well as many others. When I was in the park they cried stop that man with the apron! I having an apron on stopped to see who they meant, and they laid hold of me, and searched me, and took my watch out of my pocket.
I went out with some beer; there was another boy who said if I did not get some spoons from my master he would do me a mischief.
When you sent your servant after me I had not left your house for good, I had not paid for what I had had.
I had not paid you?
I submit to your lordship that this indictment cannot be maintained against me; I have heard it read, I find I am described as a labourer. I am an attorney of the King's Bench, and should have been described as a gentleman. I submit to your lordship this indictment cannot be supported against me. I have not my admission about me, I can send for it.
I was under a necessity of doing that.
I presume I am not too late before judgement.
My lord I have the same objection to this indictment that I am not rightly described. I have no witnesses.
The day I bought these buckles of you did not I say to you I want a pair of silver sauce boats; I was going to let out a first floor, furnished; you shewed me a pair of nine guineas; now if I had-had a mind to rob you might not I as well have taken those of nine guineas as these?
Instead of leaving his bill and receipt with the people at the coffee-house for this money, he took the bill and receipt away again?
You left the bill and receipt with the bar-maid?
I acknowledge going on the day the prosecutor says, and agreeing for this parcel. I had taken an house and was going to lett the first floor, furnished, at a guinea and an half a week. I made use of no false pretence to the waiter; I do not recollect that the maid ever went out; I went up to the bar; I saw the waiter; I asked for it, and he gave it me; neither did I go with the prosecutor up to the bar as has been mentioned. I offered to return those very boats five weeks after, as I had not sold them.
I am a countryman; I came to town one day; a man told me he had got a watch, we were at work at Paddington; I saw him talking to a man a little way off; he said he bought this watch for fifteen shillings; I gave him seven shillings and sixpence for half of it; when the other man went away then I went up to a gentleman's at Paddington and gave him seven shillings and sixpence more for it, and bought it all. I met a bricklayer near St. Giles's, he said if I would give him a gallon of beer he would help me to work. I said I had no money, I had only got a watch. We went to a publick-house, he called for a gallon of beer to drink; the bricklayer made me leave the watch there for it; he was to call next morning to carry me to work; he did not call. I never released the watch from the publick house, but the lieutenant did. I told them the watch was mine; the lieutenant would not let me have it.
When I went to the shop I asked the gentleman for some trimming. He asked me what sort? I said Pink. He said he had none. When I went to buy the trimming, I wanted to buy a bit of cloth for a pair of shift sleeves; seeing him show this cloth, it was a dark shop, I took it to the door to look at it; the gentleman followed me out and said I wanted to take it away.
I saw the parcel lying on the ground as I came out of the shop; I thought somebody else might drop it; I took it up and put it in my pocket.
The gentleman came in and said he did not think I was the man; Heley, one of Sir John Fielding 's men, came and said I was a very bad man, and they used me very ill.
I went to the Bull-Inn for a bed; I did not go into the kitchen, only within the gates; the young woman went to call the chambermaid; then they called after me, and said I had stolen something; they searched me; I had nothing upon me.
I was not with him, I only met him; he said they were his wife's things. I was not out with him.
I found this in a bag, I expected some owner would come for it; none coming for it, I went to sell it.
They coaxed me very much.
I came out of Scotland in a sloop. I came down to Wapping to seek a ship which was going farther on. I came to two or three wharfs to seek for a ship. A man came dressed in a blue coat, with a small ribbon about his hat; he asked me where I came from? I said from Scotland. I had come only that day. He said he would give me sixpence if I would carry this trunk about forty yards because he did not choose to carry it; as I was carrying it one of these gentlemen stopped me and said it did not belong to me. I said it belonged to that gentleman.
The captain gave it to us.
I took this gentleman out of another coach in Cheapside; he bid me stop in Newgate-street to take a girl up, and bid me set her down in St. Giles's. He said I need not put the step up he would put it up himself. I had not gone far before he said he was robbed. I said he could not be robbed without it was by the person in the coach with him, that I would drive him safe home.
I am intirely innocent of it.
A person gave me a direction to Mrs. Browne in Field-lane, and desired me to call for a parcel she was to have; there she gave me a guinea in gold and another in silver. Mrs. Brown asked for my handkerchief and did them up, nothing more passed between us. I did not know what the parcel contained.
I found the handkerchief in Fleet-street, at the corner of a glass shop, by Water-lane.
She said before the justice she left a lodger in the one-pair-of-stairs?
I am totally innocent of the fact; the goods found upon me I bought for 18 s. the rest of my defence I leave to my counsel, and the mercy of the court; the man I bought them of was a stranger to me; I do not know where to find him.
I picked up the gown done up in a bundle; there was a woman going to pick it up before me.
I was so much in liquor, I did not know any thing of it till I was taken to prison, and in the morning I asked what it was for?
I bought the bonnet in Covent-garden.
This gentleman came to another publick-house where I was, and asked for his fiddle; I told him I knew nothing of it.
I never saw the woman before.
I am a broker by trade, I bought these things at different times, and paid for them.
It is well known here that this Barnard has been the means of taking many a man's life away; I am very innocent of the matter.
When he came up to me, when I was taken, he said he thought it was me, but he was not certain.
This man might put the button there himself; he was at the place; I know nothing of it.
On the Monday I went out with a few friends; in the afternoon I was informed they had pulled down the chapel and house in Rope-maker's-alley, Moorfields. I got into Little Moorfields; when I had got there there was a young man who had something of a bar in his right-hand; he threw down the bar, and went into the house. I afterwards took the bar up and walked with it in my hand up to the ruins only to look on; I afterwards returned. Mr. Russel halloo'd out to me, Halloo, Martin, have you turned your coat, to pull your own house down? He delivered me up to the mercy of the mob; the mob took the bar away and were going to destroy me. I boarded at the same table with Mr. Russell; went to the same place of worship for three years during the time I served Mr. Russell. I have sufficient witnesses to my character.
I know nothing about the handkerchief.
There was a cry of stop thief; there were people running; a man stopped me. I am innocent.
I know nothing of it; I leave my defence to my counsel.
I have nothing to say at all; I have no witnesses.
I did not put them into the boat to go on shore with them. I came from Sunderland , and have no friends here. I have served on board a man of war. I was discharged from the man of war for having fits, but that was by the protection of the doctor for a little money I gave him. I was discharged from the Dunkirk at the beginning of last year.
As I was coming from the other end of the town; I had occasion to go through this court. This gentleman laid hold of me by the collar, and used this expression, that he never hung one, but by G - d he would hang me.
I found the shirt at the end of the court. I saw two men running into it; I called after them but they would not stop, so I put it under my jacket.
As I was going up Holbourn, I kicked against the cask in the highway; I took it and put it upon my shoulders.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I met a woman I knew at Greenwich; she said if I would carry this bundle to Hyde-street for her, she would pay me well. A watchman stopped me. She said she would follow me directly.
He promised me, if I told him nothing but the truth, he would forgive me, and make me an evidence, and he supplied me with money while I was in Bridewell.
I know nothing at all of it.
Did not I say I had nobody with me?
He asked me where my accomplice was gone? I said I had nobody with me.
I was going along the street, and saw these people standing at their doors; I stopped to buckle up my shoe; I went to cross the street out of the way of a coach; this gentleman came and laid hold of me; he said I had robbed the shop; I said I would go back with him to any place he required.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
A gentleman asked me to carry the box for him; being an hard-working lad I was willing to earn a shilling; the gentleman followed me up Fleet-market; Mr. Harper stopped me, and said the box was not mine; the gentleman ran away; I told Mr. Harper that it belonged to that gentleman.
How was I dressed?
Had I this coat and waistcoat on?
From the Prisoner. Whether I presented any pistol to the gentleman?
How was I dressed?
I never saw the gentleman who has been robbed, nor his servant till I saw them in Litchfield-street office.
I have no witnesses.
My father turned me out of doors, I had no where to lie, I saw this cellar open and went down there to sleep.
I had been down this court several times to go to a necessary as I was going along a man ran by me in a brown coat, he dropped this bag; I picked it up and put it in my pocket; afterwards this man stopped me, and asked me what I was doing in the house? I said I was not near the house. He said he must take me into the house. I went up stairs with him, and pulled these things out of my pocket. I did not know what was in the bag. The woman said, my dear sir, if I have not lost any thing I will not hurt an hair of your head. I was taken to jail, and the next day before the justice; then she swore her door was open, that I was in the house, and she had been robbed. Now she swears she has lost nothing.
All the keys were tried and none of them would open the door.
The shoes were left by a shoemaker at our shop, he brought them in his apron; I desired him to put them in the basket till he called for them.
I know nothing about the affair; if I had been guilty of it I should have had no difficulty of confessing it, because there is another heavy affair against me.
I bought the shoes of a Jew going along the Mews.
I had been at the other end of the town; I stopped at this stick-shop. I took a view of them, with an intent to buy one of them. As I had two sticks in my hand, the man came to the door and asked me what I meant to do with them? I said I wanted to know the price of one of them. I surrendered myself to go before any justice with him.
I am not guilty of it.
My hat blew over these pales; I went into the yard to get it again.
I know nothing about it; I was not in the house at the time; I came off guard on Saturday; I went out and came home at twelve at night. I knocked at the door, they would not let me in; so I went and gave a shilling for a bed in Westminster.
I am innocent of the business. One of these shillings I had had for some time; the half-penny and farthing I had before. I had been at a publick-house; I had offered the bad half-penny and farthing to the woman; she would not take them, so I had changed a shilling; that ten-pence was the change. I had the other shilling with five shillings at Mr. Weller's office, in change for a guinea, and the two half-crowns.
Did I say I would sell the mare?
I had been under examinations in Bow-street. Clipson came with another man; they said they would recommend to me an attorney, Mr. Wilson. They told me they understood I had a mare at Mr. Aldridge's; they thought I might want money in the situation I was; that they would lead me any more money one the mare, if I would put it into their care for me. I told them there was a mare at Aldridge's, which I had borrowed three guineas on to pay a debt. I said if they would pay the money and take care of the mare for me, I should be obliged to them. They said they would, and asked me what I wanted. I desired them to give me half a guinea. They said they would, and gave me half a guinea, and said they would give me a guinea and an half more in the afternoon. I understand Clipson lives by going to persons in distress and doing things of this kind.
I beg the character of Clipson may be enquired into, whether he has not been detected in such things before. He wished to swindle me out of this mare.
I saw the coat lying on the stones; I took it up and went up the passage; as soon as he called me I delivered it to him.
I never had the handkerchief.
I took this place of Bagnal; I worked till twelve o'clock the night before to fix up my tools; I gave my box to Bagnal, he carried it up stairs. This man came in the morning and found the things in the place where my box was. I know nothing of it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I was going through the Hay-market; I met two young fellows; they asked me to assist them with a cask into the coach.
I own it was a fault; I had rather go abroad if you please.
I was coming to Guildhall to see the lottery drawn. I saw a parcel of boys coming along with this cart; they asked me the way to the Green-yard; I said any body will shew you the way. Then this man came up and knocked my hat off my head; in my fright I ran away. I was stopped and taken to the Compter; I never was near the cart.
I live in Weston's Park. I had paid for the beer and was taking it home. I was in liquor; I mentioned a wrong name by mistake. This man came up and knocked me down, and said I was going to steal the pots. He struck me and I struck him again. It is not reasonable I should pay fourteen-pence for beer to throw it into the street. If I had sold the pots I suppose I should not have got so much for them.
I was walking by; a young man, very genteelly dressed, called to me, and said he would give me a shilling for my trouble, if I would go to 'Squire Baker's, in Portman-square; he put these things in my lap, and this gentleman stopped me with them.
I have nothing to say in my defence; I have no witnesses.
Do not you recollect I bid you a good night, and you bid me good night?
Mott seems much enraged, because he has been hurt in losing a deal of property; I myself am innocent of what I am charged with; I went into the warehouse to ask a question; when I came out I bid Mr. Foy good-night (it is impossible for a person to take two such boxes out of such a warehouse undiscovered) when I came out they lay in my way; I moved them, as any body else might have done.
I have nothing to say unless to beg the mercy of the court; it is the first fault I ever did in my life.
How far was I from the door when you took hold of me?
That gentleman did not take me, I was delivered up in Justice Sherwood's office to him.
I was going past to the tide work at Glasgow wharf; it was dark. This woman was sitting at the window; when I got about eight yards past her she cried stop thief! I stopped, and she came up and laid hold of me opposite a publick-house door. Some people came about and they carried me to Justice Sherwood's office, and gave me in charge to that man. I am as innocent of it as the child unborn.
I was going of an errand to Pimlico, coming up this street they called stop thief! and laid hold of me.
I am thirteen years of age. My mother takes in washing, I am an errand-boy; I was out of work; I live with my mother. I was going of an errand for the lodger.
Did not you come to the king's guard next morning, and you was asked if you knew the man, and you said no?
The woman was not there when I rose out of the bed, she was below stairs.
She was down below stairs, she was not up in the room; I never saw the woman with my eyes; I never saw any thing she had; she has swore very false against me.
I was in that house; and the woman was in at the same time; she asked me to give her a glass of gin. I said I could not afford it. She asked me to buy something of her. I bought a pair of sleeve buttons for a penny; she asked me to toss up for a quartern of gin. I would not, but went out of the house directly; going home I recollected I should go to the washerwoman's for a shirt for the next morning. I ran back in haste; as I was running along the street, I ran against a woman who had a bundle upon her head, the bundle fell down; I continued running on till I heard the cry of stop thief, I turned round and asked what was the matter. They seized me, and said I had robbed the woman. I never had the bundle.
A man asked me if I would earn a shilling and gave me this hamper to carry to Leaden-hall street. I had not gone far before this man stopped me.
There were a great number of people in the house at the time I threw her down. I never went out of the room till all the rest of the people were gone; we had seven or eight pots of beer.
I went to this house. I had several pots of beer. Lego came in and blew the candles out, and said we should have no more beer there, and fell a fighting with one Morris, and said we should go. Morris and he were quarrelling together, and his wife came to take him away; then we all went out of the house. I went out first; we went into Bird's gin-shop, and drank several quarterns of gin together. Lego took another man first to the watch-house, and then came back and took me, and carried me to the Compter. I took my money out of my pocket as I was going to the Compter and put it into my shoes, for safety. I was much in liquor. I did not know what I was about. My head has been fractured, and I do not know what I am about when I am in liquor.
Did you see me take the things out of the cart?
The other man stopped me and asked me to help him up with the bag. I know nothing of it. I helped him up and he went away with it. This man came up and stopped me. He would not stop the man who had the property.
I have nothing to say to it.
Whether you saw me drop the bundle?
I know nothing of it. There was a mob of people; I stopped to see what was the matter. A man laid hold of me and said I had robbed this little boy.
About four o'clock that evening I went into a publick-house, the Kettle Drum. I staid there till past eleven o'clock; when I went to go home the door was shut. I turned from thence up Catherine-street; going along Rosemary-lane, I wanted some house to drink in; I could find none open. I went home thinking to knock my landlord up, to be let in. I met a man with these casks; he asked me to carry them to the Strand, and offered me a shilling for it. I said I would; I carried them along; he followed me. The watchman held up his lantern and asked me what I had there? I said I did not know. I laid them down and turned round to look for the man, but could not see him. The watchman laid hold of my collar, and said I must go along with him. I said I would go without his holding my collar. They took me next morning to the justice. I told them where I was quartered. They took me to the house of the landlord, and he owned the cask.
I am entirely innocent of it.
I know nothing of it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I have been backwards and forwards five or six times a day every day in my business, and they never charged me before.
They got themselves in liquor and sent for a constable and took me up. Neither of them charged me with this. I did not see their master's house till ten o'clock at night, then the rioters were gone from the house. I have been backwards and forwards five or six times every day, and they never accused me with it.
He said before the justice he only knew me by my surtout coat and round hat?
I had my own brother came to Justice Addington's; the prosecutor hardly knew which of us was the man. I am not the only person who wears a brown coat and a round hat.
There was a person but he is not here.
I did not take them I found them; I have no witnesses.
I went into the shop to ask the price of the gown; the gentleman asked me eleven shillings for it; I had it my hand and had a bag on my shoulder at the same time; I cannot say whether any of it might not be under the bag. I had some brass in the bag.
I had two or three other witnesses; they thought I should not be tried to night, so they are gone.
I heard the cry of stop thief! I saw some people; I went to see what was the matter; a man knocked me down against the rails and said I was the man.
Did you not, after the alarm, say, you knew nothing of the halfpence; that they were made up in your absence?
I was coming along Oxford-road; I went into the shop to enquire for some tobacco; there was an out-cry at the door; a person went by a short time after, that man came in and said he saw me take the halfpence; they sent for the constable and searched me for the halfpence. While they were searching me, the woman lifted up a brown linen bag and found the halfpence. My friends
were here all day yesterday; I have no friends here now but your worthy lordship and God Almighty.
I have been to sea; I am willing to go again.
Going along Giltspur-street, I saw a man with the butter flat; he asked me where I was going? I said to Spitalfields; he said he was going that way, and if I would carry it part of the way he would give me some purl; when the man stopped me he ran away. I am a white-smith; I have no witnesses.
Was I the person who entered the shop?
As I was coming by, having been at my brother's in the Minories, this man laid hold of me as a man had ran by; I never was in the shop.
There were some people here were in company with me that night from six to ten o'clock at the Thatched House, but they are not here now.
At the time I found it, I did not know whose property it was.
I went down the yard to ease myself and saw the parcel lie there; I put it on my shoulder to take it home till I found an owner for it; as I was coming out of the yard this man stopped me and took it from me.
The load is 200 wt. I could not carry it if I might have 1000 l. it is impossible to carry a knot with such an hat as this. The witness found a porter's hat in the street.
I have no other witnesses; a gentleman came to the Compter last Sunday; they said I had no occasion to provide any friends for the prosecutor would not prosecute me.
I never went there on the 16th. I burnt my arm on the 15th.
I took up the prosecutrix at St. Paul's; she directed me to carry her to Chancery-lane, the next door to the Hole in the Wall; she said I must enquire for it; I stopped and asked a woman, who said I must go a little farther and enquire; I drove there and got down and asked her if that was the place; she said she did not know, I must go into the Hole in the Wall and enquire if that was Mr. Holt's, I went in; a coachman said, I will go and shew you the door, and if my carriage is in the way I will move it; when I came there the woman was gone out of the coach, and had given her band box to a man who was by her. She went in and a man said you must assist me with this on my back; I did and put the cushions right and shut the door and went and demanded the money; when I demanded the money the man and the chest were gone; I thought the man belonged to the house; she asked me for the
chest; I told her I thought the man had got it she gave the box to. I did not observe which way the man went with it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
Whether I did not say I had got the books there and wished Justice Addington to look at them?
I have nothing particular to say, I only want my witnesses to be examined.
The first application made to me was the Thursday or Friday before Christmas day; Harris then had her doubts whether it was the shop, and did not remember me at all. They went out of the shop, and came in again. I then produced the books and laid them on the counter. She led me into an error, by saying it was ten pounds thirteen shillings. I only looked down the margin, and did not see ten pounds thirteen shillings. I had not a bed-gown in the world. I never came down in a bed-gown in my life.
Catharine Dicks is not my wife.
He took a stall for me to work in; it was so little I could not pull my arms out. We got to drinking, and I pawned them to get some drink. I was taken up as a deserter, and kept in the barracks till New Year's-day, then I was discharged, having a bad leg.
This yard is open to the people of this house and the next. There are four families live in rooms at the upper end; I live in the farthest. I was going into the yard; It was quite dark. I ran against the horse and it fell down and broke the window. Mrs. Bryan called out to know what was the matter? I said I had broke the window. She said if that was all never mind. I went into my room, and staid a quarter of an hour. Then I was going out for something for supper, and she came and said I had got her counterpane. I know nothing of it.
He did not swear to me at first; he looked very hard at me, and said he did not know me.
On the 28th of November I was pressed, in Covent-garden, and sent on board the Nightingale. I was drafted on board a ship which was lost on Beachy-head, and came home on the 31st of January.
I was so much in liquor I did not know what I did.
I got in liquor; I went down to the necessary and fell asleep. My master came down and found me there. I did not take any silk; it is possible lying asleep some might stick to my clothes or buttons of my coat. Such a thing has happened. I never confessed taking it.
The prosecutor came to the Compter and wanted me to raise a small matter to make it up with me. He has been a prisoner himself.
There were two women came out of the shop with the parcel, and dropped it at the door. I picked it up as I came by.
When you asked me if I was ever in the pond, did I not say I will reserve that for another occasion?
You said I gave nine shillings a brace for the fish?
Whether Etherington did not tell you it was in a field that he was going to catch fish?
Did it appear to you to be a garden?
Was there a bank to this place like a field?
You did not know it was Mrs. Tuck's pond?
What did I give for the fish I bought at Walthamstow?
Did I confess the fact?
Did Mr. Cater say I brought them, or that William Etherington brought them?
I have some witnesses to call to prove where I bought these fish. It is not possible for a person to know fish one among another.
Could you swear positively to your fish if they were brought into court?
There are a great many white under the belly?
I believe they change their colour; sometimes they are brown and turn?
Mr. Wright said he saw me buy some fish about fifty-seven. Here has been a great spite and animosity towards me in Alderman Townsend.
He is one of my securities to the present sheriff.
The securities are in court?
I had a pair of stockings lying about the room: when he took the stockings up, I thought they were my own; but as to these other stockings, I know nothing of them: what I might say in my fright I cannot tell; but the lodging does not belong to me.
I have been to sea. I was an attorney's clerk. I was going down the Haymarket; this woman asked me to go home with her; I went home with her, and slept with her; in the morning Jealous came up, put a pistol to my head, and took me out of bed: I said I was ready to go with him. He searched the room, and brought these stockings out of the cupboard; I said, do not take any thing there, for they may be my stockings.
The money I bought the clothes with, and what I had about me, I received for the plans I have in my hand. The day I went from my lodging, I was obliged to go to Rickmansworth in Hertfordshire. I sent a letter to my landlord, that I should be back in a few days. I had before left my lodging, and had sent a similar letter to my landlord, and returned at the time stated in the letter. I often borrowed halfpence and silver; not because I had not money, but because I did not like to break my gold. My witnesses are not here, because I did not expect my trial to come on so soon. Will your Lordship indulge me so far as to ask Mr. Davis how I behaved whilst I was in his house?
Whether you did not say the man that took the watch, had an apron on?
I heard the cry of Stop thief! a man laid hold of me, and said I had stole the watches; he took me back to the shop. I am very innocent of it: I never was in the shop, nor near it. I am a breeches-maker.
I am a broker. I wanted to buy a jack; he had two in the sale; I saw they would not do; I left the sale, and went about some other business: some time after, going to Islington (Molding's is a house I generally call at) there was a woman in the room facing the street had some things to sell, wearing apparel, and this curtain; she asked me a guinea and a half for it; at last we agreed for 22 s. I asking Mold ing to lend me a guinea, he did, and I left the curtain with him; I called on a Mr. Brown; he went with me; I called for the curtain; he looked at it, and bid me 18 s. for it: the next day I called upon Mrs. Mills, and I sold it to her for 1 l. 6 s. 6 d. about a fortnight after that I was taken into custody.
I live in Marybone-lane. About the 23d of January I was going down Bond-street to Mr. Bolton's, the Golden Cross, at Charing-Cross, to agree to paint some carriages, about the hour of eight; there was an outcry of Stop thief! I saw a parcel of people running in Bond-street; I ran after them; I went up another street, leading to Oxford-Road; there was a man laid hold of me, and charged me with taking a piece of linen out of a draper's shop.
I bought the fowls in Leadenhall market.
I am entirely innocent of what I am accused of; I was at home at my own house, all the evening Mr. Darby was robbed, with my wife; and, being so near a relation, I did not think it would be of any use to trouble the court with her: I let the garret to Edward Noon ; he was tried for this, and convicted; I did not know what way of life he followed; I am entirely innocent; I hope you will be convinced I am not guilty of it.
I found the copper in the morning beyond the rope-walk.
I know nothing at all about the matter: several people lodge in the house besides me.
I never saw the shoes nor buckles: the prosecutrix asked me if I had taken them out of a joke.
I leave my defence to my counsel. Gater said before the justice, it was a man in a light-coloured coat put the cloth under the window. - No; I described him to be in a dark-coloured coat and round hat; he took it from the window, and went away with it.
This man swore before the justice, he found the hat in the middle of the field, and the knife thirty yards from it; Mr. Savage said before the justice, he found me in a ditch, with a great coat on, and believed I had changed my clothes.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I bought that top of a castor of a peddling Jew.
Going through Cranbourne-alley, I picked up this cloak, and asked the people thereabouts whose it was; I went through St. Martin's court, and these people came after me; I have been three months in gaol; I have lost all my toes in the frost.
I am entirely innocent. I met a young woman, who asked me if I bought old clothes; I told her I did; I said I would come on Monday, and see them; I went to this house, and found the door on a jar, and I went in; I met this young woman; I asked her if Mrs. Dixon lived there, for the woman told me her name was Dixon; she said, no: I went out; I never was in the parlour; I went up the court to go into Windmill-street; I found there was no thoroughfare; I went into the coach-house to ease myself, and the man came and took hold of me: I know nothing of it.
I went into the house to enquire for a coachman; being in liquor, I might throw the shirt down; I went to pick it up; I do not know any thing of it.
It is the first time I was ever taken up in my life; before the justice, Mr. Allen said he would give me two guineas to get me a place, and withdraw the prosecution, if it cost him 40 l.
I am not guilty of the fact.
I am very innocent; I never did such a thing in my life.
Whether, when Noon was tried, you said I owned the counterpane to be mine?
I am as innocent as the child unborn.
Whether there was not a coach passing, and I ran to avoid it?
Coming along I met the boy; he seemed very tired; he asked me to help him carry his box; I carried it for him most part of the way. I was going down the steps at London-street; I happened to miss him; I came back again, and enquired after a black boy; nobody could inform me any thing of him: going across Billiter-lane, somebody called after me, Stop! I thought it was some people playing the fool; as I came into Leadenhall-street, they called Stop! Stop! I stopped presently; they asked me where I was going; I said to my sister's; and they took me to the watch-house.
I did not steal the handkerchief; I picked it up in the street, and put it into my pocket.
I am guilty of the charge.
I was going to market; a man asked me to earn a groat by carrying this flat to the Mansion-house: as soon as Davis laid hold of me, the man that put it on my back ran away.
I was coming by Leather-lane, in the afternoon, about seven or eight o'clock; some fellows ran by me with cutlasses, and there was a noise; I found the door open; I stepped in; upon which these men took hold of me by the neck, and dragged me along a long kitchen; they frightened me; I did not know what they meant; in a quarter of an hour after, they brought in a bag of clothes, and said I was up stairs; one of the men said he left the door open on purpose to catch somebody.
I heard the cry of Stop thief! I ran after the person; I fell down; this man came and picked me up, and said I was one of his companions: the gentleman took these things out of the fire place, and said I had them in my pocket.
The last witness said I laid out on the 31st; I believe that was not the night the robbery was committed. I know nothing of it at all; I paid Kirby money, but can't tell what it was.
I never saw the house; I never was near the place. I am a joiner and carpenter.
I met this woman: she went and drank with me; she went home, and came out again, and walked with me; she said she was dry; we went into the Chequers, and had four pints of beer; I paid for two, and she paid for two: she wanted to go to bed, and asked me to go home with her; I was a stranger; I did not know the way to her home; she asked me to take her to somewhere to lie down; I took her to an house, and took a bed for her; I gave 1 s. 6 d. for it. When we went to bed, she said she had lost her money; I said I had no money but to pay for the bed; I went to bed with her; she waked at six in the morning, and waked me, and said, she was vexed about her money; I said I knew nothing of it; she said, did not I promise to give her some over-night? I said, I did not promise her any money; I had none to give her; she said, what must she do to go home! and she gave me a cloak, an apron, and handkerchief, to pawn for her; I could not get what she wanted; I was bringing them back, and the man laid hold of me and took me up.
A soldier asked me to sell these buckles for him; he shewed me a place where to sell them; he stood in the street. I went and sold them for 20 s. and gave him the money; I knew him by sight; I do not know where he is; I have never seen him since.
I had these things of a man to carry to James-street.
I never took any wool out of Mr. Harris's house. I have been so exceeding ill, I have not had time to send for any body. There have been things taken from me that would have supported me in the Compter.
Coming from Oxford-road up Newgate-street, they laid hold of me. I told them I was innocent.
On the Friday that this gentleman says he was robbed, I was at work at a Mrs. Brown's, carrying coals out by the bushel: I went to bed at my mother's that same night. I have nobody to call but my mother. Mayne came to the prison to me, and said I need not be afraid; for I was innocent of the robbery.
I went into that place which is open to any body. I saw the bundle lying in the dog-kennel, and I took it up: I was not in the warehouse.
I am a weaver. I left off work at ten at night. I was coming home; I saw a mob, and ran to see what was the matter.
Coming home from Moorfields, I saw two men, who were crying out, Stop thief! I saw a man in white. I said, There he runs. I went to lay hold of him, and the fellow threw the things at me; and then this gentleman catched hold of me, and said I was the thief.
I had been to Chelsea: coming back I met a woman, that I believe is a woman of the town. I went into this house, and called for sixpen'orth of brandy and water. I went up into a room with her; I do not know what she did there. I took the gown from her, and came away with it, as she had cheated me out of all my money. I thought they might be pursuing me on account of her gown.
I was going into this house: I met a post-chaise boy at the door with a post-chaise: I gave him 2 s. for this bundle.
I worked at this warehouse: the watchman that had the charge of the warehouse at night, said he wanted some butter for his family, and he and one Thomas Mardon agreed to take this butter away, and the watchman delivered the butter into a boat. I came a-shore with it from Ratcliff-cross, and this man stopped me, and asked what it was; I said it was butter I had from the country.
Whether you found any thing upon me?
Whether she saw me upon the house?
I got over the rails into this house, to see after the thieves: I was going into the yard, and they knocked me down; and, before I could recover myself, this man came and took me.
That is not the hat I had.
I am guilty of the fact.
I am as innocent as the child unborn. I have a witness will prove it.
I was going to Hammersmith. I asked a man to let me get up in the waggon. I got up. I laid hold of the rope, and it broke, and the hamper fell down upon me. I could not get down, for fear of the box falling upon me: and the man came and laid hold of me.
Sir John Hawkins promised me, when he tried me, if I behaved well, he would endeavour to get me off in a few months.
Whether I was by myself, or any body along with me?
Whether he saw me attack that gentleman, or that gentleman attack me?
I know nothing at all of the man. I am a bricklayer by trade, and work in Tottenham-court-road. I had been at work there five days and a quarter, the week before. In going home, between ten and eleven in the evening, as I was going along the foot-way, I heard a woman scream out, Murder! I ran to her assistance. I saw a man heave a pistol out of his hand. The gentleman has got it. As he run away, I took it up, and still was running to the gentlewoman's assistance. Before I got there, I was knocked down by one of those gentlemen, and beat in a most terrible manner. I have no witnesses here.
I went into this house: the girls he was in company with asked me to drink. About ten o'clock we went to bed: I got up about four in the morning, and went down to Deptford to my work, on board a Spanish prize.
I did not take the ladder with an intent to steal it.
I had been with some friends: I was drinking; and was rather in liquor: I went part of the way home with them. Returning home again, I tumbled against this gentleman; and he shoved me off, and halloo'd out, and said I wanted to rob him. I went away: he cried, Stop thief! and they stopped me. The gentleman was agreeable to let me go for a soldier: I told him I was a soldier. Then the justice committed me to Bridewell.
I am a friendless lad, just come from abroad. My mother was on her death-bed: I left her about one o'clock. I saw this property lay down, and Richard Hunter saw me pick it up.
Before the justice, he said, To the best of his knowledge, he believed, I was the person; now he swears positively to me.
I know nothing about it. I leave myself; to the mercy of the court.
He knows I desired them to be advertised.
On the 15th of June, I got up about four in the morning. Between four and five, I saw a boat driving up the river. She was near the shore. I made to her, and stopped her; and seeing these things, I took them to Mr. Bankes's, to find an owner for them. Mr. Bankes promised to advertise them, and gave me nine shillings. He said, when he found an owner, he would take care I should have something; and he sent Cooper out with a note, to find the owner.
I took that farthing in change for a pint of beer.
I never saw the prosecutor till they were taking me to the public-house.
On which side was the pocket?
When my master met me, and asked me where I was going, I went back to my work, for fear he should scotch me a quarter of a day, because I had left my work rather too soon. I had some chips and a piece of wood in my apron: I shewed my master the piece of wood afterwards.
On the 23d of August, I saw a cart unloading with bricks, four doors below my dwelling-house. I was coming by with a cask of beer. I asked the man if he was coming again with this job: he said, he should know when he was unloaded. He came up to my dwelling-house, and said he was coming again on the morrow. I told him, if he came again to that job, to bring me 150 bricks. He said, What sort? I said, It made no difference; but the commoner they are, the better they will suit me; for they are for a necessary, for a gentleman who has built a house two doors higher. He said, he should come on the morrow, without fail. I said, If you come, bring 150, but bring a receipt. He said he would. I had never seen the man before. The following day 150 bricks were brought. The bricks came in a cart, apparently full. He asked me where they were to be set down. I shewed him. He put down 150 bricks, and said, Master, where is the money? I said, Where is the receipt? D - n your blood, said he, I brought no receipt; you don't mean to pay for them, I suppose. I said, Bring a receipt to my house when you will; there is the money. I never saw any more of the man till a warrant was obtained of Justice Wilmot. On the Monday following, one of the witnesses brought a warrant in, and said it was for stealing 200 stock bricks. I thought it was for taking more than I agreed for; that made me deny the fact. I said, The man left no more than 150 bricks here. He said, What did you pay for them? I said, I had not paid for them. I was taken down to the watch-house: I was continued there all night. The next day, when I was before Justice Wilmot, he would hardly hear me or my friends speak; and so I kept these words to declare on my trial.
I met with a woman, and gave her 2 s. to let me lie with her. She robbed me of 2 s. I was going away, down Duke-street, and the watchman stopped me.
Going along Tower-street, a man came, and asked me to take that rope to Milk-street: he said they had some wine to pull up: he was dressed as the wine-porters are. I had not gone far before they laid hold of me. They often employ us. We carry ropes all over the town for them: we never ask whose property they are. I am as innocent as the child unborn. If they were to give it me, I should not know what to do with it.
They used me very ill. I wanted to go to the place, to see if the man would come, that hired me to carry it.
The prosecutor offered to make it up, if my friends would give him 20 l. and he said, if they would not, he would hang me, if there was not another man in London. I know nothing of it.
The prosecutor met me. I stopped to make water. He behaved in an indecent manner. I halloa'd out, Watch! He took to his heels, and ran. The watchmen ran after us. He ran down Horse-shoe alley. I followed him, and brought him back to the watchman, and gave charge of him for what he had done. After that, he said I robbed him of 5 s.
Prisoner to Bowman. Did you run after us both?
Two young lads went down, as they said, to see their aunt; and they brought these things to me in a handkerchief, and desired me to carry them.
I am a Danish seaman: I have been but five weeks in this country.
He wanted me and three more to go on board an Indiaman. I would not go. He took the other three men on board the Indiaman, and because I would not go, he charged me with stealing these things. I was coming out of the house with a comrade, and picked up a bit of cloth. I said to him, that would do to put about my leg, and put it in my pocket. For two days nobody owned it. When he took me, I told him I found it. I believe he has sent the man out of the way that was with me, that he might not appear.
On the 8th of October, I had been to see a relation in Brook-street; crossing the way, I picked up this umbrella. This man came up, and said, it was stole. Upon that I threw it down, and said, If it was stolen, I had nothing to do with it. I had found it.
I never was in the prosecutor's apartment in my life. I told him to search my room on the Tuesday, to see if there was any thing of his. I know no more than what I told him of.
I was very ill in bed at the time. I did not expect my trial so soon this morning: my friends are not come. I know no more about it than the child unborn.
I am a coachman. I was sent for. This gentleman helped me to lift the man into the coach. He was never on the coach-seat. He was in the bottom. His watch fell out of his pocket. I took it up, and put it into my great-coat pocket. When I came out of the coach, the gentleman said, I had the watch. I said, if he was his friend, he might take the watch, and I gave it him.
The prosecutor saw me afterwards, and did not know me again.
I should be obliged to your lordship to ask Mr. Young, whether Frogley did not come out of the empty house, with the things, and say, Here they are.
I know nothing at all about it. The man said, he knocked me down. I asked them all at the watch-house, to look at me, to see if there were any marks of my having been knocked down.
They promised me, if I would tell where the spoon was, they would not prosecute me.
I was in distress. I went to the parish, and they would give me only sixpence, to get me a lodging.
I had a parcel of a person in Smithfield: he was to give me 1 s. to carry it to Fleet-market.
I have proof I was at home at the time this man says I was there; but they are not here now.
I have nothing to say.
I never had the key.
I had been into Monmouth-street, that evening to get a pair of shoes, as I was coming from the shop, I heard this gentleman cry stop thief, just by the end of Crown Court, he stopped me, and asked me if I had any property about me, I said no; they took me into the shop, and another person pickt up the handkerchiefs; I did not take them.
I have nothing to say; have no witnesses; I am a soldier but received my discharge.
Whether he shoved against me by the lamp-post?
Whether ever I cockt a pistol at his head?
I never attempted to touch him.
Whether I picked him up myself off the ground, and the last witness, this watchman, came up, and I never stirred.
One of the witnesses said a ball; I want to ask whether it was loaded with shot or ball?
I never robbed him nor any man in my life.
I leave it to my counsel.
My lord, I was a customer at the house for beer, I came in and said to the old gentlewoman, I want a pot of beer and change for a shilling, and the gentlewoman said you have dropt something, I said I had dropt nothing; then I went into the taproom, and the gentlewoman said that is what he has dropt; I said do what you will with me, and they took me up, and sent for the constable, he said I must go with him to the Compter; then I went before the Lord Mayor, he asked her if it was her cloak, she said she valued it at half a guinea; he asked her if she could prove I dropt it, she said no; the Lord Mayor said I commit this man to the Compter, they called the landlord, he said he knew nothing of it. I know no more of it than the child unborn; I have four witnesses below, I cannot read English, their names are on this paper, Myles, Daniel, Cole, and Hendricks.
I cannot tell who he was.
By selling lemons, and sometimes cloaths; get 10 s. or 8 s. a week.
My lord, the firkin of butter was put down in the corner of the street, and I took it up, and carried it to the post on purpose for somebody to own it; I did not take it out of the shop, nor never stole it, have no witnesses.
I am porter at the four swans, Bishopsgate-street, I was in that Inn yard at half past one, I went with an order of Hinde's and Butterfield's, I saw nothing in Bishopsgate-street; as I was coming back, the turnkey of the Poultry, said, I must go with him, I told him my name and my business; this gentleman said, he saw a carman take a basket off my back, I was very contented, I neither saw the basket nor the cart.
She says she saw me roll it out of the road; says she saw that young man take it out of the road, and put it down there in the ditch, and as soon as that man came up to her, I went up and asked her if she wanted any thing, as I thought she might have heard something of it; she said no; I stood there, it was twenty yards from the box she says, and it was not seven yards; she told him at first she saw me roll it out of the path-way, then said I put it in the ditch. I have no witnesses; I did not see the box at all till I came close by Stamford Hill; the box lay in the road, I rolled it on the path-way; this woman coming along I asked if she wanted any thing, she said no, nothing of me; I thought she might have heard something of it.
I had been to Wimbledon; I was tired, and went there to rest myself an hour or two; as I was afraid of the dogs there, I did not stand up on the tiles, nor go into the window they speak of; I have no witnesses; they never saw me meddle with any thing of these people's property.
A man gave me the coat to carry; he was to give me sixpence to carry it into Shoreditch. I have no witnesses here.
I was at a house and called for a pint of purl, and this other man was drinking there, as soon as I drank my purl, I went out of the house to go home, I overtook this gentleman at the bottom of Ludgate-hill, he was reeling about, much in liquor, I advised him to go home, he would not, I joaked with him, I said I suppose you are like me, says he, what do you mean, says I, are you locked in the street, no, says he, but I don't chuse to go home to disturb my family and servants; another man came up, and he said, I don't want you, the gentleman was much in liquor, he did not know what to do, we got a coach, and got into it, he pulled the tobacco-box out, and it dropped down, he was very much in liquor, and with the movement of the coach he fell asleep, instead of putting his handkerchief in his pocket, he put it down on the seat of the coach; I called to the coachman, and said there was something dropped down in the coach; I stooped and picked up the handkerchief and box, he put them in my pocket, he was very much in liquor, he could hardly get out of the coach; when he got out, he pulled out a shilling, and a half guinea, and some half-pence, I said, I had some silver and would pay it for him. I thought the gentleman would forget, I had laid out the eighteen-pence for him, and I took the half guinea out of his hand, says he directly you have robbed me, says I, I have got none but your half guinea as security, if you give me the eighteen-pence, you shall have it directly, no, says he, you have robbed me. I gave him the half-guinea again, he said, I had robbed him of three or four guineas; I had but one guinea about me, with some silver, I paid the coachman. The next morning they asked me how I came by the tobacco box, and the handkerchief; I told them the same I do now to you. They would not hear me, I have no witnesses here, they are gone, I asked the coachman, I said have you seen me rob the gentleman? No, says he, the gentleman is drunk and mad.
Mr. Beauchamp makes it out, as if no other person was in the shop; there was during the time I was in the shop, that young boy there; he cannot say I declared my name was M'Carty; I declared my name was Hevey; I said I would indorse my name if there was any occasion for it, he said there was not, the bill was good without it.
I came from Oxford to Watford, and from Watford to Edgware; I was much tired, it was ten minutes after eleven, I asked a man where I could lay down a little while; the man shewed me this gentleman's house, and said I might lay in the stable; I went there with an intention to lay down, I have no witnesses here.
I never took them out of the shop at all; a man asked me to carry them for him.
The young woman I keep company with brought it to me, and told me to go and pawn it, and if I was stopped, to tell them I got it at a raffle.
The spoon I found, and as there was no mark upon it, I thought I had a right to sell it.
I have nothing to say for myself, no otherwise than I deliver myself up as a man dying innocent of the thing, and they are innocent of it, both of them.
I have done all that lay in my power to save the man's life; I hope you will recommend me to mercy.
I have nothing to say, but I hope for mercy; I have no witnesses.
My life is taken away for want of my friends coming to speak for me; I cannot send for my witnesses, because I am confined, I can get nobody to fetch them; I have been in the cells, and I have not a friend to send for them; my landlord knows I was at home in Cow Cross, I spent the afternoon there, and was with my friends till eleven o'clock at night. It is very hard my life must be taken away, because I cannot send for my friends.
I was in great distress, an execution was put out against me, and I had two summonses at Guildhall, I have been six weeks ill, and a doctor attended me from the dispensatory; I took them to pledge them, to pay for the execution, and as I had some money promised me in a month or six weeks, then I thought to take the things out, and put them back as I found them, on the counter; I have no witnesses; there were some gentlemen here yesterday and the day before, to appear to my character.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury, I am innocent of the affair, I leave it entirely to my counsel.
I was going by, I don't know who laid hold of me, I turned my head round, somebody was pulling me, I took it to be the man that chucked my hat into the cart; I never had the property in my hands, I was going home, down Golden-lane.
I was walking along, down Golden-lane, in my way home, two men came walking after me, I was passing the cart, one pushed me, the other chucked my hat into the cart; I thought it no harm to get up in the cart to take my hat, I just put the hat on with my right hand, and laid hold of something with my left, by pulling me strong, it came down, I thought it was the man that pulled my hat off my head, I always worked very hard for my living, I never did such a thing in my life; my witnesses have been here since Wednesday morning, they are not here now.
I never saw the glasses till I saw them there; the second time I was at the justice's, they consented for me to serve his Majesty, or go into the East India Company's service; I went and had my irons knocked off, went before the justice, and went to St. Mildred's court in the Poultry; the Doctor searched me, and they did not approve of me, as I had a rupture they said, they took me back to gaol; I take it to be nothing; Dr. Dale examined me himself at home, when I came to him, he said it was a rupture; I have the same complaint still.
I never saw the glasses before the Justice, nor no where else, till now.
I was in the house drinking, but I know nothing of the coat, I never saw it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I was out on the 11th of April. William Howard and William Downs came together to my house, as my wife informed me, and desired to leave this collar upon the shelf.
I did not take the money.
I heard the alarm of Stop thief! I saw several people before me, so I ran on very briskly; I never had the trunk.
A man employed me to carry the table for him.
I saw these shoes lying on the ground, and picked them up.
I can bring plain proof where I was, the same hour she was robbed, ten miles off.
I know no more of it than the child in my mother's womb.
Before the justice, I asked the prosecutor what dress I was in at the time he supposed that I robbed him: he said, the same dress I had on then. I have a person to prove I bought the coat I had on, four days after the robbery.
I should be glad to go to sea.
Wken I went in in the morning, I kicked my foot against this bag; I took it up to see what it was; then I took it up to the second story; he called after me, and I put it down on the stairs.
I know nothing at all about the matter.
I had given orders to a taylor to make me clothes of a maroon colour; I thought these had been the clothes.
Davis came to me from the country; she was a destitute girl. I got her a place; she staid in that place about four months, and then came to me ill, and wanted me to get her into the hospital. I asked her, what was the matter? She said, she was ashamed to tell. I said, Betty, you have been playing the fool; she said, she had. I advised her to get into her own country. She came to me afterwards, and solicited my charity, to carry her into the country; she said she was not in place, and was better; and I gave her 15 s. in halfpence, to carry her into her own country.
I am innocent.
I went to see a master I served my time with, in Moor-lane; I then went about some business of my master's. I went up an entry to make water; while I was stooping, my shoe having slipped down at heel, they laid hold of me. I do not know any thing of that gentlewoman's place. I never was up in it.
I was going home to my barrack: I stopped to make water against some old ropes that were by the warehouse, and found this bag, took it up to carry to my barracks, to shew it to my comrades. This man came and laid hold of me, and asked me what I had got; I said I did not know, I was going to my barrack to see that.
I was drinking with him all night; we were at a house in Long-acre; he came with me from thence to Red-lion street, Holborn, before he charged me with any thing; he would drink at almost every house that he could find open; he said the next morning, if I would give him a guinea, he would make it up. I said I was but a poor man, I believed I could raise half a guinea; he said we must go before the justice to have a proper discharge. When we came there, he swore point blank that I took the money out of his pocket.
I am a porter . Going through the Church-yard, two gentlemen called me, and asked me to carry a chest of tea to Smithfield. I said I had not my knot. They said they would give me a shilling. I said I would endeavour to carry it. I was going with them for the chest; they told me to wait, and they would bring it out to me; they brought it out, and lifted it on my back; they said they would follow me; they bid me go through Honey-lane Market. When they stopped me, I told them two gentlemen gave it me, and they were behind me.
I leave my defence to my counsel. John Tinnent told me it was overplus that was given him by the warehouseman; he did not like to dispose of them, and asked me to get them off.
I never was in the stable, nor never meddled with the saddles.
I am very innocent.
I was ordered to go to this house to enquire for a particular person; I went into the house; I could not make any body hear; I went up stairs; these people met me, and said I wanted to rob the house. I am as innocent as the child unborn.
A man came into a house where I was drinking in Leather-lane; he put the bundle upon the table, and went away and left it. I took the bundle up, and went to my lodgings; I was locked out, and so walked about all night. I met Dixon and Macdonald; they took the bundle from me. The next day they sent me to Chatham for a marine; the day after, the prosecutrix laid an information of her being robbed, and then they fetched me up again: they do it through spite.
The bundle was given me in the street by a gentleman.
I know nothing of the tankard.
I am innocent. I never had the cloth.
I took this note of one Mr. John Jones , who told me he was going to live at Dartford; he had value received for it, on my account. The goods this man has stated that I sold to Mr. Cook, is false, I always served Mr. Talbot. That gentleman knows Mr. Talbot.
This gentleman represented himself as a schoolmaster, going to live at Dartford .
I never was in that man's shop in my life.
I say I never had the bill: I never was in that gentleman's shop. I have not had time to subpoena my witnesses, or I could have proved by witnesses where I was when the bill was paid away. I never wrote that name John Ward , nor at the Dun-horse, in my life.
The man struck at me, and knocked me down, and the pistol went off accidentally.
I am innocent of what they charge me with.
Whether I was the person that was in the room with him, or that brought him into the room?
Was you drunk or sober then?
I came from Bow to an acquaintance, where I was taken. The prosecutor was several times in a room with this woman, and left his watch with her.
I am sixty-five years of age. I have lived in London thirty-eight years. I was never called in question for any thing in my life, I have no witnesses. I was always a clear man, thank God, before this time; and then I was very much in liquor.
I was coming through the court. I heard somebody cry, Stop thief! I went to get out of the way, as I had a bad arm. Somebody that ran by, dropped something; and they happened to lay hold of me.
I have not a friend in the world. I hope your Lordship will let me go abroad.
I found a pocket-book on the last Saturday of the old year, in Cheapside; I put it into my pocket. I did not look at it 'till the Sunday after; then I found there were six notes in it: I put the notes into my pocket, and threw the pocket-book away. I went on Tuesday to Mr. Noble's, and bought a pair of shoe-buckles, a shirt-buckle, and a pair of buttons, and changed a 20 l. note.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
A bill came payable upon Mr. Waller, while I was with him; he asked me to come and stay, while I was out of place. The man who had the bill came, and said, he would trouble him, if he did not pay it. Mr. Waller desired me to take these things to Mr. Rochfort's, and pawn them, which I did: I passed as his nephew, and he as my uncle, in the court where he lived. When I took them to pawn, Mrs. Rochfort asked, if her man should go and speak with my uncle; I said, Yes. When she found I was willing that her man should go with me to my uncle, she was satisfied. I drank harder than I should do; I lost some of the money, and was afraid to return.
I think it was 30 l. Mr. Watson, of St. Alban's-street, Pall-Mall, had the bill: the money was to be paid by Mr. Waller to Mr. Watson; Mr. Waller neglected going to Mr. Watson for three or four days, and it was he threatened Mr. Waller.
I gave the gentlewoman her things again immediately.
I gave the gentlewoman her things again, and she told me when she came down to Tothill-fields Bridewell she did not intend to prosecute me; I did not expect she would have appeared against me; I did not send for any witnesses.
My Lord, and gentlemen of the Jury, I was at Birmingham that very evening, and I was on the road all the night this robbery was laid to my charge; I subpoened the landlord of the house, and the coachman; but they say, they will not say any thing without I pay them five guineas a piece: please to hear me another word; Mr. Wilmot's clerk went to the men, and desired them not to say a word till I paid them the money.
It was only the 7th day of this month that I was committed; they could not forget me: the coach was not full, which made their memory the stronger.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I was sent for a marine and I was not accepted of; then they took me up again, my Lord.
The other man lodged in the house before I came; I was below cleaning my cloaths for duty, I went into the room and he had these things in his knapsack, he bid me bring one, and he took the other, we went to Mr. Franklin's and sold the things: and on the Sunday morning this gentleman clapped a blunderbuss to my breast and stopped me, I laid down the knapsack, and he promised not to hurt us if we told him where the property was, and we did: there is nobody to my character.
I am quite innocent. I did not know my trial would come on so soon.
My Lord, I have two witnesses out of the country; here is a gentleman in court which met them going home, which is Mr. Kirby; I had them with me two hours this morning: they are at the Four Kings.
I am ballotted to go to Greenwich Hospital; I had been at Marybone; coming down where this man was coming, I saw something hanging on the pales; I thought it had been a large tub; I was so curious, I found it to be a large copper; I did not attempt to take it away; as to the iron bars, I never saw any: I am quite innocent.
When they searched me I had not a farthing in the world, and my poor wife in the workhouse.
Hughes knocked me down, and kicked me; I called watch several times.
I am innocent.
I went into the public-house, and called for some liquor, I was very much in liquor; how the plates came into my basket, I do not know.
I lived five years with Lord Exeter, and three years with the Earl of Warwick, and with the Duke of Chandos, as footman.
I have had a great deal of sickness: I have been a hay-making, I left my fork at a gentlemen's house.
I had been to Knights-Bridge to my uncle, I was coming down Picadilly, I heard the cry of Stop thief! the man came and laid hold of me; I never saw the trunk; I was there by accident, I was going home about my business; my friends are all in the country.
The woman never swore the least thing in life to me; only to James West before the Justice.
Mr. Sherwood asked her if West was the man, she said yes, she could swear to that man by the roughness of his face; he asked her if she knew me, she said no; I was committed directly; I was turned out last sessions by proclamation.
I have followed my lawful business.
I am very innocent; I was coming from my daily labour, I went home to my wife, she was gone out, I went to the Britannia, near Limehouse church, there I had a pint of beer; I met West coming over the fields, says I Jem, what have you got here? he said, they are some things that I picked up: I said, I wish I could get out of your way, and this gentleman came up and took me.
The coat was laying on the ground when I crossed the highway, this man crossed and asked me where I got it, and I told him I picked it up. I am a sugar baker ; I have no friends here, they did not know I should be tried to-night.
Concerning what the little girl has declared now about my putting my hand into the hole, it is as false as God is true; I will relate the case to you as nigh as I can: I went to work for the prosecutor about nine on the Tuesday, about a quarter before eleven he went out, about a quarter after eleven Watts called upon me; he looked into the door, and asked to speak with me; I did not want to have any discourse with him there, I had pawned his great coat, and I was not willing he should know it; we went from the door about three yards, he told me he wanted a pair of breeches; I was to call on him that night; he asked me to take part of a pint of beer, I mentioned a house; I came back immediately; he said he would go and get a beefsteak; I got on the board, and staid about a quarter of an hour; then it wanted about fifteen minutes of twelve; I thought I might as well go off and come to work before one: I had occasion to go up to the necessary, and by the time that I had got through the passage and into the yard, the girl was in the room where the property is reported to lay; I goes into the yard, and saw the door a-jar; I made a little bit of stand, and looked at it; I heard the prosecutor's daughter ask who had been in the room? the last child was in the yard at the same time; I said I wondered to see the door open; I went into the room; she asked me if I had been in the room? I asked her how it was possible? says she, have you not got out silver spoons and milk pot? says I, how can I? she said she was only joking; she said she would run away, and would stay no longer; I told her she should not go away, nor I neither, till her father came home: I called Mr. Elphinstone, and told him the story that I believed the place had been robbed; the publican came over, and he was the first, I believe, that entered the house after the robbery; I sent for Mr. Grant, who came in presently: there is one Mr. Cooper that lays in the same room where this property lay; Mr. Grant told me he knew who the thief was; I asked him if he suspected me? he said no: at last he divulged his mind, that he suspected this Cooper, who lays in the room where the money was, but works up stairs; the prosecutor got a search-warrant, I never quitted the room; I wanted to make water; I would not stir because there should be no suspicion; Cooper's room was searched, but nothing was found; Mr. Grant said I might as well go, and I went to Bow-street; there a man, named Gregory, came in and enquired into the affair; the prosecutor felt the lump that was at the bottom of my pocket before we went to the Justice's he said it was not worth ripping; I did not know what it was myself; after pulling all the things out of my pocket, Gregory said here is something here; I said I had observed it before; the prosecutor ripped it, and if it had been in the pocket he would not have made a word of the matter, but being concealed in the lining, he said I believe I know something of this handkerchief; I said I am sure you do not, it is a rag I carry meat in sometimes when I go to work; he said he would ask his wife to be more thoroughly convinced; I said I wish you would, I can bring witnesses where the handkerchief came from; I waited in the tap-room till he returned; he said we shall hear further about it, and he spoke very freely of this Mr. Cooper; however, we all went to the Justice's, and went through our examinations. Concerning this handkerchief, I had it, so help me God, (there is a just God that knows the secrets of every thing, I would not tell a lie on this account) I had it in my possession the Saturday before; I imagine I put this rag in at the top part of my pocket which was ripped, and it must go in between the lining and the cloth: on the Sunday morning I said to a person who will be here, says I, give me a needle and thread, this hole pothers me; I sewed up the hole, and by that means did not recollect any thing of any thing being between the lining and the bottom of the coat; and when this place came to be ripped, no more thought of any thing of the kind being there than any thing; I saw directly when it was pulled out what it was; he swore that was the very handkerchief his money was counted in; she said she knew it to be hers by the border; I imagine they washed it; they swore to it a second time after keeping it in their own possession: the girl starts up, says she, I know it by the holes in it; so I was committed. I hope you will take it into consideration: how can any person think I could rob this man of his property, and make away with it, and few this rag in the lining of my coat? I think it is something very inconsistent to think of any such thing.
This tobacco was my allowance that I had every night since last Christmas; it is a rule in the trade to give us an allowance; five pounds twelve ounces I bought; and sometimes I got double that allowance.
I know nothing of it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I am as innocent as the child unborn; I know no more of it than any of you, Gentlemen; I have people to prove where I was at supper on the Tuesday night.
It is all a falsity, I never said any such thing.
Which of them was it snatched the bundle?
Last Friday as I was coming up Holborn-hill, I met this gentleman and another man, one said to the other, that is him; I said what do you want with me; they said have you a mind to do any good for yourself? I said what do you mean? he said if you know of any foot pad robbery, or any thing that will fetch us any thing, we will let you go; they felt my pockets, I said do you want money, they said no; and they told me the same story when they took me up to the watch-house; then they said I have two bills I can bring against you: and the man said when the children came, says he, mind this is him.
I hope you will have mercy on me, and send me to Africa for life; I went out in my own clothes, and I did not cut my irons, I slipped them over my heel, my Lord; the door was opened for me; Mr. Pitt kept the door, he did not know it was me.
I am very sorry to give the court the trouble, I acknowledge I got through the hole, my irons was not off, I never had any intention, till I saw other prisoners go that have been taken since, and forgiven; even my irons were not off, and I had not so much as a knife about me; I never was out of sight, even people followed me into the house. My Lord, I beg for mercy.
I am innocent.
I went from Mr. Nelson, a cyder merchant, to get some empty casks to go to Harrison's wharf, which were marked, and I happened to take this; I was not sober, I did not pretend to hide it; I did not take it to steal it. My master had several of the same size.
I know nothing of it.
It was out of a point of necessity, I beg for mercy; I have been in the woollen manufactory of a rug maker for seven years: the last seven years I have been clerk to different gentlemen in the lottery business.
I had been out of business some time; I have a wife that lays in now; my wife has been in the workhouse, she was big with child; I had three children at home with me; I could not maintain them, and I went on the hop duty in Kent; Commissioner Scott, who was my friend, is since dead: at Chatham I had been at work, and I came to enquire after my wife, and was informed she was in labour; and she sent me word out she should be glad if I could assist her with a few shillings more than the workhouse would allow her: it was through this necessity that I did it.
I had been from home five weeks, the parish officers wanted to press me, they said I had been at sea, which is false; I have no witnesses; they knocked me down as I was passing by; I have a wife and four children, I am thirty years of age.
This woman has got a daughter, which I frequently came after to the house where I was taken from, I only laid there when I was rather late, and I was there last Friday week, I came there and she was not at home; she used to keep a house by Doctor's Commons, and I sat there in the kitchen, and this woman by me, she asked me to write two or three directions for her; I only came into the house after her daughter.
I served my time to a Hatter, and work there at this time, in St. James's, Duke's Place: I suppose my people will be here, if they know my-trial is on.
I know nothing of the carpets further than this; there was a cart stood by the door, Mr. Harkness stood in the shop-door; how could I take his carpets?
This sugar I found in the passage under the gateway, behind the gateway; as I went into the street, he did not stop me till after I had found it.
The prosecutor gave them to me, and I was to have five guineas a year, and meat, drink, washing and lodging.
Jackson was not at my house till three or four days after, when the others had done what they pleased.
I had been at work all day, I am a shoemaker, an apprentice, and my father was dying, and my master gave me leave to go and see him, and as I was going to Compton-street, from St. James's, there was a Gentleman's servant standing in a silver-lac'd hat, with these two bundles, and he said to me, my boy says he, carry these down Monmouth-street, and I will give you two-pence, I said I was not going to Monmouth-street, he threw down the bundle and ran away, if I had ran away first, you know gentlemen they would have caught him; I have my master at the door.
As soon as I was committed to Tothill-fields, the prosecutor made a demand of 6 l. not to appear to prosecute me; I have witnesses that he made a demand at another time of three guineas, and one guinea the Sunday before last, he came down Tothill-fields, Bridewell, and called on my master before at Hungerford Market; he was to to have called on Monday on my master to have received this, I was coming up by the Bath coach, and this man got on the coach, and by drinking two pints of beer on the road we were acquainted; he said he had no acquaintance, he would be glad if I would recommend him to a lodging, I told him he might lodge where I lodged some times, at the George in the Haymarket, the next morning we went out together, and were out all the day long; I was his chief support all the time we was out, and it cost me a good deal of money that day, he and two more acquaintances, he said he received a letter from his relations at Leicester, that his grandfather was dead, and that he could draw some money from them, on these considerations I supported him till nine o'clock at night, and I left him and returned to the lodging where I was, and I asked for his bundle as he said he must go the next morning to the country, and I told him I hoped he would make some acknowledgement for the money I had expended upon him, and he said he could not without I stopped his cloaths.
My Lord the prosecutor offered me three several sums to make it up, he came to me three weeks ago, and offered to take 3 l. and last Sunday was se'nnight he agreed to take a guinea, and then he never came.
I went down the alley, there is a necessary at the bottom, I was going to case myself, and there was a man stood upon the wall, the man said he would go over, I got over after him, and then Mr. Askey and Mr. Taylor said I should stop or they would blow my brains out; my wife and I had a few words and I went out, and went down there on purpose to ease myself.
I was coming down the street, and heard an alarm of stop thief, a gentleman came and laid hold of me, and said, I believe you are the thief, I said, I am not; he said, I will take you whether you are or no, they searched me, and I had nothing about me; I have no witnesses.
My Lord, as I have no council nor attorney, my circumstances not permitting me to employ any, I would wish to ask Mr. Newnham whether he had missed any thing in his house, excepting the two horse rugs?
Had you missed any spoons, Sir, before I told you they were pawned?
I should be glad to know, what Mr. Newnham means by several other things, that were found at my lodgings.
Does pawning the property with intention to steal it, or to replace it again lessen the crime, my Lord, if the intention is proved.
When I went to hire myself as a servant to Mr.. Newnham, which was about the 6th or 7th of Dec. he said, I should have so much per year, and a livery, and that, as it would be some time before his other servants came, I should wear my own cloaths till then; and he would allow me something for wearing them; and as I was to go out with the carriage with my lady; he expected me to go very genteel; I told him I had sufficient cloathing, to appear as genteel as any gentleman in the city; I served him near three months before I had my livery, in the course of that time Mr. Newnham and his Lady, had frequently complained, that they were ashamed to go out with me, because I could not keep myself clean enough; I had things in pawn, which I wanted to redeem, as soon as I could get money; and I pawned these things to redeem those: I acknowledge the pawning of them: My master gave me orders to buy a sack of oats, and desired me to pay for it, I was loath to expose my poverty to my master, and those things, which were given under my care, under my own lock and key by his desire, and which, if I had lost any, I must have been answerable for them, I pawned: I put in one of his table spoons, to pay for the sack of oats, he shortly after paid me for those oats; then I got it out again; and I found my livery did not come so soon as I could have wished, and as I had put them in and got them out again to pay his expences, I thought I could do them again for myself; when the quarter was due, there was about three pounds due to me then, and with what money I had in my pocket, I could have redeemed them, I was very urgent for the money, he said he would pay me the next morning, but he did not; he was generally very busy in the morning, and if he was troubled by a servant carrying in a message, he used to be in a passion; and I did not like to trouble him; he paid me I believe about three weeks after my quarter was due; he gave me two guineas, in part of my quarter's wages; at the time the horse cloths were missing, he asked me for them, I told him, I believed they were in the manger, and I pretended to look about for them; but knowing they were not there, he called me into the parlour, and said, William you know where they are, and if you will not get them, I will charge a constable with you directly; I told him I had a wife and a child at home, and had taken an unfurnished lodging, and that they were at home; I told him that a friend had lent me some things; and he asked me before the constable, if there was any thing else pawned; he said, he had missed a pair of shoes, but he saw they were brought back again, I told him they were pawned the corner of Dove-court, them I fetched home as soon as he paid me my wages; these dozen of white handled knives and forks, were pawned at Mr. Jarvis's, in Fetter-lane, I was going out with my master behind the carriage, before I went out in the morning, I gave my wife a pair of silk stockings, which I had bought to pawn, and says I, fetch that dozen of white handle knives and forks, and when I return I will replace them, two days before I had redeemed four tea spoons from the corner of Dove-court, and carried them home in the country, and there left them; this portmanteau he desired me to lapsup a couple of young pigs, and bring them to town, one I was to leave at my master's, and it is a portmanteau that I generally buckle behind my saddle; I had two or three pair of shoes, stockings, &c. I brought th em from the country; and carried them, and the pigs, all the things in this portmantua, left it at my lodgings, with the things in it; and not with intent to steal it: And was he to speak like a gentleman, he would signify to your Lordship, that he does not believe, I meant to defraud him of any of the things; he promised me before the constable, that provided I should make him an open confession, and he promised the constable, which I doubt not will not deviate from the truth, that he should not hurt me, if he got his things again; he said, he would sooner
prosecute the pawnbroker, than he would me, and it is well known, my Lord, by the pawnbroker, that I had put these things in at different times, as I was necessitated for money for his use; and he did not pay me my bills weekly, sometimes it was longer; I have a wife near her time of laying in, and four small children besides, destitute of every thing in the world; another thing I wish to represent, Mr. Lowe, when I offered the knives and forks, he asked me to sell them, I said, no; if I had meant to defraud my master, I certainly should make the most of them; I pawned nothing, but what was under my own care, if I had a mind to have robbed him, I could have robbed him of seventy or eighty hundred pounds worth of plate; I am now at the mercy of your Lordship, and I hope your Lordship, and the Prosecutor, and the Jury, will prove merciful to me. I have not one witness here, I was informed in Newgate by Mr. Pitt, that I should be tried by the London Jury, and there was not one of the trials before the London Jury, was to come, till such times as the country was finished, and Mr. Pitt, the turnkey, told me this morning, I should not be tried to day.
Did you give me a couple of guineas at first, it was only one guinea, and that was to lay out for cards.
Did not you hear Mr. Newnham promise to forgive me, if I would tell where the things were?
Did not Mr. Newnham promise before you, that he would not hurt me, provided I would tell?
Do not you recollect when we were coming from Clerkenwell Bridewell, one of the constables asked you if Mr. Newnham had shewn me any favour; did not you acknowledge in the coach that you heard him say, that he would not hurt me, or prosecute me if he could any ways help it, and upon my telling him the truth; and did not you say, that you did not believe Mr. Newnham would hurt me?
Ah! Mr. Hotchkins. My Lord, I am entirely at your mercy, and the mercy of the Court, my life is sworn away in a malicious mannner, and I submit myself to my fate; God knows in my conscience I am clear of ever having any intent of robbing my master, had I had a mind to have done it, I could have done it frequently: I am ready to submit to my fate, if it was to go to be hanged, but it is my duty to beg for my poor disconsolate wife and family;
if I must be banished my country, I must; but I humbly beg of your Lordship to inflict any imprisonment upon me, even during the remainder of my life, so that I might but see my wife and children, and I should be for ever bound to pray for your Lordship.
My Lord, I would wish as a favor, that your Lordship will pronounce sentence upon me now at the bar.
My Lord, I thought the things I have been tried for now, were from the country house.
What is it an indictment from Mr. Newnham.
I do not understand the meaning, of your Lordship's question.
My Lord, I really am surprized in respect to the other things.
My Lord, I know nothing at all of the affair any further than this, as I told the gentlemen when they took me; I was going to the Rose, in Fleet-market, and I had the things at Mary-le-bone Turnpike, I was hired as a porter to carry them, I in Portpool-lane, at Bradshaw's-rents a basket maker lived; it is I should commit this robbed this says against me, because Clerkenwell but that very day, I have sent for Mr. Fletcher, he says I am very done by.
These things were given me by a man that used to be backwards and forwards at the stables in Piccadilly, his name is John, I cannot tell where he is; my friends live in Gloucestershire, I have none in town.
I never sold the butts, my Lord, this Mr. Vaughan's yard was a place where we
used to drive butts very often, he used to deal with us for sower boor.
I told Mr. Foster that I left them in the yard, it was Saturday night, and we could not take them home.
I can have characters plenty, I can apply to Mr. Foster for my character.
I know nothing about this affair, that my master charges me with, I am very clear that Captain Croker was a man that was out of his mind, it was a load of stuff shot on the dunghill, and a horse standing in the stable heeling out the dung had covered them over; Captain Croker had set me to take these things into my house, and I could not conceal it at my own house, and Mrs. Brown was a relation of Captain Croker 's, and I put them there: As for the boards, they were left by the prosecutor's men, I had two or three of his men lodged there.
This witness said before the Justice, she had been light headed for two or three days, she said, she could not be positive that I was the person, then afterwards she said, I can swear to him; then said the Justice, I must commit him; then says she, you must not commit him.
I did not run away from her; there is a common necessary down there, and I went down there: I have not a friend in the world.
I was just come from tea, I saw a mob in the street, and I picked up two pair of shoes, they took me, and the shoes from me; the prosecutor sent to the prison to offer to drop the prosecution if I would give a guinea.
I have nothing to say, I suppose my friends are gone home, I had people to my character all day, I did not think my trial would come on.
I had been to see my friends in Kent, and I lay at Gravesend all night, coming next morning over Blackheath, opposite Greenwich park, a man overtook me with two horses, riding one and walking another; I asked him to let me ride, he said he had got to go down to Greenwich or Deptford, and he advised me to take this horse up to London, and he would give me a shilling to bring him up, so I did; he desired me to bring him to the Bull's head, in Dean-street, Soho, and put him up there; and the next day I went up to see if the man was come, and nobody was come; upon that on the Tuesday morning I called up there again, I was going to Oxford-road; I thought I should be brought into trouble about this horse, and I thought of finding out the man that owned the horse, and that man went along with me, and the man rode him as far as Hammersmith; he asked me to let him ride; I never saw the horse again until I was taken into custody; I am a poor man, I could not get any money to subpoena witnesses; I must leave myself to the mercy of the Judge and Jury.
I have nothing to say for myself; I have not a friend in the world to speak for me; I plead for mercy of the court.
I am quite innocent of the affair; I have no witnesses.
I have nothing to declare, any further than my innocence, which I hope will be proved.
I was at Kingsland-road to see a gentleman, a master taylor; I was at dinner with him, we had something to drink, which got into my head, I slept at his house, as I had some money about me; I desired him to call me at three in the morning, which he did, and in coming along in my way home, I picked up a bag with a handkerchief tied to it, and I carried it in my hand; for the distance of twelve or fourteen yards; upon which, finding it too heavy to carry in my hand, I took and swung it over my shoulder; then the handkerchief being undone, the things came out, and I laid down the bag, and put what came out of the handkerchief into my pockets; and so tied the handkerchief up; one of the watchmen came up to me, and asked what I had, I told him I had found something, but did not know what it contained, he run after me again, I was very willing to shun him, for fear he should strike me, and so I dropped the bag; I have seen the gentleman that saw me pick up the bag, he heard that I was in the Poultry Compter, so he came and asked me my name, and how I came by the bag; I asked him his name, and I gave it to my friends: If the laws of England will find a man guilty for picking up a thing in the street, I am guilty, otherwise I am as innocent as the child that is unborn.
My Lord, there is a person that saw me pick the bundle up, who has not been called.
Yes, my Lord, his name is Levi Moses .
I leave it to my Council.
After the judge had summed up the evidence, the prisoner said, I expected my Council would have spoken for me, otherwise I would have spoken myself; my book of accounts that Mr. Harford has got, will sufficiently shew that I have received at different times, by different bills, sums to the\\ amountof fifty pounds; besides at other times, Mr. Harford has frequently sent me to get change for notes, which I look upon it will fully answer every thing that is
alledged against me; another thing, Mr. Harford has frequently left his own key in his drawer, from the time he has dressed; another thing, Mr. Harford's pocket book, has layed for one or two days in a coat, that he has thrown off, frequently, not once or twice; with notes in it; and Mr. Harford has never missed it: I have searched his coat pockets, and brought him his pocket book, with notes in it; his present servant, John Allen , can prove that I have often changed him bank notes, as being often desired to get change of a Sunday, when I could not get it, therefore, I generally keep change in the house, and he generally paid me of a Sunday, sometimes it went for three weeks, and amounted to thirty, forty, or fifty pounds.
If the book of account was here, I am sure it would acquit me of this;
Look further in May, if you please.
And 28 l. wages, which is not down there.
Mr. Harford frequently gave me notes to change, and I changed them for him, therefore, these notes must be in my possession.
I had this horse of one James Wood of Mary le Bone, I was going to my master's, I met this man, and asked him where he was going with the horse, he said home, he asked me to buy it, I told him, I did not want any, he said, if you can tell me where I can sell him, I will treat you with some beer, I told him that Mr. Weston I thought wanted a horse, he asked me to go with him, I went with him facing the gentleman's house, I told him, I knew Mr. Weston, says he take the horse, and get what you can for him, I said, I should rather he would go in along with me, he said no, get what you can, but do not take less than a guinea; I went in, Mr. Weston said, he did not know that he wanted such a one, then he said, he would give me a guinea, I went out to the door, and told Wood, and he said, let him have it, I went into Mr. Weston again, and told him of it, when he came out to look at the horse again, the horse was gone, Wood had taken him away, I went round the corner, and there was Wood with him in his hand, I took the money and gave it to him, and told him I was going home, I was to get up in the morning to drive the team; the second day they came to me as I was driving the cart in St. Giles's, and told me about the horse, and I was taken up then, I sent for my wife, and I sent for Wood, and he was not at home, his wife said, he was at Smithfield, and she went again the next morning at twelve o'clock, he did not come home, about a fortnight after he sent for his wife, and took her away: I never was in any confinement before.
He said, he would give me half-a-crown, if I could sell him for more than a guinea.
I told him, I was come home from the West Indies, and that I had the note from another person; he offered to let me have money, before he saw the note.
Please your Lordship, I put off my trial last sessions, the person from whom I received that note not being in England, and I have two witnesses that have been with me ever since the last sessions, they were obliged to go away the night before last, to Portsmouth; they would have proved,
that I. I that note as good, of one Collin Reculest : The gentleman offered to let me have as much money as I would have on it.
No, my Lord, I told him, I was just returned from the West Indies: I have been at sea all my life, ever since I was eight years old, in the King's service; I was along with Admiral Rodney, at the siege of Martinique, I have been discharged three times from the King's service; I have my arms broke, legs broke, and skull fractured; I entered on board the Zebra sloop, I was picked out by Sir Robert Bickerton; I was pressed by Lord Howe, and went to Gibraltar with him; I was wounded under Sir Roger Curtis; then I came home the latter end of last year, and that person owed me a great deal of money, and I took the note from him, I knew nothing at all that the note was bad.
I had two persons here to prove it, they came to town on purpose to be here as witnesses.
My Lord, I am a very unfortunate, and a very unhappy man. - They were waiting all day on Wednesday; I had likewise, Captain Englefield , that was Captain of the Centaur, and he is not present: I was brought up with him ever since last war, and we were both boys together: I have been in nineteen engagements, and twice cast away.
My Lord, I can shew my body full of wounds, but my back is without a blemish; I had witnesses to prove my innocence on Wednesday.
My Lord, I worked for the gentleman near upon two years, and he always gave me a very good character, and then I came home, and that night that I went up into the shop I was very much in liquor, I went to see a young man that was come from sea, and I thought the young man was at work, that did work there, when I worked in it; I opened the door, and found him not there, I run up into the garret thinking he was gone up to make his bed, which he did the last thing after he had done work.
My Lord, I did not know it would open the shop.
I was walking in the fields on Sunday morning by Kilburn Wells early, and I found these things in the field in the foot road; I have no witnesses, I have not been long in town.
I was drinking at a publick house the night before, and the young woman came in and asked me to earn 2 s. and not having been in work, I was willing to accept of the opportunity; they desired me to go up three pair of stairs backwards, and I should find the door open, and the box opened; and I was to meet that same party that same night at nine o'clock.
I am a shoe-maker by trade.
I never saw the property till I see it now, and at the Justices before; the duplicate I had in my pocket, was a duplicate of two waistcoats, which I bought of a young man that is gone into the country, they were white waistcoats, and they went and brought these two striped waistcoats; I have no proof of it, because he is in the country, the landlord and I had a falling out, and he wanted three shillings for some misdemeanor in soiling the room, and insisted that I should go out at that hour of the night, on Sunday night; so I went away on Monday.
I forgot the key, I have no friends, I have been here starving these two months.
I only wish to inform you how I came by these pistols, I was drinking at a house in Oxford-road, as I came out a man was selling them, I offered him a guinea, he objected to it, I had no more money than a guinea, a friend of mine came by, I asked him to lend me half a guinea, he lent me five shillings, and I offered the man five shillings more, and he readily excepted of it, I walked with my friend to Wardour-street, I told him to repay his money, I would pledge these pistols.
I keep gentlemen and tradesmens books.
Jackson, it was in Oxford-road, opposite to Rathbone-place.
About dinner time, about two o'clock.
I was ashamed to trouble any of my friends about this affair.
No, Sir, I believe not.
The reason of my not knowing where he lived he was out of his time, nor did I know till I asked him.
My Lord, every doubt shall be satisfied, if you will only give me time.
Innocently, my Lord, it was some property that was lost in my company a twelve month ago, a silver tankard that was taken out of the house where I was drinking.
I acknowledge the charge laid against me, it is the first time I ever was arraigned
at this bar, and I submit myself to the mercy of the Jury.
I have been brought up to the sea.
In the India service, and I have been in the navy, I was midshipman in an Indiaman and in a man of was both, I was in the Worcester Indiaman, and was pressed into the King's service; I happened to fall into the company of this man, and being in want of money I took the sword; my character was never before impeached.
The Blenhelm.
I was going up stairs with a pot of beer, and coming down again I picked the watch up on the stairs, and I went to get change for sixpence, and that gentleman laid hold on me.
All that I have to say, is, if you will ask whether any one of the gentlemen saw me in the house, or take any box, or whether they can say I was the person that jumped from the wall?
My Lord, it was dark in the evening.
I drive cattle from Mile-end turnpike to Smithfield, my mother lives in the country, I am nineteen years of age.
I got that gown thus, I had it of a young woman, a servant out of place that was going abroad, she owed me a few shillings, she had no other recompence to make me, but that duplicate in the name of Mary Brown , the Jew only gave me two shillings more than it was pledged for, my friends are not in town, I have no witnesses.
My Lord, I was taking a walk that evening about Islington, and I took the prosecutrix for a woman of the town, I went to put my hands round her neck, and she run away, I did not intend to rob her.
A woman came to me in February last, that I knew for ten years, she was big with child, she said, she was going lay-in, in the hospital, and she had brought a cloak, and she begged to leave it with me, I told her it would be very safe; I saw her no more, I was taken sick the next day, and on Monday, I got a little better, and I got out of my bed, and I heard she was dead; I went to see whether it was so or not, and she was dead; and I kept it till last week, and I went to pawn it at that gentleman's house, I wanted a guinea and half, he offered me 24 s. at last I took it, I thought I could get no more for it; as to his asking me any questions where I lived, he did not; there was a woman her name is Nancy Fielder , that saw her give me the cloak; all my friends were here yesterday; I am a Taylor.
Whether he knows any thing of Saliman?
Do not you know Soliman?
Did not he work for you?
You never saw me before?
I had been at work at Black-wall, and I overtook Soliman coming with these things in a bag, he asked me if I was going to London, I said, I was, he asked me to help him, he took the sheave out of the bag, and carried it himself, and I carried the chain.
What did you say to the waterman, when you was in the entry?
When I saw you at the public house, did not you hear me ask the boy if I was the man that robbed him?
I have witnesses that will prove, what they heard the waterman say to the boy, and likewise the boy denying me at first.
My Lord, there was a man came down to me, and said, he did not expect I should be tried till Monday, and upon that, I suppose my witnesses are gone, I am as innocent as the child unborn, I am sworn against wrongfully.
I have nothing to say, I have no witnesses.
Another man put my name down, instead of the name of William Richards , then he went to Dick Butler , and told him my name was John Brown, they gave me a note to the agent, and he put my name William Richards , instead of John Brown.
I am quite innocent, I never saw any one of the men in my life.
I am a heel-maker.
I do in no other way.
I have none now, they were obliged to go home, I thought my tryal would have come on last week.
My Lord, I leave my defence entirely to my council.
You say you came from Captain Malton 's ship in a canoe?
At what o'clock do the canoes come off?
Is that at day light?
At what o'clock is it day light in that country, at that time of the year?
Did the canoe carry you back to Cape Coast, Sir?
Whose canoe was it?
Did the canoes regularly come to your ship as a trading ship, to trade with them before day light, or at day light; or at what period did they come to trade?
They always came by day light to trade?
How many hours did it take to work down?
I am not asking you what I know, but what you know; what time do you imagine you could paddle down there?
How many paddles had the canoe?
Be sure, Sir, that is not a trading canoe?
How many miles is it by sea?
Could you come three miles in that period?
Was there a sentry at the fort at the fort?
Pray did you scale the walls then, Sir, or come through the walls?
Are you positive there was no sentinel at the door?
In a word, were the gates open or shut?
And you saw no sentry?
Then I must be very deficient in my duty, did no person challenge you on your coming in?
And yet you knew nobody in the fort?
You did not speak to him?
Stop! stop! Sir, I will make you recollect, are there not steps to the platform; truth must come out, my friend, for you never was there Mr. Jones, any more than his Lordship?
What breadth was the platform?
My Lord, the fort is a continued platform, there is no other ground to go upon, not an inch, so that he must have been on the platform, or else not at all in that fort.
My Lord, please to let the witness describe the fort to the Court, and the way of the entrance?
Describe it to the Court?
When you enter the gate, what is the next object that strikes your eye?
How can you possibly go over a draw bridge, and not recollect it; is there a draw-bridge in that fort?
There is a draw-bridge there; I will refresh your memory, young man?
Another question, I wish to confute this witness, my Lord, for he never was there; you cross a draw-bridge, what is the next object you see?
You know there is a serjeant's room for a guard room, where there is always a guard to receive and turn out strangers?
Aye! and how came you in then?
You say I had the key of the fort in my pocket?
I wish the witness to account to this Honourable Court, how these three hundred blacks and himself came in, if I had the key in my pocket?
It is my Lord, the sense of it?
I wish Mortimer may retire till he is wanted again, as I may have some questions to ask.
My Lords, I leave my defence intirely in the hands of my Council.
After his first desertion he was sent to Fort Cormantine, but he deserted three times in the whole.
I believe I can explain that in one word, the blacks who carried off Murray Mackenzie's clothes, and the other clothes, came and gave me the information of the mutiny and desertion, and if it had not been for that, I should not have been here to day.
My Lord, there are two of the evidences against me, I think it was the 4th of September last, they came up from Portsmouth as they told me; they came into Newgate, into the room where I was, and frightened me, or attempted to frighten me, and bully me, and told me if I did not give them a hundred pounds a piece, there was Cooper for one, and Mortimer for another, I wish to tell what was really the case, at that time there was no person in the prison, that I could immediately get to hear them; I was perfectly unhappy in my own mind, but upon going to my fellow prisoner, he says, good God, Captain Mackenzie, what wretches were those that have been with you? he says, Almighty God! what people or evidences must they be, thus to express themselves; the words of Mortimer to me were, might he be damned, and might God damn him, if he did not hang me unless I gave him a hundred pounds: there is a gentleman present, a fellow prisoner, a man that was rather unfortunate, in falling into a matter of small consequence, which was attempting to go to France, to acquire a better fortune than he could in his own country, he overheard it; and another gentleman who happened to call in, one Mr. Philpot saw the men, and can swear to them; and in a word, it would be a satisfaction to this Court and the Jury, that those two gentlemen should be examined, they are both here.
Mr. Philpot was the witness that heard them, this gentleman only can identify the people.
I beg that Mr. Philpot may explain what words passed between that young man and me, I wish the truth to appear to this Court in the purest light.
This is truth, or may I never have any existence here, or hereafter.
I beg to interfere, Mr. King and another man is here, and will prove that John Jones was on board a ship when he swore he was at Fort Morea.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury -
I take leave to ask pardon of this Court, it was from a perfect ignorance or I should not have done it.
No, I do not want to have any conversation with them at all; they are people not worth speaking to at all.
As to the gentlewoman that sworn first, I was in the country at the same time, at Woolwich, at the time she swore the blow was given; I worked there three days, and I came home, and staid at home for a week; I sent the child out for a six-penny loaf, that was the week following the time I came home, and during that week I was at home, the child came home and told me that a woman had thrown him down, with the loaf in his hand; Sir, at that time he fractured his scull on the right side; he broke his head at that time on the right side; in the course of the week I went and worked three days in Nortonfalgate, and the week after I stopped at home three days longer; on Tuesday night I sent him out for a loaf again.
About four days before his death; I asked him whether he could go or not, two or three times, and he said yes.
Yes, because he had got very swelled legs; he went out and called at the White Swan public-house, he frequently called at different public houses to beg beer; and so I sent his mother after him, to see if he was coming home, and she could not find him, so she came home without him; and I desired her to go to many other houses besides, and she went to three or four houses, and he had been there and had bread and cheese at these different houses; when he came home he had fallen down, and cut the right side of his temple with the fall; his mother was going as far as Drury-Lane, on an errand, and the child was gone to bed; and the left side of the boy's face was terribly swelled in the morning; and the next morning I told her to go to Doctor White , and get him into the Dispensary; she went, and I went down to Woolwich to work; I worked there till Saturday night, I came home on Saturday night, and saw the boy very bad, and my wife said she had been at the Doctor's; and the Doctor said he would come on Sunday; I stopped there on the Sunday till eight o'clock, and sent to the Doctor's again: that is all I have to say about that; I have something to say in respect to abusing the child; I never struck the child with the poker; when my wife was in the hospital, I used to take a rod and beat him with; and she was in the hospital on the 2d of January, and she came out when she had been in three weeks; I do not know that ever I ill used the boy afterwards; and I suppose his death to be from a cold which slew out of his legs, being a disordered child; he always had a breaking out in his head and ancles. I do not think that these people that have been examined are sit to go upon life and death.
I was going along at that time in the evening, and heard the alarm of stop thieves, I went up stairs following these people, and I thought I saw somebody going up two pair of stairs, and I said so, and they turned round and said they supposed I was the thief, and they took me.
I was there looking about the same as other people; I was thirty or forty yards from where this gate way is; there were a great crowd of people there, it was an open place where a number of people went; the rails were all pulled down by the mob; the witness came and laid hold of a man with a red head of hair; I stood still, and he came then, and said, that is one in boots, and laid fast hold of me; says the prosecutor, Sir, I believe you have my watch? Sir, says I, I have not; says the other witness he is one of them.
I had been seeking for work; and coming by between seven and eight o'clock, I heard a great noise at the top of the house, I stopped to hear it, being so late in an empty house, I heard a man come and bring this lead down, and he put it at the door, and I took the lead upon my head, and I thought I would take it home and go to a constable, and have the men secured, and when this man took me, I told him there were the men upon the house, and he went himself to see, and he said the men were there when he went, but they went away while he was there, and took more lead with them.
Coming from work one night, I found one of them in Cheapside, and the other in Little Britain.
I worked for that man, in the parish of Welsden, and I was taken very bad with the ague and fever, and many people recommended me to get into the hospital; my master that stands there said I was very welcome to wear his coat till I got the better of my illness; I desired my landlord's daughter when I came down, to tell my master I was going to the hospital; and told another person to tell my master I was in the hospital; I was in the hospital a month and two days; after I was ordered out, I met my master, Henry Cowley , in the Hay-market; I asked him to employ me; he said he was afraid he could not; but says he, Harry, I hope you will return me the coat; I said I would; I was taken ill again, and was bad fifteen weeks, and being poverty struck, I was obliged to pawn the coat; my master gave me a glass of liquor, there he is to witness it.
My Lord, I humbly beg leave that Mr. Bagshaw may be asked one question.
He says that he saw my hand extended as if I was giving something to some person; did he see anything in my hand, or did he see me give anything?
I should be glad also to ask him whether he saw me give anything, or saw me drop any thing, or whether he had any reason to suppose either by speaking, talking, or confederating, in any other respect according to the idea which he has endeavoured to insinuate to the Court, that I had an accomplice, or that there were any grounds to suppose any such thing?
My Lord, I should be glad Mr. Bagshaw may be asked, whether he recollects any person saying, here is the watch upon the ground.
May it please your Lordship and you Gentlemen of the Jury.
With humble submission I entreat your candid attention, and I trust the ears and hearts of all in this Honourable Court will be as open and ready to receive impressions in my favour, as they may be to admit those of a contrary nature. The evening in which this matter is stated to have happened I went to see the play, it was Macbeth, the house was filled early, and hearing it mentioned that there was no more room at that side, I was going to another part of the house, when I was accosted by the prosecutor, who said, Sir, you have got my watch. I told him I had not, and that he should be satisfied of it in any manner he chose. There were several persons present at the time. An altercation took place, during which a by-stander cried out, There is a watch on the ground. This was at some yards distance from him. The prosecutor ran, but whether he stooped himself, or it was given him by a by-stander, I cannot say; but he took it, and declared it to be his. It has been stated, that when he accused me, I extended my hand, as if I was offering something to some person; whether I did or not I cannot take upon me to say; but I trust that it will not be considered as an unnatural position for any person so accused, to extend his arm or hand. Perhaps it will be more reasonable to imagine, that an endeavour would be made to conceal them, if the accusation had been just; and I trust, Gentlemen of the Jury, that it will be worthy your most serious consideration, that while this circumstance is mentioned in order to criminate, the prosecutor has acknowledged, at the same time, that he saw nothing in my hand, saw me drop nothing, or give any thing to any person whatever. It has been stated, that during the altercation he received some violent treatment, and though he has acknowledged it did not proceed from me, yet an endeavour has been made to turn it to my disadvantage. I most humbly beg leave to observe, that in consequence of the alarm a croud came, and hearing such a charge made, and seeing two people disputing, both decently dressed, and much alike in heighth, and not immediately knowing which was the accused person, some, more violent than the rest, might have laid hold of him, as the others did of me, until they were satisfied which was the accuser. This I humbly conceive, and this alone, gave rise to the violence complained of; and though it has been laboured to impress the Court, with an idea that it proceeded from accomplices, yet I humbly hope, that, where there are no solid proofs to establish such an idea, it will not be received; and therefore that in this, as well as in every other circumstance of surmise or conjecture, it will be deemed as just and charitable to suppose for as to suppose against the prisoner; and I trust too, that the justice and humanity of this Honourable Court will not allow that a man, though he may be unfortunate enough to have a blemished character, shall be made responsible for offences which others have committed, or that a surmise or supposition will be suffered to supply the place of clear convincing proofs. Whether those that have appeared on this occasion are of that kind or not, would be presumption in me to say; I humbly hope they are not. But I must beg leave. Gentlemen of the Jury, with all humility, to call your attention for a moment to another subject, which, though it has not, and ought not to have, any connection with the evidence, may, without much care, have weight in deciding my fate. It has been my misfortune to have suffered much from ill-natured report, and from wanton invention, at a time too, when I can truly say, that I had been using my best endeavours to merit commendation instead of reproach; and I thought to have had it in my power to have given convincing proofs of this to the Court, from a gentleman in whose employment I have been for some time, but who is now absent on his affairs in Ireland. Desirous of having his testimony, which I knew must be favourable to me, I thought to have requested of the Court, to defer my till the following sessions; but being told that the absence of witnesses which was character, was not in general deemed sufficiently material to defer a trial, I have omitted troubling them with the application. And although, under these circumstances of imprisonment and an impending trial, yet they have not secured me from the effects of inconsiderate wantonness. Circumstances have been related of me which never happened, and others have been cruelly exaggerated. I do not say this in order to excite your compassion, but to allay inflammation. Gentlemen, prejudice sees through a glass, which makes things appear quite different from what they really are; you best know, Gentlemen, whether, in consequence of any thing of that kind, your minds may have contracted a biass unfavourable to me. If, upon reflection, you think that they have, I am sure you will carefully examine your breasts; and if upon a cool and impartial consideration of the evidence alone, you think or doubt, that it is not of that perfect and substantial nature, which should induce you to find a verdict against any other person, I am sure you will not against me, since you must be fully sensible, that in such a case it would be a conviction from prejudice, and not from evidence. But, Gentlemen, I have an implicit confidence in your goodness; and I trust you will not only lay aside all passion and prejudice yourselves, but that you will be pleased to make a candid allowance for the effects of it in others; and that you will proceed with that cautious and tender regard, which good men feel when the fate of a fellow-creature is depending, and which will insure satisfaction to your minds, when words cannot be recalled, and when the power of prejudice is no more.\"	d"
The coachman told me the night before he was going to Bath, and I did not know what to do, I was out of place; I thought to go down in the country, I have neither father nor mother.
A gentleman in Gray's-Inn-lane, whom I lived with two years, promised to be here.
I never saw any money belonging to him, it is all my own; I never saw his box, or had the handling of his money.
I know nothing of the blankets; it is a house of ill same, and they let lodgings at two-pence or three-pence a night; there were four more people in the same room; I came down in the morning about nine, and left another person in the room; I am a stranger, I came from Colchester.
When I was examined at the Justice's, he said I was round the window.
I was going to my aunt's, in the Strand, and that gentleman came up, and there was a bustle, and he said I was one; I said, I will go in with you.
This button broke off my breeches, and there was a pin in it; but there was no cut in my hand, it was a scratch; here is my hand now.
I am a shoemaker.
Twenty three.
My master died before I was out of my time; I work for myself translating; I have not a witness in the world; I have been a soldier in the Middlesex Militia three years.
I did behave well indeed, Captain Taylor is my Captain, in the Westminster Middlesex Militia.
I was coming up the road, and they came and took me.
He said before the Justice the first night, that he did not know who it was he saw in the room?
When I was first taken, he never offered to mention this.
Which pocket did I take it out of?
I was running down George-yard, Whitechapel, I heard the cry of stop thief, and when I was coming out of the yard they took me; when they went to the public house, they began sharing the forty pounds, and saying, one should get so much, and another should get so much; the boy did not swear to me then; I have respectable people to my character, but I did not expect my trial to come on so soon.
I and another had been drinking all that day, and happened to be in liquor, and going by that wall the other man was playing his fun as we went along, and he took my hat off and flung it over, and I went over for it, and getting back again this gentleman caught me.
I was a victualler, a publican some years, I have let my house lately; this Steward about a week or a fortnight before I was apprehended, lodged at my house; about one o'clock this gentleman came to my house; this Steward was out all the night before, and part of Sunday morning, he came and went up to bed; I know nothing of the affair, nor of the Barrahs, and they cannot say with a safe conscience I am the person, but they do not care what they swear, the Court may plainly see that I never was at Barrah's in my life.
I did not think about that, I have witnesses plenty, that know I kept a public house some years, they talked of putting it off, on account of this Steward, the Court may see that I know no more of what is charged against me than a child.
They were not my apartments.
I found this iron in the boat I was in, which was the ship's boat.
There was a man lodged in the same house I did, he is a countryman of mine, two or three days before he went away, he told me he had some things, if I could do any good with them I might, and he went up stairs with me, and shewed me his chest, and opened it.
Why did not you produce this pistol, the night I was taken into custody?
I never was in the house, I dined that day at Deptford; I was coming home over London Bridge, at ten o'clock, and I saw a parcel of people run, and I run, and they laid hold of me.
I have been at sea some time, since I deal in the marketing way, poultry and fish, and every thing in season.
I live in Golden Lane, I have lived in that neighbourhood about five or six months, I am an Irishman, I went to Ireland to recieve some money my father left me; this woman pitched upon one of Sir Sampson's men at first; as for this Harry Hall , he has been guilty of several foot-pad robberies, and has been once tried for it.
My Lord, I am but a young man, and have a young family, I hope my Lord you will recommend me to mercy.
I bought the shirt of a woman, and gave her four shillings for it, and a pot of beer.
I gathered the tea about the place, I did not take it out of the chest.
I did take it, and I went down to Cow-cross, and this man said, he would sell it for me, and he went and sold it in Sharp's-alley, to one Isaac Votier , and he came again, and said, stop a little.
I was asked to carry a load.
The boy was quite in a different story before, at Sir Sampson Wright's, they have had him this month, and been training him up; I am as innocent of it as a child unborn; I know nothing of it.
I had a person just now in the Bail-dock, and I have sent him for my master.
A coach-wheelwright; I work in Swallow-street, where the boy says he lives.
Not a soul, to my knowledge.
I was not running; that is not the gentleman that stopped me.
I was going up Broker's-alley, to Drury-lane, there was a broker who stood at the door, and a man was selling a piece of floor-cloth, it measured two yards and almost a quarter; the broker offered the man six shillings for it; I stood by when the man was coming away, I offered seven shillings; he said, you shall have it; I gave him two half crown pieces, and two shillings; he said his name was John Harris , and was to be found at the Feathers, in Holborn; I took it under my arm, and the witness stopped me; the prosecutor said at the Justice's, he did not know how many yards there were; they none of them knew the contents of the piece; then I was brought out of the Justice's again, and Mr. Barnes insisted upon taking it from the constable, into his possession; then he took it home, and kept it two days and two nights, and brought it back to the Justice's; then he swore to it; then the Justice asked the girl, and the man, whether I was running or walking; they said, walking, very gentle.
It is above a quarter of a mile from the place.
I have been the shop before, I have been past it a hundred times.
Here was a man here that saw me buy the cloth, his name is George Trotter .
Two men came by on the Monday night, and called me out of the public house, and asked me to buy a great coat, yes, say I if it is worth my money, I gave him half-a-crown directly, and he pulled it, if his back; Blacketer said you have been on this rigg a good while, and Mr. Messenger shall do for you, if it cost him have pounds; I have witnesses that Mrs. Messenger sent for me, and said I will learn you to false swear against my husband; these two men came innocently to me, and called me out, and in a minute or two after Blacketer was behind.
At the time the men brought the coat to me for sale, my master was present and Mr. Blacketer declared the same before the Justice.
The mare was brought to me in the morning, I was walking up the street, and a man met me, and said, take this to Whitechapel, and stay till I come, and I will give you a shilling.
I never was in the house, I was coming by; I never was a thief.
Did not I tell you it was a pillow?
I thought it was a pillow.
I had been up to Piccadilly in the evening about eight; to a son I have apprentice there; I met one Joseph Harrison , who is a waiter at Vauxhall, where I wait for the Summer season; I have been out of business since the beginning of December, I have a family of six children, and I told him I was in distress, and obliged to make away with the necessaries I had, and I begged him to give me any relief, if he was in business; he had that cushion, as it now appears to be, under his arm, we came together as far as Temple-bar, then he said, he was going to call of an acquaintance, a waite somewhere near Butcher-row, and desired me to wait for him at a public house in Fleet-lane, and if he succeeded; he would lend me a shilling or two, when the man stopped me, I was standing looking about for the house, and I did not know what I had till it was opened at the watch-house, I gave Ryland directions where to go.
Sir, this woman that she talks of, keeps a house for these sort of girls to be in, and house of ill fame.
Please to ask her, whether she is not a common street walker.
I was going down Fleet-street with a young man, I sell greens and potatoes with a jack-ass, as I was coming home walking down Fleet-street towards the market, this young woman immediately ran after me, she was talking to this gentleman, she immediately ran after me, says she, this is the person that robbed me; and this gentleman took me, I had a person here, but I do not see him now, his name is Badcock, a leather-cutter, the corner of Westmoreland-buildings; when I was in the Compter, a person came and said, that woman had served him so, and the constable had served him with a warrant, that he should not appear.
This man promised to come and appear for me, she swore he drew a bayonet upon her, and would take her life away.
I leave my defence to my council and your Lordship.
My Lord, I have none to offer now, I know it is a spiteful prosecution, by Collinson, Currie, and another, they have sought out this wicked fellow that lives by thieving.
Sixty-five, I lived twenty-seven years with her Royal Highness the Princess Dowager of Wales.
At the time I was in the American service, I was taken by the General Mootray privateer, and brought to Charles Town , South Carolina; I was confined in a prison and ironed, and sooner than I would bear that, I entered into the American service; I went out and took a prize, then I absconded their service, and went in the name which I used formerly to go by, of my cousin M'Grath; I resided at New York till I came home to England, six or seven years, I was generally known by that name, therefore the deceased made his will to me in that name, I had not seen him till I came to London, at the beginning of the war; then we were in the Bedford, then in the Wasp sloop, and when he was dying on board of ship, he desired I would not let it he known I was any relation to him; the will was made at the Cape of Good Hope, I being on board of the ship at the same time, Lieutenant Deschamp knows I never was on shore, on the island where the will was made; the neglect in the date in the will of the deceased, was by some person that was on shore, who mistook the date, it was brought me on board by one Isaacson, who was my messmate; when the deceased went on shore, he shook hands with me as he went down the side of the ship, and said, he would make his will in my favour, and said, he was sorry he had not made it before; the will was brought to me by one Glass Isaacson, whom Lieutenant Deschamps knows; the chests were stove, and I had no chest to put the will in, I told Isaacson to put it in his chest, which he did, he kept it till we came to England; when I came to Deptford I was a little in liquor, I did not mind will or money, or any thing else, and he went to Ostend or some where, and kept the will in his possession, upon this, when he returned, he returned me the will, then I applied to Mr. Giles, to know whether he dealt in any such affairs; he had the will in his possession two or three months before he paid the money, one time he gave me five shillings, and half a crown another, till I gave this order to my landlady that I used to reside with; some time after I came to Mr. Giles, I said, Sir, is not the Superb's money payable now? no, says he, there is no account of the Admiral coming home; when he made me this reply I went, and came again in a short time, and asked him whether there was no money for me; he said, I have some for you, and I want to speak to you; I told him I was going out in a West Indiaman, and had a boat loaded, and must go down; he went with me down towards Thames-street, and went to the door, and knocked at the door; I said, I must go down, and would send up a note about any thing he had for me; I gave Giles a letter of attorney to receive this money, and to pay it to one Kernan.
I had the horse nine man hs close to Mr. Tie's house.
I lent the prosecutor twe nty guineas, and had only one guinea. this poney and one cow for my twenty guineas, I can have no interest now the Jury have acquitted me; I was detained in custody merely through Mr. Tie.
My Lord, I can prove that, if it is necessary here.
I had been after a place, and coming down Old-street I passed this young woman, several people were coming, I heard the cry of stop thief, and was stopped by the butcher; another gentleman came up to the young woman, and says, here is your cloak.
I leave it entirely to my council.
I found that odd glove.
I picked up the ribbon.
I cannot disown the charge of being guilty, the reason of my making my escape, was the ill treatment I received after my first escape.
I was run over across my loins, I am lame, I was always struck without a cause, when I tried to do the utmost of my endeavour, and I hope the merciful Jury will take it into consideration, and send me to any other place: the allowance is but two pints of barley water, from three in the morning, till six in the afternoon, and there is half a brown loaf, and half an ox cheek for six hearty young men, and the ballast that I heaved up, weighs a ton weight, and is fit for a horse to do, and I am entirely a cripple now, and an object; I have twenty people to prove that there are a pair of irons for me to wear, and nobody else, and the expression came from Mr. Marshall's maid, that I should not live a month when I returned; if I had money I could send for the people.
I was wounded in the action of Inigo Jones , here is a pension signed by the Lord Mayor; I brought home above one hundred pounds, and went into partnership with my sister; I have been in town five years.
I said I served my time there.
I applied to go to sea immediately, I applied to one Mr. Blackerar, who was to get me a ship to go to sea.
I never saw the boy before I saw him at the office, I work hard for my living.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I was not in the house, and I knew nothing of this transaction, I have witnesses to the proof of it, I was in the street when these gentlemen came, if I had known any thing of this transaction, I had time to have gone about my business, I have witnesses to prove I was not in the house, and knew nothing of the matter.
I know nothing of it.
I had no man with me.
On Saturday the 5th of March, in the forenoon, a man came up to my lodgings, and enquired for a porter, he had a bag in his hand, which was open at one end; he said, he wanted a porter to carry it to the Swan with Two Necks, in Lad-lane: I went with him and was stopped; I looked round for the man and he was gone, I thought it was a snare laid for me: I met the man afterwards, and I had not power to speak to him.
I am not the person.
Those three old handkerchiefs were my own, I know nothing of the pocket book, I have had people here all the week.
I borrowed the things to do a temporary job, and when I came to Fleet-Market, I bethought myself I had done a wrong thing, and I was going back with them: I had no tools, and I did not intend to keep them; the job was for one Kennedy in Fleet Market; I have a character, he is here every day all last week.
I do not know any thing about the bag, or putting tea into it, or whether he took it from me I cannot say, I was in a fit just at the time, and after that I cannot pretend to say that I remember five minutes that are past.
I am come here with a resolution to speak the truth, and nothing but the truth; I am a man that is low in circumstances, nevertheless I have no manner of doubt but you, my Lord, and the gentlemen of the Jury will Yee equal justice done by me, as if I was a man of property; if I shall deny any question that shall be demanded of me, then, my Lord, and gentlemen look upon me in a had light.
I was called before the Alderman on Tuesday the 2d day of March, it was the 1st day of March he came into the lodge, and called for a pint of beer, and let some few words drop concerning me; about half an hour after five the same evening, the prosecutor and that gentleman came and sent for me to the lodge, then he asked me if I knew him, I told him to my knowledge I never saw him before; he told me, on the 4th of December he pitched a parcel there, and I was the man that took it; I told him he was mistaken; he told me the whole story, and said he would swear to it; I told him it was a very critical point where life was concerned; the next morning, about half an hour after nine, the prosecutor came to the place, and called me, and said he was sorry for what he said over night; but when he came to look at me again I was not the man; he said it was very hard upon him, for his master threatened to arrest him for the property lost; I told the Alderman that I was a very remarkable man, and if the man could swear to me he might; the Alderman said that was very fair, and asked him if he could swear to me; no such thing; I was discharged, but remanded till I got people to my character; I was ordered up on Saturday without a hearing, then on the Monday I got my friends to appear, then I was ordered into custody; then the prosecutor said he would swear I was the man that left the box there, but that he would not swear I was the man that took his bundle.
I went into this gaol, on Tuesday to see one William Brown , and likewise I had a message to deliver from a publican in Swallow-street, about a man that was quartered there, and hitting a man over the head with a quart pot, and I went there to see if I could get the man out, I went in the gaol, and as soon as I got in the gaol, Wright stopped me for assisting Steward, then he sent for the boy, and he said I was the person, he thought he saw me about there, and in the morning before Justice Gilbert he said, I believe it is, I think it is; says the Justice, you must be sure, no, says he.
I am a coach-maker.
I desire to have my witnesses called; I have nothing particular to say.
This woman asked me to lend her a guinea, so she is persuaded to do this, I am as innocent as a child.
I was going of an errand into Westminster, and coming back, I met a man, who asked me if I had seen a little child which he had lost; I told him no; I waited for him, and I went into the yard, and this man ran out, and running out into the entry, one of these gentlemen ran out, and said, I was breaking his pipe.
I went into my father's garden; it is very near a quarter of a mile from his house, the road where the lad stood is three hundred yards off; I came along by the place; but in the place I never was, and I am totally innocent.
I leave it all to my counsel.
Concerning the wine and ham; when I was last at Rotterdam, I saw an acquaintance of the prosecutor's, he said, he would send him some wine and ham, if I would give him a direction; I gave him one; I then came to London, and I was in the space of two months in expectation of finding these things; I called on the prosecutor, and staid there till the evening, and he asked me to sleep in the house, and he gave me a blanket to sleep in, on an empty bedstead; his wife brought me up a great coat; I went away with it in the morning between five and six; I did not return again till I was made; and then these things were laid to my charge; the coat and waistcoat and watch, I am a stranger to.
The gentleman did not say to me at the time he took me that I robbed his wife?
I am very innocent of the offence, and I have people here to prove that I was at a different place at the time.
The gentleman might forget cards so long ago; that gentleman paid a bill on that day.
I wish Ward to be called.
Thursday.
I do not wish to have her examined.
Mr. Allanson swore, he saw the stockings drop, and the prosecutor swore, he did not.
My father lived coachman to Lady Charlotte Finch , and Mr. Howman lived footman; and I found a ring some time ago, and my father put it into Mr. Howman's hands on his death bed; and he promised to let me have a pair of silver buckles and a pair of black worsted stockings; and I went to the prosecutor, and I never had any.
There was a little boy in the shop about four years old; and Mr. Archer said before the Justice, that that little child should say, that I took them; and this other gentleman swore that he saw me drop them.
I have not a friend in the world that will appear to my character, therefore I have only to leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I know nothing of the paper being put into the sack, or that there was any thing whatever in the sack when I took it up; I never took any thing of the kind to my lodgings, while I was a servant to Mr. Wallis; there are two doors to the room that goes through into a little yard, and likewise to the necessary, for all the rest of the lodgers; there is a varnish maker in the same house.
Going up Holborn-hill, much about the same time the gentleman lost his handkerchief, two men were behind, a person called out my name David, I went over the way to him, and the gentleman said I picked his pocket; he found no handkerchief about me.
I never saw the man till the minute he stopped me in Oxford-road.
I am a waterman by trade; I had a fare to Fulham; I was walking along, and was not within three quarters of a mile of it, and they were singing out stop thief, and a parcel of people running, and I was with them for a considerable while, and several people asked me what was the matter, I said there was a thief, and one or two of them laid hold of me, and they said they supposed I was him; I never had the bundle, nor never saw it.
I sent over to this man yesterday knowing that he had money belonging to me, he came over to me, I said, Frank, it is a hard thing for a man to lay in gaol with only gaol allowance, give me a part of my property, give me a shilling; says he, if you say any more, if you do not slash the matter, says he, I will do you.
A man employed me to carry it at past eleven at night; I never saw the man before; the watchman called, says he, where are you going with that table, the man that employed me said to Westminster; the watchman came up and stopped me, says I, stop the owner of the table, he is just a head of you, no, says he, I want you
He told the Justice that I said so; I gave him charge of the man three or four times.
When I gave her the child out of my arms; whether she saw me with any bundle?
After I gave you the child did not I stand talking to you sometime, and say I would call on Monday?
Did not that woman say before the justice, that if I would pay for the gown they would not prosecute me, and I said I would not, I was innocent, and would depend on the laws of my country?
On the 3d of June, it was on Saturday, I went down to Blackwall, on board an Indiaman, to see an acquaintance that sent for me, I came through Stepney Church-yard, I was very dry, this young woman's father and I had been watchmen together, she said her father and mother were not at home, but were gone to London, says I, I am very sorry, says I, I will be obliged to you to give me a draught of cock water, she took a pint pot and went as far as the door; she said I will fetch a pail full, she took the pail and went out, and I took the child in my arms, and the child was very cross, I followed her to the street door, when she came to the street door I was there, and had the child in my arms; she sat down the pail, and I gave her the child, and asked her what o'clock it was, and said I shall be this way on Monday, and will call; in the mean time this girl's father called; I was on the bed, he spoke to me about the linen gown, I went to the justice's, they offered me to make it up for nine shillings; I said I will stand the test to the law of my country; then I was committed to prison, where I have said ever since.
Ask him what he mentioned before the Justice; I was not committed for the mare?
I have no more to say than this; at the time he says the mare was lost I was down in Devonshire, driving the coach for my brother, then I drove a gentleman in town, then I drove the Sheriff of Bristol; I went out of town last August.
I was innocent of the whole story, but when I missed them I challenged my wife, and she told me she would call the landlord, and he would put me into the watch-house; I am a gardener, and went to work every day.
\My Lord, I am too sensible \"of the crime which I have committed, \"and for which I justly deserve to suffer; \"my life I have forfeited, and wish to resign \"it into the hands of him who gave \"it me; to recount my reason for wishing \"to die, would only satisfy an idle \"curiosity; no one can feel a more sensible \"heartfelt satisfaction than I do at \"the thoughts of quitting time for eternity; \"wherein I trust I shall meet with \"great felicity; I have not the least desire \"to live, but, on the contrary, if his \"Majesty should grant me a respite \"in consequence of my being recommended \"to mercy; I here avow in the \"face of heaven, I will put an end to my \"own existence; it is death that I wish \"for, it is death I seek; for nothing but \"death can extricate me out of the troubles \"which my follies have brought \"upon me.\""
Who gave you the first intimation of that mare being in the stable?
The horse and the mare were given to me in Tottenham-court-road, about one o'clock, or rather after, on Wednesday morning by two men; one of them called himself Hamilton; I was coming to town that morning about one, and I called at the King's head, it was so full of hay-makers, I could not get a lodging, and two men came with their two horses, and I asked them where they were going, they said not much farther, I told them I should be much obliged to them to tell me where I could get a lodging, one of them said yes, come with us my lad, take hold of that horse, and we will get you a lodging; they took me into a public house, I cannot tell the name of it, and asked me what I would drink, I told them I was very thirsty, they gave me a pot of porter, and they asked me to take these two horses down to the King's Head livery stables in Saint Giles's, and put them in there till the next morning, I told them I would, one of them came out with me to the door, and gave me the horses, and came with me almost to the place, for I am an intire stranger in town; I found this waterman at the stable door, and asked him for the hostler, he said he would call him up, he
did not awake him, he took the horses, but the stables were all locked up; the man who gave me the horses desired they might take particular care of the mare, for she was a favourite of Mr. Hamilton's; in the morning when I came at six, I found the horses in the yard, one of the men's name was Hamilton, the other I do not know; I have no witnesses.
The time that he says he lost his watch, I was not in London that day.
This lady came into the office, and looked all round twice, and she said there was no person there that she had any knowledge of, after she came into the inner office, and I was called up, this gentleman said, says he, you must swear to him, that is the man; Mr. Blacketer remembers that.
At the time that he swore to what he has lost, I was not then in London, that was the 14th of April, I think, he swore to his watch being lost, I was at Hoxton; I work for a gentleman, at Islington, I have witnesses to prove that, I had my master here all this week, which is Mr. Johnson a joiner at Islington, but every Tuesday and Saturday he is obliged to go to Windsor about a building.
I failed from the river Thames; the ship was taken away by the prisoners, and run into Dungenness; we were all ordered to go on shore, me and four or five more remained in the hold; I went over with the ship; she had a very bad passage; we were taken into a port in Maryland; the evening after we came in we were froze; the captain asked me, if I wished to be an indented servant, he said, he would write out our indentures, and the people would come on board and purchase us; he begged us to tell nobody, as there were about forty that were disposed of to the town of Baltimore; and some of them made a noise, calling them thieves; the inhabitants then began to find it out that they were convicts, they would not admit any to come on shore, nor go to purchase them; the inhabitants then discharged those that they had, and sent them into the woods; I was five weeks on board myself, when they found the vessel was obliged to go to another place, a merchant came on board, and took me to his own house; he asked ninety guineas for me, for three years, and the people thought it was too much; I was a fortnight at his own house, he got me a master who was a quaker, five miles from thence; after he found I was a convict he would not let me stay, he took me down to the place called the Notletts, and put me on board a ship, and he gave twelve dollars for my passage home; I told the captain I should be very happy to stay, he gave me leave to quit the ship, says he, do not let me see you leave it: I travelled night and day for three days, for fear I should meet with somebody to interrupt me and take me, I went to Petersburgh in Virginia, I got work there, this gentleman who purchased me, he was acquainted with this person that I worked for, whose name is Taylor; they happened to be coming through the country, they called there and saw me; the moment he had done so, he insisted on my going with him, that I was his servant; he said, he would send me home; he took me from Petersburgh, and put me on board a collier, and sent me home; I was obliged to come home; I brought some letters for a merchant.
He said, I was his servant, as he had indented me for sixty guineas; my master put me on board the vessel first, but the captain gave me liberty to leave it; I was exceedingly well satisfied; my master when he called at Petersburgh he brought me and put me on board a vessel, a collier which came from Leeds, at least she went from there to Leeds, and he agreed with the captain to bring me over, the captain of the ship brought me over, when he found I was a convict, he would not let me be about his house.
No, my Lord.
I suppose Malone put it into my private pocket.
I have nothing more to say, than that I was coming down Castle-street, and sat down at a public house door, as I thought it was, who I had with me I do not know, nor who talked with me; and after I had walked some way, they halloed out stop him; I will not say that I did not give him abusive language; I was carried before a magistrate.
The prosecutor was a countryman of mine; we were at work both together, we had been drinking, and I made more free than I should have done, because he was a countryman of my own; I should not have done so with any body else; I went to get the things to give him.
There were other people running, and I run, and coming to cross Mile-end-road a gentleman stopped me.
I am a taylor ; I went to carry a suit of clothes; there was an odd ten-pence; I agreed to spend it; I was very much in liquor; I went into another house with an acquaintance; I went to sleep, and the person went away; I never saw the pots, nor knew where I was, till I found myself the next morning in Wood-street Compter, nor should I have known where I was the next morning till I asked what strange place I was in.
The prosecutor came to this house, where they took me with a light-horseman, they had a pint of beer together, and they asked me to drink with them, and I did drink, the young fellow and me went away, and left the prosecutor, they persuaded me to go with them, and going across the park, he was determined to in-list for a light-horseman; we had some liquor, and stood and drank it, I came out of the house before Parsons did believe I fell asleep; I was rather in liquor; I got up about two, and went away, I found the things in the necessary; as for the waistcoat and the rule I never saw, but the handkerchief and the pencil, and the two cards I picked up in the necessary.
If I had committed a robbery upon him, I should have been a great fool to have kept those things in my pocket, and to come back to the house.
I went into the shop to buy some hinges, there was nobody in the shop but this gentleman, with the newspaper in his hand, he seemed rather attentive to the paper, it was an exceeding hot day, and there were twenty parcels on the counter, as I came in with two pound of pewter, and another parcel, I put down my parcels on the counter, he undid one paper, and then another, and they did not suit, says I, Sir, I have given you the trouble of opening the papers, I will have a pair of these, the handkerchief laid on a parcel, and I put it in my pocket, he said you have taken a parcel.
A man hired me to carry it.
I picked up the handkerchief.
I never came out of the yard, two men
went in and they dropped this cloth; the man will swear my life away, I can see that plain enough; when he asked me what I had got, I told him some cloth that would make a waistcoat.
I bought the things on the road going to my father's.
It was the King's birthday, and I wanted to come on shore, the mate granted me liberty; about four I wanted to get my things ready, and another young fellow belonging to the vessel was on shore; I met him and he had a bundle; he asked me to go with him, I said, I will go along with you; he said, he was going to sell or pawn some things; he took me to that man's house, and he sold these things; then to another house and he sold some more things; I wanted to go on board, he said, he would in the morning; Mr. Sadler came and took me for these things.
Pray did I take the lodging of you?
How came you to say before the Justice, that you did not let the lodgings, you said, you was not at home, you was at work?
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, the prosecutor stood as I came down stairs; I asked him what o'clock it was, he said, six or half past six, and I wished him a good morning; I should think if any body had robbed him, they would not have stopped to have asked questions; why did not the woman follow me, I went gently from the door, and I went to the public house over the way.
I leave it to my counsel; I am innocent.
Did you see me pick it off the stones?
Did not you say it was the woman in the brown gown that took it?
I had been into the fair, and bought this coat and hat, and I found the lace on the stones, the prosecutor came up to me and said it was hers, and I gave it to her, and she went to the stall and stood there a few minutes, and came back again and seized me by the wrist, and said it was taken by a woman, and I must know the woman, I had no man or woman with me.
You was along with a man, I was passing with a girl, ask him one question, whether I did not tell the men that are over him at St. James's the next day, that I saw him on duty, I accused him of it before my serjeant in the street, and told him every thing of it, and he denied he was there.
The next day that I saw him, on the 25th of June.
I said to my serjeant there is the man that I saw last night.
I say the next time that I saw him.
Ask him whether when Lord Harrington's servants were walking with him, I told him of the things that he had done, and if he would come the next morning, there were three men that did accuse him of these things, that he had connections with him in the park, and when Lord Harrington's black servant heard it, he left him.
Why did not he take me up before that time?
Ask him whether that man that stands along with him at the front gate of the park did not say he would not stand with such a man unless he cleared himself up, for he was a man that was not sit to talk to a man? he only took me up for defence of his own character, he would not have taken me up, and said nothing at all to me if I had held my tongue.
Please to let me consider of
if you please to ask whether he was not sat down on one of the benches with a soldier, and whether I did not pass by with a girl?
I dossed my shoes off my feet, and went and run up to the place to hear, I could not hear what passed, but as soon as they got off their seat, says the soldier, I will have something more to drink.
I was on duty there.
Whether I did not ask him if I was the man, before Lord Harrington's servants, and he said no?
The prosecutor then said to Lord Harrington's servants that I was not one of them.
Please to ask him whether the marshal man at the gate did not accuse the prosecutor, and say he was such and such a man, and that they would not stand with him unless he cleared himself?
Please to examine that marshalman, but that is not the marshalman.
I was not the man that spoke a word to him, neither wrong nor right till the sentry was charged with him; I had no conversation with him; I was along with a girl at the same time; I came down the park, and a soldier and he had a tustle; the three men said they would have something to drink, or else they would take him to the guard-room, and he said he would give them no more; then he went to Lord Harrington's servants, and I came up; the prosecutor had an apron on, and a round hat; and his hair was tied at that time, and his apron was tucked on one side; and when I saw him with the soldier, his apron was wrapped up plump round him; and when he got up he put down his apron; I said to the prosecutor, you know you have behaved indecent to the soldiers, and am I one of the men; no says he, you are not; and when I told the black servant the whole of it, he would not go no farther; I went to the guard-room, and told the serjeant of it; the next morning I could see never a marshalman, but I asked the man that took care of the king's chapel, I described the prosecutor as a tall man that stooped in his walk; he could not tell me his name; the next day I went on guard, that was the 20th, and I asked the name of the marshalman, they said, I believe by the description it is Mr. King; says I, I saw him doing things he should not, with a soldier, one night between ten and eleven; I could not see him that day; I constantly told of it, and was told that he went in the report of a shake; and the marshalman said they would not stand with him without he would clear it up; I never was reported to captain, colonel, or serjeant for wronging any man; I never was in prison before in my life; I am lately come out of the country; I have not been long in the regiment; Mr. King would not come down to speak to me when they went up.
I came and told the serjeant in the guard-room that night; I told it the next day to the Marshalman, and the prosecutor might have come down to St. James's, and have taken me up any day; he knew I was on guard every fifth day; and if he could have sworn to my voice, why did not he come the next day, or the day after? it was three weeks before he took me up.
I have nobody in London that knows me; I came lately out of Derbyshire.
I went there to see an acquaintance; these things lay on the stairs.
I stopped a minute where the sashes stood.
I bought them.
The money the prosecutor lays to my charge is the money I received from Mrs. Morrice.
This man crossed his dray upon me, and I could not get off to turn another way with my cart; I said I shall catch your wheel; he said never mind; then, says I, take care of yourself; I did not know I had touched the man till I had got past.
Where was Boulton when I came out of the Coach and Horses?
Ask the surgeon whether the man had not the venereal disease very bad?
I and another man were drinking at the Coach and Horses, and we saw Anderson stand across the way, just by the water trough of the red-lion, says he, go and fetch him over to have some beer; I went and laid hold of his arm, says I, Billy come and have some beer, says he, I have no money, says I, never mind that, if I ask you to drink I do not ask you to pay, and I
took hold of him, and drew him along; then he hit me a knock on the head, then I hit him another, then he up with his foot, and gave me a kick over the shin.
So far as hurt the man I did not mean to hurt him any more than my own brother; I was in liquor, I had been drinking all day.
Only the gentlewoman of the house.
The second day I went to see how the man was?
No.
A day or two after I said to Boulton, if the poor fellow is so bad, I will put in a shilling on Saturday-night, and you put in what you like, and we will make a gathering for him.
I bought the horse at Cambridge fair of a tinker; that is the receipt he gave me for it; I cannot read.
It is impossible for me to send for him; I do not know where to find him if I had; when I brought this horse up, I gave him to one John Hendrick to sell for me; he will give me a character.
I desire to call my witnesses.
Before my time was expired, I fell into a sickness for two months, and I had a pardon on condition of transporting myself.
My Lord, sickness prevented me for very near two months; I have people to prove that, but I do not know whether they are come or not.
I did not expect to be tried to day.
Near two months, and afterwards it was want of money prevented me.
Last session, the gentleman had one man cast for the sake of the reward, and the man that is the evidence now, he knows very well within his own breast, that I am not the person that was concerned in the robbery, and that gentleman has perjured himself in swearing to me.
The prosecutor said, I made use of no oaths to him; that man said just now, that I d - nd his eyes, and said, frisk him.
I have sent a letter into Hertfordshire for two men that were my witnesses; they kept a butcher's shop in Marybone-lane; they know, that on the 7th, 8th, 9th, 10th, and 11th I was ill at home, and could not go out; I put my trial off on that account; I had no answer; I have no witnesses here at all; I am not the person that the man says; I was never in his company but once in all my life, and that was but one hour; he called upon a young man that was a sailor, an acquaintance of mine; the young man called me by my name; I never saw him since, till I saw him at the Justice's; he has done it on purpose to save his own life.
This man only wants to swear my life away; for a soldier heard him say,
the man is not here now; this man went to my mistress with whom I was apprentice , and told her, if they came to my character that they would stop them, and make a twelve month's fine of them.
The gentleman and me were working together; we were talking of cards, and I asked him to lend me a deck of cards; on the Sunday following we were both together at the pay table, he promised to lend me a dirty deck of cards; I went into the garret, there was nobody: I was coming down and there came up a young woman and asked me who I wanted; and I said, Tom Mitchell ; and I saw Mrs. Mitchell, and I told her I wanted a deck of cards; she told me that her mother had the cards; and the morning following I was speaking to Tom Mitchell about these cards, and he told me to come down on Monday night as soon as I had had my supper, and I went into the Crown in Pye-street; and I was with a young man that I went for these cards for; I heard the child crying; and I saw this bundle laying up against the back door, and as there was nobody at home, I was going to fetch them home; and the patrol stopped me; I told them they were my own property; so I told him to come along and I would shew him; so I went into the back yard, and I lifted up the sash; I did not ask to put the things in; and then I was stopped; and this man said to me going along, if there were no more Irishmen than you, I would hang you for the sake of the bounty; if not for the sake of the country.
Were there not two men in the shop?
Who was in the shop?
I was in liquor, and put down the pot.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I certainly gave this note to Mr. Ball, but as for forging of it, or knowing it to be false, I totally deny; and there is no writing belonging to me but what is on the back; I was appointed surgeon of the Scipio, at Sheerness; I went down to join the Scipio; a gentleman I owed a little money to, came and asked me for it; I told him I could not pay him, but I had an agent Mr. Stirling, I wrote to him, he went up and got the note, and brought it to me, with the acceptance as it is; I paid him twenty-nine shillings out of it; if you observe, the note is dated the 21st, and consequently was due the 28th; Mr. Ball says, I gave it him the 29th; I gave it him at eight at night, of the 24th of December; as to my confession, my mind was in a situation not capable of judging what I did say; I believe I might say so, on purpose to get clear of it; for when he came to take me, he said, if I could raise a friend to pay the money, he would not hurt me; I told him if he would let me alone a day or two, I would certainly pay him; and now at this moment, I do not mean that he should lose any thing of it.
He sailed for Jamaica the day after Christmas day.
Mr. Ball frequently repeated that he would not hurt me; there was a Mr. Robinson, an apothecary, present at the time.
I expected that apothecary here by eleven, and a Mr. Cockburn, surgeon in Grafton-street, and a Captain Cockburn.
Yes, my Lord, all that I expected to come are here.
Will you give me leave to look at the note again; I did not know it till Mr. Fletcher told me, that the stamp was not a legal stamp; it is upon a twopenny stamp.
Mr. Haylock asked me the question, and I told him; but nobody else knew any thing of it but Mr. Haylock and the gentleman; I leave it to God and the Court.
No, my family is an hundred miles in the country.
I was standing close by the gateway, and a man dressed like a porter asked me to carry two pieces of cotton a little way for him, and he would give me sixpence, and the man stopped me; they dropped out of my hand.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I came into the house about eleven, and staid till dark, and went out with a common prostitute to her house; I was very much in liquor; I went backwards; I kicked the gown before me, and picked it up; I did not know what I did; I wrapped it round me; I was coming up to pay for a reckoning, and they stopped me.
I bought them for fifteen shillings of a Jew.
I am as clear of it, as God is of sin.
I took them when I was hungry.
I did not pull it down.
Upon my life I am innocent.
These bottles were given to me by a man; my friends are all gone.
I can say but a vast little for myself, if I can give you satisfaction; a month last Monday, I was coming across Moorfields, with a saw on my shoulders, and a man with a pair of bed-posts on his shoulders, asked me to sell them, and offered me half a crown; the man went with me, and put them down in the passage; Mr. Covington came and looked at him; says he, what will you have for them; says he, eight shillings; says he, I can buy better than these for eight shillings; he gave six shillings, and three shillings and sixpence in part; I told him I should have another pair, not of the same sort of wood, and a piece of slab; he bid me bring them, which I did; the man met me the following night with the other pair; he disputed I had more than three shillings and sixpence; I brought him in before Mr. Covington's face, and asked him in the passage, and he said he gave me half a crown and one shilling, and in a few minutes after, Mr. Covington brought in the remainder of the money; and the next night they stopped me; I told them, I had them from a man that brought them from Ratcliffe highway; he asked me his name; I did not tell him any name particularly; at the same time my wife lay in, and he said he would detain me all night, which I did not like.
I know nothing of it.
No.
My wife goes out to wash, and takes in washing, and she was to go to wash in Castle-street, No. 3, and the child was taken very ill, and not expected to live; she could not go out, and she sent me, and I met a woman that I knew, and she said she did not know such a woman; as we were talking together, a man came out of this door and she says, ask that man; he said yes, she lives in the kitchen backwards; he left the door wide open; I went in as far as the passage, I called at the top of the stairs, and asked if any one was below, nobody answered; I turned back, and this woman was standing at the door; says I, you are wanted, my wife wants you; she fell a searching me, I had nothing in my pocket but a handkerchief; she took it out.
I have no further to say, than this: on Saturday evening, I came from the house where I lived, I was going to the Nag's-head, in Aldersgate-street, to call for some money, and running to make the best of my way there, this gentleman laid hold of my collar; says he, what have you there? I said, nothing my good man; my waistcoat flew open as he laid hold of me; I had a white waistcoat under my red one.
I found the shoes; I did not strike him.
I went down the yard to ask when the Plymouth waggon went out; and I heard the porter say, he had lost a box of tea, and I should pay for it; and charged a constable with me; I know nothing of the man nor the box.
I leave it to my counsel.
I received a paper from a porter, who came and requested a permit for seventy-five gallons of brandy; I carried it to Mr. Norris, who wrote the same; I carried it to that person, who brought it back and said, he wanted another for the next morning; I wrote the other by Mr. Norris's desire, and delivered it to the person who came for it; now, if this note had been a false note, so long after as a month or six weeks, it might have been destroyed, but I believe it to be a true one; it was fairly wrote and posted as the usual course of business was.
They promised to forgive me.
I have a cut on my cheek; I fancy it was the fear that put that handbill in his head.
That old gentleman's son was hanged for returning from transportation; his character is very well known.
My Lord, the day I was apprehended, I was drinking with Ward; and I had been with Mr. Smith several times drinking, and I met him once on Black-friar's-bridge; it is amazing they should never mention this before; I went willingly with Ward to the prosecutor's son; and the prosecutor was sent for; and he several times said, I was not the man.
I found the things.
I happened to be in the yard; I heard a noise in the street; I was going to do what was necessary; I never saw the handkerchief or butter.
I leave it all to my counsel.
I leave it to my counsel. Mr. Nash knows I was searched, and there was only a penny found upon me.
I wish to make my defence.
I never took any money of him, no a farthing in the world; he never offered me any money, not a halfpenny, we never agreed for any price; I was coming from the Green Man to the White Bear; it is not above one hundred and fifty yards apart; I have lived in the Parish about thirty-five or thirty-six years; I have a wife and five children; I was going down to my sister; I caught this horse with a halter on his neck; I said to my people, this horse has flung his rider; I tied the horse to the rail opposite to the White Bear; this man came up, and asked me whose horse it was; I said it was Colonel Drury 's horse; they said I had offered it for sale; I said I had not; I told Mr. Grant and Gates immediately as they came up that it was Colonel Drury 's horse.
Whereabouts was it that I was stopped?
If you saw me shuffle the handkerchiefs, why did not you pick them up?
I was going of an errand to one Mr. Ridley's, to order a loin of mutton; I was making the best of my way home; I thought this the nighest cut; I heard the cry of stop thief; a man run as it might be to the left hand of me; I ran rather quicker than ordinary for fear of being knocked down; I am taken so unawares there are no witnesses here.
I had the things of my master when he kept a butcher's shop in Whitechapel, instead of my wages; and I came to Monmouth-street to sell these things and buy some others.
I picked up this handkerchief close to the door, as I came along.
I have nothing to say.
I heard a noise in the road, and I looked over the wall to see what was the matter; I was in the park, and got over the wall and stood in the road, and they took me; I have no friends in town.
Not that I know of.
There were three other soldiers came by.
The other witness said he saw the other soldier.
Yes, my Lord, he did say so.
They were hid in the field; they were perfectly covered over with the greens; I was going through the path-way, and saw them some distance from the path-way, and two men came up.
I had been looking for work at a tobacconist's, and upon Fish-street Hill. I had been at another tobacconist's; and there was a tall jockey, who might have picked the gentleman's pocket, who threw the handkerchief at me, and the man Mabs took me.
I am innocent.
He found no key in my pocket.
I have nothing to say in respect to the bill, any further than I am totally innocent of it, I never saw Benjamin Ward in my life on the business.
There was no mark upon it but what was put on afterwards.
I am innocent.
That gentleman swore that he picked me out from every body else; I was standing by myself.
I leave it to my Councel.
I know nothing of the shoes.
It was a common lodging house; another man slept with me; I sold some things of my wife's; I know nothing of these things.
I had been of an errand for my father, into great Wild-street; coming back down Long-acre, I heard the alarm of stop thief; I run with the rest, and they laid hold of me; I have several friends at the door.
I never said so, I deny having the sheep.
I live with my Lord Lonsdale five years and upwards come October; I sold this man a shilling's-worth of hay bands; that was all I sold; I had no hay bind to sell.
That man told how it was, only that he said I struck the man twice, I only struck him once, I did not mean to strike him, till he abused me, and struck me first.
I was at work on board a Greenland-man; I had received some money; and I came into Rosemary-lane to buy some odd things; I went into a publick house to sit down, and they took me; I have had the handkerchief above these five months, I bought it when I came home from Greenland; it is the same, if I was to die this minute, I never robbed anybody, I never was in a prison in my life.
I leave it entirely to my Counsel.
They were laying at the door, and I took them up.
I never saw the things, the prosecutor did not know his own property before the Justice; we were before the Justice three times.
A person gave them me to carry, he promised me a shilling to carry them to the Adelphi in the Strand, and in two or three hundred yards I was stopped; the man was not six or seven yards before me, I told him to take that man that was before me.
I had the parcel given into my hands to carry; a person was with me, he is here, but I cannot rightly say his name.
I was coming by the corner, and saw the handkerchief lay on the ground, and was running to see what was the matter, and the people took hold of me; I know nothing of it.
I have nothing to say; I have witnesses.
When you came across the square, did not you ask me who it was that was along with me?
Did not you ask me who it was that was in the square with me, in the boots?
Did not you say it was good bread for you, and it would bring you a hat full of guineas.
Did not you ask me who it was that was along with me in boots?
My Lord, I have nothing to say but that I am quite innocent of the affair.
Was not there two men before me? I had been to my sister for some linen; I have people to my character.
I only beg the favour to call in two witnesses in my behalf.
I have nothing to say.
Coming home from Whitechapel, I saw a man drop this on the ground, and I picked it up, and I was going to give it to the man, and they caught hold of me.
I bought this coat in Rosemary-lane on Wednesday, I believe it was the 2d of May, between four and five; I have witnesses I believe at the door; after I was taken up, I had not time to send to the place where I bought it, the man was not at home; but he heard of it after, and he said, if any thing further came of it; he would appear.
I told the alderman that I gave the money for the coat, and he waited an hour for me, to see if the witness would come; I told them I bought it.
James Cooper took these boots and put them into my bed, and carried them on shore, and he gave them to me to give to the woman, and she gave me the money, and I gave it directly to Cooper.
I am innocent.
I went home with an acquaintance of mine on the Sunday evening that this money was lost; I saw something on Blackfriars-bridge, and I kicked it and picked it up; and when I came into the Temple, I looked at it, and it was fifteen guineas and a half and a shilling; I kept it till it was advertised, for I thought a guinea or something that might be paid for advertizing, would be of more service to me than keeping all the money, and I looked into the papers at night; I spent a guinea and a half, and paid a debt and some trifles.
Yes.
No, because it might be taken away again; on the Tuesday and not before, I converted one of those guineas into silver.
I was never nigh the place at the time; I was on board a ship at the same time; my friends are here; they were here yesterday; I was fourteen last May.
I have had no other coat for this year and a half.
Going along, I stopped and I saw the basket; it had an anvil in it; I took it and carried it into the barber's shop and meant to have it advertised, and Gray wanted to buy it, but I would not consent to it; then Clark and Gray came to the publick-house and sent for a constable and took me up to a Magistrate, and I was committed.
I went into the shop to buy a pair of girl's shoes; I never stole a pair of shoes in my life.
My speech is very bad; I am sorry I did it.
This is a malicious prosecution carried on against me by my father-in-law, in hopes to receive a property which I should receive in a short time.
A man hired me to carry them.
I had been out a drinking.
I had been out of work some time, and almost starved, and had had a little beer, which made me more hungry than I was before.
I was employed by a gentleman to carry the gate to St. Mary Axe, and there they took me, and carried me to the compter.
I found the spoon on Tower-hill.
I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I know nothing about it.
I cannot say any further, than I was in liquor.
I bought the things.
My wife left the door open, and somebody put the basket in.
I found them in the street.
I was going home about eleven o'clock: and going home; I went home and knocked at the door; and I could not make any body hear; and I went and had a pint of beer at the Falcon and Castle, Holborn: I had not been in, I believe, five minutes, before there was a trow at the door; I heard the noise, and ran out, as you might have done, Sir; I running out, I was close by the door; there was a parcel of watchmen standing by the door got hold of three men; they took hold of me with these three men; they took me to the watch-house; I had been in about ten minutes; the prosecutor taps me on the shoulder; he says, you are the man that cut me: I makes answer to him, me the man cut you! I never see you to night, that I know of; he makes answer to me, you cut me in Drury-lane! I makes answer, I cut you in Drury-lane; I have not been in Drury-lane to night; immediately he swore to me; and I was taken down in the book, and put backwards: on Monday morning he come to me at the watch-house, and says, if you will tell me you are the man that struck me, I will forgive you. I immediately said, I cannot tell you a thing I know nothing about; then I was fully committed, and sent down to Bridewell; I went to Bridewell: the next day he comes down to me with my mother, and says to me, I believe you are not the man; if you will give me half a guinea, I will file no bill against you; I immediately said, I have not got half a guinea in the world; do you think I would go to give you half a guinea for a thing I know nothing about; I had a long discourse with him; he asked me, Jem, will you eat any thing? I immediately said, no, I have had my dinner; he said, can you drink any thing? says I, I can drink a little drop of beer; he calls for a pot first, and then after that was out, he called for another: he says to my mother, good woman, I will not prosecute your son, for I do not think he is the person: my mother cried, and begged he would not prosecute me at all; and he said, he would not: he says to me, Jem, if you want any thing to eat or drink, send up to the Coach and Horses, in Silver-street, Golden-square; I says, I am very much obliged to you, Sir, and if you have got an old sack, for I lay very cold, I will be much obliged to you to send me one down; he said he would send me one down the next day; he did not send one, nor have I ever seen him since.
I was coming from Bishopsgate-street, on the 9th of February; and the firkin of butter was pitched on a block, at a sadler's door, and a young man was standing by it; and he asked me to carry it, and he would satisfy me; and I carried it as far, very near, as Bunhill-row; and this young man laid hold of me: and the man that asked me to carry it ran away directly: I never was in the shop, nor near the shop, in my life.
Was I drunk or sober?
Did not you speak to me first?
Did not your master tell you to let me have the things to shew the person?
Was I drunk or sober?
Did not you use me ill, and knock me down?
I came on shore, and went into this shop; I was going on board again; and I told the prosecutor so, and he let me have the things; he sent them by the boy, and the boy gave them to me to carry to shew, by his master's consent; I left him at a publick-house; and I was so much in liquor, I could not find the house again; when I returned I laid down, and somebody stole my watch. It is necessary for a seaman always to get a drop of liquor, when he has done his business: they used me very ill, and tore my clothes. I have been at sea twenty-seven years, and never offended; I was five years in Turkey, and in 1776 in the American war; at the latter end of the war I was taken prisoner, and brought into Martinico prison, and laid two years there. My lord, the lenity I have shewn to my country, I expect that lenity will be shewn to me now by this honourable court.
I took this not with an intent to steal, but to stamp some button-holes upon my gaiters; and in going back, which I did directly, as I was told, in my flurry, I dropped the lead: if my master had been in the way, I should have asked him to have taken it for the same use.
I had been out with different parcels before in the morning; and I understood that when I returned, I was to go with this parcel; I then took these blankets all folded up, not knowing what they were; and drinking too much, and not knowing what I was doing, I called a coach, and told him, as far as I can recollect, to drive home to my master's house; instead of that, he drove me to Whitechapel, where I had never been before.
I leave it to my counsel.
I was going to market with my mother, and I met two porters whom I knew, and they took me into a publick-house, and gave me some two-penny and gin to drink, which I was not used too, and did not know what I did.
I went up to look for my brother, who worked for Mr. Jones; and the prosecutor came up and cried stop thief, and they took me.
As I was going my rounds at two o'clock, I found the prosecutor's door open, and went in with my lanthorn; I saw no one there; and seeing some tools lay on the bench, I thought if I left them behind, they would be lost before morning; I put them into my pocket, with intent to bring them to the buildings as soon as I got up; but at going off at six o'clock, I got rather too much liquor; and when this gentleman came, I did not know what I brought home; the gentleman himself knows, I was undrest when he knocked at the door.
I was asked by Cox's boy to get him down a pot; and in doing that a pint pot fell down upon my head; immediately they rang a bell, and carried me to the watch-house.
I am not guilty.
I was coming down Aldersgate-street gateway, from easing myself; I saw two men drop these things, and I picked them up; and this man came up and stopped me.
I leave it to my counsel.
As my mate and I were coming from Limehouse-corner; we were very much in liquor; my mate kicked a can down, that stood in the passage of this house, and I picked it up again immediately, in doing it I rather fell myself; the man comes to me directly, and asked me what I was going to do with the kettle.
I was moving this man's goods; I had the key, and at every turn I locked the door; and he was there along time; and when he went out again, I gave him the key, and did not go there again.
It is all false what he says.
About six o'clock in the afternoon, I came from my friends where I had been to supper; and going along, I went into a publick-house, and there Mr. Abrahams told me of the robbery; and told me if I knew any thing about it, I should have a share of forty pounds.
I have one thing to ask him, whether he saw me drop the curtain?
Going along Beek-street, the boy came up and said something, and I walked on; and they came up and laid hold of me, and took me back to the public-house; but I was never there before.
I leave it to my counsel.
I picked it up.
My wife has laid in at the hospital four days.
I know nothing of the coals at all.
I was very much in liquor, and locked out of my lodgings, it being two o'clock when I went home: I had been drinking with Newland; so I went up to go to the Duke's Head; and going along I met this drove of sheep coming down St. Giles's; some coaches stopped till the drove passed; they had a dog which divided them; and up the street the sheep went; I was going on the foot-way; the sheep was on the foot-way before me; then the drover came up; what answer I gave him I do not know: this Knowland comes up, and takes hold of me, and takes me to the watch-house: I was so drunk I could not see through a story ladder.
I was out at work at Whitechapel, from the 9th of January, for three weeks.
I was going to my uncle's, who keeps the Green Man, at Marybone, and coming back I heard the cry of stop thief; and the patrols laid hold of me.
I saw this cake of soap laying on the ground, and I picked it up, and looked about to see if there was any owner for it; and as soon as there was, I returned it.
I asked two young fellows at Blackwall stairs to give me a cast up, which they did, to King's Head stairs; one of them had this on his shoulders, and asked me if I would carry it up for him.
Did not I deliver the duplicate myself?
It was Dewett sent to make it up; I did not send to him.
The shirt and stockings I bought; and the breeches belong to James Williams ; he sent me to pawn them for five shillings; and I gave him the money, and we went to a public house and had a pot of beer; and whilst we set there, I bought the duplicate of Williams, in order to take out the breeches myself; I offered him one shilling for it: and if he did not come on Saturday night to the sign of the Shovel, I was to have it for the shilling; but if he came, he was to have it back again: I was at Mr. Dewett's house on Monday evening; that makes him think I took the things; I knocked at the door, and heard a great confusion within; there was a fight; and there came out a great crowd of people; I went and asked him what was the matter? he said a woman had challenged his wife on Sunday, and they were to meet that evening.
It is the first time I ever was guilty of any thing of the kind: I hope you will take it into consideration.
Coming along shoe-maker's-row, they took me, and said I was a thief.
I never took the ham, I declare to God; I saw a young fellow drop it, in a red coat. I am a sailor .
As I was going along Chandos-street saw a man running; he passed by, dropped this shawl; I laid hold of it; this gentleman came and took hold of me.
As I was going along, at seven o'clock in the morning, I saw two men standing at this door; I thought the carpenters were at work; I went in; and was coming out again, when they came in and opened the door.
A man asked me to carry these two deals to Ratcliff-cross, and I will satisfy you for it accordingly; I rested them against the wall, and this gentleman came up.
I had this bottle to bring some small beer in, as the prosecutor did not like to see a pint of porter brought in, while we were washing the bottles.
I bought the rule for sixpence; it was not burned; one of my little girls put it into the fire; and on that day he bought the axe we went out to drink a pot of beer together.
I have worked for Mr. Vantris six or seven years; and he knows nothing of me before this, but that I was very honest; and I should not have done it, but I was drunk.
On the 27th of January last, I was at work at this ship china, and being ill I did not put them down, for fear they might be broken; I then put them into the skirt of my coat, in the condition your lordship sees them; I then met Mr. Wilson in about three yards from the counting-house, (I had to carry them to the table, and clean in one room distant from the counting-house) I asked Mr. Wilson if he would give me a ticket to enable me to go out; it was impossible I could expect to go out without being stopped; for when I have had a bit of bread and cheese extraordinary, I have been obliged to take it out of my pocket, and shew it.
I went down to Mr. Bullens; I gave him an order for the goods; I asked him to give me change for a ten pound bank note and five shillings, which was all the money I had about me: well, says he, I am not afraid to trust you, you will pay me when you come to town again.
He did, he met me, and called me a thief, and took me to Clerkenwell, there I bailed it; some time after, I met him again, and he collared me again, and said I was a thief, and I begged he would not expose me, but I would go where he pleased, and desired we might go to a publick house, there we drank together.
The prosecutor told me, if I could give him seven pounds, and a bond of indemnification, that he should not be hurt, he would not prosecute me.
I had been very ill nine weeks; first from an accident in riding a horse of my master's, a vicious horse that he could not ride; I was insane for above a month, and tied down down to my bed, in a strait waistcoat; his clerk knows it; and I broke many of my things; and I asked the clerk to give me an odd thing or two for my own use, he said I might take a few; the punch bowls and the tea pot I did not take from this shop.
My Lord, I wish, and desire the favour of this Court to hear me a few words; I am a man that has been most generally ill treated: they have taken the advantage of me, because they judge I am an ignorant and an illiterate man; these are people that have been acquainted with the quirks of the law, and have had some scholastical education, brought up under the name of Mr. Crossly: I have witnesses, now present, of their making their braggs; and about a fortnight ago, says he, I cannot support this action I have against him no way; but not withstanding that, he never can get out of the bowels of a goal.
I went up for a bit of sugar to eat, and hearing the gentleman come up, I was so frightened, I got into the cask.
I was going to receive a bill for my master, in Fleet-market; I went down these Buildings, and the girl ran up to me, and said, where is my bundle? I told her I knew not what she meant, says she, you stopped me, and took my bundle from me; the gentleman here came up and took hold of me, and had me to the watch-house; I am a chair-maker .
I will speak if you please. May it please your lordship, and the gentlemen of the jury: in addition to the misfortune of standing here, accused of a crime I never committed, I have also the misfortune of being incapable of doing myself justice equal to the prosecutor, however deceived and mistaken he has been: and my lord, as this circumstance happened at the play-house, in a great crowd of people, where the first gentleman or tradesman might be laid hold of, it is not impossible that the prosecutor might be mistaken in what he has sworn: I trust, my lord, that my inability and ignorance to defend myself against such a charge, however false, will not be construed into guilt: I shall therefore rest my defence intirely on the justice and candour of this honourable Court. As to the evidence of Hannah Green , I hope, gentlemen, it will not have any weight with you; I hope you will take her evidence into consideration, and judge according to her situation in life; that it will have no credit with you, where it affects the liberty of a subject whose character was never called into question before this unfortunate time.
I leave it to my Counsel.
I object to it, on account of my health, being in a bad state through long confinement. I should rather meet it now: it is depriving a subject of his liberty, and endangering his health.
Then I shall make an application to some member of parliament, or the legislature. I therefore totally appeal against such power of putting off the trial any further; and whoever dares to oppose me in that respect, I will represent him to the legislature, or some member of parliament; either to General North, or some gentleman whom I have the honour of knowing.
I do not admit of it. And I shall make an application to parliament, that I have been here three months in disagreeable confinement; and the king has broke the mutual obligation between him and the subject: and the assault is of such a simple kind of manner; and what I have met with is of such a nature, that I desire to speak by way of extenuation, and to plead guilty or not guilty to the facts. I then shall make an application as being illegally detained in prison, that you will not admit a British subject to plead to the indictment: I therefore shall make an application to the legislature, that you are violating the laws of this kingdom. I will not put it in the power of the gentlemen that are employed for me to put it off.
I beg the favour to speak to you.
The privy counsel were pleased to send the king's physician to me, after I had appeared before my Lord Kenyon, on the 22d of January. I was examined at the privy counsel by Lord Camden; and they sent the king's physician to me. I made dates and memorandums of the physician's visits, likewise remarks that I spoke to him at various times; and of the apothecary's visits also: they persevered in my being in perfect health, fit to meet my trial; and I have put down the conversations.
I have had a physician attended me two months past. On the 22d of January, I came into these circumstances: and they were pleased to send the king's physician to examine me, whether I was perfectly in my senses: I persevered in being so, and would take no drugs from the apothecary. I begged him to attend as a friend to me, to protect me from insult, supposing there was any possibility that I could be insulted in this great prison: but if I had not been well, I would have had my own physician, Dr. Heberden, who attended my father formerly, when living: I looked upon him as a friend attending me, to prove that I was in my senses, or any thing else. I made memorandums of his visits, and the various conversations that we had together. I made memorandums likewise of letters: a letter which I wrote to Mess. Cox and Greenwood; and I have a copy of it, and one that I wrote about the 24th of February, during the time that the last sessions was here, when I thought I might be tried; I then recopied it again. I then mentioned that a disagreeable thing had happened, that General Clarke is coming home in disgrace. To hide that infamy that has happened, they wished to give it out that I was out of my senses. The agents who had immediately freed me from the inconveniences I was under, they were ordered to deny the subject the liberty of drawing on his agent on the house where he had money to answer his bills. They acknowledged me to have been perfectly in my senses at the time when I first came to England; I drew on them, and I have totally freed myself from the inconvenience I was under, from being improperly detained in the county of Cheshire. I was writing a letter of what was publickly given out concerning the subject: I then wrote to Mess. Cox, Cox and Greenwood, to beg they would send down some gentlemen here, to prove how the liberty of the subject was invaded in 1787, in June; and such letters will prove, that the 24th of last February, I was right in my mind then; and that now I recopied it again about a fortnight ago: and it went through my attorney, to Mess. Cox, Cox and Greenwood's house: that will prove the state of my mind at that period of time.
When I first arrived at Liverpool I perceived I had some powers like those which St. Paul had; and the sun that St. Paul gives a description of in the Testament; an extraordinary power that came down upon me, the power of
Christ; in consequence of my persecution and being ill used, the public wanted to receive me as a must extraordinary kind of a man; they would have received me in any manner that I pleased; when I went to St. Thomas's church I was there surprised to hear the clergyman preach a most extraordinary sermon upon me, as if I was a God: I found my friends wanted me to support that kind of fanaticism in this country; this sermon was printed afterwards by Eyre, the printer at Warrington; when I came to London to the king concerning some military business, I told him nothing about any supernatural abilities, or the power of God; when I went to the Infirmary over Westminster-bridge, to the Asylum, I was surprised to hear General Washington's late Chaplain, Mr. Duche, he said, I remember the words he said,
\see him clothed in grace,\" pointing to me; there were some supernatural appearances at that time, therefore I could wish the privy council, when I came to England, or the Parliament, might be witnesses that I did not want to set up any kind of powers to the public; but there are such extraordinary appearances that attend me at this moment, that it is singular; and all I do daily is to make memorandums, daily to prove myself in my senses: some friends in Cheshire wanted me to set up some kind of fanaticism, some new branch of religion."
In respect to the body of people, St. Paul when he was at Jerusalem, the same kind of power then came down on the public; there is both a kind of good and evil power which we are all liable to in this world; in consequence of that I feel myself in a particularly disagreeable situation in confinement; I am under a state of suffocation almost, the divine ordinances weighing so very low down that I am entirely reduced to a shadow almost, that is all to me as if it was a death seemingly, I am so in a state of confinement.
I said it was when I was landed at Liverpool, and was giving a narrative.
I have been very silent and close for many reasons, and to protect my person; I have read the Psalms, my Lord, as I had no other books.
I do not remember speaking about that, and I made memorandums of my conversations with Mr. Newman: I never spoke about particular lights; I said, when I went over to Holland, as the ministers neglected doing their duty to me as a subject, in protecting me from the insults of the body of people; stirring up licentiousness, aiming at me; they drove me out of the kingdom; I went to Holland to shelter myself from the body of the people; but I do not remember saying any thing of following the light.
Yes; he took an extraordinary liberty in putting into the Public Advertiser, the third of February, a letter, dated the first, declaring me insane, a most extraordinary liberty; I thought it prudent to keep a copy: I have made memorandums, but they have been taken from me by Colonel Amherst, the same as Mr. Wilkes's papers were seized, a kind of alteration of the laws of the land, a kind of scheme to make a man appear insane, to totally disguise, to undo the liberty of the British subject; in fact it is such a concealed evil that I do not know where it will end.
None at all; he was only employed to hide the mutiny that those applauses of the clergymen had occasioned; he went to a person that lives with Mrs. Dowdswell, in Upper Brook-street; he had a letter, and was perhaps see'd; the clergyman declared me as a God, the body of the people as a man insane; myself applying to the King merely to get my birth again; when I went to my friend Mr. Burnsell, I spoke of no powers of God or Christ.
Before that, the pain in my ear; shall I finish with respect to Mr. Burnsell?
I found he wished to suppose me not right in my senses, and that he could produce no proof; he has declared in the public papers, that I behaved in such a violent
manner, in his house, as totally to prove myself out of my senses; I have the facts now on one side put down, that I can find no one circumstance of the kind, and to put such a letter into the news paper; if they wish to make a man appear insane, he should be taken before the Lord Chancellor, and there make a general declaration, some way or other; but it is done to interfere with the liberty of the subject.
I indured it, I supposed it merely as a triffling thing, but that complaint arises from a power of witchcraft, which existed about a hundred years ago, in this country; there is a power which women are now afflicted with; there is a power that rules now, that women can torment men, if they are in a room - over your head, they may annoy you by speaking in your ear; I have had a noise in my ear like speech; it is in the power of women, to annoy men publickly, even throughout the whole continent.
That there is a noise in my ear at this time?
No, I am free from it now.
Yes, but it is the power and effects, of what they call witchcraft, or some kind of communication between women and men; but I have remained such a chaste man for these four years, that it has fallen upon me particularly; and the Physician, by leaving me a month ago, and visiting me as friend, will totally speak to the fact; the last time he visited me, was on the 19th of March, says he, I hope you will be restored, and fit to take your trial; but I know your friend Mr. Hogarth, I have seen him, and some people that are in Court, will be able to declare me in my senses: I have said little or nothing at all lately, and been totally silent, so that it is impossible for me to be in that state. Shall I beg the favor to address my Lord.
Do you recollect me, in the year 1773, when I applied to you in person, on a case of some landed property, between me and one Entwille, at Cheshire; when you was a counsel and was one of my counsel, with one Mr. Hughes, knowing me then, and likewise in October, at the assizes, respecting some contested property, some landed property I have in Cheshire; now that circumstance may corroborate my declaration of the state of my mind.
Permit me to speak, the physician is the most principal person, who has visited me as a friend, he can tell more than from any other private person's declarations what ever; I appeal as a British subject.
Then I must call on that physician, who said, on the 19th, I was perfectly in my senses.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury. I stand here an object deserving your most serious attention: from conscious innocence of the very shocking accusations made against me, I cannot but hope that just and really liberal minds must have reason to suppose the nature of such an unaccountable case, does not enable me to speak; therefore I beg permission to read my defence.
I stand here an object deserving your most serious attention and compassion: from conscious innocence of the very shocking accusations made against me, I cannot but hope that just and really liberal minds will have reason to commiserate my situation, and must feel me deserving pity and compassion. As my case has been multiplied in horror, though with submission I think, in comparison, far beyond even the sufferings of my accusers: I admit, in justice, that I should have experienced the hardships I have suffered in the process of the law against me, till my innocence could be proved: but while I revere the law of my country, which presumes every man to be innocent, till proved guilty; yet I must reprobate the cruelty with which the public prints have abounded, in the most scandalous paragraphs, containing malicious exaggerations of the charges preferred, so much to my prejudice, that I already lie under premature conviction, by almost an universal voice. I chearfully resign my case into the hands of this tribunal, whose peculiar province and character is to reason on evident motives and circumstances; and which, I trust, will not suffer the fate of a fellow creature to be determined by popular prejudice; and for want of due consideration, to be narrowed within the bounds of a party. I rest my case to the decision of an English jury; and in hopes of being able to establish my innocence in your opinion, I most seriously appeal to the Great Author of Truth, that I have the strongest affection for the happiness and comfort of the superior part of this creation, the fair sex, to whom I have in every circumstance that occurred in my life, endeavoured to render assistance and protection. I have nothing, my lord and gentlemen, farther to say, but that however strange and aggravated this case may appear to you, I solemnly, and with the utmost sincerity declare to you all, that this prosecution of me is founded in a dreadful mistake, which I hope the evidence I shall bring will prove to your satisfaction.
What reply did I make you when I was in your yard; did not I tell you I could give a very good account how I came there? did I point to the prosecutor's house?
Did not you ask me what money I had about me?
What did Armstrong say to you in the watch-house half an hour or three quarters of an hour after the robbery?
Did not he ask you for this half crown when he came to the watch-house, to give him the half crown to make a mark on it, upon your oath, Sir, if you please?
Armstrong said, we shall get the reward, and cast this man to death, so help me God?
Did not you ask the prosecutor what he had lost?
The very afternoon of this robbery I was coming from Deptford with a shipmate; we stopped to have something to eat and drink; we paid our reckoning; I wanted change for half a guinea; some people, that were travellers or riders, gave me the change provided I took them halfpence; they gave us a half crown and some halfpence; we came into Bishopsgate-street; my shipmate picked up a young woman; we went and had something to drink in the course of ten minutes, and he went away with the young woman; she said she lived at Hoxton; they stood at the door and talked about ten minutes or a quarter of an hour; says I, if you go up stairs I want to go some where; I said I wanted to ease myself; says the young woman, if you go over some pales I will let you out, and you may come to us again; I went and heard the alarm of stop thieves; I was in the necessary; a woman came and took me; I told her I would give a good account of myself; I followed this good woman into her house, and as soon as I got into her door the man laid hold of me: they did; they took me to the watch-house; they asked me what money I had about me? I said I had change for half a guinea; says they, have you any half crowns? I said, yes; one: a man in the watch-house said, I believe this is my half crown; says I, swear to it if you think proper; I said, I had a small quantity of silver besides; I was locked up in a cage in this watch-house; I was there three quarters of an hour; then this Armstrong came and said, I believe I know you, says he; says I, I am just come from sea; I have not been in London: I took part of my money out of my pocket, and he took part, and the prosecutor was there, and Armstrong said, now tell me what you have lost? says he, to the best of my opinion I think three or four shillings-worth of halfpence; have not you lost nothing else? says Armstrong; yes, says he, half a crown: he went home to see; and Armstrong said, cannot you swear to this piece of a halfpenny? I said, says I, Mr. Armstrong, I took you to be a gentleman; I see plainly now what you are; you belong to the justice; you want to swear my life away: the next morning I was taken before the justice; he asked me what I had to say? I told him that was not a place for justice; says Harper, who was there, you villain, do you know what you are saying? says he, you villain, I will knock you down; says I, it is no service to say any thing at all. I have not a friend in the world; I have not been at home for six years; my chief witness when I got change at this publick house, he was a rider, a traveller; I sent a letter to this place, and they said, it was unknown when he would be at home; I subpoened him. When the man gave me the half crown, he said, this is a very pretty half crown, it will serve some of your girls; they like such half crowns.
On Saturday night I was all night, and all day on Sunday, on board ship, at Tower Wharf, and on Monday morning I bought the boots of a Jew, in Rag Fair; I gave him twelve shillings for them; and on Monday night he took me; and I thought he was going to trepan me; I told him the things were for my sister, in the country; I told him I got the boots honestly; the Jew asked me fourteen shillings, and I bid him twelve shillings; I have lived with respectable families; I was ashamed to send for my friends; I am eighteen years of age.
The stockings I had had eighteen months; the book is their property. Last Wednesday was a week I met them two young men on Tower-hill; I asked Lowrie if he was discharged? he said, no, he was bound for Scotland; I went along Tower-hill and London-bridge, to the White Hart in the Borough; they said they slept there all night, and their bundles were there; we had three pots of beer; I told them I would try to get them a beating order to go down to Scotland; I left them at a house, at an acquaintance's of mine; I went to the clerk of the Orderly Room; he said he could not give one to another regiment; I came back and told them that the Scotch society might assist them; I went with them to Mr. Campbell; I told him they were two distressed men discharged, and did not know how to get to Scotland; he said, he could do nothing; he recommended them to Mr. Frazier; they went to give the letter, and left the bundles in charge with me at the public house; Mr. Frazier gave them an order to go to the Invalid Office; it was so late, they could not go that night; I told them they might lodge with me at twopence apiece; the next day we were to be there by nine o'clock; the two young men took their bundles with them; we came to the Invalid Office; the gentleman was not there till eleven; we had three pots of purl at the Prince Henry's Head; they went out and came in again, and left their bundles in charge of me; they came in a second time, and went out a third time; I went to see what was become of them; I went to the office, and could not find them; and being pretty much in liquor, I went to a public house at Charing-cross, and left the two bundles; and they were taken away; the time they were out, in shifting the bundles from the table to the form, the book fell out; I took it up, and was reading in it, and accidentally put it in my pocket; the stockings I have had eighteen months.
I offered him eighteen-pence, and he would not take less than two and twenty-pence; he bid me to go along for a rascal; and he jumped over the counter; and whether he kicked this muslin off the counter himself, I do not know; I never had it.
Another coach came in on the stand; and he called me to get some water: and Fry was looking into the boot; he said he lost a box; I said I knew nothing of it; being the usual hour to go home, I went up Drury-lane; I saw two men very much in a flurry, one with a bundle under his arm, and some loose things; I went to him, and said, where did you get those things? one of them knocked me down, and I called stop thief! they heaved down the things, and went away; I took them home, intending to come down to the stand to make an enquiry; in a minute these people came down and took me.
Please to let me go for an East India soldier.
Coming down Butcher-row, this young fellow in a smock frock came up towards me; he said, soldier, where are you going? I said, to my quarters; where? says he, says I, at the Bunch of Grapes, just by; he gave me the boot to take to my quarters, and said he would call for it in a quarter of an hour.
He never was near me.
I was coming up this street, and I heard the cry of stop thief! and that gentleman kicked my shoe off; I was crossing the way to my mother, who lives in the court opposite.
Did not I mention to you what money I had about me?
My Lord, I am not well; but I have wrote out my defence, if you will permit me to have it read.
I know nothing about it.
I had a shovel mending in St. James's-street. My mother said to me, go and see if your shovel is done: at the end of St. James's-street, I saw two young men with this coat; and they asked me if I wanted to buy a coat? I told them yes: that my mother had been speaking to me, if I saw a tidy coat, she would buy it for me; they asked me six shillings: I told them to come with me to my mother: I took the coat under my arm, and went to see whether my shovel was done: they went along with me, and stood at the door: I went in to know if my shovel was done, and the patrole followed me in: he asked what I had? I told him a coat; and as soon as those men saw I was taken hold of, they ran away, and they took me into custody.
No.
Yes.
If you please.
No, not many words.
As I had pleaded what I have done to Sir Sampson, when I delivered myself over to Sir Sampson and to Mr. Macmanus, I hoped he would have begged the favour of the Jury, if I was to have been tried, to have mercy on me, a poor unfortunate foreigner! necessity has drove me to it; when I went out in the morning, I had not a farthing in money; I had not a thought to go there; but this lady has been the cause of my coming down so low in this country: I came home with a gentleman, a Captain Brown; I lived with him six years; I was persuaded to go into Miss Burney's service; when I came there, I was quite innocent in a case like that; I was not there a fortnight, before I found some enemy against me; I was not there above three months; it brought an illness upon me which put me quite in confusion; I have wrote several letters to Miss Burney, that if she will say as she should say, that I am not quite right in my head at times, from illness and distress; but all I beg now, is for God's sake, if the Jury will be so kind to shew mercy to me, a poor unfortunate creature! and I promise to go as soon as I can get a little money among my countrymen here; I wish to go home to my native country, and never to return to England any more; I could have brought several respectable gentlemen in the city, who know me, to my character, but I had not money to send for them.
I was coming past this gentleman's house, and the jacket was lying, and he came out and took me.
I took none of the things out of the lodgings; the waistcoat and gloves were given to me by a person that came to call me up in the morning, and he gave me the waistcoat to take home to my mother to wash with my things, but the waistcoat was not tied up in a bundle, and I was carrying home my dirty linen.
I never saw the man; my Lord and Gentlemen of the July, I belong to a ship at Deptford, and it is a general rule for a man to find a bondsman for his two months allowance; my bondsman lives in New Bond-street, he promised me; I have a wife and family, two small children, and I thought the few pounds would be of service to her; I was coming from Carnaby-market, and met a man who had been pressed along with me, his name is Jonathan Price , he asked me to give him some beer, and we had some beer and gin; I gave him the duplicate of a watch I had in pawn to sell, and he went out, and staid above two hours, and I said to the landlord, I am afraid this young man has tricked me, and I took this kettle and went to see for him; I saw him go into a house, and I beckoned to him, and this man took me.
My Lord, I met this soldier, and he asked me to sell them for him, he laid the table legs on my arm, and carried the vaneers to my place where I was at work; I saw them the next day, and told him to take them away; they said that would not do, and the best way would be to burn the whole kit; I said that was not right; he said, you take care of the vaneers, and I will take care of the legs.
I leave it to my counsel.
Did any body tell you what to say?
Did you mark any more the same?
Did you ever mark any casks with the same mark?
About three years ago I came from the coast of Africa, and was very poorly, and I went to the Island of Cuba; I came to Cadiz in Spain, I learned some of their language; I know nothing about the butter, I never saw the man in my life, I was working for my daily bread; there are twenty people in blue jackets and trowsers, that use the quays as well as me.
I was in great distress, and had not a bit of victuals for the days; I have three motherless children and never was guilty of any thing of the kind before.
I lived with Lord Monson's family, and they are out of town; I have nobody here.
I did not tell my master I stole it.
I came off guard at twelve, and went out with a friend; and I was coming home, and I found a key and a knife; and this man came up to me, and asked me if I had got a pair of shoes? and I said I had not, and I struck him.
Where did you light of me?
I was coming by the building and saw the door open, and being much distressed I went in to see for a bit of old wood to put under my arm, and I saw this, and I took what I could get.
What business had you to come up to me at the Lock-up-room; you spoke to me seriously at first; afterwards you began in a storming manner, and said that you would prosecute me, and that you might swear to me at the Justice's?
The second time you swore to a particular halfpenny; the first time I was only committed on supicion?
How long was you out of the compting-house before you returned into it again, at the time you say you catched my hand?
How long was you out of the compting-house, when you say you pursued me in the street?
Could you have sworn to me that I was the person before you saw me at the lock-up-room?
You cannot positively say that I am the same man that your master told you of at first?
How far distant do you think I was from you at first?
You was behind me, and ran after me, and yet you knew me to be the same man, as soon as you saw me on Ratcliffe-highway?
My back then was to you, how could you tell? you could only see my coat; another man might have the same coat?
Mr. Cooke has sworn that the paper of halfpence that was taken out of his desk was packed up; ask Underwood in what position they were taken out of my pocket?
The halfpence, when Mr. Underwood got them from me, were tied up in my handkerchief, tied up in four knots. Mr. Underwood can swear it if he will: you see how the case is; Mr. Cooke will swear any thing to convict me. These halfpence I received from a shopmate of mine in a public-house; those halfpence were in my pocket handkerchief tied up as they are now; in the street I was used in a merciless manner; if I had not been beaten by them, I had not struck them at all.
Did the trunk stand in the passage?
My counsel is totally unacquainted with any thing that I can say, he had my brief so late this morning, for Mr. Garrow, who was retained as counsel for me, might have been in a better state than the gentleman who now has my brief. This trunk was not delivered to Hayman by me, and was delivered through the instructions of the man in black; this trunk I acknowledge I did deliver to Hayman, by the order of the man that was in black; I trust that trunk is not considered as my property; the apartments where the things were found, was No. 27, Maiden-lane; the house I acknowledge is mine; but these apartments were let; it is very hard that I should be accountable for other people; I had a difference with my wife; I went and took a lodging in William-street; this man is a debtor to me; he desires me to take this trunk as a security for my money; he comes and settles with me; then he desires me to deliver this trunk to Hayman; this said person in black cohabited with a Miss Roe, who lodged in this said one pair of stairs.
Whether it is not a well known practice in the copper-plate way, to wish to obtain a print for themselves, they will take one if they can? -
I have no bed, I was obliged to sell my bed through distress, to maintain my family?
Ask Mr. Griffiths if he did not strike me repeatedly before I touched him?
I could bring a hundred people, if I had had habeas's, that would have sworn he struck me repeatedly.
He threw it down.
I merely did it for want; I have been a debtor for a small debt upwards of a twelvemonth, I having a wife and four small children, I sold and pawned my bed, and every thing; my wife was ailing, and my children in the small pox; my Lord I could not make half a hundred, what I did was merely through want, that my children should not perish through the sharp thorn of hunger; they cried for bread, and I had none to give them, and I was persuaded to do this to get a bit of bread; Mr. Whitehead and the Gentlemen knew my distress, and they gave my wife money.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
Are you sure I am the man?
It is very odd; I have been at his father's house four months; I was at Bow-fair from five till eleven at night.
When I came to bed about eleven at night (this young man went to bed about nine, or a quarter after) this gentlewoman says to me, you have got a bed-fellow with you; the door was wide open, and I saw no property at all, nor the next morning; and I went to work; there were other lodgers in the house; they might go out at any time of the night they thought proper.
I have nothing to say, I hope you will forgive me.
Betwixt three and four o'clock I was going to Crutched Friars, I picked up one pair of stockings, the watchman cried, stop thief; I saw a young man run past me in a brown coat, he turned down an alley; they searched me, and found the one pair on me.
I heard the cry of stop thief, I was coming down Holborn; I run, and in running along I picked up this piece of new cloth, which the constable produces.
Mrs. Atkinson, on Monday morning you came up to me at the corner of the Little Sanctuary, you came and took hold of my arm; did not you walk with me to the corner of Love-lane?
For shame, woman, consider what you are about here, I am standing for my life! My Lord, she took me to the narrow lane, very near over her shoes, at the back of the Plow, in Love-lane. - There we went together, she asked me if I would go and lay with her; I told her no, I had a wife at home.
As I was coming along on Monday morning, between twelve and one, I met this woman, she came up, and took hold of my arm; she desired me to go to such a place, and asked me several times to go home with her. I went with her into this Love-lane, and there she wanted me to lay with her. I asked her what I should give her, and she said a shilling; I gave her a shilling, while I was giving her that, she was rifling my pockets with her own hand; she shoved her hand and mine into her pocket; I got the money out of her hand, and I thought it was my own, and shoved it all into my pocket.
I cannot speak English enough to give any answer whether I could do it or not; I have only to say, I know nothing of the robbery which has been brought to this bar, excepting the things that have been found belonging to the prosecutor were given to me as a partnership by the prosecutor; the prosecutor, in the presence of Mrs. Smithers, declared he had given me these things, and in the presence of another young fellow.
If you please.
I lodged in this gentleman's house; I rented a room of him, and worked in my room; he gave me this pair of breeches to make, he gave me a matter of four or five pounds worth to work in my own room; being in great distress, I could not support my family without subsistence; I owed a little money where I used to deal, and they would not let me have any more till I could pay it; I took the liberty of pawning these breeches till I settled with my master on Saturday night, when I intended to bring back the breeches again. I am a stranger here, lately discharged from the 48th regiment, come from India; I am a poor distressed man.
The breeches had been in my room six or seven days, hanging across my line; I took it as a choice to work in my own room, because it was lighter.
Going home I met a lad named Thomas Lack , with the flap under his arm, and he asked me whether I could sell it for him; I did not know it was stole.
On the 19th of June, it was Saturday, I stood at my own shop-door; a gentleman came up to me and asked me if I was a cooper ; I said yes; he asked me if I could pitch three water-tubs for him; I said yes: he said if I would go with him, he would shew me where they were, and I went with him to the place; and he went under the Adelphi, and marked them with a piece of chalk, and asked me if I could fetch them away, and he would satisfy me; I went for them on Monday, and fetched them away; and when I came up in the Strand, I saw a cart, and I hired it for a shilling, and got them home, and this gentleman came and took me up about eleven or twelve in the same day; after I was taken up the gentleman came to my shop, and hearing I was taken up he went away as fast as he could; I have never heard of him since.
I was coming along, and I met with a person who had got these three saucepans, and he asked me if I would carry them along for him, and he would give me the price of a pot of beer; we were in liquor, and we laid down together and went to sleep, and when I awoke I found I was alone, and I went on about my business, and that made me so late out.
I leave it to my counsel.
Upon my examinations before a magistrate, that man swore to losing a watch with a shagreen outside case and metal box, and I am indicted differently here.
Please to ask the boy if he knows the nature of an oath, before he is sworn.
My lord, I believe this boy has been bribed to take my life away falsely.
The same day I was out, I was going to Oxford-road, to fetch some glass for one of my masters; coming along Watling-street, I met this boy, and his load tumbled off his head; I helped him up with it, and going along with him, I told him if he would put his load down I would take it up and assist him. I did so, and we went all the way to the Old Bailey; he then asked me what the mob was about there? I told him. He asked me, which way I should go? I told him I should go down Shoe-lane, as the way to Marybone.
The prosecutor said I had taken his handkerchief; I said I had not, he then said whether you have or no, I will swear you have.
I had been to seek for work on Monday, and returning and laying down under some hay, and in the night two men came and brought these things and hid them, and in the morning I went to see what it was and I took it up, I did not know the consequence of meddling with it. I am a stranger entirely in this part of the world. I have no friends.
Did not my mistress say, when she came down, that she found other people below besides the boy?
There was a girl down between five and dark, three or four different times, of the name of Norris?
Did not a man of the name of Norris send his girl to go to get a light for his tobacco-pipe?
I found this flint and steel on a shelf on the top of the cellar stairs, and I took a couple of matches from the mantle shelf, because I perceived the fire was almost out, and I took the tinder-box to strike a light. This was in the afternoon, but being called up stairs in a hurry, to my mistress, I put the flint and steel into my pocket; I left the tinder-box standing on the dresser.
I was at work at a gentleman's house in Hampstead, I could not do without a wrench of this kind; I never borrowed one of Mr. Wright, or of the boy. I always worked by myself; that very Wednesday, as he says he lost the tools, I could have had three witnesses where I slept that night; I have a wife that I expected lived along with Counsellor Kent, and I know Squire Kent; I had not seen her for a long time, I had occasion to go down that night to look for her, I slept at the Nag's-head; I did not know when my trial came on; on the Sunday following in the morning, I came to this Hampstead, on purpose to meet this wife of mine there; which if I had stolen these tools, would any gentleman reasonably think I should go there back again; I went to the house, my master challenged me, and I went with him into his yard; I was greatly surprised, these gentlemen all said that they had a very plain proof and witness that I took them. When the watchman came he said that he did not know me, that he could not swear to me; no man can swear to the wrench, I have had the wrench above a twelvemonth.
No man can swear to the wrench.
I was on board of a ship that evening they say the robbery was done, I could have had witnesses; the Justice and this gentleman would have me fully committed that night; that morning we came for two casks of beef, and our boat lay a-ground, and we came up to this place, and got on the mud that night, which gave the people a suspicion of us; Finnis said at the Justice's, he was not sure that I was the person, till a runner spoke to him; and then he came directly, and said he could swear to me, and the Justice gave him his oath after; he said before he could not swear to me.
I had been working a ship out; a man met with me in the street, in a sailor's dress, and he asked me to carry that for him, for he was afraid of the press-gang; these people followed me, and said I had stole it; all the neighbours cried out, shame!
I swapped this mare with a man at Marlow: if I had stolen it, I would not have laid about the place.
I bought these things of a young man that lodged at the place before me.
I leave it to my counsel.
He said he should prosecute me or lose the 40 l.
A man offered me a pot of beer to carry it to Kingsgate-street; the man ran away; I told Franklin it was none of mine.
On Saturday, the 16th of July, I was in Parliament-street, between seven and eight, and I bought these things of a man that appeared to be a Jew, and gave him 5 l. 15 s. for them; I put some of them on, and pledged the coat in the evening, being distressed.
I was brought up very unexpectedly.
I could bring two people to prove my good character, but I have been brought up so unexpectedly.
I was coming up Fish-street-hill about one o'clock, and I saw a handkerchief lay under a cart, and I went and picked it up; and that gentleman there came up, and laid hold of me, and said I took it out of that gentleman's pocket.
Going up Fish-street-hill, I saw some man throw this handkerchief down, and being in distress I picked it up, and put it into my bosom, and this gentleman catched hold of me by my collar.
I did not put them into my pocket; the witness Reid has often played tricks with me.
I was coming along Cheapside, and up the Old Jewry; and about three parts up the way, this man took hold of me and said, he would take me on suspicion of stealing his coat; I am entirely innocent.
I have nothing to say.
I often work in the warehouse among the sugars.
He took two shillings out of my pocket.
I found this purse, and took charge of it till the morning, and was threatened to have my brains knocked out. Lovatt said he was satisfied. Thomas said, you fool, we will prosecute him. The postboy went away to Watford, and Mr. Thomas went to fetch him to prosecute me.
I went up stairs into the room, and brought the sheets down for the gentlewoman to air; they were damp, and I gave them to her on the stairs.
I am very sorry for what I have done; I never was before a magistrate before.
I was hired as a porter to carry the things.
I worked at the white-lead mills, at Hoxton , I asked him to lend me some clothes, to enable me to get a place; I met him some time after as I was coming to town to make him satisfaction, and he took me into custody.
I happened to come that way, and I know Shiman Lally, my mother buys her lemons of him, and I went to tell him my mother was sick, and would not want any more lemons, and I happened to sit down by the coat; but I know no more how the coat came there than you do.
I was coming down Newgate-street, and I met these two gentlemen together, I went to pass between them, and having a wooden leg, I slipt, and I catched hold of the gentleman's chain. I gave him the seal immediately, he hardly held out his hand for it, while I was on my knees.
I leave it to my counsel.
I met that person, and asked him to buy some silver. He asked me, what I would have for it; I told him, a guinea. He said, he would give me half a guinea. I told him, I would not take it; and with that he got a constable, and took me into custody.
That silver I bought of a man at a public house, in Houndsditch; that man said, he had brought it from Birmingham.
There are many saucepans marked like that; and in regard to the sheets, there were two blankets, but no sheets at all. As he was very sharp for his rent, and I being something behind hand, and he threatening me to padlock the door, and he being very sharp with me, and I being dubious of losing my two or three trifles, my working tools, and so I left the room, but I left the key in. I never had any poker nor flat-iron in the room; but I left every thing in the room as I found it, and rather more.
I leave it to my Counsel.
My Lords and Gentlemen of the Jury, being quartered at Mrs. Watson's, the sister of Mr. Heaven, at the sign of the Angel Inn, my other comrade was getting up about eight on Thursday morning, the 4th of August last, we both came down stairs in the yard together; I said I must go up the yard, I should soon return; I went with intention to go into the common vault, I found it engaged, necessity obliged me to go into the gentleman's vault; upon entering it I perceived on the side a small parcel of fine paper, which contained the movements of a watch and a chain, without a glass or case; I put it in my pocket, having no time to make any enquiry after it, being almost too late for my duty. It continued in my quarters till Friday the 12th of August, no enquiry was made, I naturally imagined it belonged to some traveller that might have slept at the inn; it was not advertised, nor any enquiry made after it; I took it to Mr. Bannister, to have a case made for it, for my own use, and I agreed to give him 1 l. for repairing it; I went into the hospital, in a bad state of health, on Friday the 12th of August, where I continued till Monday the 15th of August, when I was surprized by the Serjeant Smith, belonging to the same company, who said I must get up and go with him to Sir Sampson's Wright's office in Bow-street immediately; I called at Mr. Bannister's, in Bridge-street, to see if the movement was repaired; it was not till the day following. I came strait to Sir Sampson's office, when I was charged with stealing a watch, the property of Mr. Heaven. I was examined, and sent down for further examination; I came up the second time, the movement was produced, which I had taken to Mr. Bannister, but my prosecutor could swear to neither the movement nor the number, till he should write down to Bath. I was five times examined before I was fully committed, and as Parker, the evidence against me, says, he saw me take the watch from one breeches pocket to another, which he was at some distance when he saw me do it; no words passed between us, I did not know he saw it; had I stolen it, or knew it to be stolen, I never would have gone to Mr. Bannister in the neighbourhood to have it repaired for my use. My Lord, I call God to witness what I have said is true.
Yes.
No case at all.
I leave it to my counsel.
Prisoner to Pedler. Did you see me throw the glass down?
I know nothing about it; I should have had many friends come here, if they had known the prosecutor would carried the cause on.
I have nothing to say against the charge.
I had got an acquaintance a journeyman bakers, he pitched his basket in Grace-church-street, and he sent me to fetch four quartern loaves, and I very innocently went to the wrong basket.
I was a child when this happened, not above fifteen or sixteen years old.
Had not she four children, and beholden to the parish; I wonder how that can be good circumstances.
That good woman knows very well, that I was very much distressed, and I thought to go to sea; and as soon as I got a little money, to come home to her.
I liked the girl very well, and did not like the first; and I thought no crime in it.
These things that I gave Harriott Smith to pawn were things sent out of the country from my friends from Yarmouth, in the county of Norfolk.
I never saw him in Smithfield-market.
Please you my Lord, I bought the horse at Godalmin fair, the Monday before I saw this man.
I had it booked at the toll-book at Godalmin, and I wrote a letter to the toll-keeper, and he sent me an answer, and I gave the letter to Sir Sampson Wright, before I ever opened it, and Sir Sampson Wright has kept it ever since; I sent my mother to Sir Sampson Wright for it yesterday, but she is not yet come back; I have now nobody here.
I understood that Palmer bought stolen horses, and I knew that he had once before of another person, and I sold it to him as a stolen horse, and told him all the particulars, and where it came from; and he said, that the horse had got a ball eye, but he would put the eye out, and crop it, and dock it, so that it should not be known. He did not buy of me in Fleet-lane, but in a private stable. The next morning, I goes to him about seven in the morning, and told him, I was going to Waltham fair; says he, if you will take the horse to the fair, and get it booked, and made safe to me, I will give you half a guinea more. He was to give me seven guineas, and he had given me five guineas in part of payment of the horse, and he was to give me two more on Tuesday; with that I took the horse to the fair; he had his horse ready to go to the fair; and he said, he must go and get his horse shooed first, before he could go; and he sent me to the fair. With that I took the horse to the fair; and I suppose it was near to five o'clock before he came to the fair. As to how I came by the horse, I and another man stole it out of the stable.
I was sent for a pound of beef-stakes, I had sixpence in my hand, and the man asked me what I would give him? I said, give you! why nothing. He then laid hold of me, and said I want a c - , you old bitch, and I will have it out of you.
I am as innocent as any man in the world of depriving my prosecutor of his property, I knew not my way where that gentleman tells you he saw me, I was lost, I met the bailiff, and endeavoured to gain intelligence of him; I had business with Mr. Bell, who was not at home, I went to Hendon, to buy a cart for my use, but being full of customers I returned home, and about ten minutes past ten, a man that I had bought many pounds worth of goods from, came up and called me by my name; I thought I knew his face, I went down to the door, and it was a person that goes by the name of Joe, he fells a deal of goods in Smithfield, but does not employ a proper salesman, and always takes his money himself; he told me he had eight sheep, and would be glad I would buy them of him; I told him it was late in the evening, I could not think any thing about buying them, nor should I know the value; he called me by my name again, and said as they were lame with travelling, he would turn them into my premises, I might kill them at my leisure, he would leave the price entirely to me, and call again the first market-day he came to Smithfield; him and his boy went away, I had not the least idea in the world of their being stolen goods, I killed part of them, the skins were ready to go to the salesman when this gentleman came; Innocent as I was about the matter, I knew nothing about the business, I had not a better place to keep them in than in the little place, a place out of repair; the rest I meant to keep for a future time, for I had not the least idea in the world of their being stolen: I was taken into custody before the man came for the account.
I went to Kentish-Town to carry a kit of salmon, and as I was coming back I saw these tools lay in the road, and I picked them up, and put them into my apron.
I am a taylor by trade; I went into a house in that street to do my business, and as I was coming out again, two young men met me, and desired me to take hold of the things, and asked me if I had an handkerchief in my pocket, and he called me by my christian name, and desired me to hold them things for him, and I did, and this young man came up, and took me upon the alarm, and the other fellow ran off.
Did not you say you had been drinking?
Did not the gentleman say I took his watch?
I went to see my brother, an ostler at the White Horse Cellar, Piccadilly; returning through Leicester-fields, I heard the cry of stop thief in Cranbourn-alley, and saw four men run down a court towards the King's Mews; I stopped, and them two young men came and laid hold of me, and said somebody was robbed, and the gentleman came and accused me, and said I took his watch; I said, young man, consider what you are about; I have no watch; he said you are not the man; I said young man consider you are in liquor; but they do do not speak as they did when before the Justice. I never let my friends know, being innocent.
I leave it to my counsel.
This person that prosecutes keeps a public-house, I was there, I wanted to go to the Peacock Burton Alehouse; I expected a friend to meet me, and left word I would be back very soon, in coming back they seized me; I know nothing more about it.
When I was living in Manchester, I married this woman; I found she had another husband living; I found a letter in her pocket from her husband she eloped from him; therefore I thought I had a right to marry again.
It was not that piece that I had in my hand; I had three handkerchiefs in my hand.
Please you, my Lord, I know nothing about it being stolen, as I was coming along from my work I met a shipmate, he asked me if I would have a drink of beer, being weary with work, I said I did not care if I did, he then asked me to sell this roll of tobacco; I told him I did not know where to sell it; he said he took it out of his chest, and was much distressed; I said I would take it to the shop where I bought my smoking tobacco; I went there, and his wife said her husband was not at home; but she sent for him; I was taken up, the gentleman told me to open my breast, in order that he might see if there was a scar on my breast, when he found there was none, he said you are not the man. I am as innocent as the child unborn.
It was ten o'clock at night when I went into the house in St. Catherine's, the prosecutor says it was between seven and eight; I went to that house for a lodging. On board that ship there were many knives like that.
I was coming over the common, and I heard these geese cry out, as I went up to them there was a man ran away, therefore I took them and put them in my sack.
I was crossing West-street, I heard the alarm of stop thief, a soldier and a sweep chimney took me right.
He came to my house, and said how do you do Mr. Shimmer; says he, I have lost my seats; I suppose they have only played the rogue with them; says I, as I know you, I will see if I can serve you; if I can do you any good, says he, ten years hence I will do it, God bless you, and I thank you.
My Lord, I have nobody here to speak for me, I have no witnesses.
I did it through necessity.
I bought this pencil of a Jew the day before, and I wanted to send another to my cousins at school. I was very much in liquor.
I leave it to my counsel.
The foreman of the carpenters cut the lead, and sold it; and he sent me another time with another piece, and I sold it for fourteen pence.
I found the lead.
A young man offered me sixpence to carry them.
Did not you decline swearing to me at Barnet?
I wish the Court to know the answer that Dr. Knowles gave to the magistrate at Barnet; wheher Dr. Knowles did not refuse swearing to me, because the person who robbed him was of a very pale complexion?
The lady, in giving her evidence so very clearly and deliberately, on observing my person, and the colour of my handkerchief, I beg leave to ask her, whether she did not look in my face at Barnet, and ask which was the man that robbed her father?
I beg the Jury will attend to the very deliberate answer, that she should be so cool and deliberate when she came into the room among twenty people looking at me, and asking, is this the man that robbed us; I wish the lady would give that explicit answer, for the satisfaction of the Court.
How far, and what pace, he rode with me, before he gave any alarm?
He has informed the Court that I was riding very gently; he rode with me as far as from Whetstone to Barnet before he gave any alarm at all. - I did not ride with him at all; the person that was with me saw me go past as fast as I could.
What was you promised in case of my conviction; whether he was not promised his part of the reward?
I beg the attention of the Court to what has been said against me, and I rest my defence with the Jury. I beg leave to say a few words with respect to what has been laid against me. First, Dr. Knowles comes now and swears positively against me, nearly two months after he was robbed, when an hour and a half after he declined it. The next is Mrs. Underwood, she comes nearly two months after, describing the colour of the handkerchief of the person who robbed them, describing the colour of his coat, his dress, complexion, and every particular circumstance which she could not describe an hour and a half after, and said when she looked me in the face, which is the man who robbed me? That boy is next called, I put it to him, he declines answering it, how far I rode with him, and what pace. I rode with that boy I suppose more than two miles, at the pace of five miles an hour, when I went through Barnet I went not very fast; then when stopt I made no refusal; there was what money I had when I was before the magistrate; nothing found upon me could be claimed by any other person. I was on my business, if any person claims any part of the property that was found on me, so it must be.
I had a pair of pistols about me, which I bought at Cambridge; I have travelled with a great deal of money about me very often, and it was necessary for me to have them for my own defence.
I did not ride fast, I rode gently up the hill, but when I got into Barnet I rode fast, without any particular reason. I have witnesses to my character.
That gentleman well knows that my friends are in affluence and respectability, and that I have been with them ever since my business declined.
I had been up to Berner's-street, and returning I saw three or four young men before me, and I heard somebody say I have lost my pocket handkerchief, and my detainer caught hold of a man in black, and then he took me.
Coming into Broad-street, St. Giles's, a man said he wanted to sell his room of goods, and desired me to call on one Johnson in Broker's-alley, I went to the prosecutor, and the door was open, and they took me into custody.
I live at the Swan and Two Necks on Finchley Common, I bought them of a drover on the road, I gave twelve shillings a piece for the ewes and six shillings a piece for the lambs, and I took them to Mr. Mercy, to grass; I should be glad to put it off till Saturday, as I employed a Counsel and an Attorney, and my brother run away with the money.
I wish to know whether there was a frame on the glass?
I had been on some business for my father and mother, and they took me; the man run by me, and had liked to have knocked me down, and that good man picked the ribbon off the ground.
I stood at the Dials a considerable time, and the next morning they took me.
I saw this callico on the ground, and got my feet in it, and the gentleman came and caught me, and swore I was the prisoner.
Your Lordship, I know nothing of it any more than the child unborn; if that man can swear against me, after taking me a mile and a half off, he can swear any thing.
I have nothing to say, but to beg the mercy of the Court and Jury.
The deceased abused and struck me several times; I said, Smith, I will not be struck and knocked about so; he would not desist, I turned my hand, laid hold of the broom, and gave him the unfortunate blow. God knows my heart did not mean to kill him.
This Peter Berry was a mess-mate of mine; he was taken sick, and before he died, he gave me a written order to receive his wages in England, and gave me an account to whom he gave his power of attorney; he told me to come for his money and get it; but when I found that Brown had marked the man dead, I gave myself no more trouble about it; and in four or five days I was taken up and committed to New Prison.
I told him of it, and he said I might.
Please you, my Lord, I was coming from work; I saw a man take the bacon, in running him I shoved this man down. Please you, my Lord, I served my seven years, and worked hard for my bread.
I know nothing at all of those in the bag, those which were found in my pocket I took from necessity, and I am very sorry for it.
I am a sawyer, I broke my arm some time ago, I deal in Rag-fair ; my master gave me a pair of shoes, so having a shilling or two I went to buy a pair; we could not agree, I laid my bag down, the buckles were under the bag; I do not know how they came there. I did not intend to steal them.
My Lord, as I was coming home, last Lord-Mayor's day, I stepped upon this tin, in return home; I took it next day and sold as much as came to half-a-crown: my wife was taken in labour, and said, you may as well go and sell the remainder of this tin: I was going to Charing-cross, and the patroles stopped me.
I bought five pieces of lead, and gave 18 s. a hundred for the lead; I bought it to send into Hertfordshire, where I was building a little tenement; Turner is only a cadee; he is a thief; he has been in Newgate; he stole beer and pork; he is well known in Newgate.
I hired the horse of Mr. Dale and of John Mott ; I did not ask him if he knew Mr. Richardson; it was another person whom I have not yet seen; Mott only led the horse out of the stable; I never mentioned Low Layton, nor any place; I only applied for a horse to take a ride; it was not four o'clock when I was there; I rode a considerable time, I am certain it was above an hour, on the Islington road: I found the horse went so very lame, after I had rode him about an hour, that I rode him into Hopkins's livery stables: I then saw Mr. Humphries, and begged of him to let me put that horse up there, but that I could by no means sell him, neither would I: as he told me before that he knew Mr. Wise very well, and on his credit would lend me twenty pounds, if I wanted it, I asked him to lend me a guinea: he did so, and added he was no pawn-broker: he did not consider the horse as brought there for sale: this was the conversation that took place under the compting-house window: I never went into the house. With respect to the horse being booked for sale, Mr. Humphries has an undoubted right to write what he pleases in his own book: it was never my intention to sell him, nor to leave him as a pledge: the second time I called, I wrote that night requesting him to lend me eight guineas: I never conceived it to be lent on the horse; and I am sure Mr. Humphries does not: I am sure he cannot; I called again after I had left the note, and Mr. Humphries was not at home: but he presently after came home, and I then asked him to oblige me with the money? he said, no, he had been disappointed: he had been after a Mr. Allingham, a sheriff's officer, to arrest a Mr. Charles Bowyer , that owed him thirty-seven pounds: but he could not get it then: I asked him to lend me another guinea? he said he would: he went and borrowed it: that I believe Mr. Humphries has stated before.
That is what I told him.
I was in liquor.
The lamplighter at the Horse-guards asked me to go to trim three lamps for him, and I could not, I was so much in liquor.
My lord, he has sent me out a begging; I have brought him eight shillings in one day.
I found these pots at the corner of Long-lane; I met an acquaintance; he asked me to take part of a pint of purl? I said I had no objection: I went into Bolt's and there Mrs. Bolt accused me; I said I had nobody's pots but Mr. Pidgeon's, and I am going to take them home.
Please you my lord, I was coming up Fleet-street, and I saw a congregation of people assembled, and I went to see as another might do, and they took me up.
My lord, I had three rabbit-skins at home, which I intended to convert into a hat for one of my children.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
On the 14th of November, about six o'clock, I called at the George in Piccadilly; the boy said, your father is in the parlour; going into the parlour, I saw Mr. James coming out; I said, how do you do, Mr. James? he said, are not you Mr. Barnes's son? I said, yes; I called him on one side, and asked him to lend me a shilling or two; upon this he put his hand into his pocket, pulled out his money, and gave me half a guinea and four shillings; I said, I do not want so much; he said, poh, poh, keep it; I am going to receive a sum of money of your father; nothing more occurred for two hours; Mr. James came out of the parlour again, and was going into the street into the coach; he was put into the coach, and the coachman asked him where he was to drive him to? he was so drunk he could not tell him; I said, he lives on the other side of Black-friar's-bridge; my father was in liquor, and could not tell the coachman where to drive Mr. James to; the man that keeps the public-house, said to me, Ned, get upon the coach-box, and see him home; I said, I do not rightly know where he lives; I got upon the coach-box, along with the coachman, about one hundred yards; Mr. James called me then, and said, Barnes, come in the coach, it rains; I told the coachman not to mind him; he then called out, God damn you, stop; the coachman got down, and let him out; he made me get in before him; we went to the sign of the Sun, near St. Clement's; there we both got out; as soon as I got into the house, he, without any provocation, struck me in the mouth, and knocked out one of my teeth; I struck him on the nose, and he fell behind the grate; the coachman asked what all that was about, and asked for his fare, which was seven or eight shillings; he refused to pay it, and said he did not hire the coach; then we shook hands; but afterwards the coachman and I gave charge of him for assaulting us; they took me down a court to the watch-house; they put me up stairs; I had a bed, for which I paid a shilling; Mr. James was brought in soon after; and he had a bed in the next room; he broke the pannel of the door, and I crept under the bed for fear, as he said he would be the death of me.
Which room did he search first?
I was coming home late on Saturday night: I met a helper on the stair-case, who asked for a coachman? I told him he was not there: then he asked me to let him leave that bundle till Monday? I said, yes, and welcome: he put down the bundle, and I went into the next room to get a tinder box: I had no sooner struck a light, than five or six people came in.
On the 12th of November I saw a man with a sheep on his shoulder; he said, if I would carry it for him, he would satisfy me for it; the man walked before me; and when I was stopped, one of the witnesses said, why don't you look after the other man?
I had been to sea; I went to this lodging-house, where I had lodged a year and half before; they were very glad to see me; I know no more of it.
I was coming up, and saw a crowd; a man said, if you will take my comrade's coat into a publick-house, I will give you a pot of beer; I had no sooner got it under my arm than this gentleman seized me.
Coming over London-bridge, a man asked me to carry this weight to East-Smithfield, and he would give me a shilling.
You had better state to her the situation of Lord Grenville's office, and then she can know.
My Lord, being deprived of counsel, I should esteem it a favour to be permitted to examine the prosecutrix.
My Lord, I wish to ask Mrs. Yostus how she first became acquainted with me?
Did not you come to the Red-lion, in Old-Bethlehem, and apply to me to get a petition drawn, in order to get your husband a pardon?
Was not it then agreed on for me to draw a petition for that purpose?
After I had drawn that petition, and carried it to your house, and read it over to you, whether several of your friends, and particularly your husband's master, refused to sign the same?
Whether or no I did not get several of your friends to sign this petition?
After that, whether or no you did not go with me to several respectable people; the first was Mr. Evans, the wine and brandy merchant, the corner of York-street?
Did not you give me one guinea, not two?
At that same time?
Did not I desire you to meet me at the Prince William Henry 's, at Charing-cross, the next day to Good-Friday, when I brought you the petition?
Now, Mrs. Yostus, we went into the Treasury, as I call it, and I went up a great number of stone stairs, till we came to the top of the building, to a green door; do you recollect going up a large flight of stairs?
Do you recollect, after that, my drawing a petition to the worshipful Recorder?
You went with me, and saw me deliver it in to his lordship's servant?
Do you recollect another petition being also drawn up to Baron Hotham ?
Do you recollect my taking a letter to Lord Grenville's house in St. James's-street with you?
Now, Mrs. Yostus, I shall be glad to know at what time the 3 l. 17 s. was paid to me; when was that?
It is amazing to me that you cannot recollect the day; if I pay any money, I can recollect the day.
After this supposed time of receiving these different sums, did you employ me any further in the business respecting your husband?
I think another circumstance, but you speak so low, but only I gain information from the learned counsel, it was when going to the side of the ship, that I came up and told you I could not see him, and you said you would go yourself?
Will you swear that?
Did I represent to you that I was acquainted with Captain Manning , of the Pitt, and did I go with you?
Did not I use every endeavour in my power to prevail on the Captain to let you go aboard to see your husband?
I am not talking about a false pretence, or what pretence it was; was not the Captain's orders that he should be on board on the Friday following, and if I would send a letter by you to him, you should be permitted to go on board?
I think you said that Captain Manning should tell you, if your husband was so unfortunate to go out in the ship Pitt, he should be liberated from his irons, and assist the cook?
Do you recollect a petition presented to the King?
Likewise another to the Queen?
Have not you, before and since that time, expressed that you was fully satisfied with my conduct, that I had done every thing to serve you?
Have you not said so?
My Lord, I am in an aukward situation here; this is a matter between party and party.
Had the man that robbed you a sore hand?
Was I ever in your master's shop since I released this hat which I have now in my hand?
My lord, I never took any active part about that man, nor ever saw him in my life before.
I had been to my aunt's, in St. Martin's lane, and coming up Drury-lane two boys came and asked me whether I would buy a knife; I asked what they wanted for it; they said 8 d. I told them I would give them 6 d. and they said I should have it, and before I could get the money out the gentleman took me directly.
Mr. Chapman keeps a house for girls of the town, he lets lodgings to them.
I was on Mr. Pillar's platform, and I saw this glass behind the bags in the yard, and I took it; and Mr. Pillar said, if I would confess I took it out of the place, he would prosecute me no further.
I work in St. George's-row, and coming over Westminster-bridge, it was a hard frost, and I picked up this lead, and two men came past; says I, I have picked up a prize; they said it was lead; I said, if you will not take it, I will; so I put it over my shoulder, to take it to St. James's watch-house, to see if any body owned it.
Coming up Marshall-street, I stopped a few minutes; I heard a cry of stop thief! I went on, and pursued, and this Goreing cried out, stop thief! and said, there he goes; and this gentleman stopped me; I said I was not the person; I am as innocent of it as you are.
A cabinet-maker .
I have been out of work a great while, and wanted bread, and have a sick wife.
This gentleman pointed me out to the boy.
I am entirely innocent: when I was in the room Dawson told the boy I was there, and he naturally pitched upon me when he was told I was taken there.
Mr. Garrow, I am the person that kept it, I do not deny it.
I did keep the Half-moon at the time his affair happened; and a young man had been at our house on Thursday night, and we had a chair club, and there the young person gave bills about the club where I was spending my evening, and when he gave the bills he desired me, if I could, to come to his house, and he would take it as a favour: accordingly I went to his house, in Shoemaker-row, Aldgate; and coming home from thence, I was coming on the left-hand side of the way, in Cornhill, a few doors of being almost opposite Birchin-lane; I heard a watchman running; he came up to me, and laid hold of the right side of my collar; I immediately said, my friend, what do you want with me; he says I must go along with him; I told him I believed he was mistaken, and said if I had done any thing amiss I was very ready; accordingly he takes me to the watch-house, and when we came there he goes and says, take care of him! Mr. Williams and another came and searched me; accordingly, after that, they took me to the Compter; that evening they asked me how I came to be out so late; I related the story as before; I told you he asked me what trade I was; I told him I was brought up a cabinet-maker, but having an asthma I was obliged to leave off business, and I took a chandler's shop in the Borough, and from that I took this public-house in Half-moon alley, always endeavouring to maintain the character of an honest man; and even since I have been in this calamitous affair, I have reduced myself to the last shilling to pay every thing that I owed. My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I am entirely innocent of the thing laid to my charge: I will call a few friends, who will speak what they know in my behalf; and I leave myself at your mercy.
Did not you say, before the magistrate, that you found me under the window?
Did not you come from the vestry-door after Beck had hold of me?
There is a long space from the street to this chapel, and just by the chapel-door there is a kind of a nook, in which, as I was coming up, there stood two or three men, whom I know not; I was going to the Meeting, and they thrust me upon my face; and thereupon the gentleman seized me before I could recover myself.
I frequently frequent Mr. Romaine's, in Blackfriars, and these people are of the same persuasion; I live at No. 20, Cow-cross-street.
Did not you positively swear that the door was not fastened that night?
Was not you witness against two people last sessions?
Was not it a dark and rainy night?
This night, that they swear the shop was broke open, I was in bed; they came and searched my apartment all over, and went down again; they came up at half after six in the morning, and found me in bed; I got up very peaceably, and went with them; my wife awaked me the first time, and told me there were three watchmen, and a boy; I told them I had done nothing to be afraid of; and they came up again, at half after six, and took me out of bed: the prosecutor practises dog-stealing, him and one Cadwell have been tried for it both in town and country, and lives at this present time by buying and selling stolen goods, and in his cellar there you will find carcases of dogs; they boy is a notorious character; his master keeps fifteen or sixteen lodging-houses for common prostitutes, and it is his employment to light them up to bed: here are two watchmen, respectable characters indeed! but, my Lord, it is very wrong to swear a man's life away: the morning that they took me out of bed, gentlemen, says I, you have used my wife very ill; she told them to have patience, and she would open the door; and a man, who is not here now, struck her with the staff; they found nothing, on me; they found me doing nothing, even if I had been there coming out of the passage: Mr. Hodge, pray is not your house let out in tenements, inhabited by dustmen and chimney-sweepers, a house that is free for all sorts of people, comers and goers; I would wish to know whether they could distinguish one man from another in a dark lane; watchman, pray was there any the least implement, or any thing, found in my apartment?
My Lord, I work for Mr. Battridge, an hair-dresser, in Golden-lane.
I have several questions to ask him: pray, Sir, did not you come into this house with a disorderly woman?
Can you swear to my taking the buckles out of your hand?
Did not you swear that you offered the buckles to several people in the house, before the justice?
Now mind what you are at: Did not you say first to the landlord, will you take these buckles into pawn for the reckoning for me and my wife?
Ask him! it is of no use to ask him, he had his tale all ready before he came. Pray did not you say, when you catcht me hold by the collar, d - n your eyes, I will have satisfaction of you for the money?
Did not I tell you that I gave charge of this man when you came first up?
I was going home to my lodgings: this man, that swears so false against me, was in Parker's-lane; there was a mob with him; and he met me, and says immediately, d - n your eyes, you are one of them; by Jasus, I will hang you, for the sake of the money; and he got hold of me, and entangled me by the shirt, and I called the watch; and when the watch came up, says I, this man has interrupted me; by Jasus, says he, I am almost murdered, and have been robbed; and they took me to the watch-house with him; and they searched me, and found nothing on me.
Which way did I take your buckles and watch?
The box that I took into the house a man has had it here these three days, but he is not here this morning; and the key that was taken from me was the key that unlocks that box; I have no witnesses now; they have been here these three days.
I leave it to my counsel; Mr. Nash knows me never to wear a white jacket, and he has known me two years.
Last Tuesday three weeks I was at work for Mr. Royston, in Islington; between eight and nine in the morning, one Dunlock, seeing me at work, asked me to take a walk with him; I went out with him, and in the evening afterwards I was going up to the Coach and Horses, across Islington, to see a person that was to help me to another job; these two men came and laid hold of me, and dragged me about as if I was the dirt under their feet; please you, my Lord, I am as innocent as you yourself.
I was going into the yard, and saw these things on the tiles, and there was a man, jumped over the tiles; I picked them up, and I thought I would play the rogue with with them: when they were asked for, I delivered up the things safe.
I was coming by, and a man came out of the shop and threw down the tea, and they took me in a mistake; I am innocent.
I would only ask this gentleman, whether, when he found me, I was not asleep, and in liquor; and whether I did not say that it was an empty house, and I had no money to pay for my lodging, and I found the door open.
I want to ask him whether he found any property on me.
I was drinking where this man was; I went out; he said, my friend, will you let me have a hand; I did; his hamper fell down again; he turned himself about, and said, I wish your head broke, you d - n'd rascal; you want to rob me: I was paid off the Ardent.
I have nothing to say.
I know nothing of it.
Two men were running by me, and they dropped a coat, and I picked it up.
Who had the keys while I was out at sea?
My Lord, I have helped him four years, off and on.
Did not I expose them all about to the people in the tap-room, and say they were come up from the country to me?
A man came and said my uncle was dead; I said I was the person; he said then I must give him a crown; he gave me a note, and a key, in which it was mentioned that my uncle was dead, and had left me 900 l. and the contents of that box; he gave me this note on my refusing to give him a crown, as he asked, for carrying of the trunk; there was a card nailed on the box, Francis Stevens : Mr. Brown knows me ever since I was a child.
I was hired to carry this box by two men.
As I was coming out of the shop with the young fellow, I saw the muff lay, and I picked it up; I knew not what it was.
How long was it the person you delivered the note to lived at Mrs. Adams's?
I never had it in my hand; I was in liquor, and going by the table, and two or three fell down off the table.
I was going on an errand for my master to St. Martin's-lane, and a man tapped me on the shoulder and asked me to carry this carpet to St. Martin's-lane, and said he would give me a shilling; and when this gentlewoman cried stop thief! the man run away; I was not near the house.
Whether Mr. Morley can swear to the hairs?
My Lord, so far as this I know, this is not my master's property; I have worked for myself seven years, and bought hair and other articles in the brush line; it is impossible for any person to swear to the hair.
The gentleman did not apprehend me; I went to see a young fellow of the name of George Ildman , and I was standing talking to him in Sloane-street, and this gentleman came up and took me: I hope, my Lord, you will send me for an East-India soldier, as I dare say the gentlemen of the Jury will find me guilty.
I found the lead in a bag.
This boy swore that he saw me go across the street with the cheese.
Had I this coat on at the time?
I have nothing to say for myself.
I know nothing at all about the matter.
Mr. Meymott sent for me to my lodgings, and told me he could be of service to me, and then said he must have a warrant to search my lodgings; I told him he need not be at the trouble; I gave him my key, and they found the duplicates; I bought the caddies of various people that hawk them about Moorfields.
Please you, my Lord, I met a man in Hampstead, and he asked me if there was a pawnbroker's in the town; I said, no; he said, I have got a shirt to sell for 2 s.; he asked me to buy it; I said, I would ask the coachman; I took it to the coachman, and he said he would lend me 2 s. to buy it for myself, as he did not want any thing of the kind.
I was coming along, and there was a mob; I asked what was the matter, and they took me; I am as innocent as the child unborn.
Did you see me go into the passage?
I was coming through this passage, and they said they had lost a leg of mutton, and Mr. Phillips said I had taken it.
I found it going into the prosecutor's house from easing myself, and I went immediately to seek after work; and in about an hour, in Cranbourn-alley, I met the prosecutor's wife, and I told her then, as I had but just looked at it, that I had picked up a box and the contents; she said she had lost many things else, and if I would tell her where they were, she would forgive me.
I had been in the country for my tools, and on my return I saw two men making off over a field; I saw the bundle lying in the road, and came up to this turnpike, and there they stopped me; I did not say it was my clothes, I said it was probably clothes.
I was going on an errand into Holborn for my master.
That shirt was left with me by a person in Kent, a friend of mine; and I wanted money, and pledged the shirt.
My Lord, Mr. Reynell promised me he would not hurt me if I would confess; I did then tell him of a little more. My Lord, I have a very large family, and have had the palsy several times: I have been in gaol six weeks, and nothing but the bare boards to sleep on, and the gaol allowance.
He has took me at a very great nonplus, or I could have brought very good friends to my character; I have 20 l. a year annuity; I could have sent for Alderman Harley: I picked them up in the street.
I leave it to my counsel.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury; I had an occasion to do some particular business, and also being in want of some stockings, I went into the prosecutor's shop, and asked the shopman to shew me three pair of silk stockings; I asked the price of them; the shopman told me the price was 30 s. I examined the stockings very carefully, and found them rather slight, and not worth that money; I then offered him 27 s. which he refused, alledging he could not take less than 30 s. which was the price: on which he said he would shew me some inferior and lower quality, which I refused, and then stood by the counter, and took my pocket-handkerchief out of my pocket, and afterwards put the handkerchief into my pocket, and then I buttoned up my coat, with my stick in my hand, and walked five yards from the counter, and wished the shopman a good day: I was near out of the door, when the shopman called two more out of a room, and charged me with stealing the stockings; on which I was searched by them, but no stockings found on me at all, nor any thing else, saving cash to the\\ amountof five guineas, and some silver; on which the shopman turned round and said, I see the stockings on the counter; all this happened on the 24th of January last, about four o'clock: these circumstances of my case I humbly offer to my Lord and the Jury, and I am entirely innocent of the charge against me.
I was not searched in the watch-house; I had only three-pennyworth.
That is as false as can be sworn.
I met this man in the street, and he spoke to me first, and he asked me then if I would go and take a share of a pint of beer with him; I told him I did not know him; he said he knew my face very well, but he could not recollect where; then I told him I would go with him, and he brought me into a house in the Coal-yard, Drury-lane, and he called for a pot of beer; in the course of the time, these two young men came in, that he has spoke of, and they sat down in another seat, almost opposite where we sat, and this young man asked them if they would not join us company; they said they had no objection; we all sat down in one seat together, and we had two pots more of beer, besides the first pot; and after that we all went out of the house together; these young men I bid good night, and went away from them; just as I parted from them, they called me back again, and asked me if I would come further with them, and drink more; I told them I would not, I wanted to go home; they said I should go; I said I would not; so one of the young men took my hat off, and went away towards this man; and I followed them, to get my hat; and when I came up to this man, they put my hat on my head again; I turned about to go from them the second time, and as soon as I turned about they knocked that man down.
In the coach-yard: he cried out; they ran away from him, and I went up towards him: when I came up towards him, he said, you was one of the men that were with them that knocked me down; says he, I will call the watchman; so he called the watchman; and that gentleman there was standing at his own door, and he came over; this was in the coach-yard; then the watchman came up, and this gentleman came over from his own door; and the watchman came up and had me; and when he came up to the man, he asked him whether I was one of the men; he said I was; and he stretched his hand across the watchman's arm, and struck me; the watchman asked him how much he had lost; he said one shilling; and when he came to the watch-house he said he had lost five shillings.
I leave it with the gentlemen of the Jury to do just as they please: I have got two or three witnesses.
I have nothing to say; I was persuaded to do it by an old man; he said there was no harm in it, and I thought no harm: I have no witnesses but my master.
I have been in business for myself, in Glamorganshire, and I kept a few things by me, and these were part of them; Mr. Summerset frequently sent goods into the country, and these might have been brought there with his mark on them.
My lawyer is not here; I have no witnesses at present; I did not know of my trial coming on till ten minutes ago.
I beg for mercy.
I went backwards, and the dish was lying in the yard; about a fortnight afterwards, they took me up for the robbery.
I leave it to my counsel.
I never touched the boots; I am a gardener; the boy said then he did not know who took them; the constable knows that.
I never thieved a shilling in my life, nor had a pennyworth laid to my charge before.
I came out of the country for work, and going through this little village (Bayswater) I saw some people running after somebody, and I stopped, and they ran up to me and took me, and chastised me with it; I have no witnesses.
Droitwich, in Worcestershire.
I heard the cry of stop thief! and I ran, and they took me.
I never was in the fields that night, or did I ever see that knife before tonight.
Please you, my lord. I was coming up Store-street, and I saw a man running; and he threw the salt away from him; I picked it up; and on the cry of stop thief! this man laid hold of me, and I put the salt into my hand; then he took me to a poulterer's door, and told me I must stay till the gentleman came; I said I would stop; they took me to the watch-house, and I was bailed till Monday, then they brought me here.
I picked up the things, and went out to do a job; I really forgot to give them to my mistress.
I was in the publick-house most of the evening, and tossing up for liquor: I went to the necessary, and heard somebody, and Mr. Simpson stopped me.
My witnesses were here yesterday, they are gone out of town.
I am learning the trade of a farmer and grazier , from one Mr. Holgate, of Leeds Marsh, near Rye, in Sussex, tenant to one Squire Mansfield I think his name is, he lives at Roberts Bridge; I left him a year and a half; I have been supported since by my friends; my aunt used to support me, Old Quebec-street, Oxford-road.
That house was not inhabited lately; there was neither door nor window in it; I have slept in that room three months; I did not go into the house to take any thing away.
I live with a wood chopper, and had been out to sell some; on my return home a man asked me the way to Mutton-hill; I told him I was going that way, and he said if you will carry this parcel I will give you a shilling; going along Turnmill-street, these two (Newmans), stopped me.
I was coming from Soho-square, from Knox's; one of these gentlemen ran against me; he seemed in liquor; he said he had lost his watch, and took hold of me and took me to St. Martin's watch-house; I was searched, and nothing was found upon me.
I hope I shall be permitted to go for an East India Soldier.
I have nobody to my character in the world.
Out of Hertfordshire.
I was going down Phoenix-alley, and there was a cry of stop thief! and they saw me meanly dressed and took me.
Selling things about the streets.
I have nothing to say, only they say a great deal false in it.
Yes; but that young woman was not present as she says.
Did not you promise if I confessed I should go free?
The constable was present when you made the promise.
How came you not to stop me?
Did not the prosecutor say, that if I confessed he would let me go about my business?
Please you my lord. I have nothing to say, but to leave it to your lordship and the gentlemen of the jury. I expected some friends from the country, who are not come.
I was coming along, and the black man ran after me, and said I had his watch; he struck me several times, and I shewed my resentment, knowing myself to be innocent.
A man took the handkerchiefs, and chucked them down, and I took them up.
I was born in Bandy-leg-walk; I came out of Drury-lane.
I am a leather clog maker , I have been employed by Mr. Crouch, in the Hay-market.
Prisoner. Did I not tell you how I came by the property?
Please you my lord. I picked up the lead; and Mr. Newman took it from me, and said, if my father would give him a guinea he would settle it; my father had not a guinea; and then he said that he would prosecute me as far as the law would go.
I was going along Fleet-street, and hearing the cry of stop thief! I ran, as others did, and the gentleman struck me with his umbrella, and almost knocked me down. I am innocent.
Prisoner. Was there not two boys with you before I came up?
I was going up to Piccadilly to my brother's who is a captain of a revenue cutter; fearing I should be too late, I got up behind the coach where this boy was, and the coachman threw his whip over, and a boy threw some mud on the boy that was behind the coach with me; I got down in anger, and the bundle fell; I picked it up, and had not the bundle in my possession a minute and a half before I heard the cry of stop thief! the bundle was picked up by the constable under a woman's feet: I can bring gentlemen to my character: I am a native of the West Indies. I was tosticated in liquor.
He said at the justice that he would not positively swear I was the person, being dark, as I went past.
Will you ask the prosecutrix how she gets her living; she is a common prostitute, and will swear any body's life away for the reward.
A gentleman met me about twelve with a pair of boots, and horse whip, and he wanted a cart; says he, it is to take 400 lb. weight of hemp into the Borough; he said, he was in a hurry; at Millar's wharf; if you will load it, it is all ready looked out; and he promised to satisfy me for my trouble; he gave me a pot of beer, and ordered me to get a cart and load the hemp.
The prosecutor cut me down to sixteen shillings a week; the proper wages are eighteen shillings, by the laws allowed by the lord mayor; I brought down the blue coat, and asked his nephew for two buttons to put under the flaps; he turned to the window again; them black breeches were under the coat, as I laid it on the counter, and I was taking it up stairs, and he said I robbed him; I was generally a jobbing sort of a man; I had them breeches in my pocket, which I was bringing down; the constable knows I owned them before they were taken out of my pocket.
I found these bars almost covered with dung.
I was going along Holborn, and a man gave me sixpence to take it to the Old Sun, in Moorfields.
I am innocent as the child unborn of the fact charged against me.
I beg for forgiveness, that is all. A man asked me to let him ride, and he rode away with the horse; I was bringing him along the road.
I was passing from Lincoln's Inn Fields to Covent Garden, to buy some garden stuff, and I saw these gentlemen, and they said I was not the person.
I leave it entirely to my counsel.
Mr. Lavender was the most likely person to know whether it was or was not. I have very little thoughts of its doing me a service: this I will tell you very candidly, that I read it over myself, but it never was read over to me.
I have no desire of the kind, I do not think it would serve me.
I hope not.
I have nobody here. Apprehending from the message I received from the worthy solicitor against me, that my trial would not come on, I did not prepare myself with any witnesses at all.
One day I was in great distress, and a gentleman came up and gave me 3 d. and I went into the shop: the gentleman was ringing the bell for coals. I was in great distress, out of place, and it was necessity made me take it; it is the first error I ever was guilty of, and I hope you will have a little mercy. I have no friend in the world but my mother; she lives at No. 52, in Skinner's-street; she knows I am in goal.
Please your Lordship, we were walking up Holborn, and we found this purse with the cross; he cried half; says I, I picked it up, I have a right to all; we looked to see what was in it: another man came in, says he it is valuable property, indeed; says he, was you in company; yes, says I; yes, says the man; says I, I have no money about me; says he, I have some money; I have a note payable to the bearer; he went and got 130 l. he left me a hundred and five guineas, and I was to meet him at six o'clock at this house; and when I returned that 105 guineas and the 100 l. more, I was to have the diamond. I met him according to the appointment within a quarter of an hour.
I was stupefied with liquor, and did not know what I was doing: I throw myself on the mercy of the Court; I am lately come from Bristol, and I have not a friend in the world.
I was coming over Moorfields, and I saw a lad chuck it away, and I picked it up; and I went back into the stable-yard, and there was a woman said I was not the person who took it.
I had been along with a captain to the West Indies, to Bridge Town in Barbadoes; I had been gone about ten months; it was with Captain Carey , of Blackheath. A lad, that was on board the same ship with me, met me one day after I left my place, in Berwick-street: he told me he was a plasterer, and would get me a master. I had been after him; and coming down Oxford-street, I heard the alarm, and I ran, and some gentlemen knocked me down, and a mob came round me, and they picked me up; I do not know where the shop is; I have no witnesses.
As I was going along, I had been of an errand, I heard a great cry of Stop thief! a gentleman came and knocked me down, and this man came up and said to me,
\You rascal, you have robbed me!\" I have not a soul; I have lately come from sea."
I found the umbrella.
My Lord, I found the books in the street, two or three yards from the door, scattered about.
Kennedy said at Bow-street to the Jew, \You stand to what you have said, and we shall get 40 l.\""
I cut my shoe in coming from Chelsea, and I ripped my shoe; I thought it a pity to lose my shoes for 5 d. or 6 d. and I inquired for a person to mend it, and they directed me to that house. I have the shoes on now.
I found them in Drury-lane, wrapped up in a piece of paper.
I leave it to my counsel.
Please your Lordship, I was in company with one Pat Coyland, and he said if I could pawn his watch we might have a drink.
I leave it to my counsel.
Two other men took it.
I hope you will forgive me.
It is not feasible that I should go to steal things without see or reward.
Arrowsmith told me to go to Kilburn to fetch the horse, and I went; when I came there I staid that night, and part of the next day, and Arrowsmith never came, so I brought the horse to the Compasses.
Please you, my Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I stand here for a crime of which I am totally innocent; neither of my prosecutors can say they found any thing on me, how then, my Lord, and Gentlemen, upon your wife opinion, can I be guilty of this offence: I humbly throw myself on your lenient protection and humanity, for I am innocent of the crime.
When he took me he said he would make a guinea of me.
My mother lives at Bow; I was coming along and saw two men, and they began to use me ill, and kicked my hat over the pales and I got over after it.
I leave it to my counsel.
I had been to bathe myself; and when I came out of the water it was almost dark, and coming down towards the road I heard a sing out of stop thief! I saw nobody; I walked down the lane and that man took me; my friends are not here.
I was never near the place.
I was going to see an acquaintance who lived at next door, and I mistook one area for the other, and this young man came, and shut me in; I never saw the spoons.
I am innocent of the robbery.
Another man just before me dropped the boots.
I went to serve newspapers, and coming by the turnpike, I picked the things up.
I was coming up Bishopsgate-street, and I heard the cry of stop thief! and they stopped me; it was between nine and ten, and a very dark night.
Please your honor there was crying stop thief! I saw a young man running in a blue jacket, I ran the same as another, he threw something over my head, and I stooped down on my knee, and they took me.
I met a man, and he desired me to take the saws, and put them under my arm, and the oil-stone, and wait for him; coming across, I was met by that young gentleman, and taken into custody.
If I had had a friend, I should have got through this business, that I see, but I am lost for want of a friend; where they have fetched this man from I do not know.
I have nothing to say.
I found the gown near Turnham Green.
I took them to get a little money to go to sea.
I leave it to my counsel.
I have but little to say in my defence, my Lord; I have been guilty of some follies, but I never before violated the laws of my country, there I humbly throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I worked at Brentford, as a plumber and glazier; I had been drinking, and coming by the prosecutor's door I heard an alarm, and I ran as others did, but know nothing of the affair.
My lord judge; I have this to say, I am innocent of the thing; I have witnesses.
A man offered me a shilling to carry it to Ratcliff-Highway, and ran away while I was easing myself.
My Lord, I know nothing at all of what I am accused of; I could not deliver it, nor have any thing to do with it.
I have a very large family, and was not three doors from the public house; I had no intention of stealing the shoes.
On the Monday before this, my master and me had a great many words, about my bed and bedding not being put to rights, and he made me work on Sundays.
I bought the bacon; to be sure I have been here before; but I have left it entirely off.
There was a crowd, and I picked up the things.
The girl was not there when I was stopped.
I was coming along, and a man asked me to carry them, and said he would give me a pint of beer.
A young man just before me dropped it.
I bought the stockings.
I bought these at Bristol myself; I can produce some more, and they cannot tell a difference.
I leave it to my counsel.
Necessity urged me.
My lord, my father John Dean , the governor of Bengal, on the coast, left several natural children, some were formerly in the East India service, there was something for them; I applied to Batson's coffee-house for something; I was informed it was from abroad; I waited with much suspicion, I imagined that these letters were intended for me; both my uncle and father left several children; I did expect those were the letters intended for me; the way I came by the letters was by the people informing me there were several letters for me from abroad, that were of consequence; the people gave me the direction, and came after me from place to place, to hunt after me; please to let the witness be called that first informed me of the letters:
I have nothing to say, more than to declare my innocence of having bought the coat in Monmouth-street; I bought the coat in Gerrard-street, of a person that was going to sell it to two jews; he offered it for twelve shillings; I offered him eleven shillings; it appeared to be a coat that nearly fitted me; and being in want of money sometime after that, I pledged it at Mr. Clarke's for five shillings; I know nothing about any person in Monmouth-street; I never bought any coat there; and I never changed a bank note in my life.
I hope you will all be merciful to me: I was very much in liquor: I have not a friend within a hundred miles.
I was in Covent-garden market that morning, buying a bushel of apples, which I get my bread by selling on a jackass; know nothing of the matter.
Had you not the locket from me?
Did you say the locket was left with you as a security?
Walking down Piccadilly, I met the prosecutor, we walked on and I saw a purse; says he there lays a purse, I picked it up and he cried halves immediately; then he asked me what countryman I was, I told him a West countryman; he said he was the same country; he said as we are countrymen I hope you'll give me half; we went into Mr. New's; there was a strange man; I took out a bill and receipt, and a locket, from the purse; the prosecutor asked if there was nothing else in the purse, and there was a locket, but I cannot say whether that is the same locket; I went to my friend, he was not in town, I came back and told him; says he I should like to keep this, it is the first thing I ever found in my life; and the prosecutor said he would leave his money and his watch in my hands as an indemnification; he first gave the money to this man, a stranger to me; I went on Monday morning to the same place, he was not there.
At the first hearing did not you set it down as an assault?
I thank you, my Lord, and the honourable Court. I assure you I grant the first part of Dunn's evidence, in meeting with him and going to the Walnut Tree, to Mr. Smallwood's house; there we drank together; but as to ever hurting him, or putting my hand on his person, I never did; in the next place he has crossed himself very much: he did say to the carman, this man has murdered me; why, d - n me, says the carman (begging your pardon, my Lord) you look like a murdered man: I said I would go before any magistrate, I know my innocence; we walked arm and arm together, and we went to Guildhall, where 'Squire Boydell was sitting alderman; he sent us in a coach to Mr. Justice Clarke; there he only swore at the first hearing that I committed very violent assault, but never mentioned a word of robbing him till the Saturday, then he said I had robbed him of two-pence halfpenny; I was only committed for a violent assault, till the last session the grand jury found a bill for robbery.
I only came out of the sick ward this morning; I was seven weeks there: I have no witnesses: I am very weak.
I know nothing about it; they asked me to cary it, and said they would give me 6 d. I said I would if I could, but it was too heavy.
I had been among my shipmates, and was in liquor.
I had been drinking with a young man, and he desired me to carry the goods to Islington, and he would pay me for my trouble.
I have nothing to say, I only beg for mercy.
I leave it all to my counsel.
A man offered me a shilling to carry it to Billingsgate.
I bought them of a school-fellow that I was playing with; I am not 12 years old.
Was any body with me at the time?
There are many persons in a red coat; one may be like another.
I know nothing of it.
I leave it to my counsel.
I was coming down Thames-street, and a gentleman said he would give me a shilling to take them to No. 21, Clerkenwell-green; I have no friend in the world.
I was coming up stairs, and found the spoons on the stairs; I was going to fetch a pint of beer for the cook, and I took the hats and umbrella, thinking my fellow servant, Grant, would come over and drink a pint of ale; I wish to clear up the point; I am not guilty of the crime.
I am totally innocent.
I bought the two shirts of James Point ; Mrs. Gard bought two shirts at the same time; Mrs. Berry bought a waistcoat and breeches; I never saw the Chesterfield arms, nor do I know where it is.
Did not you come past me three or four times and look in my face? he says never mind, you are not a native of England; what countryman are you? I said of Holland; I said I am going to Holland next Monday; he said what kind of country is that; he asked me many questions; he asked me to have some Burton and a bowl of bunch.
He said you are rather low spirited, is there any thing in my power that I can serve you?
Then he laid hold of my arm, as we were walking along.
He said I should not be afraid of him, he was a true Englishman and could afford to spend a thousand guineas.
When you gave me the guinea and a half, did not you appoint me to call upon you on Monday?
When I came into the room, did not you take hold of my ring, and say, you d - d rascal this is my ring?
My Lord, my life is in your hands; how came this Mr. Peterson to be in bodily fear, if innocent? and take me to his home, where there were twenty or thirty people, and lend me a guinea and a half; why did he not take me then; he said, I am a gentleman, there, take this; I said I was going to Holland on Monday; he said call on me on Monday; I came back to tell him I could not call on him on Monday, but would call on Sunday night; he said, keep the money, my good fellow, you are welcome to it as long as you come from Holland; on Sunday evening I went there, having a guinea and half a crown and a shilling in my pocket; I said I came here to return him a guinea, and I will leave him any thing, and my direction, till I come from Holland to pay him the rest.
I leave it to my counsel.
They said if I confessed it would be better for me.
The bundle was on the table, and I expected a bundle; the things were not in my pocket.
I was not nigh the house.
The prosecutor keeps a common lodging house , and the very night before, his wife came up, or his daughter least-wise, threatening to turn me out of the bed; we pay every night; being out of work, I was almost starving, and I took the sheets, and I pawned them with that gentleman.
I came from Shropshire, and it rained, and I went to get a lodging.
I bought these things of the prosecutor's clerk.
It is very hard for a man to have his life sworn away, she is a common prostitute on the town.
I know no more of it than the child just born into the world.
I was very drunk.
My Lord, and gentlemen of the jury, under the unfortunate situation in which I now stand, and have been these two months, my mind is too much embarrassed, and my spirits too much depressed, to attempt to say any thing for myself; the honour, the justice, and humanity of this court I have always held in the greatest reverence; to that honour, and to that justice, and the humanity of the court, and on you, gentlemen of the jury, I rely very much, not only for myself, but for my wife and our aged parents; my counsel will call such witnesses as I have given, and the gentlemen of the jury will take it into consideration; I can say no more.
A young man asked me to mind his coach and horses, and in the coach I saw this bundle and took it out, and put it up in my handkerchief, then Mr. Hall took me; I told him I found them in a coach.
A man who appeared to be a steward of a ship asked me to carry this to No. 2, King's-street; I carried it, and the man went with me, and the same man went with me at six o'clock to fetch it.
I would wish to ask where I was taken?
I was taken by a butcher.
I was coming up from Black-wall, when I was stopped by a butcher; presently after this man came out of School House Lane, who was passing by me, and the butcher called to him and said, this is the man, and he took me, and afterwards a man came and brought this property, and said I stole it.
John Hunt , who lodged at Wringer's, had offered me to lodge with him, and I went in backward, and went up and was asleep when Wringer came, being intoxicated; I told him I hoped he did not think I came there to do him any harm; and I would be very happy if he would search me.
I was in liquor.
there was a young man in a green coat, that dropped it and I picked it up, and that man came.
I am willing to make it up in my work when I am in work.
Did not I find my own linen?
What he says of the duplicates, and a pocket book is false.
I have a witness here to prove that I delivered these things to Mrs. Neale.
The premises were all out of repair. If these sheets had been theirs, they must be dirty, because they had been laid in a month, and if they were their sheets they must be dirty, and not clean.
I have got the paper to shew that a gentleman gave me to collect money, to go to this doctor to cure my eyes.
I was so much in liqour I cannot give any account.
I had been drinking in the morning, which I had not been accustomed to do, and was very much in liquor, and knew not what I did.
Can you point out any mark you know that ring by?
I have two witnesses to bring into this court to prove that Mr. Wheeler, living at No. 14, Harford-street, Mary-le-bone, offered this ring publicly to sell in the Adam and Eve public house, in Mary-le-bone. I never was in Mr. Jones's shop in my life, till I went with Mr. Miller. In my flurry I might have said that I had it from Mr. Williams, but I meant at Mr. Wheeler's, he has left his house and gone away.
With respect to the thing, I do declare that I did not know any thing of the kind till that young man came to me; I have dealt in the yard sixteen or seventeen years, in the course of that time I have laid out some hundreds of pounds; I knew no more about when he challenged me with the property, no more then you; he came to me, and said you have not settled for that; I said I have; I had been drinking; I know no more of the business than the stones I was walking upon; that young man knows that I have dealt with honesty and integrity; if I had not been as a person out of my senses I should not have attempted any thing in that yard, without expecting to have been found out.
Ask him when he went to work the next morning, whether there was not one of the men gone out of the room that sleeps in the room?
When I was going to work the next morning, I went to work very early, I met this man who slept in the room, one of the men who lodge in the room in which he left his watch; he took me and gave me two or three pots of beer, and he gave me this watch, either to sell or pawn for what I could get for it; I took the watch, I went down to this man's place and shewed it him, says he to me will you sell the watch? says I, it is not mine, says he, I will stand every rig of that sort, I don't care how you came by it, if I can get a bargain; he said he would give fifteen shillings and another that he had taken out of pawn before to boot, and I had sold him the duplicate, I went and advanced the fifteen shillings down to the man, and I told him I would pay him the rest at proper times; we kept drinking till it was too late to go to work, indeed I was not fit, and the next day I knew there was another man put on in my room.
It was not him that gave it me, it was the man that slept in the room, there were two single men who slept in the same room where he left his watch, lodgers.
I was in the street when he laid hold of me; he never catched me in the place at all; my shoes were my own which I bought at Rag Fair.
The four loaves were standing in the street, and no basket nigh with them, and that man came up and made me go back with them.
I took the child out of the coach, the coach was broke down; I delivered the child, and every thing, as far as I know, as I found it; I delivered the child as freely as I took it; I have got no witness; there was nobody there it was so early; I have lived in St. James's parish thirty-five years.
Please you my lord I know nothing at all about it; at the change of the moon my head is light, and I don't know what I am about.
I was coming along Whitechapel between the hours of four and five, and the people walked very thick on the pavement, and there were two more lads walking close by the side of me, and a kind of a cheesemonger man catched hold of three of us, and called the gentleman back, and one of the other two dropped the handkerchief.
Mrs. Goodman depended on me to do her justice, as she was going into the country, and desired me to put the things in in my own name.
I found the watch; I saw it laying among the crowd.
Was there any thing taken out of the bundle?
By all means I had a right to have the duplicate of the hat I had bought in the Hay-market, after paying four shillings and six pence for it, because they had a suspicion of this hat they conceived it must be that gentleman's there; I never meddled with the hat, and they cannot say that I did, except they for swear themselves. I have a few words to say. I brought this hat of a jew in the Haymarket, and gave four shillings and sixpence for it, he had told me his name was Shepherd, and that he lived in Rosemary-lane; in the afternoon afterwards I pawned it for three shillings.
He either offered me to let me pay eight shillings for the breeches or give him them again.
No man can speak a word against my character, except about these breeches; about the 17th of May I left two pair of old breeches in that place which were not worth much; on the 3d of June or 4th, I went to see for my breeches and could not find them, by looking about I found these in the hostry and took these to put them on while I had another pair mended; I takes these to the breeches maker's, which the prosecutor knows at the time I changed them, afterwards I wore these breeches and did not know but they were my own when I took them. I have no witnesses because I expected it would have been made up, because I sent a person to Mr. Fossit yesterday morning, and he said it would come to nothing.
I met this other man and he asked me to have part of a pot of beer, after we had the drink, he asked if we should go in and play at skittles? when I went into the ground there were four men just done playing, one of them had his coat off, I was obliged to go home to leave some victuals at home; as I was coming down Wheeler-street I met this man again, I asked him why he did not stay, he said, he was obliged to go because he was sent for; as I was walking back again I met this girl, and she asked me whether I was not in the skittle ground? I said I was going to the same skittle ground, but I did not know whose it was, particularly she asked me what was the man in the white coat? I told her where he told me he was going.
I found it in the fields laying in three pieces, and that bit of a bag lay by it; and I took it and put it in my basket, and took it away; I work for Mr. Law, in Chiswell-street, he can give me a very good character.
I was in the shop I own; I went to look at a watch, but when I went out to look for the chain I found I had not money enough in my pocket, and there was an elderly man in a black coat, that went out before me.
I had none of them about me, the spoons were found under the bench.
I know nothing at all about it.
I had the horse to sell for this John Jones .
did you see me have any thing in my possession?
Ask if he did not see the woman take the curtain and give me the rod?
Please you my lord I was in Lukener's-lane, and a woman said come in here, and have something to drink, and she left a parcel which I took up in my hand, and put it in my pocket; I went to pay for my beer, and they would not take my money.
Ask him whether he let the room to me or to one George Webb ?
Ask him whether he did not take up George Webb to Bow-street, and he was discharged after two hearings?
Ask her whether she let the room to me or George Webb ?
Ask her whether this said George Webb did not come along with one Moore that lodged with her before?
Ask her whether there was not one George Webb lay with me from the time I came into the room?
Ask her whether it is not a common lodging house for all forts of jack ass chaps?
I was at work for a plasterer, and so I light of that George Webb , and as I wanted a lodging he said he had a room, for which he paid five-pence a night that was half a crown a week, and he said if I would pay half that I should lodge with him, and George Webb asked me to lodge with him; coming home one night I heard that this said Mr. Croney had taken up this said George Webb for a robbery, and I did not go home that night, because next morning I was going to a country job, and then I heard afterward that he was looking after me; he had this George Webb up to Bow-street, and likewise three girls that used to come up with this George Webb , and had them examined, and they were discharged; I was up about this six weeks from the country, and about the neighbourhood ever since, and he said he was resolved to have forty pounds if he could, for to make up for his goods. I paid George Webb the twopence halfpenny a night, and he paid the five-pence. I have no Witness but my mother.
I was very much in liquor. - He rather seemed to be in liquor.
He says he took a gimblet out of my pocket which I never saw in my life.
I know nothing of the affair I am as innocent as a child unborn. I am destitute of friends; I am a seaman brought up to the sea out of America.
He said he catched me in the house; I was knocking at the door. - As soon as ever I catched him in the room he instantly attempted to knock at the door with his knuckles, and said halloo; but I found him inside of the door; he got back from me as soon as I collared him, but my mother instantly came up, when I asked him what he wanted? he said one Mrs. Lewis.
I was looking for work, and I met a gentleman who employed me to carry the table down to Shoe-lane, to the Red Hart, it was a gentleman as I met, as I was looking for a job.
I would be glad to go and serve my king; I am a carpenter by trade.
He said at the justices that he left it out till such a time in the morning.
The thing was, I was very much tipsey that night; I saw that saddle lay down by the wall, and I took it up, and I did intend to carry it to the watch-house, but before that, this man met me, and I thought as he had took care of me he might take care of the saddle. As to that thing the tinder box, he need not have brought it, that I had for the convenience of getting a light.
At the time I was taken how far was it from where was apprehended and detained by the officers, from the place where he was attempted to be robbed?
Ask him did he know my person?
Can you swear to me?
At what distanace was it from where the gentleman was robbed you took me?
When I met him I was turning out of the path into the road, and this man fell down.
I could wish you to call the other witnesses in, the gentleman in the blue coat.
At the time you stopped me on the road, was not that last gentleman drunk?
Did not I stop to see him picked up?
How far distant was this from the place where the gentleman was robbed?
The other has said nine hundred yards, which is three quarters of a mile, upon my soul it is unaccountable.
I was passing along the road; I had been drinking; they took me into custody, and they detained me, asked me where I was going? and where I had been? and were taking me to a place where I had been in, and passing along we were met with this prosecutor of mine, and he said, that I was the man that robbed him: I declare my innocence; I know nothing about it. I have no witnesses, I was brought up to trial so suddenly I have none at present; had it been a future day I might have got some.
I was drawing a load of dung over two more loads of dung, the horse had almost winded itself, and fell back, and for fear she should lose her wind, I went and catched hold of her reins, and gave her a slap on the nose to keep her wind.
When I was first taken to the watch-house, Mr. Fuller said that his daughter saw the man come into the shop in a white coat, and took away the till, ask him if he saw me near the shop.
In the first place I lodged with Mr. Adman up three pair of stairs where there are three beds.
Pray what particular mark is there on the neckcloth? I bought it in the country the time I did this on my neck.
He said before the justice that he believed it was his own, but now I find he has learned a better story.
In the first place that is the gentleman that took me at the public house; ask him if he found any instrument about me; I am charged with breaking and entering.
Or any other property whatever but what is my own; that neck-cloth is my own, it is the fellow of this that I have on my neck; in the second place I lodge at this landlord's up three pair of stairs, it is a house for the lodging of strangers, sometimes there is a man comes there for one night or two nights; now some time ago there was a robbery committed there of a sheet and a pair of shoes, they might as well have laid that to me as this, this robbery was committed on Monday night, why is not the same man as liable to commit this robbery as me? I have been in the house three months, or something better; the landlord of the house would give me a good character if he was here.
This lady says that she saw me coming down with a bundle, ever since I have been there I have perhaps been in and out for two or three times a day; that day I went, I went up to get a few things for a washer woman, the contents of this bundle were my own things, and were found at the washerwoman's when she was sent for, she knows the same; I have been out of the country but three months, I have nobody in this part of the world, and what little money was taken from me was the remainder of what I brought from the country; before the justice my prosecutor did not pretend to say any further, than that he believed it was his handkerchief; he might as well swear to this I have got on my neck, I dare say the gentlemen of the jury can find no particular mark upon it, if you look firm into this my lord, you will find me an injured man.
I am totally innocent of the charge; I had sent to Lord Milbam's to subpoenea a person on this charge that was with me, but he cannot now appear; I had just parted with him in Oxford road, a woman then catched hold of my arm and wanted to keep fast hold of me, I at length run from her and she called out watch; I might push against the prosecutor, I cannot say, but when I heard the cry of stop thief, I immediately stopped and was taken to the watch-house, and when I was taken to the watch-house, Mr. Aire, as he called himself, never charged me with any felony in the least.
It was five guineas and a shilling.
I have nothing to say.
I was coming along the same time as they were calling stop thief, and I happened to be the first man coming along, and that man stopped me.
I want to ask the prosecutor whether I stole the jacket, or whether I had the jacket given me by one of the young fellows?
I and two more came on shore, and wanted to buy us some jackets, and we went into two or three shops, and we could not get a jacket to suit, and then we went into this man's house, and we tried on two or three jackets, and this young man that bought this jacket gave this jacket to me and told me to go on with it, and he would over, take me; with that I went on to Tower-hill, to make haste to my ship.
My fellow servant that I worked with, his wife was taken ill. After I had done my work I went home to supper, an order came in that he was to go and buy a horse at Hackney, and he immediately said to me, that his wife was taken ill, and he would be very much obliged to me if I would go and buy the horse in his stead; I said I would go to serve him in any respect whatever; I went and bought the horse; coming along this place there was a gentleman on the other side of the way came over and catched hold of me by the collar; I asked him what he wanted with me? he immediately replied you are one of the persons that has robbed my shop; he had me in custody for the space of five or six minutes, he wanted to take me back to the place from whence he came, and then he turned back, looked over his shoulder, let me go, ran away from me round the corner of the street; knowing myself innocent, I never stirred from the place where I was left; he ran back again and said, you are the person, and I have got you; immediately a gentleman came up and asked what was the matter? I says, I don't know what is the matter,for this gentleman has taken me by the collar, and says he has got me. The prosecutor made answer and said directly, are you a constable? yes, says he, but I don't belong to the office; he says, that don't signify, I give you charge of him, and we went into the office directly; we were near Marlborough-street. I have got no witness. My fellow servant's wife is very ill, and he was obliged to attend his wife, and my mistress is subject to the rheumatism in her arms, and cannot come.
This man when he had me in custody, attempted to take me back from whence he came; he knocked my hat off in the street, and left me for the space of three minutes, and I went and picked up my hat, in that time he took hold of me again, and took me into the office immediately.
I have nothing to say.
My father is a great farmer in the lower parts of Surry, I had been at Sutton four weeks, I lived at Guildford last year.
Surry.
The moment you laid hold of me did not I try to disengage myself all that ever lay in my power?
I was coming along with my brother, we had been drinking most part of the evening together, who was the only person in company with me, there stood a coach near the pavement, with one man on the box, and I thought I would get up, and there ensued a scuffle between the coachman and me, my brother ran down immediately, thinking I should be overpowered, and I came down with my feet on the pavement; as soon as I came on the pavement this gentleman was there, and he put his hand out to lay hold of me, which I acknowledge, that I struck him; that gentleman laid hold of me; I strove all that I could to disengage myself, and in the scuffle we both fell down in the mud; I said to my brother, get him away, get him away; I was overpowered and struck till the blood run out of my car; they took me away to the watch-house, and the coachman came also, and gave charge of me the same time that this gentleman did.
Can you look me in the face, and say that you was robbed by me?
This is a malicious piece of business; I had no more intention of robbing him than I have of putting an end to my life. I had two poor people attending to speak for me all the day, and they said, they could not stay any longer.
I work about three hundred yards from Mr. Messenger's, and I goes there generally for my day's victuals, by going there, I got acquainted with the servant girl, she used to bid me call her up in the night; and I used to be with her from two o'clock in the morning, till five; and she has given me both money, victuals, and drink.
The gentleman seems to swear they are his master's, and I have nothing to say against him.
This gentleman hired me as a porter, and he keeps two shops.
They told me that if I would tell who the man was that took another piece that they saw go away with it, they would freely forgive me?
The same day, I saw a man in the place with an oil-cloth under his arm, drinking a pint of beer, and I dare say, he saw me. The boy said before, that he never saw me but three times in his life.
I cannot explain my words so plain, because I cannot talk English, which I hope you will excuse. I hired myself to Mr. Bullmer, he keeps two shops. I used to pull his truck, &c. And I used to drink at this public house, and that child used to drink rather too much, when his uncle was out of the way; and my master saw some man go away with a floor-cloth, and he came to me, and asked me, whether I knew the man that had taken the cloth out of his house? and told me, if I would tell, he would forgive me; and wanted to persuade the boy, that I left that piece there. Mr. Bulmer's house is a lodging-house, and the lodgers have as much liberty of going through the warehouse as he himself; and there was a man seen go with an oil-cloth away that day, as I was told; the clerk knew that I was going away from the place; his place would not suit me.
I hired him in my room to do my work while I was gone a couple of days.
I had a wife come down to see me with two children. My master was gone out, and I asked my mistress to go out with them; I went out with them on Tuesday. On Wednesday morning there was a man called me up about half after four, who brought the horse and cart into the yard, and hallooed out postilion; I went to him, says he, my horse is knocked up, says he, give him a feed of corn, and take the cart in; and he desired that I would send them up to the Three Kings, Piccadilly, as soon as I had given him the feed of corn; he desired also to have the cart, and send the horse up by the side of one of the chaises, and he would call for the cart in the course of a day or two.
The time I was taken the witness in the green coat, he catched hold of me, I was not near the building; he catched hold of me and he says to the other, here is a sure forty pounds; why did not you lay hold of him? I have nothing else to say in regard to that.
I had seen her the Wednesday night before.
I came up on Wednesday night from St Stafford, I, and five more of my comrades, in order to see our wives and children; when we got into London, I went home to my wife and children, after I had sat about a quarter of an hour with my wife, I said, I will go up and see my father and sister; accordingly, I went up to my father's place, I asked where my sister was? my father told me where my sister was, in Chelsea-place at work; I went there and told the person to tell her it was her brother the soldier; with that, she came out of the area and said, Ned, is it you? yes my dear, it is says I; I went in and discoursed with her some time, and when I left her I kissed her; I parted with her at that time and the told me the would come up again to me in the morning; I went home again to my father and told him I had seen her; I parted with him and went home to my wife and children; in the morning between eight and nine, my sister came up and breakfasted with me and my wife, after breakfast we had two or three drams together; I then asked her where my brother was at work? the said, the did not know, but if I went to my brother's pay table I might hear of him; says she, I must go home and get my father's dinner, I went up with her to her own place where the fetched out some cold meat to eat, afterwards she fetched a dram, and then another dram; I then kissed her and took my leave of her, and went up to my brother's; I told her it would be some time before I saw her again, very likely six or seven months; I went up towards Mary-le-bone, going through Mary le-bone, I met Margeret Marshall , the put her basket down and killed me and I her; I then went to my brother's pay table where I had a pint of beer; my brother came in between twelve and one, he was very glad to see me; him and I came away together; in our discourse he says to me, how many letters have you sent since you have been away? I told him I had sent five; he says, what a deceitful girl my sister must be not to deliver them to me, the is a very deceitful girl, and as you are here we will go up and have it out about the letters; I told him, no, I had took my leave of her, and I had to meet five of my comrades in order to go and join the regiment that night; however, by his persuasions I went up, when he says to his sister, Polly, how many letters have you had from Ned? she said, what is that to you? I said, you are a deceitful girl not to shew them to your brother; no, says she, I will not shew him, I will see you d-'d first, and some more words ensued; with that, she flew to the window and caught up the tea kettle and flung it over my left leg, which was always very tender; she then turned herself again to lay hold of something also, and swore she would cut me down if I did not quit the room; she then instantly stretched her hand across to my bayonet, I put my hand out to prevent it, and how it happened the Lord above knows, I don't know.
Whether you did not say to your sister first, that the was a deceitful hussey?
I have to this time served him faithfully?
Please you my lord I have rented that room ever since Whitsuntide.
Pray did I not, a week before this, come down to your wife, and say, Mrs Oliphant, there is your garret door open, and she said she was very much obliged to me for telling her of it.
Did you ever lose any thing before?
I believe it to be all a piece of spite of Mr. Oliphant, the officer and all. Mr. Oliphant styles himself a cornchandler, when he deals in nothing but buying and selling of birds; and every Sunday, there are forty or fifty fellows up in this house; he gives them a shilling a-day to catch birds for him, and there are a matter of seven different lodgers. I acknowledge that night, I was in liquor. I went up to see if my wife was at home, going up stairs I stumbled and fell into the room, but as to the sheets or tick, I know nothing about. I never can think it is done for any thing more than a reward; they cast a man not long ago, just before this, and they went home with cockades in their hats.
Oh, your honour! that is as big a falsity as ever was spoke; what a lying old man that must be.
I would be glad to know, if they lost none, but in this fortnight or three weeks; because I lived there about two years and three quarters before, and then, while I was there, they were always losing plates. Mr. Miles has trusted me with many a twenty and thirty pound note to change. I might as well have robbed him of plate as pewter; I have been in London these twenty-five years; I have been a master and journeyman, I have never been summoned in a riot, arrested, nor served with a warrant, nor any thing these twenty-five years. I lived with Mr. Miles, two years and three quarters ago, for six or seven months, and Mr. Miles cannot say any thing against me; I have been a master for myself; and this is some old pewter that I had left.
I meant to sell it; the value of it was not above two or three shillings; it is very hard to prosecute such an old man as me, when I have saved him thirty or forty pounds in flour.
He keeps a private mad-house.
Had you ever seen this cupboard on Mr. James's premises?
I have nothing to say but what it is my own, there is nothing brought here but what is my own, it is my property, I bought it in Ratcliff-highway of a man who brought it about in a cart.
I went out on Sunday to see my sister-in-law, I had five shillings of my mistress when I went out in the morning, I went to my sister-in-law's to drink tea, she keeps a cheesemonger's shop in Westminster; I asked my sister to lend me a guinea till Christmas, to buy me a coat for Sundays, as I had lost one in this gentleman's service, and I borrowed a guinea of her, she gave it all in silver, which was two half crowns, and the rest in six-pences and shillings; this was the Sunday before I was taken up; I put it with the five shillings that I had of my mistress and wrapped it up in a bit of paper, and tied it up with a piece of string, and put it into my sob.
I am an innocent man I do assure you.
If I had known I had been in danger, I had a summons sent me at two o'clock, to attend before the corroner the next morning by nine, and I was there by half after eight, if I had thought I had been in any danger, I certainly should not have gone.
When you was at the Lord Mayor's, the Lord Mayor ordered you to deliver me the property again and you have not.
The money that I had in my purse I took it that very day for butter, and as for them that were lapped up in paper they had been some that had been taken some time ago, and I never offered them nor did not intend to offer them. Some times I go out of an evening a fiddling and get twenty shillings in a night, often had shillings and sixpences; there was a bad dollar slung into my hat not long ago while I was fiddling.
In my time I have dealt very large in butter and cheese ; I married Miss Holmes, the banker's daughter.
I came to this gentleman's house on the 10th of last month, which was the Sunday, I came into the coffee-room, and called for a glass of rum and water; I stayed there some time, I cannot recollect the time, about twenty minutes after I called for the rum and water, and paid for it, at the same time as I was sitting in the box; before I went, I took the coat which laid on the table; I had my own on at the same time; at that time I was rather intoxicated, and did not know myself very well; I took the coat, and went as far as the door of the coffee-room, where I was stopped, there I found I had my own coat on; and Mr. Clarke took the coat away from me out of my hand; I was so giddy at the time, I could scarcely recollect who stopped me; then I immediately delivered the coat, according to what they took from me, and said nothing at all, as I found I had got my own on, I recollected that I made a mistake; for my intentions were not to have taken away the coat, I assure you, it was through mistake and intoxication, that I had that misfortune.
It is false, I did not put it under my great coat, I had it on my arm, as if I was going to put it on.
I had been to No. 35, Manchester-street, the overnight, when a gentlewoman told me, I was to come the next morning for the dust; I went, and I was very dry, and I asked for a drop of table beer, and she brought me up a pint and a half, and it was very sour; but I drank a good draught of it, and it gave me the gripes, and I went to ease myself, and that man came and catched hold of me, and said I must go along with him.
The indictment has never been fully read to me, nor have I been indulged with a copy of it. I claim the indulgence of the court to have it read.
You said it was about seven o'clock in the evening when I came into the coffee room?
How long do you think I was in the coffee room from first to last?
How long do you think?
That is not an answer; How long do you think I was in the coffee room?
Did I address myself to you in any part of that two hours or not?
Did I address myself to the company at large?
You swear that positive?
Pray how was that manner of address made?
How did I address myself to the whole room?
How long do you think I might have been in the coffee room before I addressed the company with that question?
Do you think it was an hour?
What had past before I had asked that question?
Pray in consequence of what was it that I made that address?
Pray, Mr. Buchanan, did you see any body attempt to interrupt me previous to this address? Mind I ask you positively to speak to that question, because that you must know?
Are you positive that Mr. Newman did?
You seem to be extremely positive in some other things why not in this? did you or did you not see some person interrupt me?
That did not interrupt me?
Was nothing else done?
Was this before or after I addressed the company?
Now, sir, Pray what was the manner of that interruption?
Pray, sir, did not you hear him call me a rascal, if you can recollect one part of the conversation, so much against me you surely can recollect the other, or else your's must be a very accommodating memory? Did not you hear him call me a rascal?
Was it words to that effect?
Were they opprobrious terms?
I ask you positively whether he did or did not call me a rascal?
Would you have supposed that any other man was called a rascal?
Did he do any thing else?
Did you hear Mr. Newman call me a rascal? What did he call me?
Did you see Mr. Newman do any thing to me than call me opprobrious names? To cut the matter short, did not you see him put his fist to my face?
If he had applied to you in that way would you have supposed that he meant to strike you?
Would not you have supposed he was going to strike you?
Did not you see him put his fist in my face before I addressed the company?
Was not all this previous to my having addressed myself to him or the company?
You say you heard me call the King, a German hog butcher and other words; are you sure that these were all the words that I uttered, are you sure that I never uttered any words by way of comparison, such as he was no better?
Don't you know what past previous to my making use of these words?
Pray at what period of the evening was it that I gave a\\ to\\ ast to the French Republic?
You was not I think before the alderman when I was first taken up?
Was not you applied to come before the alderman?
How came you to come here to day?
Was it not in consequence of a paragraph appearing in one of the papers, stating that this country had to pay for so many Hanoverians killed at thirty pounds a head, that I made these remarks?
Pray Mr. Leech what hour in the evening was it I entered your house?
How long might I remain in your house?
You think it did not exceed nine before I went out?
How came I to go out of your house?
What authority had you for that?
What period might I have been in your house when I drank the French Republic?
How many glasses of punch did I drink in your house?
Was it the first, second, or third?
Did I address myself ever to you?
Did any body attempt to interrupt me before I addressed myself to the company?
Did not you hear Mr. Newman call me a rascal?
You swear positively that Mr. Newman did not call me a rascal?
Did you not see Mr. Newman put his fist into my face?
Was not that previous to my having addressed myself to the company?
Now, sir, what part of the room was you in when you heard me drink these\\ to\\ asts?
Did I drink them as\\ to\\ asts to the company at large or to my friend?
Was it not after Mr. Newman called me a rascal and put his fist in my face that I gave the\\ to\\ ast on my legs?
Did I seem to have given Mr. Newman any provocation to induce him to put his fist in my face and call me a rascal?
Was he not approaching my box in a menacing posture?
You did not hear me call the King a german hog butcher?
Pray Mr. Leech, where these all the words I uttered?
You have seemed to select them very nicely however. Was it not in consequence of some paragraphs in the news papers that I made these observations?
The jury want to hear nothing of you but evidence. Did I not read the news-paper aloud, and were there not paragraphs tending to that effect which induced me to make use of some of these expressions?
And you came in very apropro when I was uttering these words. Did you hear the whole of that conversation concerning the King?
At what period did you come in?
Was it after you came into the room sometime, that I began to speak about the King?
There is nothing else you can swear to, only what you have mentioned?
At what period do you think, that I drank, The overthrow to the present systems of Government throughout Europe?
And are you sure these are the very words I uttered?
You say, you came into the coffee-room between eight and nine o'clock. Can you recollect what period between eight and nine?
Did I address myself to you, when you came into the room?
Did I appear to be addressing myself to the company?
Did I desire the company to join with me?
Did not you come up to me, and call me a rascal?
You did not call me a rascal before I spoke to you?
I think you put your fist in my face?
What induced you to come to my box at all?
You had no other provocation from me; how long do you think I gave this, after you came in the coffee-room, before I was conveyed out of it?
Then it must be past nine o'clock?
Did you hear me give any other\\ to\\ asts, than those you mentioned?
I think, when you was before the magistrate, you said, you heard me call his Majesty, a German Hog-butcher?
What did you conceive, that I was taken out of the coffee-room for?
Did I strike any body?
Did not I desire the constable to take a gentleman into custody, whom I swore positively had struck me?
Was he taken into custody?
You are sure, that I did not connect any other words with the\\ to\\ ast that you have sworn to?
What hour might it be, when I came into the coffee-room?
How long do you think I remained there?
Do you think I remained there till three quarters past eight?
Was I taken away before nine?
In what part of the coffee-room was it you sat in?
Was Mr. Newman sitting with me?
Was Mr. Buchanan?
Then perhaps, Mr. Buchanan sat nearer to me then you did?
At what time did I drink the French Republic?
How long do you think I had been there, before I drank the\\ to\\ ast you charge me with?
Do you recollect, how many glasses of punch I drank, while I was there?
How many glasses of punch do you think I had drank, before I had made use of these expressions?
You are sure of that?
Have not you sworn, that I drank, The French Republic?
And now cannot you fix on any period at all, that I did drink it in?
You recollect how many glasses of punch I drank, or how many had I drank before I used these words?
Answer that question, at what glass of punch was it, I drank the\\ to\\ ast in question?
Did you see any body attempt to interrupt me, in the course of my being in that coffee-room?
Did you see any body interrupt me then?
Did I address myself in any period of this discourse to you?
Did you see me address myself to any body else?
Did I give the\\ to\\ ast to Mr. Newman?
Did you see Mr. Newman put his fist in my face, or attempt to do it?
Was that Mr. Newman holding his stick up to me previous, or after my addressing him?
Did you hear Mr. Newman call me a rascal?
But before I addressed myself to him, did not you hear him call me a rascal?
And if he had done, you must have heard him?
Did you, in the conversation you have stated, hear me make use of any other words than these you have mentioned? Were these expressions not mixed with other words?
I wish to ask you a serious question, whether I did not apply the words, none but a German Hog-butcher could be guilty of such practices, instead of the King being a German Hog-butcher?
I suppose it is not possible, you could be mistaken in these words?
You receive no kind of emolument for appearing against me this day?
You have not applied for any part of the Credit Loan?
I believe your circumstances are not in the best situation?
I believe you are either in a bankrupt state, or making up your affairs?
Are you positive, that I drank an overthrow to the present systems of government throughout Europe?
Did not you in a former examination, say, that I spoke in a language, that you did not understand?
Did not the conversation at first, originate from a paragraph that I was reading in the newspaper?
You said, that I said, none but a German Hog-butcher could be guilty of such practices?
What did you hear me say about the Prince of Hesse Cassel?
Will you swear that I used these words, in partnership with the King of England?
Did you hear me make use of the term, King of England?
That is your meaning, I suppose?
Mr. Croft, I wish to ask you whether it is your own act and deed this prosecution, or is it by the advice of others?
On Saturday the 23d of November, you remember, you mentioned to me, that you wanted a Sunday's dinner, and I gave you one of my shirts to pawn, to buy a Sunday's dinner for me and you?
He has the duplicate now. Have you not in your possession of mine, two pair of stockings, a cup, a check shirt, and a tobacco box?
The man has false sworn himself about that Sunday's dinner. Had not you a rabbit for dinner on Sunday the 24th out of the money?
My lord, he had it out of the five shillings that the shirt was pawned for; here is a cravat, which I have about my neck, which he wanted to pawn as well as the shirt.
Mr. Croft, when you returned from pawning the shirt you brought a bad shilling, and tendered that bad shilling to me for to look at it; I told you I was no judge, particularly by candlelight. Look at me well in the face, you remember you went back to the pawnbroker with it?
I hardly know what to say. he cuts me out of every thing in the world; I could not imagine he could have stood before this court and said what he has said.
You remember the 24th of November you and I went and supped at your cousins in Aldersgate street; after supper we had a pot of porter, after that we had a pipe of tobacco; instead of putting the top of the pipe to be light you put the bottom; I said to you, let me light the pipe, which I did; on which, my lord, it grew late while we were there, and I begged of him to go home, about the hour of eleven, or nearly that time, we set off from Shaftsbury-place to go down to Exeter-street, in the Strand; I did all in my power to take care of him, every person that he came by could not pass without his giving them an insult; however, with my care, we got as far as Clare-market, there happened to be a liquor shop open there, and he insisted on having something to drink, he and I had a glass of peppermint; when I got him home and up stairs in his own room, which is a garret, no otherwise, he said, I will not go to bed except you fetch me a pint of porter; Mr. Croft, says I, you have had sufficient, I think you had better have no more; however a pint of porter he would have; says he, Bob, the bed is not made, will you make it? I made the bed and sat down by him some considerable time; I says to him during that time, Mr. Croft, I am going out very early in the morning, about six, I shall be much obliged to you if you will lend me your handkerchief, because my cravat is very thin; says he, take it, and don't ask any questions, and said, when will you return it; I said, to-morrow or next day.
The things I left in his possession was double the value of this handkerchief; Mr. Croft owned himself before the Alderman, says he, I will not say that I had not had a glass too much.
You have mentioned of me having a pint of porter at my breakfast, did you drink any gin on Monday morning?
Be so good as to inform the court, whether or no you had not a child before you was married.
You remember, on Sunday the 24th of November, your coming to drink tea at Mr. Croft's in Exeter-street. You remember going out, and getting change for a guinea, and coming back very much intoxicated?
After you returned home, the tea was made; do you remember the circumstance of your husband attempting to strike you across the table, and knocking down all the cups and saucers, and throwing a dish or two of tea over me. My Lord, the husband of this woman charged her with embezzling property to her own relations, before this time; some of the words he made use of were, you drunken whore keep from your thieving, swindling relations. You have taken a deal of property from me for them, and you also had a bastard before I married you.
I never saw that witness in my life.
I wish to ask whether your wife has ever made away with any of your property to her relations?
You charged her with it, and Mr. Henry Croft told you that you had not property to lose as he had?
Will you inform the court whether Mr. John Croft did not charge his wife with making away of his property to her relations?
My lord and gentlemen of the jury, before you give a decisive opinion upon this matter, I most humbly beg to place a few circumstances before you, relative to the evidence given by these two treacherous women, particularly Mrs. Croft, who has declared that she brought forth and delivered the property to me; is it consistent with reason that a woman would deliver such a property into the hands of a mere stranger, unless she was mad or drunk? if you consider her mad I trust her evidence will be of no avail; if drunk, I doubt not but you will be of the same opinion; with respect to the other evidence, no doubt but Mrs. Croft and she had revelled with the chearful glass together, that destrustion of mankind, and as connected with Mrs. Croft, it is not to be persumed but she will do any thing to reinstate Mrs. Croft into unity with her husband, which by her own imprudence, she has lost. I trust also that if you think her guilty of committing of one embezzlement, though her husband will not allow it now, I hope you will also think her guilty of another Unhappy for me I am pointed out to be the object of her treachery; there have been instances of women when they have come to a knowledge of their foibles, being known to any one individual, for fear of their divulging it, have not stuck at any thing to gain their point, to the overthrow of the individual, and what is there that a woman will not do that has deviated from the path of virtue? what is there that she is not capable of doing? I shall now conclude, putting my whole trust and confidence in you, making no doubt but you will weigh the case with humanity, and dispel the heavy cloud that now hangs over me.
If I was the man that took the hat what is the reason he did not detain me when I had the hat?
Nobody else see me take it besides you?
I came up the next morning and had a pint of beer at the next house; he knows I am an innocent man as well as he is himself.
I am as innocent of it as a child unborn, and that the man knows himself. If I had been guilty I would not have gone to the next house but one.
I was laid down on the key, by the side of this hogshead, and you found me laying down.
I had been at work on the keys about four hours for one man, and I was rolling the hogsheads along, and I picked these bits of sugar up, and then I went to work two hours more for another master, and when I had done I laid down by the side of the hogshead, and this same man came and took me.
When I was coming out of the yard I was carrying this deal to a job, and I had this piece of oak, and thought it was an old piece of oak, good for nothing.
It is customary amongst us carpenters to take chips, and fire wood to burn, or make the price of a pint; this piece I took out of the yard, it being a black piece I did not know but it was an old piece, so I said to the sawyer as I was coming out, I will make a pot of beer of this, says he I will have half of it; so I went to the gentleman's house and asked no more than a pot of beer; so I hope you will take it into consideration, I beg for your mercy, so I leave it to your lordship and the mercy of the court.
I was just come out of a cook's shop, and was crossing over the way.
Coming up Shoe-lane, I bought a piece of meat at Mr. Smith's, and had it in my hand, and came out and was in my way going up to Holborn and I was knocked down, and there was four or five more, and when I got up again, some gentleman had hold of me, I never saw the handkerchief at all.
This here gentleman he put a box on my head, he asked me to move the things, the woman that he is with, did, whilst I was at work at my business, and I said yes.
This woman gave me a shilling to carry the things and the man was there, and he said to me he would be glad if I would move his things under the arch way as they must both move together, after we had done moving the girl's things from the archway, then he came back and gave me a box, which is in his own place now, that is all that I had moved of his, I told him; then he told me that he would fetch an officer, I said fetch an officer, for I will not run away, take me up directly I will not quit the room, I know myself clear; nor I would not stir a peg from the room. He put his things under the arch way for fear of being seized for the rent.
When I first met you, in what manner did I meet you?
And then you came to me, and said, if I would go with you to a coffee-house, and fight you, and beat you, you would give me a crown bowl of punch?
Did not I turn to you, and say, never mind, he is only a taylor.
Did not you come to the watch-house that night, and speak very partial on my side that night?
Did not Mr. Daws give you money at Guildhall the next day?
How much has he given you since?
What has he promised you since?
Did not he give the watchman half a crown?
I think it is a very hard case, I have been in the Poultry compter for eight weeks, and I think it is a very hard case that I should be insulted in such a gross manner by him.
I know no more about it than you.
I was going along with three more gentlemen, and this young man jumped out of the chaise and took me into a house to see if I had any knife about me, and I had no knife at all, that could cut the chaise; the sessions before last, I was discharged from it by proclamation for the same fact as I am now indicted for.
I know nothing at all about this here woman.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I leave it all to my counsel, and you gentleman.
Ask her is she has any other lodgers in her house?
Be so good as to ask her if any of these lodgers can go out in the morning without being discovered by the family?
Whether she has not an inscription in her window with lodgings wrote on it for single men, and whether when I came to her house she asked where I live, and whether she went to enquire after my character?
Did you see me take any property out of the house?
What day was it I took the lodgings?
This woman owns that her house was a common lodging house, I think it is a very unlikely story that that man saw me in the room and yet he can give no description of me. As the lodgers can get out of themselves at what time of the morning they please, they may take the things themselves. I am really innocent.
On the 18th of January, I was accused by Mr. Downer and servants in the shop of being in the shop that afternoon which I was at work that morning from seven till six in the evening, in Little St. Martin's-lane, along with Mr. Shaw, the master that I worked with, and I was paid for my time.
Saturday.
No, he is not.
I wish to know whether you was not at Charing-Cross, a treating of some girls of the town?
You knowed me before did you?
Where do you know me?
Where did you know me before you knew me in Vine-street?
I have witnesses to call that will prove I was in bed at the time.
I went with a friend to a public house in Charing-Cross, and was very much in liquor, and I went to sleep, and when it was time to go home he awaked me, and put this hat on my head, and bid me come along, and I went with him, not knowing but it was my own hat. I should have employed counsel if I had had more time, and I should have had witnesses here in the evening.
I was going down to Pimlico after some grains for my master, as I was going down Park-lane I saw a man throw these things down, and he told me to take them up, and I jumped up and took him, and called that man to take them, and ran after him to take him, and that gentleman there ran after me, and took me.
I was going along, and there were three young men met me, and they told me to go and cut the line for them, and they would give me six-pence when I came back, accordingly I went as they asked me.
I was going down Charing-Cross to my sister's, I was walking along, and there was a man ran past me, and dropped this, and I picked it up, and had it in my hand, and that gentleman came and took me, and said, that property is mine, and I delivered it to the gentleman directly.
I had been at Kingston along with my master.
I had been to Kingston along with my master, and I left Kingston about two o'clock, and coming to Wandsworth we stopped to have a pint of beer, and my master went home with the cart and horse without me, and I was running through Battersea and Chelsea, to make the best of my way home, for fear I should be scolded for staying, and these men overtook me on the bridge, and they were talking one to another; I did not see him says one; at last they said to me you must go along with me; I said where? they said O, not far; says I what am I to go along with you for? they said come along with me, and I will tell you what it is for; says they you may as well go along with me; says I, I will, for I am not afraid of any thing; and they wanted to find a knife, and they could not, and they wanted me to go for a soldier; and I said I have got a good master, if I went for a soldier I should loose a a good place, and I did not like to leave it; and they said one to another are you sure it is him? one said I think it is him by his coat. Then the constable came, and the woman gave charge of
me, and he took me to the watch-house, and the next morning they came to me, and got some beer, and asked me to go for a soldier again, and I told them the same, and then they gave me some bread and cheese, after that they said you must go to the justice's, and I said if I have done any thing to go to a justice's I will go; I did not like to sent to my friends, because of losing my character.
I have since lived as a clerk and book-keeper to the King's Arms, and I lived there for ten months. and I had a deal of property entrusted to my care, and I gave a satisfactory account.
Ask him wheather I had any bread in the bag or not, and whether I had forsook the basket or not when he detained me?
Ask him whether he owned the bread when he first come to the basket?
I had been to by some bread, being Saturday, I went to buy what would serve me nearly the week, I paid a shilling and a halfpenny for five three-penny stale loaves, coming along this place I made rather a stumble, and stumbled against this basket, these two loaves were on the top of the basket, and they fell down, and this man came by, and wanted me to pick up the bread, and I picked up the bread, and laid it on the basket, and he said now I will stop you till the man comes, who owns the basket; and the officer that took me I took him to Smith's, of whom I bought the bread, and he owned that I bought the five loaves of him, before the officer; the man was here yesterday, but God knows whether he is now here or no.
Ask him whether I did not tell him every thing that was in the bundle, when he first stopped me?
On Monday night I was going to go down Wapping, to get a man to get me a ship, to go on board a West India man, I was to go to the Jolly Sailors, I did not see him there, I was coming up from there, I see these articles all lay one by one, the first thing was the hammock, then a bit of an old towel, then a bit of a shift, and a bit of an old waistcoat, with the flannel side outward; I picked them up, and was going to sell them for old rags, and when this man took hold of me, and took me into the public house, I told him every thing what it was. My father has been dead about a fortnight before I was taken up, and was going to get a ship to go to sea; had I known the consequence of picking up these things, I should never have touched them; any body else would have been as liable as me, I thought they were nothing but rags.
I never denied pledging the articles, but far from a felonious intent; I had a chest of tools coming out of the country, and I should have redeemed them as soon as my circumstances would admit, and while I remained in the place I did not know that there was any harm in so doing, I had no intent of felony, far from it, because if I had, I had an opportunity of taking away other things in the place; I pledged them for as little as I could help, because I meant to redeem them again
as soon as my circumstances would permit.
Ask him if that is the real will that he caused to be wrote.
This Elizabeth was my daughter, she was insured at the insurance office, and she died very suddenly after; after that my other daughter died, and I had the money, and I did not know that I was entitled to the first money, till I was told of it; so as I thought I was entitled to it, I would have it, so as I pursued after the money, and this witness of mine, he had a little bit of ill will; I am sure that it was done out of spite, and they think that I have a great deal of money, and they wish to knock me off, to have it.
I had not a son about ten years of age at that time; I have no son but what is twenty-two. The attorney can shew a letter that I received the twelve hundred pounds, and they have spite and malice against me, and in ten minutes time I could send over for a person that would prove that they said, they would spite me, one way or the other.
I never was in that shop all that evening.
I never was in that shop all that evening before her husband came to take me in, which I had the worsted and cotton stockings in my pocket, there are many stockings that have the same marks as them. I am come above two hundred miles from my country; I belong to the third guards .
I never had the man's money at all. he gave it to another person.
Had I your money?
I know nothing at all of the matter, he said he would take forty pounds for his part?
I have got nobody here, I was abroad with Lord Cornwallis in America seven years, and with Sir John Erskine.
I had left my master about half an hour, and I was coming out of the Windmill where they were laying this beer down, and I saw this rope in the middle of the road, and I picked it up and put it across my shoulder, and I was taking it to my mother's house, and my mother was not at home, and I was going down to my master's house, and I was taken.
I was in great distress at this time, I had been out of work thirteen weeks, and had been bad with a fever, and had a little child bad with the small pox, and my landlord when I got a little better, he was going to seize all my goods; I attended the market in the morning, to do what I could, I was almost starved at the time, we had but a two penny loaf between my wife and child for two days.
Please you, my lord, I was going down Beech-street, between five and six in the evening, going to Barbican, a man ran past me and delivered the waistcoat into my arms, and before I could recover myself to see what it was, this gentleman came and took me.
As I was coming down Bishopsgate-street, there was a gentleman came to me and asked if I would earn a shilling.
He said it was to carry this box to the second turning, the upper end of Houndsditch, and if he was not there to carry it to Winfield-street, and as it was slippery to put it in a coach to carry it to Houndsditch; when I came to Houndsditch, as he was not there I was going to carry it to Winfield-street; they took me into custody at that second turning; there was nobody with me to have any witness.
Did I make any resistance?
I was going down Aldersgate-street, I heard the cry of stop thief! and some hackney coachman held me by the collar, and laid, here is one of them, and they stopped me; I was in custody five minutes before the man came and took hold of me; I said I was very willing to go any where, where they pleased to take me. I never knew any thing about it.
I met a traveling man on the road, and he had these clothes, and he asked me what I would give him for them boots? and I told him I would give him eighteen-pence for them; and so he said no, that would not do, if I would give him a pint of beer I should have them; so with that I went down with him as far as the King's Head, and drank part of a pint of beer, and he delivered the boots to me, and said they were his; he said he had got these here other things, and he was going to sell them as soon as he could; and I went up to Brentford with him; he said they were his own, and he went into this shop, just by the seven mile stone, and he sold them, and I stood at the door, and I thought being a travelling man that they might be his own. So he said he had made pretty well of them, as he was out of work He took me over to the Black Boy, and treated me with part of a pint of beer.
That there gentleman told me that the horses were glandered, and told me to try to sell them some where.
I was in the public house, the corner of the gateway, and the hostler asked me if I would have a ride? why, yes, says I, I don't care if I do; he went up and asked me if I would ride them geldings? when he got them out into the street, he said they were glandered, and says he, go try and sell them, and I knew this gentleman in Oxford-street, that he bought horses, and I went to him and sold them; and I had to go to Piccadilly and I never returned again.
I left my work at six o'clock and went home to my lodgings, and had my supper; after that I went to my mother's for a clean pair of stockings, and stayed at my mother's within ten minutes of eleven o'clock; coming from there to my lodgings, there was a man came along with a bundle in his hand, as soon as he saw me he dropped the bundle and ran away; I said to him you have dropped your bundle; and he said nothing, but kept running; I stood by it for five minutes, and then I took it up and went home, and went to go to bed. I was undressing myself when the gentleman knocked at the door and I opened the door immediately.
I bottom chairs about the country, and I buy horse hair, and rags, and a few odds and ends, to get my bread by; and I met a man with this ass, and he asked me if I wanted one? and I told him I could not spare the money; he asked me twelve shillings for it, and I bought it for eight shillings and six-pence in the road. I have known this man, Mr. Bull, above these twenty years, and I went to him and told him I wanted to sell it, and he said he would go and sell it, and take the ass on his own hands, and nobody should know it was mine, and he had three shillings for felling of it.
I had been to Hammersmith that morning, as I was there, I got rather intoxicated with liquor, and coming home I met with a gentleman's servant, and he asked me if I would call in this street and enquire for one Mr. Edward's, a Butler, and I suppose I made a mistake of the place, and accordingly that gentleman came down and took me, and sent for a constable and searched me, and they found nothing at all about me; accordingly after that they took me to the watch-house, and they asked them whether they had lost any thing, and they said no; accordingly the constable of the watch-house said, they had better go home and see, but before that they said, they had lost some things at a time back, and that they would make me pay for the whole, and they went back and brought this bundle.
I did not know any thing about the coat when they accused me of
it. On Monday morning I was very much intoxicated with liquor, I had worn the hostler's coats before many times, they found the coat after I was in prison. I came out of Cambridgeshire to go to work.
On Sunday morning about nine o'clock, as I was coming from Wapping church, coming down Osborne-street, I saw this man go along with a pistol, and directly as I came to the top of the street, that gentleman, Mr. Robins came up to me, and took me back, and when I came back, near to this gentleman's house, Mr. Robins picked up this pistol, and said, I had no occasion to lay it down.
My Lord and gentlemen of the jury; on or about the 23d or 24th of January last, I was at Dunkirk, and on account of the troublesome times there, me and two more Englishmen got into an open boat, and got off from Dunkirk, to see if we could get on board a ship going to America, or any other part; we got clear of the Roads, and with our night glasses we saw a vessel, and she appeared to be a smuggling vessel, going to Dover, she came up to us, and they took us up, and brought us to Dover; I made application there for any ship going to the Indies, but I could not procure any thing at Dover, I came up the next day, I applied at Lloyd's coffee house, and I could not find any thing there. At this time there is no such thing as an Englishman's living in Dunkirk, unless he will take up arms against the English nation; knowing the circumstances I laid under, in having received the humane mercy, I had received of my Sovereign, I never could dare to take up arms against my nation and my Sovereign; but they said that the English had forced the French in their towns that they took to take up arms against the French nation, therefore the English that lived in their towns against Flanders, should also take up arms to do the same; and if I had taken up arms, I should have deemed myself a rebel. As soon as Valenciennes was taken, there were three Englishmen were taken in the midst of the French, and were executed directly; there is another person who obtained a pardon with me, and at this time he takes a part in Dunkirk against the English. I have no witness, because I did not like to make my cafe known to the tradesmen that came over with me. I have further to say, that particularly after the attempt at Dunkirk they have been more sharp on the English than they were before.
I had a key to go in and out of every room in the house, between the hours of six in the morning and eight at night.
Saturday morning between ten and eleven o'clock, I was coming towards Fullwood's-rents, and I saw a man that had worked in some buildings where I had been (he was a painter) says I, painter, are you out of work? says I, I am; then he said, I suppose you cannot give me any thing to drink; I said I could no, because my wife was ill be
sides; then says he, come along with me and we will have something to drink; I went with him up to Bedford-row, straight to this door, and he went up and brought me down this coat, and said to me, you go across King's-road with this, and we will have half a gallon of beer; I took the coat of him and looks about and did not see him coming, and immediately I returned with the coat, thinking then absolutely that he was playing a trick with me.
I was coming home Thursday night, between nine and ten o'clock, and I saw these two baskets and these cloths lay down in the broadway of St. Giles's, laying down in the middle of the road, I took them up and carried them into my room. Between five and six Mr. Bowen and his wife came up into my room, and asked for the rent; I said it was not due; he then snatched up these two cloths and said he would keep them, and his wife took and slapped me in the face twice; then Mr. Bowen ran and fetched a watchman from the watch-house, and came back with the cloths.
I worked at Chester and Brewer's key, and have always been trusted in the buildings; I had been in the buildings most part of the day, I was admitted a scraper or any thing, when there was nothing to do; this morning there was little to do, we weighed ten hogsheads for shipping; my master told me he had very little to do that day, so he told me, Thomas, you may as well go along with the cooper, and hold the hoops for him, very likely he will give you a bit of sugar when you have done; I went with the cooper, and was with him about four hours; he desired me to get another cask to pitch, and turn them; I did so. When we had done he asked me whether I had an handkerchief to carry a bit of sugar? so I told him no; he said, then take your hat off and he filled my hat; coming along this place there were several people there, I stopped and I took a bit of sugar from there and I eat it; I had my hat on my head with the sugar, and he took me up and sent me to the compter. The sugar was given me by the cooper for assisting to hold the hoops before I came to this place.
I said I had got something in my bag, and he says, I said nothing.
I worked with Messrs. Hanson, Pearson, Stiles, and Pearson; I worked with them sometime, and on Monday I went first to Chequer-yard, there I continued till half past two o'clock, first piling some wool, then I went down to pile some silks, then I went from there and went to my dinner, and a man came in and said, Green, you must go with me; I immediately went with him, it was then a quarter after three; I went with him to the Steel-yard, and worked with him twenty minutes or a quarter of an hour; I came up again, and Mr. Green ordered me to go with this man up to the warehouse, in Mud-lane, which I did; when we had done I asked this man to lock up while I went down into the necessary, says I, I shall be off nearly as soon as you. I went down to the necessary, and afterwards, in running along Thames-street, I picked up this sack, I saw it laving as I ran by, I ran by it and saw it, and went back and took it up; afterwards I met this man, Wainwright, and he said, Green, what have you got there? but before this' I went and threw it into Mr. Barker's, the public house were we are paid; I goes to Mr. Pearson's and there I gets my note for my day's work, two shillings, I goes and gets my two shillings, and has a pint of beer and drinks it; a man says to me there, what will you have for this sack? I said, you shall have it for a shilling, not noticing then there was any thing in it; after I got out and was a little up Bush-lane I thought I felt somewhat, and then I met Wainwright, he said, what have you got there? says I, I don't know, and with that he took me to the counting house. I have no witnesses: if Mr. Wainwright had got that man for me that he promised to do, he would be a witness; and Mr. Hanson knows, and Mr. Pearson and them, that I have never been in the indigo warehouse since I have been in the Steel-yard. Mr. Hanson weighed the chests, and the chests weighed the gross weight as when they came.
I have nothing to say, only that I know nothing at all about this business.
The humble defence of Edward Murray, sheweth, That he was committed to prison, for offering a piece of counterfeit money, resembling a six-pence. Not knowing it to be a counterfeit, deign, my Lord and Gentlemen, to permit an unhappy captive to let his defence be read, not having fluency of speech to speak. About the latter end of January, having occasion to buy a candle, I went into a shop for that purpose, and paying, as I thought, a good six-pence, the shop-keeper, not having change, she sent her servant to get it, who returned and brought a constable with her, who insisted on searching me, and found two bad six-pences on me, which I took as good, but they shewed they were bad, by wearing them in my pocket, and of course did you offer to pass them; I had likewise fourteen-pence in halfpence in my pocket, the property of another labourer, who worked with me, but having a hole in his pocket, he desired me to put it in mine; all of which money was taken from me by the constable. I humbly beg leave to implore you that I am innocent of offering the money, knowing it to be bad, as I had not long before taken it before for good for my labour; I have bad, for two days past, people to prove it, and having nothing but my labour to depend upon, humbly beg that this honourable Court will consider my case, and mitigate it according to your wisdom and judgment.
I was doing some work for a person in the farriering line, and it came to half a guinea, and I received the half guinea for it; I had had three guineas in my pocket, when I came home I got a guinea changed, so that I did not know whether it was the half guinea that I had taken of that gentleman in the morning, or the half guinea that I got in change. This day I called, as I came along up Field-lane, where this gentlewoman lives, and I asked her if she would sell me a shirt? she said she would, I agreed for a shirt, and was to give her three shillings and six-pence for it, and I said I have not any silver at all without you give me change for half a guinea, I laid it down, and she weighed it and said it was light, she was afraid it was a bad one; I said I cannot tell where I took it, except I took it of my master; she said, I will send it over the way to a gentleman. If I had known it had been a bad one I had time enough to go away; as soon as the gentleman came I resigned myself up to be examined in every respect. As to that stuff, if it was touched with a hammer it would break all to pieces, it is what I had used in my business.
What time of the night was I taken?
Why did not you find a bill against me last session at Hicks's Hall? I was turned out by proclamation.
The 16th of October.
I have nothing to say.
In the morning that this happened, I was going as far a Hammersmith, about a house that I was going to take in St. George's-fields, Blackfriars-road; in the Strand as I was going there, I had occasion to cross, and I saw something lay in the middle of the road; I immediately ran towards it, and found it was the box in question; I picked it up, there were four or five people present, one or two will come forward; after I picked it up I returned towards the Strand, to a part where I saw some light, to read the direction, and before I got to the light I was taken in custody by these two men; they asked how I came by that box? and I told them I had picked it up, and they insisted on taking it from me; I said it was not theirs, they did not seem to claim any right that it was theirs, but they insisted on my coming to the coach, and when we came to St. James's-street, there they both stopped with me, and said, if I would give them two guineas, they would let me go about my business; but before that, going along, Hicks said, he would swear it come out of the rumble tumble; when we came to St. James's-square they said if I would give them two guineas a piece I might go, and I offered them a guinea a piece, and they would not without the two guineas, and I said I would not give two guineas; and they took me directly up to the White Horse cellar, and there was the coach that it came from.
I was up stairs on the right hand side, and he charged me with picking his pocket on the left hand side.
That Mr. Mackay, my prosecutor, was on the left hand side, and I was on the right hand side of the stair case, going up, and he said, I had picked his pocket; I said, I did not know any thing about it. He might have had his pocket picked, I make no doubt, but I know nothing about it, I declare to God.
It is a cruel and unjust prosecution. In the chests there are no mats put in. I had been labouring in that room but it was two hours before that they found the tea on me; it was in an old coat that I work with in the warehouse, not the coat that I come out with, and I had an opportunity of putting it from me, two or three hours, if I had known it. I knew nothing about it; I believe there is a guinea reward in this case, and some person wanting to supersede me in this warehouse.
Ask serjeant Burrows to my character.
I was going up to my sister's, through Whitecross-street, to let them know my wife was very bad in bed; with that there I was coming along Whitecross-street, and there came a man just as I got about the middle of the way, running along, and had liked to have pushed me into the kennel, with that I steps out into the highway, and walks on (my sister lives in Grub-street, up a turning) and I went to Grub-street, and this man came and followed me into a shop, where I was cheapening a pair of shoes; he came in with a woman and this lad, and she said, it was a lustier man than I; and the constable says, please you, will you go with me to the shop? says I, where is it; says he, in Whitecross-street; says I, I will with all my heart. The young body would have let me gone about my business, though I was willing to go back to the shop; I have gentlemen to prove my character, that I never was before a justice in my life, nor ever wronged any body of a farthing. The man came running against me and pushed me down almost, and I went out into the highway.
That man that stands there told the Lord Mayor that he packed the parcel himself, and tied the bag, and every thing.
Christmas Eve I was going to see a friend over in the Borough, I was asked to come over and sup with them; I was coming through Bow church-yard, there was another strange young man coming along; I see something laying against the church wall, and he and I goes and looks at it, it was a parcel just by the pump; so says I, here is a parcel here, and he took it up on his back, and carried it a considerable way past Garlick-hill, when I took and carried it till that gentleman stopped me with it. I knew nothing of it till I see it lay up against the church wall in Bow church-yard; that is all I know of it.
I have no occasion to say much, I took the watch in my drunkenness, and I put it in my pocket the same as if it belonged to me; I kept the chain out and went into the public house. It is the first thing I have done since I was born, I always got my living without thievery or drunkenness. I said to the landlord, here take care of this watch, and give it the mistress.
My wife and I were going along Old-street, going into Shoreditch, the night was duskish, the cask was on the belly of it, and there was not room for to go past, and I moved it for my wife to go past, and my child, with that the gentleman hearing the cask making a noise came out, and asked me where I was going to take that cask to? I said, I was going to take it no where, but if it was his, why did not he take it out of the path way? He said he insisted that I was going to steal it, and sent for this gentleman, the constable, and took me to Hog-lane, to the justice's, and swore that I was going to steal it, I told him it was too big for any man to steal, I only moved it out of the way for to make a free passage to pass it.
I have got a wife and three children, and work hard for them every day, and go out every morning to get a shilling if I can; I went out that day to the Bank-side and earned a shilling, and out of the shilling I spent sixpence, and I went home and gave my wife the sixpence; I asked her if she had got any thing for supper, she said she had not, I said I would go out and get her something; going down to Butcher-row, I stood to make water just at the Magpie stand, and I see a man who said, coalheaver, if you will carry this load for me I will give you sixpence; says I, I will. Says he, take and carry it up for me to Boswell-court, and I took it on my back, and he went on and I followed him up Newcastle-court, when I got about two yards up the court from the stone steps this man followed me and said, what have you got here? I said, what is that to you? he said, why it is my property; says I, then God bless my heart, I will carry it back again, and I did carry it back to the Magpie. I have been in prison ever since, and what my family have done for victuals and drink I don't know; I am a man well known.
At the justice's you said there were three handkercheifs, and afterwards you said they were not hung out, and afterwards the magistrate scratched it out, he cannot deny it.
One day as I was coming up stairs, I took the pot out of the window to take some warer up in it, and when I was asked at first I forgot it, and said I had none, and I was so terrisied seeing it along with my rags while they were searching that I put it in my pocket in order to put it out of the door, and they detected me.
I found the duplicates in the prosecutor's house, coming down stairs, one morning; I lodged there for about a fortnight.
I have nothing more to say than that I was brought up in the navy, and till now, have ever borne an irreproachable character. According to the prosecutor's own account I must be in liquor, for I had been drinking gin and water in the morning and afternoon; I did take the gun, but with no intent to sell it or make away with it; I was inebriated when I did it, and did it in consequence of a wager; Williams laid me a wager that I dare not take the gun out and go a shooting, and I took the gun out.
I can refer myself for my character to the gentlemen of the office who are here, Mr. Ferguson and Mr. Sparkes.
On the 12th of December, I left my work a little after four o'clock, and I was going down to East Smithfield to see a brother-in-law that was at sea, in my way at the corner of Sun-yard, I was laid hold of by a press gang, and running away I ran over this lad, and there was a cry of stop thief, and I stopped just as I came to the boy, and they gave me in charge, and the constable and boy took me back to the place where he fell, and the bags were found; from thence I was taken to the public house back parlour, and from thence to the magistrate's, the magistrate sent the officer to search my habitation, and they found nothing at all amiss there. I have witnesses to my character.
Ask her why her husband is not here?
Did your husband appear before the court of justice?
I am a gentleman emigrant and Frenchman, I have not the faculty of procuring any body to defend my cause, I request your lordship to hear me and take my case into consideration, and the jury also, to weigh with equity the justice of my case; I would have asked for six jurymen of my own nation, but I refer to the equity and justice of these gentlemen. It was customary for me to go to the house of Charles Le Comte , he keeps a shop and sells things that I want; on the 3d of December, I went there to purchase a hair ribbon, and I asked the liberty of writing a letter in the parlour, it was granted by her; the parlour is at the further end of the shop, I found there a woman that appeared to be a servant that carried a child, and the daughter of Le Comte about eight years of age; I wrote my letter and retired; it is true that the servant quitted the room almost instantly that the wife of Le Comte was called out of the room for a moment, but the child and the daughter remained there; on the same day I went to Richmond, to seek for a French woman which I did not find; the next day I returned and the first thing I did was to go to Charles Le Comte 's, his wife received me rather ill, called her husband and quitted the room; the husband told me that money was missing, that he had ten or twelve guineas and a bank note of ten pounds, that he found two guineas less. This declaration she made also, before the justice of peace; and that he suspected me to be the person who took it, because I had been and wrote in the parlour, but he could not convince me, that he shewed me his resentment and indignation and went to carry me before a justice of peace, then he told me that perhaps he might be mistaken; that was not sufficient for me, I returned to my lodgings were I had been four days, it was given out that I was a thief, and they would not receive me there; I returned again to Le Comte, his wife had been to the justice of peace; I saw myself attacked by a number of people, stop theif is cryed out, surprized, a stranget in this country, not knowing the usage or customs, I went to run away, I was stopped, I was beaten, they took from me what I had about me; a guinea and half and two shillings, which I had in my pocket, and I was carried before a justice of peace; the wife of Le Comte was there already; she declared that I had taken three guineas out of a box that was in the drawer, wherein there were fourteen, and a ten pound note, and the husband who did not think proper to have me arrested, declared he was not positive as to the sum he had in that drawer, that he only missed two guineas; see there is a manifest contradiction, and the wife of Le Comte, declared to an emigrant of my acquaintance before I was arrested, that she had missed nine.
He is a priest. Nevertheless, the wife of Le Comte told the justice that she suspected me to be the person that took the three guineas, because, I had remained alone in the parlour, she declared that the drawer was not locked, but did not say that there is a door comes into the parlour which I informed myself of, that door goes into an alley going into a street; on this suspicion the justice of peace caused me to be imprisoned and caused the money to be returned that had been taken from me, and now, my lord and gentlemen, I will inform your lordship and jury from whence I got this money; it is necessary and proper for you to know that I have been treated very unworthily; Mr. Channelly, an em grant, who raises a body of emigrants in the British pay, he is colonel of that body of troops; I not having the means of subsisting, not being able to partake of the bouney of government, not being of the age of fifty years; I engaged in Mr. Channelly's corps, and he gave me three guineas, and the guinea and half found in my pocket was a part of it; Mr. Maleet, an emigrant from France, deputy of the French slates general in the year 1789, had addressed me to him; the justice of peace sent to Mr. Maluet and he declared in writing that he knew me, from having been captain of dragoons in France, and an aid-de-camp during the serge of Lyons, and if it was possible to find three guineas on me it must come that was; that writing ought to be before the eyes of your lordship and you gentlemen, and Mr. Channelly also, will if needful, declare, that on the 1st of December, last past, that is to say two days before I was imprisoned, he gave me three guineas as a bounty, as being engaged to him. I now intend, my lord and gentleman of the jury, to establish my justification. First, when I came into the parlour there was a maid servant in the room, she quitted the room immediately; it is untrue that I remained alone in the parlour, the daughter of Le Comte, eight years of age remained with me during the time that the wife of Le Comte quitted the room for a moment. Secondly, my lord and gentlemen, could I guess that there was in the drawer which I knew nothing of and which did not lock money, that is not probable, and the justice of peace himself was surprized that fourteen guineas and a bank note of ten pounds. should not be under lock and key. I hurdly, if it had been proverty that had prompted me to rob, instead of three guineas, I would have equally taken the whole, the fourteen guineas and the bank note of ten pounds, and I could equally with the same facility have carried away two gold watches also, that were hanging in the room, belonging to Le Comte. Fourthly, If I had robbed the prosecutor I should not have returned the next day, that is not probable, besides there is a door in the parlour which belongs to that room which leads to an alley, and from thence to the street; is it not possible that somebody might have come in into the parlour before me? and can this woman in conscence swear that no person came in before me.
My lord and gentlemen, a stranger as I am in this country an unhappy emigrant, I have not the faculty or means of getting a counsel, I do not speak the English language, be pleased to hear this my petition or memorial with your usual justice; I defended the cause of my king at Lyons, I have a thousand times escaped death in many battles, am I to fall here under the worst of calumny, an unhappy Frenchman, an unhappy father; am I reserved never to see my wife and children? now my lord, I persuade myself when I think I have for judges the wisest of men, who will weigh in your justice the justice of my cause, you will confound my enemies, and in rendering me my honour you will render me my life.
I was coming along Fish-street hill, and a man hit me on the side of the head and said I was taking the things out of the cart.
As I was coming up on Saturday night in Fleet-market, I heard the alarm of stop thief! and the gentleman stopped me, and said, I was the thief, and when he stopped me they took me to the watch house, and soon after I was in the watch-house, the brought this bundle, and the gentleman said he lost a bundle of his own at the Bird Cage, at Wood-street, and he said he did not care what he did with me, out of revenge for his own bundle he lost; he said then he could not swear to the bundle, and now he has sworn to the bundle.
I was coming along Shoe-lane between five and six o'clock, past that gentleman's shop, and he came and seized me by the collar, three doors below his shop, immediately I asked him what he wanted with me? he said I had stole a quarter of pork out of his shop; and the pork was ten yards from me, and more than that, he told the coalmerchant's servant to say that he see me drop the pork.
I have got no witness, I did not know of my trial coming on so soon.
stay maker by trade.
Ask him if he did not say if he had the things back again he would not hurt me.
I have nothing to say at all, the prosecutor settled so far with my father that he took half a guinea and made it up.
I am a hatter by trade, I should not have taken them things, only I had a poor sick father and mother at home and they were starving for want; my prosecutor knows my father.
What made I do it, was because to-morrow it will be a week since they stripped me and turned me out of doors.
That man catched hold of me by my throat as I lay asleep. The door I did not break, it was on a latch, and they robbed me of clothes that I gave them five pounds for.
I was sitting in the room, and this man came rushing in, and he says, my boy, will you buy a sack of coals for half a crown and a pot of beer? I looked up at him, and told him no, I did not want any; he said that he brought them for a woman in Shoreditch, and she was not at home, and that if I would take them it would save him the trouble of carrying them back again; he said they were very good coals; he repeated that with a loud voice, two or three times in the passage, and the door standing open; he then went out into the street, and repeated with a loud voice, the same words again; I told him I was afraid I should get myself in a hobble by buying of them; he said, there was no fear of that, they were waste boys perquisites; as for George-street it was not mentioned to me, and as for saying take the half crown, I did not; I cannot deny that I had the silver and halfpence in my hand, but I had not separated them; had I known what they had been at the time, I should not have had any thing to do with them.
I leave it to my counsel, no farther than my cart stood in Grace-church-street instead of Bishopsgate-street.
I wish to know whether he missed all the four articles at once, or only three?
If I had been a person to have done such a thing as this, why did not I go to his parlour door? I did not offer to go to his parlour door. I have no witnesses.
I never meddled with the saw at all; how could he swear to me when several persons were in my dress in particular?
I was coming from Westminster, where I lodged, and coming up Scotland-yard, in Northumberland-street, there is a court, I was coming up the court I heard the halloo out of stop thief! with that I ran up Craven-street, I happened to get the first person on the top of the street, and there were three gentlemen coming towards me and they stopped me, in about two minutes up came that gentleman that told the three gentlemen to stop me, and said, he believed I was the person, and he took me into Mrs. Tomlinson's shop.
I am not given to do any such thing.
I was coming along at six o'clock at night and I kicked over this piece of beef, I did not know what it was at first, it was so dark, and the first light I came to I took it in and I found it was a piece of beef, after I had been in about five minutes this man came in and said it was his beef.
How long is it since you applied to the magistrate for a warrant to apprehend me? was it before you failed you last voyage, or since your return?
Did not you first see me in the lock-up-room, and asked me if I knew you, what was my answer?
I told you no, I believe?
Did not you shew me a cross, and asked me if I knew that?
Is that the same cross?
What was the reason you told the magistrate that you could not shew it him, it being on board a ship, at Blackwall, when you had shewn it to me the same morning in the lock-up-room?
Was that the reason you did not produce it before the magistrate?
You recollect Mr. Lucas and you, and Mr. Fox going out in order to have me committed for a further examination. What was the reason I was not fully committed then?
Did not you authorise Mr. Lucas, Fox, and Mayne to compromise this matter, provided you could get the money back again that you had lost; and if you had it back again, did not you agree that you would relinquish this prosecution?
How came you to be acquainted with my name, in order to have it set down in the warrant to apprehend me?
Should you have known me if you had met me in the street?
Did not Mr. Lucas tell you what sort of a person you was coming to swear to?
Did not he tell you what sort of a dress I was in?
This money was obtained on the 27th of November; I have been several times at Mayne's house; particularly I was there on the 1st of January, and he never offered to take me into custody. Do you know the day I was apprehended?
I have two or three witnesses that will prove that I have been at Mr. Mayne's house about this business, Mr. Mayne charged me with it once, but he never offered to take me into custody; I told him that I knew nothing about it.
Do you recollect my being charged with this business? do you recollect my going to Mayne's house?
I know nothing at all about the buttons; when I came to the bottom of the court another gentleman stopped me, and not that man, and this man came up immediately after and laid hold of me, and they said the buttons were in the mud; I said I knew nothing at all about them, they said, which way did I come? somebody said, across the church yard; I made answer and said, you must look into the church yard; they went back into the church yard and found them there.
When you see me take the property, why did not you stop me?
I am a working lad, I sell fruit about the streets, and I know nothing what they have alledged against me.
I leave it to my counsel.
I was going down White Hart-yard, I heard the cry of stop thief, this man came up to me at the corner of White Hart-yard, and struck at me, and the prosecutor came up and said, that knife case is mine, I will swear to it.
My Lord, and gentlemen of the jury, I am now brought on my trial a second time for the same offence; I am advised that it is not the same so far in law, as to entitle me to plead my former acquital; the charge before was for uttering a forged draft for five pounds, with intention to defraud Messrs, Ransom and Co. the charge to day, is for uttering a draught for ten pounds.
The jury that then tried me, acquitted me, and I will beg leave to state shortly, as before, the manner in which I became possessed of these bills. As I was lately an officer in his majesty's navy, I was obliged to be often at Portsmouth, I became there acquainted with one Macdonald at the Blue Posts, where I lodged, he did not lodge there but in some private apartments in the town. Almost as soon as our acquaintance commenced he told me he was going to America; among other intercourses, we went together to play at billiards, where at other places as well as at Portsmouth, we played for small sums; I won a very large sum of him at Portsmouth, and he applied to me for fifty pounds, which he lost; and then applied to me for another fifty pounds, and as I had won the greatest part of his money that he had lost since the time of our acquaintance, I lent to him; and I lent him a third fifty pounds. As he was going out of the country I thought it would be proper to have some security, and he said he would give me some bills. In about a week or a fortnight after I went to Northampton, soon after my arrival there he made a remittance to me of three checks, one of five pounds, one of ten pounds, and one of fifteen pounds, all of them drawn by Mr. Thomas Exton on Messrs. Hammersley; I soon after returned to town, and on Sunday the 31st of August, I paid one five pound check to Mr. Lewis's servant, and the other two I sent by a servant to Messrs. Ransom's, the bankers, and all of them were actually paid at the banker's, and no questions have ever arisen on them to my knowledge; from this treatment of Macdonald, I had reason to believe I was treating with a person of honour; on my return to town I met with him at the New Exchange coffee house, when I mentioned to him my desire of having the remainder of the debt being paid, and he gave me three other checks, purporting to be drawn as before, which I immediately sent for payment by a servant, but on their being presented Mr. Moreland stopped them, and desired to see me, and I went immediately to Mr. Moreland, he then informed me that my checks were forged; I then said, I would endeavour to find Macdonald; I informed Mr. Moreland by whom they were paid to me. I did not see Macdonald that night, but I see him some time the next morning at the coffee house, when I stated the circumstance to him, and he expressed a considerable passion, and with apparent resentment set off to go to Mr. Moreland's, and returned in great haste in about half an hour, telling me he had explained the matter to Mr. Moreland's satisfaction, I then thought that the alarm that Mr. Moreland had made on my mind was an unjust suspicion, and Mr. Macdonald then took from his pocket a letter, which he informed me he had received from Mr. Exton, by that day's post, containing two checks signed by Mr. Exton; and they were signed different than those he gave me. I looked at the two last checks, and from the circumstance of the two first checks being paid, I relied on Macdonald's veracity; of these two last checks. one was for twenty-one pounds, payable to Mr. Ryland, or bearer, and which has never been negociated; the other was for ten pounds, payable to Mr. Brooke, or bearer, and which I paid to Mr. Lewis, Saturday, the 13th of September, and I received of him in exchange, three pounds sixteen shillings, and which I understand was presented by him, or his servant, to Messrs. Ransom's, who stopped payment, and I was apprehended on the usual charge of uttering it, knowing it to be forged. I shall here beg leave to call to your consideration, the evidence on the trial for the first indictment, one of the witnesses proved that I paid it to him for money due to Mr. Lewis, for goods, which he then objected to taking, on a supposition that it was not a good one, on which I told him if it was not good I had two others of the same, and to take it home, and if his master did not like it I would take it back, on that I called on him on the Tuesday or Wednesday following for the change, which he gave me, the bill having been paid. It was also proved by Mr. Francis Heslop, that some considerable time after paying the five pounds, on being sent for to Mr. Ransom, I went there without any hesitation; I related the facts as I have to you to day, and so satisfied was Mr. Moreland of my innocence, that he did not detain me, and on the last trial so satisfied were the jury of these facts, that they acquitted me of the crime laid to my charge.
I have communicated to you all the circumstances of my first meeting with Macdonald to the present time, and I must here request your particular attention to the times when the foregoing transactions took place. The first checks were paid the latter end of August 1794. On Sunday, the 31st of August, I paid one to a servant of Mr. Lewis's, who objected to take it; my answer was to him, that if it was not good I had two others of the same; in regard to the other three checks which I sent by a servant to Mr. Moreland, the banker's, and who desired to see me, I went to Mr. Moreland's without restraint; Was this the act of a guilty mind? had I a guilty conscience, should not I rather have sled? Mr. Moreland was so well convinced of my innocence that he suffered me to go at large; from Messrs. Ransom and Co. I never sled, but immediately sought after Macdonald, and never changed my lodgings to the time of my apprehension; taking all these circumstances together, is it at all surprising, that any suspicion that I had entertained against Mr. Macdonald should vanish? that I did not question Mr. Macdonald, is certain; that I am not guilty myself, is unquestionable; for if I had known they had been forged, I would not have paid two checks to Mr. Lewis, and after I had done so I would not have gone home to my lodgings, solely to give the prosecutor an opportunity of apprehending me; would any one of you have acted so? surely not. The great difficulty by witnesses to prove the negative, is a hard matter; add to this, I am not twenty years of age, and Mr. Macdonald is a great deal older, and no wonder that he easily prevailed on my credulity.
Gentlemen, under all these circumstances, I trust you will not reverse the verdict of the former jury; that you will not inser that to which the facts do not lead you, and consign me to an ignominious punishment, that is to an awful death; it is a maxim of justice, that it is better that many guilty persons should escape the punishment their crimes deserve, than one innocent person should perish.
Please you, my lord, I was called to the Saracen's Head, Snow-hill, to take up, about eight o'clock in the evening; the porter brought a pair of saddle bags and a bundle, and put them into the coach himself; the gentleman ordered me to drive him to the pump, Piccadilly; when I got there he got out, he offered me half a crown, told me to give him a shilling; I had none, he put his hand in his pocket and went to the light in a window; immediately as his back was turned his bags were gone; I called to him immediately, I hallooed out stop thief! then he ordered me to drive him to the corner of Shire-lane; then I carried him to the office, and the justice took my number, my mistress's name, and my name. I am innocent; nor did I carry any body on the box.
I leave it to my counsel.
The pot was put in my pocket. They asked me if I would go for a soldier? I told them I was not fit for it.
I was in this public house and had a pint of beer; there were some men in the room, they asked me if I had any money in my pocket? I said I had as much as I wanted. I staid there some time on account of the weather; they asked me if I would go for a soldier? I said, no I was lame. They must have put the pot in my pocket, I know nothing about the pot.
When he first laid hold of me, he said his master was drinking wine up stairs.
One John Wilkins brought me the tools, and asked me to pawn them for him; he was in distress he said.
As I was coming from Clare-market, from my master's, coming down Long-lane, I was taken very ill, I went up a gateway to reach, being very sick, and two men came up the the gateway and charged me with this felony, that I know nothing about; I was up the gateway the time the young man came up and took hold of me.
I could not go out, I was a wounded man.
I have been serving his majesty ever since I was seven years old, and for the honour of God send me back again.
I leave it to the mercy of the court.
I have lived twenty years in Whitechapel parish, and thirteen years a housekeeper, and through fire, and not being insured, and distress, and one thing another has reduced me; I have sent to my friends in Whitechapel, if they would be so kind to come here and give me a character for the time that they knew me. I hope my Almighty maker will forgive me all my offences in my life time, and I hope for mercy at the hands of this honourable court; it is the first offence that I have been ever guilty of.
I had been over to my aunt's, at Lambeth, and at half after eight o'clock, coming down Leadenhall-street, coming down the pavement, I kicked this handkerchief before me, and I picked it up, and carried it open in my hand, and this gentleman came up, and said, it was his handkerchief that I had picked his pocket of, and then he said he did not believe it, and that gentleman, the constable, came up, and said, I will take care of you, and get a new coat out of you.
Did you ever see me on the wharf?
Have you any witness that you see me on the wharf?
I was going to throw in some coals into a west country barge that lay on the river, and I found this laying in the dock while I was going.
Did you ever see me in your warehouse?
I worked at the water side, I have done so these twenty years, and I get a job where I can; here is a gentleman here, Mr. Miller, has known me these twenty-nine years about the water side; as I was coming down the street I was called to work by a man, a soldier, says he, will you earn sixpence? yes, says I; and he gives me a bag of cotton, or something, I suppose it may be cotton; and he says, if you will carry this to the White Horse, at the bottom of Wood-street, and leave it with the book-keeper, I will give you sixpence, and he gave me the sixpence first, and that gentleman stopped me with it, and said it was his, and he charged me with a constable.
Did you suspect any body?
You have known me two years, have you any thing to say against me before?
I went to Rag-fair to buy some things at this time, and a man asked me to buy this gown, and I looked at it, and he said, put it into your bag, and we will deal for it afterwards, and I put it into my bag.
man that goes about the fair; and I asked Mr. Solomon to take me about the fair, and I would shew him the man.
Yes, he did, I paid him for it, seven shillings and sixpence.
I have nothing to say.
I had one from the waggon, and I picked it up.
It was the King's birth day, I was quartered at St. James's; at night I went and had some sapper; afterwards as I was coming home through the Park I saw two gentleman, that gentleman and another, walking arm and arm together, and as I came nigher to them I heard some conversation, and I heard one gentleman ask the other gentleman to have concern with him; one gentleman put his umberella down against the seat, and that gentleman put down his breeches, and they fell to work with each other, and I was about six yards from them; I jumped up to them, and they ran off, and I ran after them, thinking to charge the centry with him, and with their running away with their breeches down, they dropped the watch, and I picked it up; that is the truth, and nothing but the truth.
In the Bird Cagewalk, on the 4th of June, at half past eleven at night; right opposite the recruit house, by the corner of Queen's-square.
I took up the watch and chain both together; I don't know that they belong to these gentlemen, I thought there was no person had a greater right to them than myself.
It rained very hard.
No, I told him that I bought it of a jew. Likewise this gentleman came down to me to Tothillfields, and told me to make the best story I could, and he would never appear against me. I desired to speak to the gentleman by himself; and he said, he would not for a hundred guineas have it known.
The serjeant, Evans, and the constable (I don't know his name) of Queen-square office. I have no witness, the serjeant and the company that I belonged to, went abroad yesterday.
I am not guilty. I was there on Monday morning, about ten o'clock, and I went away about eight o'clock in the afternoon. On Tuesday I went to the Hospital; and when I left the room, on Monday, there were forty or fifty people in the room.
I pawned my watch, great coat and shirt, and every thing else, to keep me while I was in the Hospital.
I am convinced from the evidence that that young man has sworn against me, that he would say any thing in the world.
I leave it to your superior judgment, and the gentlemen of the jury.
I would wish to ask every one of the servants which of them recollects shutting the window; this man has swore that the window was shut; it is false, the window was open.
I went to see my wife that lived at Brompton, and I stopped at the White Hart public house. When I returned to town, in the road I see two men, and I was in a hurry running along, I saw these geese, I thought I see them fall from their backs, and I picked them up, thinking that morning to enquire out an owner for them.
The keys were my own property that I brought out of the country with me.
The material goods I am accused of I brought up out of the country, being in business for myself, and the keys I brought from Woolverhampton, which I believe there are not such keys made in this part of the country, none of the kind.
I have got nothing at all to say.
I was coming that way, and I see three people come out of the garden, and I asked them if I could cross over that way to Tothill fields? they told me I might; and as I was coming along this man called out, who are you? Stop, or I will blow your brains out. He startled me, and followed me, and laid hold of me. As to the mats I know nothing about them. I came up from the country about two months ago.
I am a gingerbread baker by trade, through misfortunes in trade I have been obliged to leave my native place; coming along through Croydon I met a man who asked me what business I was? I told him; he said he was going to set up in that business, and if I would stop a bit he would give me employ, and he asked me if I was coming to London? I said, I was; he said, he should be at a public house in Thames-street the next day, and if he and I could agree he would put something into my pocket, being greatly distressed I had nothing to subsist upon for two days, but two rolls, which were given me by two bakers, and that induced me to do that rash action; I knew if I had engaged with that man, I should want scales and weights.
Positively, my lord, it is a very false accusation; I went to the lock-up-house to Bowley, he told me that he was falsely arrested; I offered the bail of Mr. Benjamin, Mr. Hill refused the bail; I then took the woman to Mr. Noy, and then she gave Mr. Noy one guinea, and Mr. Noy went and searched. When she came to me again, I then said, good woman, I will trouble my head no more with you, I must be paid for my labour; she said, if I would do justice to her she would give a guinea. That other woman never was there, as sure as there is a supreme judge. I believe the prosecutrix gave me the second guinea in East Smithfield. Afterwards they came to me, on the 9th of June; I went up to them when they came and asked them if they knew I was a thief? They said, I was not the person; I was retained in Mr. Horsey's custody three quarters of an hour; then they came back, and the woman said they would make it up for two guineas; and the man says, you d-mned b-ch, I will have the expences of the indictment. She made no reply, but he tells her, positively swear, right or wrong, he robbed you; for which afterwards they made me out a bill of five pounds; I told them I would not go nigh them; then they wanted six pounds one shilling and sixpence; I then said, if I did any thing illegal I would go through the law. On that motive I come before this honourable Court and jury, to surrender myself up under no bail, in order to thew you my innocence. I have been brought up in the Portugueeze Hebrew College for fourteen years; I never wronged man, woman, nor child. I undoubtedly, at this present time, do educare poor children who cannot afford to pay me, because the times are hard; how much less would I commit that horrid crime; and therefore I hope you will hear my witnesses.
I am brought in guilty; as true as there is a supreme being reigning over the universe at this present time, I am as innocent of the accusation as a child not come forth from the womb of his mother, and if you was to take and hang me up momentarily, I should die with a free conscience.
I was working at the house four days; I was ordered away on Wednesday night, to do a job in Fetter-lane, from there I was ordered to a stationer's facing the plaintiff's house, which I worked the remainder part of the day. Friday morning I got up at three o'clock and took my tools and pail of water, and a scaffolding to do a passage that joins to the stationer's house; I went through Mr. Potter's house to a large back building that leads into Lombard-street; I went down into Mr. Potter's cellar for some stuff; at seven o'clock I had used my stuff, I went to Mr. Potter's house again to get some more, and I took a bit of board up for to put some stuff on, and I saw these old bars laying, in a cellar forty yards from the dwelling house. Mr. Potter said they were his property; I begged his pardon, and told him to have them, that I did not know they belonged to him.
Mr. Rutter has sworn as false as God is in Heaven; at the time the soap was produced he was not in the parlour. The soap was given me because I had a family, a wife and four children, and it was given me because the distress that I was in to help in washing.
Here is the man here that stopped me as I was walking quietly along, whom the prosecutor would not wish to come forward.
The day before I laid out about six and thirty, or forty shilling; I bought six pair of back legs the day before.
That gentlewoman delivered the coat to me.
That gentlewoman delivered the coat to me to carry over Blackfriars Bridge, and I carried it to the second horse ride ever the bridge, and I delivered it to a gentlewoman that I never see before, nor I never see since; I took it to be a gentlewoman that was maid to the house, or bar-maid, or something; I came back again to Mrs. Munt's, and she paid me a groat for carrying it; about eleven o'clock at night I was going to bed, and the son came and told me that the coat was not delivered; I told him I would go and shew him the place, I went with him at that time of the night, and shewed him the place, and the people were gone to bed, and they took me to the watch-house that night. As to that man (Palmer) I never see him with my eyes to my knowledge, nor this Mr. Frost; I did not sell him no coat, no never; when I was taken to Guildhall the first day, I was remanded back again, thinking I should tell where I had pawned it, or sold it, but I said, I have no other story to tell, nor no other story will I tell.
I leave it to my counsel.
I was going along and saw these three pair of breeches lying upon the area rails; I enquired of a boy that I saw there, who they belonged to; he said, he did not know; and I put them in my apron, and this man came up.
I only had a little bit in my hand, about an ounce or two, and they put the rest to it; I had lived in the house three years, and never did any thing bad in my life.
I was coming from Carnaby-market; I saw two young men; I asked what it was o'clock; there was a cry of stop-thief, and they laid hold of me; the man that is bailed out, said, the man that gave him the property was run away, he knew nothing of me.
I was at work at the Glasgow Whars; as I was coming up, I saw the two pots standing by a post, I took them up and meant to return them to the owner, I could not read the name on them.
He said, at the Magistrates, he saw nothing of me, and did not see me take any thing till he laid hold of me.
I went into a public-house to get a pint of beer, I came out at the back door to make water; being in liquor, I went into this yard; I know nothing of the linen no more than the child unborn.
When you came to my apartments, where did you find the cambrick?
Was that private mark upon it at the time?
When I was at the bottom of Cold-bath-fields, do you remember my putting a mark upon that cambrick?
My Lord, I beg to be permitted to read my defence,
It was not Mr. Haynes's property; I was out ten minutes after I was paid; I have a wife and three children; I have very little wages, and I bought this tobacco of a coachman, or guard, I am not sure which; I thought I could get a shilling by it, and I wanted it to get bread for my children.(The prisoner called two witnesses who gave him a good character).
Is that your hand-writing?
I met him on the 3d of March, in St. Paul's Church-yard; he knew I had been in the hardware line; he asked me if I knew any body that wanted any; I told him I did not.
Did you see the handkerchiefs about me?
I was going to Deptford, I am wounded in my thigh, and have got a pension for it, besides losing my arm; I have got one about my neck of the Spitalfields sort, and it is all gone to pieces, and I wanted something of the India kind, and in coming out, a young man was behind the lady, she cried out directly, the man has got something; I went out and cried holloa, you have got something; I could not run, I walked, and there was a mob, and a cry of stop thief; my friends are not here, and who could prove that I never had any thing on more than I have at present; I have been nineteen months in the French hospital, I never wore a book, or any thing of that sort, it is impossible that I could have put them into this sleeve; I will leave it to any gentleman whether my arm would uphold a hook, the French surgeons cut it six or seven times, and my thigh too; I did not expect my trial to come on till to-morrow.
I bought that saw of Mr. Howell, in Coelsea; if it is mine, there is a tooth broke out near the handle, and another within two inches of the bottom; I was going to look for a job; I have been so long out work, that if I could not have got a job, I should have been obliged to fell it.
It was a very little time before that we were drinking together.
What I said then I don't know, because I was frightened; I went to the public-house, and the young man asked me about his bread; I said, I might have taken it out of a joke, but I had not taken it; the bread was in the parlour; he went, and said, it was his bread; he went away, and the next day he took me up for it.
Did you see me drop them?
I am a plaisterer ; I had been to put up a marble chimney-piece just by Queen-square, and when I had finished work, they gave me some of their strong ale; and being in a close room, and coming into the air, I was very much intoxicated; I endeavoured to lay hold of the top of the rails to keep my self up, and I suppose, the gate being open, I fell to the ground.
I received these things from Geary, he told me Mr. Knatchbull wanted money, and as he knew I was in the habit of pawning plate for a gentleman that I lived with, he asked me to pawn it; he thought if he went himself to the pawn-brokers, he should be stopped; I never brought a bit of plate out of Mr. Knatchbull's house, they were all brought to my lodging by Geary; I did not suppose I should be brought into trouble for this, I did it very honestly.
As I was going across the street, I heard the cry of stop thief; and a great many people were running, and I ran too; I saw the coat lying on the ground, and I picked it up, and gave it to Mr. Walker; he let the man that had the coat run away, and then laid hold of me; I told him that was the man.
I brought these things out of the country; I was down on surlough for a fortnight, at Christmas, and I brought them up with me.
I went out of this jail on Whitsun-Saturday; I went down with the coach to Gosport; and at Farnham they changed coaches and packages; and I was drinking there along with some ship-mates, and was left behind; they forgot me, and so I came to London.
I have not any thing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say, but throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I bought the loaf.
I stood in Upper Thames-street, against Calvert's brewhouse, and a soldier asked me if I would sell this coat for him, and I went and sold it for 7s. 6d.
I am not guilty; I picked it up coming out of the gate at dinner time; I did not think any think of it.
That piece of duck, with the private mark, Mr. Brounger gave me, a fortnight before Christmas, to line a jacket; he was writing in the counting-house; I went and asked him for it; he told me to go up stairs, and ask above; I went up and asked Grose, he said, he had got none there, there were remnants enough below; I came down and took these two pieces, about enough to mend my jacket, and make pockets, and shewed them to Mr. Brounger, and he said it was very well.
Yes.
All I have to say is, that I don't know any thing at all about it; I never received any seed from the gentleman.
Was not the veal wrapped up in a coarse cloth?
I was out of work, and was going over Blackfriar's-bridge, and I picked up the property stated in the indictment, wrapped up in a coarse cloth, and I was going home, and was stopped by the officer.
I went into the Rose, over Westminster-bridge; this woman came in, and gave me a share of seven pints of beer; she was very much in liquor, and desired me to carry the bundle for her; she slipped down several times upon the bridge.
I was coming down Saffron-hill very much in liquor, this woman came after me, and said I had got a waistcoat of her's; I don't know whether I had or not, I was very much in liquor.
Did you not say the cellar-door was broke open?
I had been up to the other end of the town to work, I had been in two or three public-houses, I was in liquor; coming up Ave-Maria-lane, I thought this was a public-house, and went into it to case myself; a man asked me what I wanted, and said, that that bundle belonged to me, and I said, no, it did not.(The prisoner called two witnesses, who gave him a good character).
On Thursday, a friend of mine agreed to go with me to the masquerade, I asked him to be so good as order the dominos; he said, he would, the boy was so long before he brought them, that I met him in Holles-street; I went with the boy to a friend's house, in Mary-le-bonne-street, being a respectable house, I thought it better to take him there; my friend did not come so soon as I expected; I sitted the dominos and masks, and made an excuse to the boy; I was thinking, if I did not meet my friend, I would leave the boy at a gentleman's house, to look for him; I told him, in five minutes, I would call and pay for the hire of the dominos; the boy, I believe, suspected something, and instantly followed me; I was making all the haste I could to my friend for the money; I had not sufficient in my pocket to pay for them, and the boy called out, the watchman was at my elbow, and the idea of being put in the watch-house made me run; I concealed my money, and told them I had none; I had two guineas and a shilling in my pocket; the watchman treated me extremely ill; I did not take them away designedly; if the person had called in the morning for the dominos, there would have been the money and the dominos.(For the prisoner).
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury; the crime I am accused of I plead innocent to; I had the goods in my possession before I went to live with Mrs. Jackson. The rest I leave to my counsel.(The prisoner called six witnesses, who gave him a good character).
On the 1st of March, I was going to work, and a young man asked me to go with him to sell the watch, I did not know it was a stolen watch; I went to seek to sell it, and he went with me; I offered it to a cloaths-man in the open street; if I had known it was stole, I should not have offered it in the open street for sale.
I have nothing more to say, my Lord, than that I have been entirely drawn in by the evidence, Baskerville.
I have nothing to say.
I am not able to make any defence, I beg to leave it to the mercy of the Jury.
My Lord and Gentlemen, the principal witness, Baskerville, I have been acquainted with about four months; I told him that I meant to apply to Mr. Longman for a few instruments, upon sale or return, which I shall prove is the habit, and has been the continual practice of that house for many years, and when those instruments are sold, they pay the money, and what are not sold, they return; I spoke to Baskerville, I had spoke to Mr. Longman first; he could not do it without the consent of the assignees; Baskerville said, he would speak to them for me; I told him, I would be much obliged to him; in a few days after, I met Baskerville, and he said, I might have two or three instruments, as I had had instruments before, and paid for them regularly; he said, the vans were all gone to Tottenham-court-road, and they had ordered him to carry it; he took this piano-sorte, and carried it to the spot that he has said; he went to fetch a porter, who carried it to my house; I sold it for eight guineas and an half, and a short piano-forte, which I afterwards sold for three guineas and an half; he said, if I would give him the money, it would be better, as I did not know any of the assignees, and he would take care that I should have credit in the book; I have had a vast number of instruments upon sale or return; he told me he had applied to the assignees for me.
I know nothing of these porters: I know nothing of the crime I am charged with; I am innocent of it.
I have a witness to prove I was in their company at the time she says she was robbed.
I am very ready to serve his Majesty by sea or land.
I had the things given me by a girl.
The clerk desired me to take this tallow home; I forgot it till night, and then I took it to carry it to Mr. Russell's, and these gentlemen stopped me; I told them I had got some tallow of Mr. Russell's, and was going to carry it there; one of them cut me open by a blow upon the nose with a stick; I never offered to sell it.(The prisoner called three witnesses who gave him a good character).
I had been with a load of coals to Hampstead brewhouse, my master told me to take a sack of chaff into the stable, I went with it, and Mr. Dutton came and told me I had stole the potatoes; I don't know how the potatoes came there, I did not take them, I told him I did not know any thing about them.
Will you say I took that bed without your knowledge?
I carried the bed to the Jew, that woman desired me to do the bed, and I told her to do it herself, and I went home with her, and she asked me to take hold of one end, and I the other, and we brought it to Mr. Smith's; I did not know it was a ready furnished lodging, I thought the things were all her own.
This woman lay upon the bare sacking of the bedstead along with me, and if I had done any thing unlawful, and she had not been privy to it, she would have gone and told Mr. Harlow of it.
This prosecution is founded merely upon malice, for the goods I never knew that I had, when I went away with them in my great-coat pocket; they were some how or other put into my pocket, because I would not work for him at the wages that he wished me, he has, out of revenge, framed this bill against me.
I am quite innocent of the charge; I was at Broomhall's at the time, but it never entered into my head to be guilty of so mean a thing as to steal a pint pot; it is a malicious thing of that girl against me.
I was at a sale, the 13th of September, in Brentford, and laid out to the\\ amountof 22l. 8s. and gave earnest for them; and after the sale was over, having been standing all day, I walked out to see a friend at Hounslow, when I came there he was gone from there; so I went to the next public-house, and asked them if they knew James Miles, that lived there, they said they did, that he was gone to Kingston-upon-Thames; a man said he saw him in a lane, and I went down the lane, and saw this bag, I went and laid hold of the bag, and the man jumped up, and said he would blow my brains out if I stirred; I had a little money in my pocket, thirty-four guineas and a half; I had not paid for the goods; I did not know what the man meant to do to me, I ran away; I thought if he got my money, he would murder me; I ran away, and he being stronger, overpowered me and took me.
I come up to sales to London, and I carry the goods I buy to Queen-street, in the Borough; and leave them till I can pack them up; and I carry these straps for the purpose; when I go to Portsmouth, which I often do, I carry the straps always to carry goods.
Going along Thames-street I saw some soldiers running, and I heard somebody cry out stop thief, and I ran to see what was the matter, and there were people stopped me.
I worked for the prosecutor as long as I could get any money for wages, and I was obliged to pawn my cloaths; I bought this webbing to work over hours, to maintain myself, I could not get any money of him; I got me a fresh master, and therefore he took me up; I made some of those button-holes myself, and he owes me now above a guinea of wages.
I have not any thing to say.
We work in very different places; he could not possibly see me do any such thing, if I had done it.
This tobacco is the service that was given me and my wife; I had saved it up to send down to my brother, a young man that was going that morning to Lincolnshire; I have no other convenience that they should not search me to take it from me; and this man that is swearing against me, is to have five guineas from my master if he can cast me.
I had been trying to get into St. Bartholomew's Hospital, and St. Thomas's, and I could not; I had not a farthing to help myself; I could not pay for a bed, and I got in to sleep there; I had just come up from Portsmouth; I had a bad leg from a hurt I got on board a man of war; I know nothing at all of the lead.
I bought 12lb of candles in January, in Holborn, and they were part of them that were found in my possession.
I had been carrying a load for a gentleman in the market, and going towards home a gentleman stood by the corner of Magpye-alley, in Newgate-street, with this rub; and he said, porter, do you want a load, I told him, yes; says he, you have got to carry this to Ratcliff-highway; he told me he would give me eighteen pence; I asked him for a note, and he said I had no occasion for a note, for, says he, I shall walk along with you; and coming along Cheapside, I saw him close behind me, and I saw him behind me in the Minories; and when I came to cross the way on Tower-hill, this gentleman came up to me, and asked me where I was going; I told him I was going to Mr. Wilson's, in Ratcliff-highway; and I looked about for the gentleman, and he was gone: I have worked fourteen years about the market and the water-side, and nobody could ever give me a bad character.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury; I have but very little to say, in the aukward situation that I am in, at present; as I am to answer to God. I bought this poney near five months ago, in Smithfield, of a man that said his name was William Owen , I gave one pound six shillings for him, and sold him for a guinea and a half; a witness was waiting here to-day morning that saw me buy it; where he is now I don't know.(The prisoner called two witnesses, who gave him a very good character).
I know nothing at all of the things, neither did I take them out of the house.
I leave my defence to my Counsel; I have some witnesses attending; I wrote a letter to Mr. Bray in Dublin, desiring him to settle affairs, and waited ten days in Dublin for his answer. I did it in a paroxysm of madness, and was willing to make any atonement.
I was coming down the court, and a young man told me he would give me a shilling to carry it for him to the pitching-block.
I sell fish ; the gentleman told me to bring him some fish, and he would pay me for it; I went, and the gentleman came out and laid hold of me, and said, he had lost a parcel, and if I did not tell him where it was, he would do me if he could.
I asked the prosecutor's wife to lend me a shirt, and she lent me that shirt.
Did you get any property of me?
Was not I lying on the casks drunk?
There was no property got with me of no sort; I was very much in liquor, I had been working with a wine-merchant, and got very much in liquor; I laid myself down on the cask, Robins came up and damned me for a bloody-back soldier, and asked me what I lay there for; I was very much enraged, and said, if he served me so, I would put him in a place he had never been in.
The shirt was given to me by Mr. Nixon; and I was in distress, and sold it to that man.
Here is a little boy that saw me buy the rope.
I had been drinking, and I was coming down Holborn, I saw two or three men; Mr. Sherborne ran up against me, and two other men hustled him against me, and we both fell together into the mud; after I had gone away from them, I found I had got a wrong hat, and I was going back to see if I could find Mr. Sherborne to change it again, when the watchman took me, and said, he had seen me knock down Mr. Sherborne.
I was coming from St. James's church to the Green-man and Still in Oxford-road, to go out of town to Uxbridge; I heard a noise in the street, I walked up Sackville-street, and saw a watchman and some people talking together; I asked what was the matter, and they said there were thieves, and asked me if I had met any men; I told them I had, and described them; I asked them what it was o'clock, and then the young man came, and said I was one of the robbers; I told him he was taking my character away; he said, if he was doing wrong his master would stand by him; I told him to take care of what he said; they searched me and found nothing but my watch.
I was walking along when this man charged me with stealing the pocket-book; I did not do any such thing.
I was coming down Nightingale-lane, I turned down by a sence, where there was a public privy; I went down to it, and that man came up to me, and told me, I must go with him; I behaved with no violence; I told him, I was going to my daily labour, and being the only man that was there, that woman said, that is the fellow; I know nothing at all about it.
I was coming along, and saw this door standing against a wall, and I took it along till the watchman stopped me.
Where did you know me?
What is your name?
Whether she knew that I had property, or received any benefit from it?
The prosecutrix of this indictment knew there was property left in her house of six hundred pounds; this six hundred pounds has been appropriated to her use, which I have appropriated to the creditors and other persons, for flour, and bills contracted from the 15th of October to the 19th of February last; for flour brought in from sundry people, but most particularly from Mr. Cooper, near Abridge, one hundred and twenty pounds worth; the consequence was, I found the money was not prepared from the trade for the payment there of; Mr. Cooper was solicited by Mrs. Bennison to arrest me; of all which I can bring forward proof from the person who did arrest me, in consequence there of; there were also sums of money appropriated to her use.
It was not consistent with my knowledge that she was existing; I had not seen her for near five years; I had been credibly informed that she was not existing; all which she was apprized of before she married me.
The apprentice ordered me to deliver a ton of salt in Bishopsgate-street, and this was a piece that I thought belonged to that ton; the lumps were in danger of falling over, and I took out that one lump, and was securing it in the sack; I desired my wife to take care of it while I went after the horses, as they were gone on.
I was going to Hyde-park-corner to see my wife in the hospital, I met with a man, who said, he would give me a shilling to carry it to Vigo-lane pitching-block, near Saville-row; I found it very heavy, and I set it down to rest, when this man came up and took hold of me, I turned back with him, and made no resistance at all; I have a wife in the hospital, and three children.
What time was it?
What time was it when you came to take me?
I was not out of my own house from nine o'clock till past twelve, when the watchman came to take me.
She said, before the Justice, that she could not swear to me.
I had been at a shipmate's house in Virginia-row, I heard a cry of stop thief, and they stopped me.
I had a pardon from that, I saw it at the Justice's.
I had not slept there for two nights before; I bought the watch.
I positively deny the charge against me of the robbery.
I went to ask for a copper, with a large cock, and this cock was lying upon the copper; I took it up in my hand, as I might any thing else, and in a few minutes he turned about, and said, that is what you are about, is it? he said he would send for a constable, and he had me insulted by the people, till I could searce stand upon my legs.
About five pounds; it was a second-hand one that I shewed him, the cock was tied round by the top in his apron.
What pocket did I put it in?
I had not a pocket.
I was very much intoxicated at the time; I have been in his Majesty's service many years, I have been wounded twice in my head, I was with the Duke of York the whole of the last campaign; I have had some splinters taken out of my side, which causes me to be delirious at times, especially if I get a little liquor.
I had just left work, and stopped to have a glass of anniseed; I had pulled off my trowsers with my money in them; I said, I could not have the anniseed then, I would go back and get the money out of my trowsers, and when I came back again, I heard a cry of stop thief, and they laid hold of me; I never saw the coat.
Was not there a man with me in your shop?
I bought the shirts of a Jew.
I am innocent of the crime that is laid to my charge; I was posted at the King's guard at nine o'clock; about ten, there came an old woman that washed for the people in the house, she knocked at the window once or twice, the window was opened, that was about six yards from my post; about half past ten, this gentleman came through the gate, into the Green-Park, he looked at me very hard, he turned up towards the Bason in the Green Park, he turned back, and looked at me again, I did not know what he meant; I was very dry, and I went up and asked the women if they would give me some clean water, or table beer; they gave me some, and that gentleman came up to the window, what conversation they had I do not know; I did not think it prudent for me to stop there; I went to my sentry-box, and laid down my firelock behind my box, and soon after that, the gentleman came up to me, and said, \soldier, should not you like to have connections with these girls?\" I said, I should not mind it in the least, if I had one of them here, and he made no more to do than to take hold of my breeches, \"sentinel,\" says he, \"do your p-s stand?\" no, says I, if I had them here, I don't know but they might; he opened the slap of my breeches, and took hold of my t-s in his hand, I had my firelock in my hand, I immediately seized hold of his coat, and said, what did he mean by that; I called out for assistance, and then Sharman came up; I said, I insist upon your taking charge of this man, he accordingly took hold of him, he made a scusstle to get away; I called out again for assistance, and then there came up another man, and then Sir John was still, he put some money into my hand, and said, I will give you any thing before I will be detained; no, says I, I will take you a prisoner to the Guard-room, and I sent Sharman to the Guard-room for a serjeant, and a file of men; accordingly they came, and I laid my charge, that this gentleman did so and so with me; I shewed the Colonel the money he gave me, and I was confined all night."
As I am in the presence of God, these witnesses are mistaken with regard to my person, as I hope to prove by upright and just witnesses.
I found these articles tied up in a handkerchief, which Crocker took out of my pocket when I was apprehended.
I was going along about my business; I happened to stop looking at some rings in the window, when they laid hold of me; they know I was by myself.
The handkerchief is my own.
I was going to Clerkenwellgreen when I was stopped, I never had been in the shop at all; I was armourer on board the Middlesex East-Indiaman, since that, I have been to America, and one voyage to the West-Indies.
I picked up the handkerchief, I did not take it out of his pocket.
I have had a bad character, but I work very hard for my living now.
I took that shilling for a good one; I work very hard, I never dealt in such a thing in my life; what made me run away was, that he he told me, if I did not run away, he would throw me into the river.
I have a sister lives at Harrow; I lived at Stanmore three years and a half myself, the constable knows me very well; I lived with Mr. Bromley, schoolmaster, three years; my sister has lived there seven years; I asked her to let me have a little money till I got into work, and she lent me half-a-guinea; I went to Mr. Drummond's farm, to ask for some work, and then these people charged me with taking these things; I told them I had not got them.
They took seven shillings and six-pence from me in silver, and I think two shillings and eight-pence in halfpence, which was my own, that I had had in change out of the half-guinea that I had of my sister.
I have nothing to say, but leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I know nothing at all about them.
I am a poor man, with three small children, and my wife very near lying in again in the workhouse; I have buried six.
I met John Solomons that day, says he, is there any of our people here? no, says I, you know they never come till eleven o'clock; he asked me to lend him a guinea; I told him I had not one; and he asked me to pledge the watch for him; he said, he had bought a lot and had not money enough to pay for it; and I went and pledged it for him, I have never seen him since; I have sent after him, several times, but since I have been taken up he has never been heard of at his house, where he has lived some years.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
The girl has been different times in my company before that evening.
I did go into the house, and had some gin and water; when I had drank it, I came out, and going by that gentleman's house, I wanted to go backwards, and I went, and they followed me to the door, and insisted upon coming in; and I immediately opened the door; the gentleman that belonged to the things, took me by the collar and knocked me against the door and against the wall; how the things came there I do not know; I have a wife and two children.
I have been a long time broke down by distress; I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I only reached over for a case-knife; I know nothing at all about the halfpence.
I lived next door to Bowyer; he knows me very well.
The prosecutor and I were drinking together, and he was very much in liquor too; he desired me to take care of them while he went to sleep; he was very drunk, and I took them home to my lodgings; Mr. Nash followed me, and asked me where I got these things from, and I told him from Mr. Shannon's.
I am a soldier in the Middlesex Supplementary Militia; I called at the prosecutor's house with my comrade, and had rather more liquor than I wanted, and as I was going across the field to my quarters, I saw a man go over a gate into a ditch, in a stubble field, and throw something down; I went home to my quarters, and this man came and took me, and told me Cripps would not hurt me if I told him where the things were, and I told him what I had seen, and he found it there, I never took the property.
Did you see any knife in my hand?
Did you see any handkerchief in my possession?
I went on board to beg a little victuals, and I told the woman so; she said, I had been taking something; I said, I had not, and I went on shore; they came after me, and took me; they found the things in the cabin.
I went into the shop to buy some silk; I never meddled with any stays at all.
My wife has been very ill for a long time; I took it home, with intention to take a little bit of it for her, intending to take the rest back again.
I had occasion for a little money; I parted with these things with no other design than to redeem them when I took my wages, which would have been on the 27th of July; I had to receive 20l. Mr. Morse never fulfilled his engagement with me; he was to settle with me every Monday, and he has let bills run up to 11l.
I had been hard at work at the fire that evening, rolling the sugar up; I drank a good deal of porter, and after that gin and water; I don't know whether I had the sugar or not.
I picked it up in the street, and carried it in my hand, and nobody owning it, I put it in my pocket; the prosecutor came after, and said, he had dropped a handkerchief; I told him, if that was his, he was very welcome to it; I went with him directly.
I was a soldier in the Tower-Hamlets; I went into the public-house to get a pint of beer and some bread and cheese, before I went upon duty, and I picked up these stockings in the road.
I never cheated him nor any body else; I pawned the things with intention to return them again; I had not left the room, nor did not intend it.
That board I can prove I bought at a timber-yard, and the mandrils I made myself; I will call a person who made the mahogany mouldings himself; he struck them with Mr. Avery's plane, which he borrowed of Mr. Avery; I had begun business for myself, and this is done entirely because he was jealous that I should take his business from him; about six weeks before he made me a prisoner, he was arrested for debt, and durst not be seen at home, and he allowed me to take tools home to my house, to be ready to put up an organ at Whitehall, and another at Mr. White's, the auctioneer, at Storey's-gate, and he has now got some of my tools in his possession; he owes me 2l. 4s. to this day; he would not let me have my tools, and pushed me out of the yard; I was enraged at that, and made use of improper language to him.
I was coming up the Angel-road, Islington; I met with a young fellow that asked me to carry it for him; I said, I knew the pig was Mr. Luffkins's, and Mr. Oborne did not know where to find Mr. Luffkins, nor whose pig it was, if I had not told him; I worked for Mr. Luffkins when I was nine years old.
I was intoxicated with liquor, I did not know what I was doing, and when I was committed, I was told it was only valued at 10d.
I only took a lump out of the hogshead, and took a bite of it, and Mr. Lucas came up to me, and desired me to put it down again, and I did.
I went into the warehouse and put my coat on, I found it concealed under my coat, upon the head of the cask; I concluded, when I saw the officer, that he would, of course, accuse me of it, and I endeavoured to conceal it between my thighs, and he searched me and found it there.
I went into the cellar to get a knife to use as a screw-driver, and when I came up the leather by mistake was amongst my tools.
I had affronted Mr. Layton, and he said he would lay a snare for me, and would do for me; and when I came down on Monday morning, he laid hold of me, and said, I had been robbing the till.
I have lost one arm, and the use of great part of one side of me, that it is totally impossible I should be able to hold them between my thighs.
I was coming along Long-lane, and saw a parcel of people contending about a handkerchief; I picked this handkerchief up in the kennel, and before I could say is this the handkerchief, the gentleman laid hold of me; since that the prosecutor has been with my friends, and demanded two guineas to make it up, and then he came down to a guinea and a half.
I went in to buy some eggs; I changed a dollar; she said, it was a bad one; I told her, I did not know it; I did not run, I walked on for near a quarter of a mile, before I knew they were after me; then they called stop thief, and Mr. Willie laid hold of me; I do not know any thing about the other money.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge. I was taking it for a man that asked me if I wanted a job; I was to take it to the Hungerford Coffee-house for 6d.
It was distress that made me take them.
I took the liberty of putting them on while I got my own mended.
There were three of us in the bed; I picked up a piece of paper, I did not know what was in it.
Did you ever find me pilfering or skulking about?
This wool laid a little bit here, and a little bit there, I meant to bring it to the scale as I did the night before, when Mr. Green was there, and before I could get to the scale, he took hold of me, and dragged me to the Compter.
I had no property about me.
A man offered me a shilling to carry them to Gower-street, Bedford-square.
I was very-much in liquor; I don't know any thing of it, my brother was just come home from the West-Indies, and I was so overjoyed at seeing him again, that I did not know what I did.
My box was always open; I don't know how they came there.
I am entirely innocent of the fact.
My wife kept a green-grocer's shop, and these five sixpences, that these gentlemen swore before the Lord-Mayor, they found upon the mantle-piece, she had taken in the shop; and this woman that has swore against me, I never saw before in my days.
I drove his waggon to Maidenhead; he stopped and had his breakfast; and afterwards he stopped to look at a fight; he never overtook me till I got to Colnbrook; how the cheese came into the sack, I do not know.
When I was sent on board the ship, from the prison, I went two or three cruises in Lord Howe's fleet; I was set ashore at Torbay in sick quarters; after that I was on a cruise off St. Domingo, we were taken, and I made my escape from a French prison; I got away to Jamaica to my own captain; I had a fever which fell into my legs; after that, I went on board the Lottery Guineaman, we came over to Liverpool, where I was six weeks; when I got better, I came up to London and told Lieutenant Dickinson my case, and he took me into his employment, and from there I went to Lieutenant Christie, on board the Enterprize tender, lying at the Tower; I have been in pay with Lieutenant Christle ever since.
I found the tea in my pocket.
I do not know any thing about it.
I saw a man put the table down, and stop, pretending to make water, but I found he did not, and seeing me look at him, he took to his heels and run away; I took the table and carried it home, and hearing that it was stole, I was going to the watch house to tell them of it, when I met the watchman.
I was in liquor, and did not know what I was doing.
It is the first time I ever did such a thing in my life, and beg the favour to go to sea.
It is the first time I was ever guilty of such an offence.
What I have said, is true; but I cannot recollect exactly the day.
I was out of employ, and received that order from a person, to receive these goods; the gentleman said his name was Creasy; and I knew my brother had lived with Mr. Anderson, and therefore I got this boy to go for it.
This horse was impounded by Mr. Bennett, of Ilford, for three weeks, he gave it to a man of the name of Morse, who sold it to one Meredith, who sold it to she prisoner.
Desire the prosecutor to describe the horse.
I never saw the gentleman to my knowledge.
I went down into the fields, and saw this sheep lying, and I picked it up and carried it home; I thought there was no harm in it, it might have been killed by dogs, I could not say.
I got it from my fellow servant.
I had been to Sommers-town, and got very much in liquor; I came away between eleven and twelve o'clock, I fell asleep in a field, and there I laid; when I waked, I saw a man coming across the field with a load, I asked him what it was o'clock; and he said, between twelve and one; then the watchman came up, and the man threw down his load, and ran away.
I was pardoned for a soldier; I went to Southampton, I went on board a transport, I was sent a-shore to sick quarters, at Southampton; I had been out late one night, and was pressed on board the Royal William, at Spithead, and then drafted on board the Albion, and there I remained till she was cast away off Harwich, coming up Swinn, and then I was drafted on board the Sandwich, and then sent on board the Lancaster, at Long-reach; then I was sent to Woolwich at sick quarters, and from thence to Guy's-hospital; when I was discharged from there, I went to Somerset-house, and had my free discharge.
I wish to ask Mr. Hill, whether he and his wife have not been in the habit of pawning every little trifling thing about the house, from September 1796, to this time?
He has got, now, in the house, duplicates, from pawnbrokers, in different names, to the\\ amountof 115.
Have you your watch in your pocket now?
Upon your oath, is it not in pawn?
Were you ever at Manchester?
Do you know one Mr. Smith of Manchester?
Had you ever any dealings with Mr. Smith, at Manchester?
Did you ever draw a bill in the name of Chickledy and pay it to Mr. Smith to swindle him out of goods.
My Lord, the warrant upon which I was taken, bears date the 18th of January last, and it charges John Portees , alias John Day . Now Mr. Hill knows that my name is John Portees, but he chuses to alias me, because he wishes to defame me. Mr. Hill, the whole time I was with him was in the constant habit of pawning every little trifling thing in the house; I have known the house many times bare of every thing, without a table-cloth, or a tea-spoon in the house. Mrs. Hill can neither read nor write, and she has given me the tickets to pick out particular things for her when she has wanted them out, and I have seen even the ticket of a child's cap, that had been pawned for four-pence, and they always pawned things in other people's names, particularly in the name of Mrs. Williams, of Tottenham-court-road, a person not of the best character in the world; two children used to fetch and carry these things backwards and forwards. When they have had company, they have been obliged to borrow tea-spoons, because their own were in pawn; I only came down here last night between eleven and twelve o'clock, if I had had further time, I should have had some witnesses to prove what I have already stated. When I was taken up, I had Lord Kenyon's subpoena about me, to attend the Grand Jury, at Westminster, to give evidence upon a bill of indictment against Mr. Hill, for perjury; he said to a person that is now in Court, that if I went to give evidence against him, he would take me up upon that warrant, and as soon as I came out of the Grand Jury room, I was taken up upon that warrant. With respect to pawning the book in question, I solemnly declare to your Lordship I never did; and, with respect to the second witness, a very few days indeed will shew what a situation he will be in, on account of some transactions at Manchester; there have been several persons up from Manchester to take him, but have not yet been able to find him.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I most humbly beg leave to crave your Lordship's attention for a few minutes. When I last appeared at this bar, I felt the ignominy of my situation so much, that I was determined, had not the Royal mercy interposed, to have devoted my future life to a sincere repentance for my past indiscretions; but his Majesty was pleased to pardon me upon condition of serving as a soldier in the 60th regiment, which I joined at Tobago; and having done duty there for three months, was reported unfit for service, and sent to England under the command of Major Martin and Captain Court; we arrived at Spithead in September, 1796, and were discharged in the October following; I then returned to London to a distressed and disconsolate family, thinking I had received a general discharge from the army. I trust I shall be able to prove what I have here stated. Since I came to England, I have conducted myself with the greatest property, but, unfortunately, when a man has once appeared at this bar he is ever looked upon with suspicion; I therefore throw myself upon the candour of your Lordship, and the Gentlemen of the Jury, convicted they will act with that impartiulity which so peculiarly characterises the Juries of this country.
I left my discharge at Portsmouth Barracks; I did not know but it was to be left there.
I went to see for a job of work at Mr. Adams's, at Parto- Bello Farm , and coming home, I found this copper in a sack in the ditch, I was going to take it to the Spotted Dog, a house that I use, till it was advertised.
I never had them in my possession, or ever touched them.
As I was coming along I heard the cry of stop thief; I never had the watch in my custody at all.
I now belong to the Sea-horse frigate; I got leave to come a-shore to seek after my prize money that was due to me from the Scorpion sloop of war; I am entirely innocent of it, I was never in the waggon at all.
It being holiday-time I had been at Wandsworth-fair, and being rather in liquor I staid later than ordinary; I met a man in Holborn with a hamper upon his shoulder, I heard the cry of stop thief, the man threw down the hamper, and the watchman immediately laid hold of me, and said I was the man; I did not make any resistance.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge.
I went to buy a side of veal of Mr. Gordon; Mr. Gordon has had twenty sheep in a week to sell for me by commission; I bought this side of veal of Mr. Gordon, and told him, he must give me credit for it till Monday.
I was at work there as a cooper; I came down for some beadings, and I found this indigo; I meant to give it to some of the men.
On Tuesday, the 22d of May, a forty pound note was missing, I was in the warehouse, I heard of it; there was a noise about it, and we were all called up except one, a Mr. Jones, who I believe is a partner with Mr. Simpson, who might have had it for any thing I know; Mr. Simpson has a great number of servants; I was searched from top to toe and nothing was found, none of the rest were searched; I went to work as usual till Whit-Monday, and then I begged for a holiday, which he agreed to, and then I told him I had got a place superior to his, and I did not go again till Thursday, when I was apprehended; I did not make any resistance. GUILTY (Aged 25.)
I was coming home about half past nine o'clock, I heard somebody scream out, I ran up, and this man caught hold of me and took me to the Compter.
I received the note from Mrs. John, by the hands of her niece.
Houghton is a man of infamous character, he is a common informer, he said, he should pass all those to night, and he should want some more to-morrow; accordingly, the next day, he wanted Marsden to let him have seven more to make up the number, for he had passed seven of them.
I pray the benefit of the statute.
I thought it was not a capital offence the second time.
It was only three papers of halfpence, I did not sell them to the man - I was cruelly used.
I leave it to your Lordship.
No, it was my brother, I believe.
He may say what he will, it was not me.
I had been receiving my pay along with a witness who is here, and we went into a house for some porter, and I went out to get some bread and cheese; I went into the prosecutor's shop with three-pence halfpenny in my hand, there was nobody in the shop, and I was looking about for somebody, when this gentleman came up, and said I was robbing his till.
There was a horse prancing and making a great disturbance among the people, and that gentleman took me round the waist and threw me down, and then that other man picked up a handkerchief, I knew nothing at all about it.
When I was first acquainted with that woman, I kept the Mary-le-bonne Coffee-house; she did not live farther from me than it is a-cross this Court, she kept a little tobacco and snuff-shop; I told her repeatedly that I had a wife, that my wife and I had parted about sixteen years, and I did not know whether she was dead or alive; she knew I had been arrested in her apartments; she said, she was lawyer enough to know that sixteen years was long enough to wait; I told her I wished to have Counsel's opinion upon it; she said there was no occasion, for she had been a lawyer's wife, or something of that sort; she asked me to go and look at a house in Oxford-road; she did not like that, and we went about looking at different houses; and when we had got so far as the bottom of Holborn, she said we might as well go on to Doctors'-Commons; I said, for what; why, says she, for a licence; I said I have no more than one shilling and sixpence in the world; and she pulled out two guineas and gave me, and we went for the licence; she insisted upon my coming to breakfast with her the next morning, but I would not promise; when I went the next morning, she was putting on a clean pair of white stockings; I said, what, are you going out, madam; she said, why, we are going to be married to be sure; I said, I do not know any thing about it, I have got no money; says she, then I will pay for the wedding, and we were married.
On the 28th of March, I was coming from my work, just before I got out, Thomas Allen, the head fireman, and another man, gave me three pieces of iron, and told me to take them outside the gate a little way, and he would take them of me, I did not know what he meant; and then I was laid hold of; the other two men ran away.
I did not intend to defraud him of it; I was going upon duty the next day, and pledged it for fear I should lose it.
I was persuaded by another man in the morning to get this malt, accordingly I did.
I had been up all night, and was over persuaded by bad company to go to a pawnbroker's shop and sell the watch; I never did such a thing before.
I don't know any thing at all about the things; I never saw them before they were brought to Queen-square before me.
I gave three-pence to a sailor for two handfulls of it on the Tuesday night, and as I had no pockets I put it in the crown of my hat; when I went home I forgot to take it out, and I went to work with it the next morning to the warehouse.
A man gave them to me to carry for him, and he was to give me a pot of beer; they are very heavy, and I could not have carried them is I had not had three glasses of gin in my belly.
I know nothing about it; I was at work at my father's from five o'clock till ten at stay-making, I can prove it.
What character did I bear while I was on board the hulk?
I must leave it to the mercy of the Court; it is the first offence I ever committed in my life-time.
I was going to the privy to ease myself, I picked up the things between the of age and the privy.
I have nothing to say, but leave myself entirely to the mercy of the Court; I have often been entrusted to take out goods and return the money, which I intended to do with these.
I was coming along, there was another young man standing by me, and this gentleman happened to lay hold of me instead of the other young man; I know nothing of it, he catched hold of the wrong person.
About the year 1791, I enlisted in the 37th Regiment, and was at the siege of Dunkirk; When I came home, I found my wife married to another man, and children by him, and I did not like to trouble her for it; I got acquainted with this girl, and I married her; I did not know I was violating the law; Maria Driver's Mother was the sole promoter of the marriage.
I know no more of it than the child unborn.
I had been shipping rums off all day, and was a little tipsey; I saw a man on the wharf that asked me to carry it for him, and I had not carried it the length of this place, before this man stopped me; he pulled out his sword, and cut me over the temple; one of the men that helped to take me was the man that desired me to carry it for him, and he would pay me, but they have not brought him here.
I was very much in liquor, and how I came there I do not know.
I intended to repair the saddle myself, for fear of anger from my master, and pay for it myself out of my own pocket.
I never sold him any thing in my life.
My Lord and Gentlemen, I met with this gate in an alley, as I was coming out of Panton-square; I sold it at this shop; I stumbled against it as I came out of the alley.
I got them in change for a seven-shilling piece.
My wife was very ill, and I met a man on the wharf that gave me this sugar; I accepted it, thinking it would be of service to my wife.
I have been an unfortunate man it is true, but I have not been home eighteen months, though Sansum says I have been three or four years; I was not near the place, I am entirely innocent of it, as the witnesses will prove that are about to be called, who are entirely strangers to me.
These men are certainly mistaken in the person; I had plenty of opportunity to have got off if I had wished it.
The stockings were not in my box at all; that gentleman brought them out of another room, and said, they were in the box.
Did I ask you for it on the account of Messrs. Maitlands, upon your oath?
Did I tell you I lived with Messrs. Maitlands then?
Did I not tell you that I should refund it again?
Was I not in the habit of carrying out bills of Exchange from 100l. to 500l. a day, at the time I lived in the house?
Are there not many clerks in the house besides you?
Are there not many bills of Exchange in the house that you know nothing of?
Did I not afterwards call upon you and ask you for a recommendation to Dimsdale's house, the bankers?
Did you not tell me, that as it was only from neglect, and not dishonesty, that I was discharged, that you would give me a recommendation?
I never saw the woman in my life.
I was told that one Mr. Brown lived there, a captain of a West-Indiaman, who owed me some money; I knocked at the door, but nobody answered; I lifted up the latch, and went in.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court; I am innocent of what is laid to me.
I was coming from my sister's in Bloomsbury-market, I had a stick in my hand, I saw a man break the window and take out a pair of stays; I made a blow at him with the stick, and knocked the stays out of his hand; that was the way they came to be at my feet, and this man laid hold of me immediately.
My Lord, I hope you will be my judge and my counsel: this property was my own; I had left them in his custody, they were never in his house; I bought them and paid for them, at Kingston, in Jamaica; he keeps an unruly house; here is a woman here, that he has offered a guinea to swear against me, Mr. Benjamin's servant.
I am innocent of the crime that I am charged with; I have witnesses to prove where I was at the time the robbery was committed.
I lodged at Mr. Miller's, and had done for five weeks.
I never saw the girl with my eyes till the Friday, which was six days after the crime was committed that I am charged with; on the Monday night following, which was ten days after, the girl and her master came to the house while I was at work; I asked who they were, the master asked me if my name was Richardson, and I said, yes; and then the girl said, I was the person that she had delivered the change to; and the next day, Tuesday, I was taken up by a Bow-street officer.
I have been in the hospital five months; I was going to Snow-hill, and a man offered to give me a shilling to carry it to Jewin-street, and when I got into St. Bartholomew's-hospital, I was stopped with it; I had not had a bit of bread in my lips from the Wednesday till I was taken to the Compter on the Friday, and then only a three-penny loaf for myself, my wife, and three small children.
I did not take it out of the hogshead; I had been at work for Mr. Wilson in the crane; there had been some soldiers at work upon the ground, and they had every one taken some out, and I was gathering what they had scattered upon the ground, when Mr. Wilson came up and laid hold of me.
Did not somebody say to you, when you were taking away the chest from the Gun-tap, what are you going to do with that chest?
A man employed me to carry it, and when I got to the Gun-tap, he said, I will take it now, and desired me to go and fetch another, and I went and waited, but I saw no more of him.
I have a wife and three small children, and my wife about to lie-in with another; I work very hard for my family, as a porter ; and as I was coming through Thames-street, a person asked me to carry this barrel up the next hill, and he would give me sixpence; I never was before a magistrate in my life till now.
I am quite innocent of any thing of the kind.
I had been into the Whitehart to have a pint of two-penny, and when I came out, this man told me he would give me sixpence to carry it to Barbican.
I have nothing at all to say.
I know nothing at all about Mr. Marryat's books.
I have nothing to say.
I worked for Mr. Kinghorn; I was clearing the leaves out of the garden, and found this gun underneath the leaves; I kept it eight or nine days, and nobody said any thing about it, and I pawned it; Mr. Dyson knows me very well.
I was drinking with Dodson at a free and easy club that is held at Mr. Gibson's, he was very drunk, and I took off his clothes, and put him to bed; he desired me to take his watch and other things to take care of them.
Were there not several persons in the kitchen at the same time that you signed the paper?
Were there not several persons playing at cards at the time?
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, the crime with which I am charged, I am intirely innocent of; I am consident my word, as a prisoner, will avail but little; but, my Lord, it was regularly signed by the parties who had a right to sign it, and made over to me, and therefore I conceived myself justifiable in converting it to my own use; knowing the sufferings of those, who do commit such crimes, would have deterred me; but these men knew, that if I had not made the property good, it would not have been made good, and they have applied to the Bank to make it good; they have done it, and my life is in danger; I hope, gentlemen, you will take my case into your consideration; and when you have so done, if you are of opinion that I am guilty, I shall contrive to meet my fate with as much resignation as my situation will allow.
I was very much intoxicated with liquor, I was insensible at the time.
I never stole a horse in life; the rest I leave to my Counsel.
I picked them up in the middle of the road as I came along.
It depends entirely upon that shilling; you gentlemen are in the habit of trade, of receiving money every day; and you will be able to judge whether she can swear to it or not.
I saw a vast concourse of people running down Gray's-inn-lane; I ran with the rest, and I fell down, and they laid hold of me.
I am totally innocent.
I found the pots.
I saw a man with these two heifers on the road, and he said he was going into Hertfordshire, and I bought them of him, and gave ten pounds for them; I gave them to Mr. Field to sell for me.
I heard the cry of stop thief; there were several people running, I ran, and Mr. Bewley laid hold of me, and accused me with stealing his cheese.
The lawn belonged to me.
I had been out in the morning to buy some articles, I met a man who asked me to carry it for him, which I did out of compassion; Eyre told me their master was a very severe one, and he should lose his place if he did not come forward against me; he was obliged to say what his master pleased, or he should be turned away.
I had been to make enquiry about a parcel, and the book-keeper told me I must go across to the tap; and in the way a great number of parcels were lying, that I could not very well get past; I took them up in my hand, and they laid hold of me, and charged the constable with me.
That is my own box, and all my own property in it.
The prosecutor has spoke very false; I can bring witness to prove that I had no lining in my hat.
I follow the fishing business ; my father, and mother, and sister are here to prove that I was not out of my father's house, from eight the night before to eight the next morning.
I went to look for work at Wapping; and when I came past this place, a man offered me half-a-crown or a couple of shillings if I would carry it for him.
I was going home, and no doubt I might run against the gentleman; but the handkerchief I never had, nor I never saw it.
I beg mercy of the Court.
I met a man that I knew, who said he had got a bridle to sell; I told him I would get him a customer for it, and I would sell it to the best advantage; I was going by the Bull-and-mouth, and I turned in to make water, but never was within the door.
I lived with Mr. Wigzell about a year and eleven months; I had been in the habit of bottling off wine for several gentlemen, and when I have bottled off wine I have had the cask, and I have had the bottoms, both of white and red, which I have put by; and knowing how to manage them, I have brought them round; not to a proper state, but so as to be sit to drink; I had these bottoms by me, and I spoke to Mr. Close, and told him I had three dozen of each, and he brought Mr. Philpot to me; Mr. Philpot tasted the wine in my cellar, and he and I agreed for the price; I believe there is a witness in Court that has been with me when I have brought home these wines from different places; and, I believe, a witness that tasted the wines in the cask, and was going to recommend me a customer before I bottled it off, but the wine being flat, he could not recommend it to this friend of his, because it was not so good as he could wish it; and I hope and trust the person is in Court now that I sent with it; I drew the permit as usual in the trade, thinking no harm in it; in the course of a few days, Mr. Wigzel was looking over the books, and he saw that in the Excise-book; he said, who is this Philpot; I said, why, Sir, it is a permit that I have borrowed; he said, I shall not stand any such nonsense as that; I told him I would not do so again; and so it passed on till I appeared before the Commissioners at Guildhall; he has done this out of revenge; I hope and trust there are witnesses in Court that can prove that I have bought the casks, and had the bottoms.
My Lord, with regard to the pistol, the evidence that saw me pick the pistol up is now at Bath; it is true I had it in my possession; there was a review in the Park, both of horse and foot, I went into the Park to see it, and kicked this before me; I picked it up, and with a bit of stick I tried it, and found it was not loaded; I looked at the lock, and found there was but one screw in it; as to Miss Nation, I am perfectly innocent; it was a very hot day, and the people were drove about very much, and there were a great many people glad to put handkerchiefs in their hats to keep the sweat from running down their faces; I dare say there were fifty people in the Park with handkerchiefs in their hats; I have lived with Lord Howe, and some of the first families in the kingdom, and am now in the Custom-house; there were several people running in Kensington-gardens; I offered to be searched when I was stopped; but as to Miss Nation, the great Searcher of hearts knows I never saw her purse or money, and we shall be judged by-and-by; I know I had this pistol about me; I thought it would look black against me, and I threw it away.
I was coming through the City, when I got through Temple-bar, by the first church, it was a very wet night, and I picked up a handkerchief, and upon shaking it this paper dropped out; I never was in London till three weeks before this.
When that gentleman came up to me, I told him it was not my horse, and he asked me if I knew the price, and I told him I believed the price was about five guineas.
Was I not standing still when you first saw me?
I picked up the tea-chest at the step of a door in Dean-street; I did not know whose property it was.
I have nothing to say, any more than this, I trust to the Jury for what punishment they chuse, after what they have spoke it is of no use to say any thing.
Yes; there were a great many others, oval and square too.
Mr. Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, I was going to Drury-lane theatre, and was violently crushed, in consequence of which I drew back, and standing against the farther end of the colonade, Mr. Williams came up and charged me with picking his pocket, says I, sir, I believe you are mistaken, says he, why, here is my money, catching me by the collar; says I, it cannot be my money, and how it came here I do not know; says he, you are endeavouring to hide it, says he, what are you stirring your foot at; says I, sir, I see something lye there, and I suppose you would stir your foot to see what it was; Mr. Cooper came up at the time, and caught me by the collar, and likewise picked up some money; I was given in charge to Mr. Beresford, the officer, and taken to the Brown-hear; that is all I know about the mat ter; I positively deny any thing of the charge alledged against me; I am entirely innocent, and in your hands I trust my cause.
It is the first offence I ever was guilty of.
If you saw me take it, why did not you stop me?
I know nothing more about it than a child unborn.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
The witness swear very false if she says she lost the pot; I never knew any thing about the pot.
I was employed by a man to carry it to Blackfriar's-bridge.
I am guilty of this offence; I hope your Lordship will suffer me to go to sea.
I am as innocent as a child unborn; I had no tools to cut it away with, not even a knife; they searched me and I had nothing about me; the gentleman said, you rascal, I have been robbed so many times that I will send you to Botany Bay.
I do not know what to say.
Have you not said that you never saw me till after I was brought back, two hours after the affair happened?
I had been up stairs with a young woman for a quarter of an hour, and then we went and had something to drink together; after that I went as far as Lombard-street, and she desired me to call as I came back, which I did, and hearing these people come up stairs, I stepped into the closet; I was never near the house.
I picked it up all over dirt.
It was twenty-one inches and a half, I have witnesses to prove it.
My Lord, I had like to have been murdered twice by the deceased, once with a poker in his right hand and a knife in his left at the same time; that was the time that I made my escape out of the room, and the deceased at that time locked the door, and kept in the foreman belonging to the plaintiff; then I went to fetch Lyne to my assistance; he went with me; I knocked at the fore room door, and asked if Ledeka was there, but I received no answer; Ledeka will tell you that the deceased held a knife to his breast, and would not let him answer me; then I begged of him to come out quietly; I begged of Mrs. Bartolomichi to prevail on him to come out; I told her I would go down with her to Mr. Degville, and take their joint note for the debt, or I would go with them to the plaintiff; he would not comply with either; I then told him if he would come out and behave like a civil man, I would take his own note for six weeks at my own risk; he then told me he would either murder me or I should murder him, for he would not go to prison; I then told him I could not leave him, I must break the door open; but I thought proper to fetch more assistance, I found him so very violent; I then returned in about five minutes with three others; just as we got within about twenty or thirty yards of the deceased's lodgings, I saw the deceased drive out Lyne with a dagger in his right hand; he put his left hand on to the door-post, and extended his right arm, and made a blow which we were very much afraid was in his shoulder; we then all followed him up stairs, but he was so very quick that we lost fight of him; we searched the back-garret, and he was not there; we then returned to the fore-room of the two pair of stairs, one of the persons with me saw the key on the inside of the door, I concluded that the deceased was in that room, and then put a stick just by the lock and shoved it open; it came open very easy, there was no damage done to the lock; I entered the room first, and Crane immediately after me; the deceased then ran to me with the dagger in his right hand, I made my escape out of the room, and cried murder; he then immediately attacked M. Crane, and made a blow at his breast with a dagger, which he avoided; he was making another blow at him in the breast apparently, I then said hold of the poker, which laid upon the drawers, the same poker which the deceased bad drove me out with, and in that instant I threw it at him, just as the dagger was coming towards Crane's breast; the poker entered just under the nose; at that instant he let the dagger fall which he had in his hand; he pulled out the poker with both his hands, and made a blow at Crane with it, he then immediately ran towards the window, which was open, and certainly would have jumped out if Crane had not caught hold of him and pulled him back; Crane and one or two more laid hold of him, and brought him down stairs instantly, he never fell down at all; and the witnesses will tell you there were no chairs or tables at all moved.
I did not know his name.
I have nothing more to say in my defence man my corporal has said.
A copper of mine had fell out of a cart, and I took it by mistake; there were two coppers standing, and I took the wrong one.
I am not the man: I was committed by a prosecutor from Westminster.
They stopped me and challenged me with the card of lace; they searched me and found nothing upon me, and they were going to let me go; and then they picked up a card of lace under the coach, and said I had picked that young man's pocket of the lace, and then they took me to the Compter.
On Saturday last, a man asked me if I wanted a job; I said, yes; and he took me down this yard, shewed me the job, and told me to carry it over Blackfriars-bridge; upon that, he took the bag of nails and put them upon my back; I had not gone but a very few paces before I was taken into custody; I have served his Majesty five years in the Guards, and was never taken into custody before; I hope your Lordship, and the Gentlemen of the Jury, will shew me lenity now.
I had no handkerchief in my hand; what he has sworn is as false as it is true that there is a God in heaven; one handkerchief was full of holes, and the other I had a clean shirt wrapped up in it.
I never had any more sheep but what I had honestly paid for; I did not know any thing about the sheep before Tuesday morning; I mentioned to Mr. Grover that I had got some sheep at home, and asked him if he wanted any; I told him he might have a score, or half a score, or fifteen, or any number he pleased; finding these sheep came wrong into my drove, and not knowing where they came from, I sent them to Mr. Grover's to be killed, because they were sinking in flesh; the other four I let Mr. Harman have; I told him they came wrong into my drove, I did not know the price, and when I learned the price I would let them know, for they should pay no more than I did; Robinson came down on the Wednesday, and I paid him for the nine sheep; he took fifteen guineas from me for them, one pound fifteen shillings a-piece; he told me they were his property; I told young Grover to tell his father I did not know the price of them, when I found out the owner I would let him know.
I was very much distrest, and my shopmates had given me some beer; I had very little, and it affected my head; I do not know what I was in the watch-house for; it is the first crime I ever committed; how I came by the things I do not know; I throw myself at your Lordship's feet for mercy; I have a wife and children.
I never saw the things.
I was at work on the 17th of April at the prosecutor's: I left off work at six o'clock, I sat down and had a pint of porter, I drank as many as five pints, besides a pipe of tobacco; I went to Mrs. Harding at the bar, and told her I had not money enough to pay her, I would pay her on Saturday night; I went out of doors through the passage into the street, and from there I went to another house, where I knew I could have a pint of beer without money; I had another pint there, and then went home to bed; my little boy was coming from the Sunday-school, the Sunday following, and picked up a bit of paper, and gave it to my wife, and she put it in the glass; it is not in my name, nor my wife's; my wife has been kept in prisoner ever since; I have been obliged to send my children to the work-house.
Did you not assert, at Bow-street, that the man that robbed captain Owen galloped past you, with a crape over his face, and that the wind blew it on one side?
My Lord, I hardly know how to express myself upon this dreadful occasion; I am a very unfortunate man as well in health as pecuniary circumstances, and it is a very improbable thing that a man like me, who has a very bad rupture at this moment, and which I have had for a number of years, should attempt such an offence as this; I have had the honour of serving in the navy, as a midshipman and captain's clerk in the Bellerophon; I left that ship through debilitation; I was in a very debilitated state, I remained ill for eight or nine months; I had no means of subsistence, but dependence on my friends; I was then recommended to be a clerk in the lottery insurance, in Oxford-street; it was actual distress that drove me to that, and nothing else, since which I have been in a very bad way; I never was out of town in my life, till the day I was taken, except to Portsmouth and back again, and if you examine Carpmeal, who is present, he will state in what situation he found my lodgings; I declare before this honourable Court and Almighty God, as I hope and expect to meet my precious Redeemer, that I am as innocent of that robbery as any man in the world ever was, so help me God; it is a serious matter for me to assert such a thing, a very serious matter; I have had a vast number of distresses in my time, but I declare to my Maker, that what I now assert is a truth, and nothing but the truth, as I hope to see him.
My Lord, the day that I was apprehended by Mr. Balam, and when I hired the horse, I told Mr. Watson I was going to South-Mims, which is but a very little distance from where I was, I have an uncle lives there that I meant to have called upon, that was my reason for going that road; when I was taken, I was very glad it had frustrated my intention in a thing that I never was guilty of; and as to the day that they attribute the robbery to me, I was at Mr. Castell's in the morning, about half past eleven o'clock, and I only went to the other end of the town to see my poor mother, who is bed-ridden; I staid with her about an hour, or an hour and a half, and then I took a walk round and came to Mr. Castell's again; that I declare is the truth, and nothing but the truth.
She said she would send me to jail if I did not give her the handkerchief.
I was coming down Ratcliff-highway; I met with a sailor ; he said, shipmate, where are you going; I told him I was going on board my own ship; he said he was going to Portsmouth, and he would give me a pot or two of beer if I would go to the pawnbroker's, and pawn this handkerchief for him; I told him he might go him self; he said he did not like to go into a pawnbroker's shop, there were always so many women there; and I bought them of him, and pawned one of them; I gave him the money for both of them.
You say I swore at you; what words did I make use of?
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court, and the decision of the Jury; I have a wife and three children who reside thirty miles in the country, and my friends are all there; I did not expect my trial to come on so soon.
I found them coming out of our warehouses.
The first was a holiday, on every holiday we leave the doors open; on the 1st of May I went out, and took a pint of porter; I met with a person that had this load; when I have nothing to do, I do any thing for any body that will employ me; I met with a person who asked me to take this box in a coach to Chesterfield-street, Marybone, and having nothing to do, I took it.
On the 6th of April, I was discharged from the Warwickshire Fencible Cavalry, at Coventry; I received seventy-one days arrears, fourpence halfpenny a day, one pound six and seven-pence halfpenny; then I received fourteen days pay, at one and three-pence a day, seventeen and sixpence, and thirteen shillings for doing a serjeant's horse, and I sold my bridle and saddlebags, and horse-cloth, and a pair of buck-skin breeches, two pair of black gaters, and a pair of trowsers to a serjeant, I got one pound eleven and sixpence for them; I was discharged, and did not know how to carry them home; on the 16th of April, I inlisted in the Royal Waggon Train, and got two guineas bounty, then I went upon a recruiting party for the Plymouth division, and got a recruit, and I had two guineas for him; then I was ordered to Birmingham, and from there to Nottingham; then I was ordered to Hertford, and from there I came to this house; I was billetted there, and was very ill, being wet and tired, and I went to bed, the landlord dried my jacket for me, and brought it up to the bed to me, and then I started for Staines.
Before the Magistrate, the prosecutor said he could not swear to the money.
On Monday, in the beginning of April, I came to London from Portsmouth, and I brought these handkerchiefs with me, and I gave two handkerchiefs to these young women; I went to this gentleman's shop to buy a pair of breeches, and I gave him one shilling earnest; next day I went to Gravesend with some sailors, and when I went for the breeches he challenged me with taking the handkerchief I had round my neck from him.
I bought the coat of a Jew, and gave one shilling and sixpence for it; I am totally innocent of the robbery.
When I met with that man at Dartford, he said, why did not you ship with the other men; and I said, I should be a d-d fool to let him ship me, for him to get three guineas; if I shipped myself, I should have it myself; he is a crimp.
I never took his bundle: he wanted to crimp me as he did the other two men.
You are upon your oath, and I hope you will take care what you swear; you say I was at the coffee-house door, I was not near the coffee-house door - are you certain it was me?
Was there not something round that bag?
I found them in the square I saw two men whispering together, and hand something over the iron pallisadoes; I went by that corner, they went away, and I looked and saw a stick sticking to something, and I took it up, I thought they would be advertised or something, and I should get something to help me on the road, I was going down to Scotland, I did belong to the Dunbarton fencibles ; in the midst of judgment, gentlemen, pray remember mercy.
Lucas demanded a shilling of me, and said I should not work there long if I did not give it him; the next day he asked me for a shilling again; some time after that I met him upon London-bridge, and my wife was with me; he asked me where I was going, and I told him I was going to work in the Borough; and he told me I was very foolish not to give him the shilling, for I might have staid there till now.
Did I not meet you several times, both morning and evening, as you were going to and from the tobacco-warehouses, and I going into the Borough to work; did not you and I go to the Tumble-down Dick in the Borough, and have a pint of porter, and toss which should pay for it?
I have nothing to say.
My first wife and I agreed to part; Mary Drake is my lawful wife.
I did not run away, I only wear a foot-pace, I went very volunteerly.
I was on the road, and saw a man who looked like a chimney-sweeper, with a horse; I asked him what he was going to do with it; he said; it was going to be slaughtered, and I bought the horse of him; I gave him a guinea and a pint of beer.
Did I not ask for two-penny worth of bread and cheese?
I went in to buy two-pennyworth of bread and cheese, and two men came in and knocked me down, and ran away with the cheese; I was going to assist the gentlewoman, when she sent for a constable and took me up.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge.
I am as innocent as the child unborn; I know nothing at all of it.
Have not you and your wife been parted; and did you not advertise her in the papers?
I know nothing at all of it.
I never saw Benjamin till I saw him at Marlborough-street; he came and looked at me, and said I was not the man.
The boy told me to follow the other man with the iron, and I did not know rightly where they were gone to.
The picture that I took was not above half the size of that; I have got a wife and two children without a bit of bread for them, and I did not know what to do; I have but one hand. GUILTY .
I don't know any thing of the bonnet.
I saw the handkerchief drop from the gentleman, I picked it up and gave it him immediately.
I found the spoon, at the corner of Portland-street.
I am innocent of the crime, I know nothing of the things.
I was passing by, and this man laid hold of me, and said I was one of the party; he knocked me down, and kicked me till I was not able to stir myself; I lost an entire new hat off my head. GUILTY .
I never saw the prosecutor till the 11th of last month; I never was in London till the 9th.
Did you not tell me that you were a gentleman's servant?
I wish your Lordship to ask him what he is now, and what he has been?
Did you not send your servant to me to try and make it up?
Did you not walk arm in arm with me on the 9th of May?
Mr. Lee lives up two pair of stairs in Milford-lane.
Did you never come into Newgate and tell me that Mr. Oliver sent you?
He made me write a note to Mr. Oliver, and he carried it?
On the 9th of May, I met with the prosecutor, he came up to me, and asked me what it was o'clock, I told him it was past eleven; he asked me whether the play was over, or whether I had been to the play; I said, I had; I told him I belonged to the Sheer bulk, and I was going into the city; he said he was going that way too; he laid hold of my arm, and we walked together down Drury-lane, till we came to this passage, there he put his hand round me, and squeezed me very hard in the side; I then up't with my fist, and knocked him under the eye, he said, he did not think a young man. would use him so, but he was sorry for what he had done, he knew it was not right: we went on to the Magpie and Stump, and I called the watch close by the door; he then ran into the house, and said, he would get somebody to bail him; as soon as he had got in, he called for a pint of porter, I followed him close, and I called for a pint of porter, I would not drink with him, he winked at Mrs. Young, and sat for ten minutes or a quarter of an hour; I saw him go out into the tap-room, take something out of his pocket, and put it under the table; as soon as he had done that, Mrs. Young sent for the watchman, and he accused me of robbing him; I then said, I dare say, if they searched, they would find it about the table where I saw Mr. Oliver throw it.
I don't know any thing about it; I never was in the place.
I am as innocent as the child unborn.
Have you not charged another man with this offence, besides me?
He said, before the Lord-Mayor, that I wrote my name George Wilkinson , in the book?
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I am but little calculated to make a defence, much less when I consider that every eye is upon me, and every ear open to the words I utter; I am but little skilled in logic, but considering the situation I am in, I feel it necessary to exert every nerve. First of all, let us take a slight view of the solicitor for the prosecution, Mr. Loaring, he has been telling you, that I had a lodging in such a place, after that, in such a place, and after that in such a place. Can he prove to you that I bore a bad character at either of those places? Can he prove to you that I defrauded him or any other person, at either of those places? Can he prove to you that I have committed forgeries, or that I have circulated bad notes at either of those places? If he cannot prove that, where is the utility of his speaking? He might as well have told you that I was born in Birmingham, and after having been at school, was apprenticed, and at the expiration of that apprentiship, became a journeyman; it would have been as fully applicable, or he might as well have told you, that Paris was the metropolis of France, or that the Old Bailey did not stand upon London-Bridge. He did not tell you that I was a clerk in the Bank; he did not tell you that I was employed to go about searching every place to discover forged notes; no, he did not tell you that, because it would have militated against himself; but I leave it for you to draw the inference upon his character, while I attempt to proceed a little farther. I will now take a view of the Counsel for the prosecution, and in doing this, I cannot but feel myself astonished to see a man stand up in this Court with all his strength, with all his might, with all his logic, attempting a stab a fellow-creature to the heart; he has been traducing, vilifying me, stating that he has not the least doubt of proving my guilt by such and such a circumstance, by such and such evidence; and he has not least doubt, that the facts will be proved; forgery cannot be proved against me, but he hopes to cast me upon circumstances. Gentlemen, be careful, consider the situation you are in, consider the eye of God is upon you, and likewise consider that you have this day taken your oath to do me justice. Has the prosecutor proved to you, that I committed the forgery? Has any evidence proved that I circulated it, knowing it to be forged? Have they proved the least appearance of what I now stand charged with? Gentlemen, your reason must tell you, no; no man's life ought to be taken without the clearest proofs, particularly for forgery, for as soon as a man is cast for forgery, you may as well shoot him dead at the bar, for there is no respite, all is then over; suppose either of you had a son, most likely some of you have; suppose it to happened that your son had taken a Bank-note, and he pays it to his tailor or his doctor; it turns out to be a forged one; it is traced to his possession, he is taken, doubled ironed, and tried for the forgery; what would be your feelings, as fathers, upon that occasion? Would it not be your prayer to Almighty God, that his innocence might appear; would you not sympathize with his situation, would you not feel for him? Certainly you would, and what would be your opinion of that Jury, who should find a verdict against him for nothing at all? should you not think it head that your son should lose his life for nothing? Can any reason upon earth be brought forward to justify such a verdict? No, Gentlemen, your reason will tell you, no, it is impossible. Gentlemen, be careful, let me exhort you to bring your understandings to the test of truth. Has the prosecutor believed to you, that I am guilty of the circulation of the notes of which he wishes to convict me upon circumstances where the evidence is not clear? If you think as I do, and as every body must do, that the Counsel for the prosecution has not proved the least appearance of guilt, you cannot, consistent with your oaths, this day, find me guilty; you cannot, consistent with the principles of justice and humanity; you cannot, consistent with the duty of Christians this day take away my life. Gentlemen, I have oftentimes heard, that men have lost their lives upon circumstances. This, in my opinion, is extremely cruel, because, if circumstances are ever so pointed, if they are ever so obvious, if they are ever so clear. they only amount to probability, and probability implies at least a kind of uncertainty, and where there is no proof, gentlemen, you ought to be very careful; but even supposing a man ought to lose his life upon circumstances, here there are no direct circumstances at all; for if I am to lose my life because I pay away a note, you, and every person present, might stand at this bar for the offence - offence I cannot call it, but you are as liable, gentlemen, to take a bad note as I am, and if that is the law of this country, don't let England set herself up as an examples to other countries. The Bank would with to convict me upon slight circumstances. With respect to the letter,they would wish to urge it as an evidence of conscious guilt, nothing can be more ridiculous, in my opinion, than this. When I was first taken into custody, I was taken to the House of Correction, and there the Governor (you have most likely heard talk of him) took me into the kitchen, and desired all the turnkeys to watch me closely; no person was suffered to speak to me; my sister came twelve miles from the country to see me, but was not permitted; she went to the justice, and he did not think fit to give an order; I have a brother, who came one hundred miles, and he, with difficulty, got admittance; after I had been there some time, the Governor took me into his private closet, as he calls it, and said, Mr. Holt, you are in a serious situation, depend upon it you will lose your life; you had better tell me all, and you shall have an attorney and counsel, and the best advice, for, says he, the Bank-directors are so severe, that they will. prosecute a person for only having about him a forged note; I told him I had nothing to fear, and therefore as to discovering any thing to him, I could not; I was informed they meant to do all they could to convict me; this induce me to write this letter, in order to make my escape, though I was innocent, knowing I had such a body to contend against, and having heard that men had been executed upon such circumstances, I began to be alarmed, which was the cause of my writing that letter, but after that, I had several opportunities of getting away; I was placed in the kitchen where the keys were kept, and I could have let myself out, as well as all the prisoners confined in the prison, if I had pleased, but I was determined I would trust to Providence and take my trail. It is very true, that I lived with a female, and in order to get rid of her, I took this other lodging. As to the materials that have been produced, they are such as I use in my business as a varnisher. Gentlemen, whatever may be your verdict, it will not make me unhappy, as I am conscious of my own innocence. I do not conceive it to be necessary to say any more upon the subject.
I was at work for Mr. Skidmore that day till seven o'clock; I was coming down Snow-hill with the volunteers, and this gentleman laid hold of me, and said, I had robbed him.
The evidence given by Hill is totally false; any thing further I leave to my Counsel.
I went to my club on the 14th of July, I was there by twenty minutes after one o'clock, and I was not out of the room till I was taken out by that gentleman; as soon as the gentleman came in, he said, do not be alarmed, for there is a person in the room that has committed a robbery, then the girl pointed me out, and he said, I must go with him; I was smoking my pipe; I begged of him to let me drink a glass of punch before I went, which he did, and then he took me to Acton, to the constable's, and then I was taken to the watch-house.
A man engaged four of us to go to a job, and sent me back for a pair of canhooks; I saw them lying at the warehouse door, I took them up, and put them under my arm, and this gentleman laid hold of me; I had no intention of stealing them.
I had been three days without victuals, I could get no work to do; I have no friends, I come from Dartmouth.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I have nothing to say; I expected Mr. Hodgson, of Symond's Inn; but he is not here to-day.
I sent to Pickering, when I was in Tothill-fields, for the three shillings, and he sent me word he would keep it till the sessions, on purpose to do me; I wish you would look into it, for it is made up among them.
I know no more of it than the child unborn.
I was promised forgiveness from my master; I was very much in liquor, and am very sorry for what I have done.
I asked the gentleman for his watch, and he gave it me directly.
I have a large family of five children, who are motherless, I hope the Court will in judgement, remember mercy.
Did you lose sight of the object you were in pursuit of?
I was going past, I heard the cry of stop thief; there was a man and two women before me, and this gentleman came up and laid hold of me; the bat is not mine, the shoes are mine; I am a shoemaker, and every shoemaker whets his knife upon his shoe, and using a white stone it makes the shoe white.
I never saw that sugar till it was laid before me at the office.
I was going along Freshwharf, and the officer laid hold of me, tied my hands and took me to the Compter, they searched me, but I had no sugar upon me.
I am as innocent as the child unborn; I saw a man take a piece, and I took it from him to take care of it.
When I was brought back, Mrs. Jackson was asked if I was the person, and she said she could not tell; then they took me to Newington-green; the constable asked her, and she said she not say that I was the man, and then a gentleman came and said, he would swear he saw me take the purse out of the lady's hand.
I was starving, and very much distrest; I never did such a thing before; I have not a farthing in the world; I did not know what to do with it when I had got it.
I was at work in a lighter, and after she was worked out, I found this coffee spilt about, and it would have been trod upon and spoiled if I had not picked it up; I did not know that I was doing any harm.
I have not any body to speak for me.
I bought the watch of George Hands , I gave him half-a-guinea, I was to give him so much a week for it.
I declare that I received two notes, one from Mr. Shakel, and the other from White, of Fleet-street, as I have endorsed it, which it was my duty to do; the rest of my defence I leave to my counsel.
A woman told me, if I would carry that to the stage, at Swallow-street, she would give me sixpence, and I had not carried it far, before the gentleman laid hold of me.
I picked it up under the gateway; there is short straw and filth among it.
I was very much fuddled; I do not know any thing of the bridle.
I received three shillings and sixpence of that gentleman, and when I came home my master was not at home, and I gave my mistress the money; I gave her seventeen shillings and four-pence in all.
I have nothing to say.
I never was in the house in my life. GUILTY .
I am innocent of the charge.
Mr. Stinton, the elder, told me, if I found any thing concealed, to let him know, and I should be promoted in the warehouse, and as he was not much liked in the warehouse for fear of a trap being laid for him, three years ago, I stopped a man with nutmegs, and it was dropped; I could not walk the streets safely after it, I was so ill used, and that was the reason why I took them to him in that private manner; I have been thirteen years in the warehouse.
I am quite innocent of what I am charged with; I went up the court, and had some beer, and I dare say it was the space of ten minutes before I came down the court again.
I have nothing to say.
I bought these taps of a young man that was going Armourer's mate on board an Indiaman.
Mr. March gave me orders to pawn these things; he was short of money very often, and bid me go and get some money; I was Mr. March's friend, and he wanted money when nobody knew it but myself; he very often had not money to buy a dinner. For the Prisoner.
Dawson never saw me write a line in his life.
I have nothing to say.
When I went away, this young woman was in the yard, and I said, good morning to her; I had no bundle nor any thing with me; there was a deal more people slept upon the same gallery that I did.
I was going along Bishopsgate-Street , and a boy came running out of the shop, and said, will you hold these; I said, what are they; he said, never mind, I will give you a penny, and he put them into my hand, and ran away; I ran after him, and this gentleman laid hold of me.
There are five of my comrades that are quartered with me, and this was a bag, belonging to the regiment, that I always fetched our meat in; how the goose came there, I do not know.
I never saw the woman in my life before. NOT GUILTY .
When I was at Marlborough-Street this man swore that I had a blue coat on; the round-house keeper proved that I had not a blue coat on; and Ragan, the watchman, said, he was not sure whether it was a blue coat or not.
I was at work at Spring-gardens; we had finished the house of a gentleman, and he gave the tradesman a supper; about half past ten, it was brought on the table; from that time we were drinking till twelve, or thereabouts; I made too free, and, in going along Fleet-street, I went up this court, and laid down to sleep at three or four o'clock; the watchman came and took me up, and told me the same he has here; my master is a plaisterer, in Gutter-lane, Cheapside; I saw him yesterday afternoon, and he said he would attend to-day to my character.
I was very much in liquor on the Saturday night, and I asked Drewee to lend me some clean things to go out with; he said, he would; I went up into the room, but could not find him, and I took them; I went out, and spent the day with my friend that I had got intoxicated with, and, as I was coming home on the Sunday evening, I met with a girl that asked me to go home and sleep with her, which I did, and when I got up in the morning, I had got nothing left but the shoes; I told Drewee that I would make him any recompence in my power. (The shoes were produced, and deposed to by the prosecutor).
A boy gave me these glasses to have a glass put in; and when I went into the shop, I could not find any body, and I came out again, and then that gentleman laid hold of me.
I am an old man; I was totally in distress, and had not had a mouthful for two days preceding, nor my wife, nor children; if your Lordship will shew me a little lenity, and give me an opportunity of returning to the paths of virtue and honestly, I will ever pray.
I was coming through Longacre, and a person accosted me at the corner of the court, and asked me if I wanted to buy a trunk, he said I should have it a bargain; he asked me a guinea and a half, and I gave him a guinea for it; I purchased the trunk for the son of the Reverend Mr. Lindsey, at Charlton.
I have got two witnesses to prove that Laythorp offered to lay a wager that he would transport me, or hang me.
I was very much distrest, and meant to have replaced them, when I got work.
Going along Carter-lane, I heard some men talking very loud, and I stopped, out of curiosity, to hear what they were talking about, and the patrole came up, and said, he would knock them down, if they attempted to run away; they directly ran away, and a gentleman caught hold of me, instead of one of those men.
I received the gold from William Moore , who is just out of his time; I believed it to be his own at that time; he asked me to make him a dozen pair of ear-rings, and I was to have two-pence a pair for making them.
It was impossible for me to have stolen any pepper; I gave a black man some tobacco for it; I thought it was his own property.
I know nothing of it.
I found them near the Barracks, at Knightsbridge.
I found it in the road; I meant to bring it to town, and have it advertized.
I picked up the stockings on the ground, in Piccadilly; I am an American; the ship went away without me; I have been twice sick in St. Giles's workhouse.
I saw these four loaves standing upon a step, and I took them; Mr. Longden can give me a character.
I had been drinking a little, and was very sick; I turned into the court on that account, and this gentleman came and challenged me with taking the boot.
When I came down stairs Mr. Gore laid hold of me, and called his wife out; he overhauled my breeches, and pulled them down over my knees; he found nothing there; then he said to his wife, they must be somewhere behind the counter, and there they found them; I never had the property at all.
Mary Clarke ran after me in Oxford-road, she had some more girls with her; she wanted me to give her something to drink, and, in order to get rid of her, I gave her something to drink; I missed one shilling out of my pocket, and I told her, I must have it; I threatened to charge the watch with her, and she said, if I would go home with her, she would let me have it; I went home with her, and she wanted me to stop with her all night; then she would not let me have it, and, I said, I would take something out of the room for it, and I took these things.
I was making water down the gateway, and this man came up, and said, I had taken the coat, I was not within twenty yards of it. GUILTY . (Aged 32.)
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, if it should appear to the Court and Jury that I have done any thing wrong in this matter, I am the most unfortunate of human beings. I was called upon, by Mr. Collinridge, to make his will: after his death, it was necessary that his account with the Navy-board should be adjusted; it appeared to me next to impossible that it could be done; I was desired to do it as well as I was able; I had neither leisure nor ability to do it; I employed an accomptant, and the papers and vouchers were made out by him in the best manner he could; I had no suspicion there was any thing wrong; I had no interest in the subject, I had no indictment to do any things amiss; I have transmitted business to a large amount, for persons of the highest respectability, to whose voluntary and kind testimony to my intregity, I have the satisfaction to appeal with confidence; in October last, I had the first intimation, that a charge of a serious nature was made against me; I have, since that, been many months at large upon bail, always ready to meet any charge that might be brought forward; I have now submitted myself to the justice of my country, in the humble confidence that they will not take away a life valueable to myself, more valuable to my family, for an offence from which, if I had committed it, I could not have benefited one shilling, and for which I hope the whole tenor of my life proves I could have no inducement.
I picked up the basket in Whitechapel, and this man came and knocked it off my shoulder; I have a witness here that saw me pick it up.
I went into the house to ask for a letter for the hospital; I told him, I hoped he would excuse the liberty I took of coming into the house; he d-d me, and said I came to steal something; I said, I had not, but for a letter which I had had before; he took me up for stealing his boots, which I had not seen; I have failed in the four quarters of the world with Lord Howe, Lord St. Vincent, and Lord Duncan, and never was charged with any offence before.
I was going home, and a man offered me one shilling to carry this bed for him; that was at the corner of Queen-street; and as soon as I had got it upon my back, the watchman stopped me and the man run away.
A man gave it me to hold a minute, while he went into a house to ask for some money. GUILTY , aged 60.
In what state did I appear when I went into your shop?
My Lord, it was not my intention, originally, to have given the Court any trouble; the next morning after it happened, I had not the smallest recollection of the situation I had been in the night before; Mr. Aughtie said, that he knew perfectly well, that I was intoxicated the night before, and he offered me to go on board a man of war. GUILTY, aged 49.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I acknowledge that I have been guilty; I was a distressed man, with seven children, and no wife to take care of them; I hope, my Lord, that you will shew me mercy.
There was none of it Mr. Collins's; I had it to mill for another person.
My Lord, if gentlemen of respectability to speak in my behalf, could be of service to me, I could have had them to-morrow, but to day they are not here; every person with whom I have had dealings would give me the most irreproachable character; and if other pieces of silk were cut away, they might tally with Mr. Sampson's, as well as this; my friends are three hundred miles from town, and are, I am proud to say, of the, first respectability in their neighbourhood; I served my time regularly in the county of Cornwall, and had a liberal education. NOT GUILTY .
Have you always said that I was the man that run out of your house?
He asked me if I was the prisoner; I said, yes; he said the sailor was taken; and I said, I was very glad of it, if they had got the right man that took the things.
I had been to see an acquaintance, and as I was going home through this lane, they stopped me; I never saw any other man.
Mr. Miller ordered me to take it home to his house, and he would buy it of me.
When I had done my work, I went home to bed, and these men came and took me. GUILTY , aged 38.
I saw several people running, and I ran with them; I know nothing of the sugar.
Did I behave with any violence to you?
I was going to Kentish-town, and I met that gentleman upon the bridge; I told him I was very much distrest, and asked him to give me a trisle; he said he had no halfpence, and then I stopped him; he cried out stop thief, and that young man came up; I went very quietly with him, and never offered to meddle with his watch; I had just burried my wife, and got two children; I was very much distrest; the spring of the pistol is broke; I had it to mount; I little thought of doing such a thing as I have done.
I know nothing at all of it.
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, I had lately taken a public-house, and I understand, from all the enquiry that I can make, that my wife has been imposed upon by some person who has called at our house with these things, and produced, as I understand, a very high miniature, being a striking resemblance of a boy of mine, about four years old; she was imposed upon to receive them, and she lent a guinea upon the whole of them; I learned that my wife was imposed upon, from observing that the locket was not gold; she had been told it was; Brown has said, that my wife told him, her brother was a miniature-painter, and had delivered them; I did not here her say so; I was in another room with Cook. My Lord and Gentlemen, I rest myself, under these circumstances, satisfied that you will do me justice. NOT GUILTY .
A little boy called me up to go a mushrooming; it was a very wet morning; my father said, if I went out of the house, he would give me a lathering, and when I came out, I thought my father was after me, and I ran down there; I had no intent to steal.
I belong to the Venus brig, I am cook of her; I came on shore on Sunday evening, just about dusk; I have got a witness here who saw me find the watch at Union-stairs.
I found this sugar coming down Thames-street about six o'clock in the morning; I belong to the Coldstream regiment of guards; my serjeant has been waiting here all day, but is gone. GUILTY , aged 25. - Confined three months in Newgate , and delivered to his serjeant.
I was first of all committed for a misdemeanor, and was out upon bail from August till November; I had been at work till half past one o'clock, and was going home to my lodgings; I expected my trial was put off till the next Sessions, and I have no friends here.
My Lord, I am a bricklayer by trade; I went up this ladder with an expectation of getting a job, I had worked for the same master before, and they asked me what I wanted; and I said, I only wanted to see my master; they used me very ill, and therefore I made my escape.
I was so much in liquor I did not know any thing of the transaction till the Sunday morning. GUILTY , aged 49 - Confined six months in the House of Correction , and fined 1s .
I am a smith and a nailmaker by trade, I called to look at some nails for a sample; I have got plenty of nails myself in my shop.
I have nothing to say, I only want the things that the officer took from me.
I have only this to say, that I did give him the dog, and he did promise me some seeds in return.
I was coming from Wickham; I was out of place; I met with a man that said, he would give me a job, if I would meet him on the other side of South-end, on the Sunday night, he would give me these beasts to drive to Smithfield; he said, he wanted to go to Deptford to do a little job, and he thought he should be in Smithfield as soon as I was, but be never came, and they charged me with them.
On Sunday morning, the 2d of November, I was coming along Bridge-street, and these two gentlemen came out, and laid hold of me.
I was in liquor, when I went down, I did not know I was in the yard, till after I had been in the Compter two or three hours; I did not know what I was about.
At the time Baynton was arrested, he authorized me to do every thing in this house for him, and for a dozen or twenty days, I did business in the house, and was answerable for every thing, and these sailors asked me to go with them to buy some watches, and they were to give me a one hundred pound note, and I told this gentleman I would be answerable for the watches; when he came in, I was drawing off a bottle of gin in the cellar, and when I came up they had all got their watches; I never saw them before, they were strangers to me, and when I was taken up, I was endeavouring to find them.
Last Monday was a week, Thomas Rolls brought eight cakes of soap, and wanted me to take it away, and I said I would not have it, for I did not know what to do with it.
Did I not tell you not to take them out?
I desired Rolls not to take the soap out; he said his mistress had been terrifying him, and said he was as bad as the man; he said his master was better, and had offered him a guinea, if he could defect any of the men.
I have nothing to say; I have no friends. GUILTY , aged 24. - Confined six months in Newgate , and publicly whipped .
An that I can recollect of the circumstance is, that late at night, or early in the morning, I left the company in a quarrelsome state; it might be between two and three o'clock, as high as I can recollect; the next day, failing into company with people of the same capacity as myself, at the water-side, I was drinking again, and I knew nothing of this box being in my pocket, till the latter part of the day; and how I came by it, or how I got it, I cannot tell; I had been drinking all night, and was still insensibly drunk; I was afterwards informed that I had called at Mr. Barnes's that Monday morning, and I was totally insensible till I was in the Compter.
I went up stairs to enquire for one James Gregory; a boy that stood at the door told me to go up there; I did not meddle with the things.
I went into the shop for some tobacco; there was nobody there, and I came out again; I ran, because it rained hard; I am as innocent as a child unborn. GUILTY of stealing the goods, but not of breaking and entering the dwelling-house . - Transported for seven years .
On the 3d of November, I was in Portland barracks; I was making the best of my way home; I stopped to make water at Southmolton-street; the watchman came up, and swore by his Maker, he would fix me; I thought he was going to strike me, and I made the best of my way from him, till I was took by another man.
I will take my oath I never was at the top of the house; I had been out that night watching my master's garden, and as I was coming home, I picked it up.
I was coming from work that night; I went in to get a pint of beer, and there was a fiddler came in, and these two women, and some sailors began dancing, and during the time they were dancing, the cloaks were taken out of the house; they sent immediately for the officer, and gave charge of me; I am seafaring man; I have no witnesses. GUILTY , aged 33. - Confined six months in the House of Correction , and fined 1s .
The flour was not his, it was in my hat on the Saturday night.
I went into the country last Wednesday was three weeks, to Guildford, Farnham, and round that part; there was a fair on the Thursday, so I staid there all night; I stopped along with my friend at Blackwater, till it was late in the evening, I cannot say what time it was, as I had been drinking freely; he wanted me to stop all Friday night, but I returned home from Blackwater upon a very small horse, and before I had rode eight miles, I was obliged to get down and walk, which I did, to Egham; I then fed him; and when I came on again, I met a person on horseback, and asked him what road he was going; he said, he was going near to the Magpres, on Hounslow-heath; I told him if he would not go too fast, I should be glad to accompany him; I came along with him till within two miles of the Uxbridge road, when I got off again, and led my poney; a person in a market cart overtook me, and I got into conversation with him, and as we were going along, we overtook a man with these pigs on the foot-road; I says, farmer; firs I, what have you got there; he replied, I have got a few hogs; I asked him where he was going with them; he said, I am going towards town; I asked him if they were for sale, and where he brought them from; he said, from Uxbridge; I asked him whether he was going to take them to any body particular, and he said, no; I told him if he would bring them to my house, as I dealt a little in the pig way, I would buy them, and I gave him my address; he told me he could not bring them into town, for that he was going to lodge them at the Red Lion, at Paddington; I asked him the price of them; he said, three guineas and a half a-piece; I said, I could buy good pigs for about two guineas; in the dark they appeared small; the person who was along with me held my horse, and I felt them; I told the man I would meet him at the Red Lion, at Paddington, and try if I could buy them; he said, he would as lief fell them to me there, as to meet me at the Red Lion; I agreed with him that two guineas and a half a-piece, by what I could see of them, was a very fair price; I gave him two guineas earnest, and kept helping to drive the pigs till within a mile of Bayswater, when he said he wanted to step into town, and if you will continue driving the pigs to the Red Lion, I will meet you there; I continued driving them till I came to the corner of the Black Lion, when I said, does this take me to the Edgware-road, and some person said, yes, that is the Edgware-road; I drove the pigs on as gently as foot could fall, till I was just got up to Paddington, when Mr. Peele came up to me, and said, I want you; I answered, I will go back with you, or you may go along with me; he said, no, you must come back with me; says I, I am going to lodge these pigs at the Red-lion, at Paddington, and if you will go with me you may see the man I had them of; but he said no, and we walked together to the Blacklion, at Bayswater; and when the owner of the pigs came, I gave him my address, and told him in what manner I came by them; that is all I have to say.
My Lord, I declare I never in my life had the least malice or intention to injure the man, but always would have done any thing to serve him, as, I believe, he would me; the accident has hurt me so much, that I have been very unhappy, and can say no more.
All I have to say is, I am innocent of what is laid to my charge.
Those tools I bought of a man named John Powell; he died about four years ago.(The property was deposed to by the prosecutor).
My Lord, necessity and starvation compelled me to do it; I was brought from Ireland by an American gentleman, and have no friends in this country.
I was coming down St. John's-street, and saw that lay at the side of the pavement. GUILTY , aged 14.
At the corner of Catherine-street, I saw a man running with this piece of goods, a man called stop thief, he dropped it, and I picked it up.
I am innocent of the crime charged to me.
He took hold of me, there were two men running, and, says he to me, I believe you are one; no, says I, I am not of that description, I am a seasaring man; says he, I shall take care of you.
I am innocent of the charge.
I have nothing to say, but I sold them to these three persons. GUILTY .
Did I not give myself up?
I went into the place to sleep, I did not do any harm to nobody, I am a labouring man, and was never in any trouble in my life before; I work at farmering work.
I hope the Court will be merciful to me. GUILTY , aged 19.
I know nothing at all about it.
I know nothing at al about the stockings. NOT GUILTY .
Was I not at my lodgings the night the things were lost?
I bought these duplicates of a person in the trade.
Did you ever know of my hiring horses of Mr. Pring before?
Did I ever run a bill without its being discharged?
Did I not send the horses home without riding them myself?
On Thursday the 13th of August, I sent the waiter of the Moorgate Coffee-house to Mr. Pring's, to know if I could have a horse to go to Dartford, in Kent; Mr. Pring's man brought a black mare, which I mounted; I told him I was going to Dartford, I told him I should return probably to-morrow evening; I went to Dartford in expectation of returning next day; when I got to Dartford, I had the misfortune to meet with a brother of mine, who was a lieutenant on board his Majesty's ship, Charlotte; he told me, he heard that the ship I belonged to, the Charger, was going to sail; I desired him to ride the mare to town, supposing I could put confidence in my brother, and told him to return the horse to Mr. Pring; I gave him a guinea to pay for it; I always paid Mr. Pring half-a-guinea a day; I rested satisfied that the horse was returned, and went off the next morning with the coach for Plymouth; I understood afterwards, that my brother had gone to Liverpool, and sold the mare there; I have since learnt, that, at that time, he had lost his commistion, but I did not then know it; I heard, about a fortnight ago, that he is in America.
I found them in the road, God is my witness.
I have only to say, that of late years my mental faculties have been much impaired, but I hope the evidence that will appear to my character, will operate in my favour.
Are there any particular marks to those things?
My Lord, these things, as I was coming down St. Giles's, I picked up, tied up in a bundle, I put them upon my back; going up St. Giles's, this man came past me; soon after, I went past him, and this man followed me, overtook me, and swore they were his property, before I ever saw him; I am entirely a stranger.
I was at the window talking with another man, who was standing there; after asking me several questions about the things in the shop, and the different prices, he asked me which way I was going; I told him up Holborn; he asked me to carry this stool for him; I took it up, and carried it for him, and then the people took me into custody.
Did you see me take it from the place?
I was looking for employ, and a man told me if I would take this plank over to Green's, he would give me something to drink; I leave it to the mercy of the Court and Jury.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I wish my witnesses to be called.
On Saturday night, the prosecutor and a woman came up stairs, and wanted to sleep there; he was half drunk, and sent for four shillings worth of gin hot, and for some victuals; we agreed to let them sleep there, he gave Moody some money, and we went away; I went to him in the morning, and he said, that d - d wh - e has robbed me, for I cannot find my breeches; I looked about, and found them; I went to look after the woman, which he knows to be true.
I have nothing to say.
I saw him take the one-pound note out of his pocket to light his pipe with, and heard the half-guinea jink on the table; about half an hour after, he said he had lost it; I put my finger into a corner of his pocket, and took it out, and the gentlemen said he ought to forfeit half-a-crown bowl of punch for taking away a young mans character.
I know nothing of the notes; I never saw them.
I was going to the theatre, and I might be behind the lady, I cannot say; all of a sudden, she said she was robbed, and, in turning round sharp, several people fell backwards on the stairs; I was one, and then they laid hold of me.
The charge that is laid against me is false.
I was going for a pound of sausages for my supper, and as I was going down Black-lion-yard, a man came up and shoved against me, and then four or five more came up, and began to hustle me; I found they were trying to get at my watch, and I pulled it out into my hand, one of them struck a blow at my head with a stick, and then I got away from them.
I beg to have the watch, and my own property; the purse I found at the end of Great Tothil-street.
I never saw the boy till I saw him at Hatton-garden.
I have nothing to say.
I work in the brick-fields; I was going along, and met another boy, and while I was speaking to him this gentleman came up, and said I had stole the ribbon.
I was almost starving, and seeing this bread, I took it.
I was going to work at Mr. Benwell's, in Sloane-street, all night; I was running pretty fast down Sloane-street, when this man came up, and said I had stole his sowl; it is a very likely story that I should steal his sowl, and come past the door again within an hour after.
My wife and I had had a fit of sickness, and we were in very great distress.
I am a porter at Billingsgate: I took a box, and a hammock, to the White Bear in Basinghall-street, and coming back, a gentleman's servant employed me to carry this platform to the Dundee-arms, to go on board one of the Margate boys; he went into a shop in Tower-street, and told me to wait at the top of the steps, and this gentleman stopped me.
Did I not tell you I would pay you as soon as I got into work?
I did not intend to steal the things.
When they are cut for the Jews, they only mark the sides, and, I believe, there are people in Court, that can testify they never saw a pair of hind quarters marked.
I have nothing to say.
I have witnesses here to prove that I was in the house all night.
I was going up Bunhill-row, I met a man with the cheese, who asked me to carry it to Blue-Anchor-alley, and gave me two-pence; I was going along, and these gentlemen took me.
I was going through the passage, and heard the cry of thieves; I fell over the bundle in the passage; when I was stopped, I had not the things in my hands, as is sworn to; the prosecutrix said before the Justice, she thought it was the cat pulling the things out of the drawer, and she did not see any body.
I have nothing to say, I beg for mercy of your Lordship and the Court.
Do you recollect to have ever seen me before that evening?
Are you positive I am the person?
Did you not say before the Magistrate that you were not?
Was there any person who went into the room from the time I ordered the dinner, as you say, till I went away?
You say you met me - did you miss the things before you met me?
Did you see any thing on me?
I am sorry to say, that the gentleman I was in company with on the 29th of November, from one o'clock to seven, is ill, and cannot come, or I could satisfy you I am not the person; he lives at No. 15, Prince's-street, Prince's-square, St. George's in the East.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
As I was going along, three men came along with two cheeses, and one was thrown down as I passed by them, and they ran across the way.
I did not take the ass; another man brought it to me, and then run away and left me.
I can sleep better on the hard boards than that woman can on a feather-bed; she is the person who sent me to pawn it, and no other.
I had been out to spend the evening, and as I was returning home, a man accosted me, and charged me with the robbery; I told him I knew nothing of it, but would go with him any where; they took me to Mr. Troughton's, a master I had worked with, and I asked him if I had done any thing, whether he would forgive me, upon which he told them to take me down to the watch-house.
I was going out of the mob between two hackney-coaches, when somebody laid hold of me, and said, I was a pickpocket; they took me into the Pantheon, where I was searched, but nothing found; those things were brought in afterwards.
I am a poor man, and was out of work; I took the bread on purpose to carry home to my wife and four small children.
I met a Jew who was disposing of some cloaths, and I gave him ten shillings for the gown; when I went home, I had no supper to eat, and having no money, I pawned it for seven shillings and sixpence.
I went to fill the pails, and going along I met a ship-mate, who said to me, you are loaded with cold water, will you have some hot purl; I went into a public-house with him, and left the pails at the door; when I came out again, they were gone.
It was never my intention to defraud Mr. Peddif; I leave it to my Counsel.
I never said such words, nor had I the handkerchief in my possession.
I leave it to my Counsel.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I was in distress at the time.
I meant to get them out in a day or two, after they were missed.
I heard an alarm, I was running, and they laid hold of me.
I have known the man a great many years; I did not take it with an intention of wronging him; I had been drinking very hard, and did not know that I had it.
I am entirely innocent of the charge that is laid against me; I heard the cry of stop thief; I ran with other people, and they laid hold of me. GUILTY , aged 20.
They told me they would forgive me, if I told the truth.
I never was guilty of the like before or since; I hope you will have mercy; I should not have acted so, but I was in liquor, and was ashamed to come home again.
He asked me to drive his team on, which I did, and the things sell off the cart into the high road.
Two boys ran against me, and knocked me down; one of them dropped a piece of calico close by me, and this gentleman came and took me up. GUILTY , aged 12.
I know nothing of the coat; I had had some water thrown over me, and I went up the court and pulled off my coat; I did not see the other coat; it was a very dark night.
I bought the boat of a quartermaster, who was in the service with me last war, he is gone to sea again.
I was sent by my mother of an errand to Tooley-street, and as I came through Temple-bar, there was a cry of stop thief; I saw a great many boys running; I ran with them, and then this gentleman said I was a thief, and took me back to the shop. GUILTY, aged 11.
I was very much in liquor.
That man fell down, and I came up to help him.
Did you not ask me and a soldier to go and drink some gin?
All this man says is false; he was very sick, and vomited; he fell down, and I was helping him up when he desired the watchman to take me up.
I never had the bacon at all, it laid down at the door.
I was coming along, and I found it on the side of the pavement.
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury; I am a poor working man; I went into that woman's shop, and gave her a shilling to take for the beef and pennyworth of bread; she and her daughter both acknowledged it to be a good shilling; when the man asked her to produce the shilling, she said she could not; how is it possible she could swear to a shilling she had put among forty more; when I came out the man stopped me, and I gave him eighteen shillings; another man said, mind what you are about; then I was taken to a public-house, where I was detained a full hour, till such time as the woman thought proper to send a shilling; she gave it to a man at her own door, who handed it over to another, to bring it to the public-house; and, after all, she had the baseness to swear to a shilling, and that I was never out of her sight the whole time.
I got up in the morning to go to work, and I happened to go over this gap where the things were hid, but I did not know any thing about the robbery; I thought it was a wire put down for a hare; and then these men came up to me and used me very ill.
Will you swear I was the man?
I know nothing at all about it; I never saw it with my eyes.
I went into the Golden-Heart to have a pint of beer; this man, and a Mr. Hinde, were drinking out of a quart-pot, and they insisted upon my putting my pint of beer into their pot; we were sitting drinking from eleven o'clock, till halfpast four; he was very drunk, and I never took the bag out of the room at all; his company got rather troublesome to me, and I came away with my own bag.
One evening, between eight and nine o'clock, I met Lieutenant Smith in the Strand, whom I formerly knew in the Leicestershire Militia; I was quartered with him at Tinmouth; I had this watch from him; after I had parted with it to Mr. Campbell, I heard it had been stolen, and surrendered myself.
A man gave them me to carry. GUILTY, aged 22.
I have nothing to say.
There was a soldier lodged in the house, of the name of Mills, and he asked me if I would sell some things for him, I said, I would, he desired me to conceal them; he said, he owed the master of the house some money.
The sailor said he had got five guineas and a half, and he had but four guineas and a half; and the Magistrate said he had a great mind to keep him for making a false report.
I never saw that man till I saw him at the watch-house.
This man asked me to fetch these things down for him, and I went to the door to look for him, when he came up and took me into custody.
Gentlemen, I have worked with Messrs. Birkett and Co. a number of years, and don't know as I ever robbed them of a halfpenny in my life; I meant only to see whether it would cover my chair-bottom, and if it did I would pay for it, and not to wrong them on any account.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I was sent to measure some work, and returning, I met a shopmate, and drank with him till eight o'clock, when I run to get back to my time; I saw a man running, and throw away the cloth; an alarm was made, and I was taken.
I won the notes of the prosecutor fairly; he won a guinea of me first, which he kept; he said, he would see me again; and I said, if he would make the letter himself, I would see him for a hundred; he said, I have only ninety; I turned my back, and he took the chalk to make the letter; the other man said, make it plain; says he, I cannot, the table is greasy; then he made the letter O, and I guessed O, and won the money; then he went away with his friend to receive four hundred pounds, and what conversation passed between them I don't know; but, when they were gone, I went about my business.
You have said, you intrusted me with drafts for small sums - did you not send me into the city to receive a bill for 250l.?
Did you not say before the Magistrate, that you could not swear to my person?
Did you not say, you had no knowledge of the person whatever?
Have you not detained from me my box, and a gold watch?
Have you received a reward for apprehending me?
Do you expect a reward?
Before I make my defence, I submit to your Lordship, that the prosecutor being an attorney, my case comes within the description of a breach of trust; the act expresses merchants, bankers and tradesmen, and Mr. Benbow cannot be considered either as a tradesman, a banker, or a merchant.
I must throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I was at work at the Customhouse, and after being paid off, I was going up the gateway, and was counting my money, when he said hold of me; I never had the tooth in my possession at all.
I was going along to work; I saw these two books lying; I thought I might as well have them as any body else; I picked them up, and put them in my bosom; my poor mother has been blind these six years; I have worked very hard to keep her as well as I could; I never did such a thing in my life.
On the Monday morning, I went, out of curiousity, to see the balloon; and, on my way home, coming over the bridge, somebody said there was a mad bullock, and there was a great press and a cry of thieves; upon which a scuffle ensued, and they all got away, and I was then taken; there was another watch produced at Bow-street, and an officer, of the name of Lloyd, swore that I had taken that watch from another man; and the man said, I was not the person; Mr. Justice Ford asked him how he could take his oath that I had taken it from the man, and then he said, he had not taken his oath.
I was in a very bad way, and could not do any work; I don't know any thing about the oil-cloth. GUILTY , aged 65.
I was going down Fenchurch-street, and heard a sing out of stop thief, and two gentlemen stopped me; I am quite an innocent man, it is a malicious piece of business; my uncle and aunt are now lying bad of a fever; I very lately came from sea.
I was very hungry, and I went to ask for a drop of water.
I was forward in liquor, I know nothing of it.
At the time the robbery was committed, I was at home at supper.
This coffee was given to me upon the wharf.
I leave my defence to your Lordship.
I bought the two watches that night.
I took them by mistake.
I have nothing to say for myself.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge.
Did you not say before the Magiftrate, that you knew I was not the man, and if I would pay you for your day's work, and for the handkerchief, you would not prosecute me?
I was going through St. Giles's, I had been to receive some prize-money, and this man charged me with having robbed him; I never saw him with my eyes till he collared me.
Coming down Whitechapel-road, Mr. Harper said to some of the chaps, he would treat them with half a pint of gin, because the beasts belonged to a very good master; he knows very well it was not taken with intent to steal it.
There were a parcel of chaps running, and some of them dropped the watch, and they laid hold of me.
The money is all my own.
I was going home from a fieldday, and met with a comrade just come home from abroad; he said he wanted to buy a dress for his little boy, and going by this gentleman's door, he said he thought it would do; the pin came undone, and, in stooping to pick them up, my cap fell off; this gentleman came up, when I had my cap in one hand, and the dress in the other, and said, I had been stealing it.
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury - With that submission and respect which I am aware is due from a person in my situation to this Court, and that candid impartiality which is the characteristic of an English Jury, I presume to state some facts which may take off some degree of the weight which my prosecutor wishes to impress upon your minds with respect to me; I have been brought up under a rigid, but respectable, worthy, and honest, parent, who has ever taught me the paths of rectitude, honour, and propriety, and given me a liberal education; at a certain period, I was placed under the care of an affectionate uncle, who gave me an extensive property, with a house of forty guineas a year; having met with the greatest duplicity from those whom I have called my friends, and particularly that society which was held at Mr. Knight's house, as well as others, I had lost between four and five hundred pounds; those injuries I could have borne without regret, but this last injury has stung me to the quick; with these repeated losses I left business, and retired with the remainder of my property, which I had carefully deposited in the hands of an honest relation; the book in question, which the prosecutor alludes to, I had under my arm on the afternoon of the evening I went to his house, for the purpose of getting some little money due to me at Black wall, and to a house of the same description; I went there, and drank several pints of porter, and some shares of sixpenny-worths of rum and water; in passing this house, I knew the house, and I can bring respectable witnesses to prove that I have been many times at his house, I went into the house, and in that state in which a young man of my description ought not to have appeared; I was in a state of some intoxication, and from the admonition of my friends I had made a now not to go into a lodge-room again, having sustained so much injury from these clubs; I went in, expecting to see some persons who owed me money; I asked the girl for Mr. such a one; the girl said, she did not know the names of the persons who were there; I waited till the lodge was closed, and after it was closed, I went up stairs, and met with some persons that I knew; I went up, and had some rum and water with them; it was proposed by them to go down stairs; I went down stairs, and I know not why we should be introduced into the bar, in preference to any other part of the house - a part of the house which I should not have presumed to have entered, and there we had more rum and water; they wanted to drink some ale, but I gave my negative to that, chusing rather to drink porter, and I know not from that time who came in, or what time they went out; by this time I was in a great state of in oxication, I found that I was so, and as a proof of it, if I were placed upon an oath, which I would not forfeit, I should say I did not know the time of the night, whether it was eleven, twelve, one, or two, nor did I, upon my oath, were I put to it, know in what manner these people, whom they may call my friends, left me; I was accossed by Mr. Knight, telling me it was time to go home; I got up, and knowing I had this book, I asked for it, he said, I had left it up stairs probably; he went up stairs, and said, it was not there; I told him it was of great consequence to me; they begged of him to look for it, as being at a publichouse, it was the more likely to be lost in the morning; I begged of him, and he was, as I then though, kind enough to go to several parts of the house, but his endeavours were fruitless; in coming down stairs, he said, I will take care of it if I find it, and wished me to go home; I went out for the purpose of going home, and he said, I have to speak to a watchman to call some one up, and, says he, you can go along with me; I went with him, and took hold of his arm, thinking him a friend, and walked with him; but instead of being in my own road to go home, I actually crossed a road almost uninhabited, which was the direct contrary way to my own home: My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, I did not know that I had any thing in my pocket at the time, and when I came up with him to the watchman, he said, you have a pot of mine in your pocket; when I offered to wish him good night, I was astonished, and asked him if he was serious; I put my hand in my pocket, and found one, I put my hand in my other pocket, and found another; the measure was in my waistcoat-pocket, there was a large hole in it, and the measure went through.
I know nothing at all about the ducks, I was upon the high-road when they stopped me.
I throw myself upon the mercy of the Court.
I never saw the man with my eyes till the day I was apprehended.
I went into the shop to purchase a hat, I did not know what I did as I was in liquor.
I went to buy a pair of stockings at Mr. Lewis's; my neighbour followed me quickly, and was immediately gone; I denied knowing any thing of the cloth; she desired me to deposit the money for the value of the cloth; I pursued the man, and said to him, it is time to take back the cloth; I thought no more of it.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I beg leave to say, that I had that morning taken a little drop of ale, and calling at Mr. Barker's, where this unfortunate affair seems to have arisen, I stopped to dine with some gentlemen; instead of drinking three or four bottles of wine, I am confident we had eight or ten; I believe Mr. Martin paid for five, being the wine-merchant of the house; I was in a state of intoxication; and when I went from Barker's, I went home, which is a distance of three quarters of a mile at least; I took a 20l. note in the shop that evening, which, fortunately, I believe, a gentleman in Court can prove, who assisted me with part of the change; with respect to Mrs. Snowden, whom they have mentioned, it is a plain proof that I was very much in liquor, for I never knew or heard of the name before; and I think it is very hard a man cannot take a 20l. note, as I took that, without being tried for it.
I have nothing to say, but leave it to the Gentlemen of the Jury.
I was going to Wapping, and coming past the shop. I heard the gentleman cry, stop thief; I ran after the man who dropped the calico, and they immediately took me, when I was running after him.
I am innocent of the charge; he said, what are you going to do with the shoes; I said, I was going to buy a pair.
He never mentioned any thing about the children before; I had been three days from Rochester, and going up Tottenham-court-road, he accused me; I was stopped, and was searched; I was frightened at the charge, and ran away; but as to knocking any body down, I did not.
I had no money to pay for my lodging; or to support me, so I meant to pawn the sheet, in order to pay him, and to take it out again.
On Saturday evening a person called upon me and requested I would go with him to purchase a pair of stockings, which I did, and having an Indian shawl which I brought home, I took it with me, and asked the prosecutrix the value of it; he stood bargaining for the stockings till I was tired, and walked on, but not ten yards from the cellar, then I was challenged with having the shirts, but they were picked up several yards from me; several people were rushing forward at once, and that man took me; the chief part of my time has been spent in the navy.
I worked till half-past eight, and bought a piece of beef in Newgate-market; going past that man's shop, he said, I must go back, for that I had stolen a piece of his beef; I cannot tell the name of the person I bought it of but it was at a shop.
I went to ask for work as I was much distressed, and found the bridle laying in the yard, on the ground.
I had two shillings in my waistcoat, which was gone, and I only took the cloaths up to see if I could find it, when the landlord asked me what I was doing with them, I said, looking for my money.
I had been working in the house where there was a cask of sugar open, and saw a Custom house officer bring up a basket full, he said, I might take a little for my own sea-stock; I said, I was afraid but he said, there was no danger, for no body took notice, of such a thing as that; I did so, and thought no harms Hunt was the man who told us to stow it in the tops.
Can you swear positively to my person?
At the time I was detained, Mr. Heanes declared he did not know me; nor Mr. Smith either.
At the time the gentleman charges me with putting his book in my bosom, I was putting my handkerchief in.
I went to Rosemary-lane to buy a jacket, and saw that bundle lying in the middle of the road.
I picked up the sugar as it scattered from a cart where the packages had broke.
I picked up the handkerchief on the spoke of a cart wheel; I don't know how it came there.
I found these shoes at the prosecutor's door.
Was I not very much in liquor?
I was stupid in liquor; I don't know any thing of the trunk; I had a bundle with some bread and cheese in it.
I was passing some chests, when I struck against something on the ground, I did not know what it was, and I picked it up and put it in the waistband of my breeches.
I am innocent of the charge.
I had the basket to get some straw; I had occasion to go into Mr. Maynes to get some money that was owing me; I let the basket at the door, and when I came out I picked it up, not knowing there was anything in it but straw.
I was going down Distaff-lane, there were several hogsheads on one side of the way, and a waggon unloading on the other, and it is possible my coat might have touched the hogshead, but my hand was never upon it.
I honestly bought these ribbons and paid for them.
I went down to look for a person, and saw the coffee running out of the bag; I was picking it up, with intent to save it, when this gentleman came up and said I should not have it.
What I threw down, was a piece of canvas that I had been wiping my hands with, after I had done work.
I came down stairs with the gown in my hand, it was lying on the bed; the lady said, I was going to stealher gown; she seemed very timid and frightened; I told her she need be under no apprehension of my taking it, it was not my intention; I then threw it on the bed in the first floor, and told her not to be a alarmed; I desired her to sit down, and be perfectly reconciled; I went down stairs, supposing she was perfectly reconciled, having her gown left there; when I got near the door, the brick layer's boy was standing at the door; the lady immediately followed, and took hold of me by the arm; I stopped a considerable time, and then she called, stop him; she let go my arm, and I was walking on; I went as far as Mr. Dalby's shop; when I went in, Mr. Dalby was very much surprised at seeing such a mob round the door; seeing the bricklayer's boy standing at the door, I came to the door, and told him I should return back with him to the lady very quietly, and I returned back to the lady's house; some people came into the parlour where I was, and they sent for a constable; not finding a constable, they proposed going to a Magistrate, and I was taken to Marlborough-street.
I had been at work all day; I was coming along, and saw this woman with five or six young men; I was going past Red-lion-street, when a young woman called me; I said I was only going over the way, and then the other men walked behind her; I asked where she lived; she said, in George-street, that she had been on board ship five or six days with a sailor, who had given her a 2l. note, and she had left the ship at Gravesend; she said these young men would not leave her alone; she clapped her hand in her pocket, and said, she had lost a silk handkerchief, and charged me with it; I then walked right up to the watchman, and told him to take me into custody, for I knew nothing of it.
I was going to a timberyard; I am a box-maker; I met with a Jew, who asked me if I would buy some soap of him; he asked me two shillings for it, and I gave him nineteen pence, and a quartern of gin.
I have served the landlord of that house, with corn and coals, for some years; I went to this house about four o'clock, and had some porter; Mrs. Kingsbury told me I had got a hat, and they took it from me; but whether it was put there as a trick or not, I cannot say; I don't know how it came there.
I never had the goose in my possession; Browne has known me for sixteen years.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge.
I intended to redeem them.
I was sent by Mr. Clarke for the money; Mr. Cato would not pay it without a discount being allowed; I went back to Mr. Clarke, adn he directed me to allow it; Mr. Cato paid me, and I never eat, drank, or stopped, till I had paid the money to Mr. Clarke, in Mr. Yerraway's counting-house.
I throw myself on your Lordship's mercy.
I went to Mr. Laurie to buy a second hand saddle; he said he had not one, but would lend me one till I got one; I said, if my master wanted a new one I would come again; I took the saddle and went to Piccadilly, to Mr. Pollock, and asked him to buy it; he said he would give me twenty-five shillings; I said I would take twenty-six shillings; he took the saddle, and took it to three different shops, to try to sell it; he came back and said a man was gone to try it, and then they took me.
I had been to Newgate-market, and just by King-street there was a cry of stop thief; I dropped my piece of meat, which I had in my hand, by the pushing of the people, and away I run as fast as any of them; upon which they took me, and said I was the thief.
Being in liquor, I laid the bag down on the counter, and by mistake took up the parcel; I have had several blows on my head, which, if I drink a little, makes me insensible of what I do.
Did you see me chuck the box down?
I was coming from Billingsgate, running along, they called out, stop thief, when I came to a place where they were digging, I fell down, and a man said, you are the thief; I am as innocent of it as you are; my coat slap was not torn off till I was taken.
Some time in September I was sweeping the School, and found them laying about; I inadvertently took them, as I could not read, and thought they were waste paper; I am sorry I took them away, without the knowledge of any person.
I have nothing to say, but have witnesses.
I leave my case to my counsel.
I don't know any more of it than the child unborn.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I was going on an errand to the Minories, and saw a man with this bacon, he said, he would give me two-pence to carry it; I was going along with it, and that man came out, and said, where are you going with that, and laid hold of me; I asked him what he was going to do with me, and he took me into the shop.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court; it is the first time I was ever guilty of any thing of the sort.
Did I ask you for any thing?
I got four shillings from the girl, on Monday morning to keep for her; she said, keep that for me; I went out, and on my return, laid down in my own bed; she came up intoxicated; when I awoke she was gone; I opened the door, and saw her coming into Sun-yard; she said, I hear you have lost your money Browne; if I have lost it, I said, I suspect you of it; I put my hand in my pocket, and my money was gone; she said she knew nothing of it, only she had lost half-a-guinea; then she got a warrant against me, fearing I should go first.
When the woman was gone for the bread a shipmate of mine called me out to some more of my old shipmates; we stopped at a public-house till nine or ten o'clock, and as I was going home I met a man with a bed, who said he was very much fatigued, and asked me to carry it; I said I was in a hurry, and at the time the watchman came up, and took us all to the watchhouse; I have served with Lord Nelson and Sir John Borlase Warren in all their actions this was.
I have nothing to say, but that one Moses Bannon, belonging to the Pompee, sold me the ticket for eighteen shillings.
Was any body there besides me, when I was taken?
Can you say you saw me follow you, or night you?
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I have nothing to say, I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I know nothing about them any more than a child unborn.
The last money I received was a twenty shilling note.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
The place where the prosecutor called is kept by two girls of the town; I lived there then, and he asked me to fetch the pot of beer, which I did and two others, and half a pint of gin; they then asked me to drink along with them at a gin-shop; I did so, and he was flashing his gold ring, a guinea, and a seven-shilling piece to the girls; I never saw it after; one of the girls went back, and the other went to the Golden Key with the prosecutor and me; we walked on till we came to the Green Gate, where he began to dance with a parcel of men and women who sold fish; they would not let him have any liquor there; he was so drunk, when we went out he tumbled down, and had liked to have pulled me down; when I helped him up he missed his ring, and said I must have taken it; I said if he thought I had, I would go back and look where he was dancing; I asked him to take his fish; he refused them, and I dropped them down, saying I would not carry them any farther.
Did I stand accused of having presented a pistol with a view of extorting money, painful to me as the acknowledgment must be, I certainly could not but plead guilty to the charge: it was a rash and criminal action, (for it is not my intention to attempt in any manner to extenuate its guilt): it was an action which I cannot reflect upon but with the utmost astonishment, which I know not how to account for, which I most sincerely condemn, and the very idea of which overwhelms me with inexpressible contrition and shame, that I even proceeded so far as to fire the pistol, (though I shudder at the thought, yet consistently with truth), I cannot deny but that I fired it at the prosecutor, but not with any intention of killing or injuring him, that is a charge which my conscience will not suffer me to admit. The fact is, that without the smallest premeditation or reflection on my part, but from I know not what kind of sudden and momentary impulse, occasioned by extreme distress, I entered the house in which this melancholy event took place, and shewed the pistol, thought certainly without any intention of firing. - In the already extremely agitated and disordered state of my mind, I was, in all probability, as far as I can judge of my own sensations at that moment, so affected by the entrance of a person who came in after me, that I involuntarily pulled the trigger, but without pointing the pistol at the prosecutor, or any other person. This, to my conception, is the only possible way of explaining so very extraordinary and unpremeditated an act. Of the extreme agitation and disorder of my mind, some idea may be formed, when I declare, that almost perishing with hunger, (for I had taken no nourishment whatever during two days), a friend less wanderer by day, obliged at night to seek repose within the dismal walls of unfinished houses, unacquainted with a single individual to whom I could make application for relies, ashamed to beg, and destitute of every other resource, I was absolutely driven to such a pitch of desperation, that I had positively determined, about two hours before, in the Park, to put an end to my miserable existence, had loaded my pistols for that purpose, and should actually have perpetrated the horried deed, had I not been prevented by the presence of a lady and her two servants, who were at that time walking in the Park. In short, I am fully convinced, however unable to prove it, that I laboured under a kind of mental derangement at the time: that such was the idea of the keeper of the Poultry Computer, when I was taken into custody, is evident both from his own declaration, and his ordering a strait waistcoat to be put upon me; at all events, the firing of the pistol certainly was an act in which my will had not for a moment the smallest concern; for I do most solemnly declare, in the face of this awful tribunal, before which I am now arraigned, and in the presence of that omniscient Judge before whose still more awful bar I am shortly, perhaps, to appear, that it never was my intention to fire. What object, in fact, particularly at so early an hour, and in so public a street, could I expect to attain? what advantage could I hope to derive from it? I could not but foresee that the report of the pistol must necessarily alarm the neighbourhood, and cause my person, in all probability, to be seized: the act itself proves, that there could be no rational intention; and I solemnly aver, that there was no intention at all of pulling the trigger, much less to fire at the prosecutor. I am informed, and it has but this morning reached my ears, through the charity of a gentleman, who, from compassion, interested himself in my unfortunate case, that I stand accused before the public of actual robberies committed in shops and private dwellings, under circumstances similar to those of the charge I have now to answer to: this, I am told, has been asserted in the public newspapers; and yet from my ignorance of the language of this country, and my close imprisonment together, I have been so far from being able to answer the groundless and cruel report, that I was utterly ignorant of its existence. I throw myself upon the candour and humanity of the Court for protection from this source of prejudice: I am sure the justice and liberality of the English nation will hold it enough for a poor foreigner to answer to charges legally brought against him in a strange land, without being prejudged by the effect of calumnies which he has no means of disproving. For the charge upon which my life is now in your hands, my rash and criminal conduct had given but too much colour, though I certainly did not fire at the prosecutor, or meant for a moment to hurt him; but that I ever, in any other instance, offended against the laws of this country, in any degree, I most solemnly deny; and if any man can alledge the country against me, I desire him to stand forward, and am ready to meet death if it be found, that except in this instance, I ever attempted to invade the property of another, or gave a moment's alarm to any man for his personal safety. Whatever character may belong to the act now in question, it was my first and only action which can be taxed with criminality in the eye of the law of this or any other country; I had suffered enough before, but had not before attempted to relieve my sufferings at the expence of any moral obligation.
Gentlemen of the Jury, I have nothing more to add in my defence; I rely on your equity and your charitable construction of my conduct; my life is in your hands; and whatever your decision may be, to that I shall bow in either case with respect, with resignation if it bid me die, and with gratitude if it save my life from a premature and dishonourable end.
I was going along, and saw them lay above a yard from the door; I picked them up; they took me; I said here are the gaiters; she gave them to one of the officers, and they took me to the Compter.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
A boy came out with the things, and dropped them close by me.
I got the wound in my side while I was rolling a hogshead of sugar on the Quays; a nail took me in the side, and tore me.
I had been only three days in town; I had not been in town for seventeen days.
I was hired to drive the sheep by the person that Mr. Spragg saw first with the sheep: I met him on the other side of Kingston; he had thirteen pigs with him; he called to me, shipmate, where are you going; I told him I was going out into the country, to look for work; says he, come along with me, and I will give you 5s. to assist me to drive some cattle that I have got along with these pigs: there was a public-house just by, and I went in with him and had some ale; he said there were two more men in the town of Kingston that were to be along with us, upon which he went to the house where these two men were, and we sat there drinking till I suppose about ten o'clock at night; he then told me we had to go down to a turnpike very near, where he had the rest of the cattle, he did not tell me what cattle they were; he called for half a pint of gin, and told me he would go and have the cattle out; and as soon as he had got the sheep out, he came to the turnpike again, and I overtook the sheep with the other two men, they were about four miles a-head of us; we drove the pigs, and the other two men drove the sheep, till we got to Charing-cross, and then he desired me to drive the sheep to St. James'smarket, and if any body asked me whose they were, he desired me to tell them they belonged to myself, and that I bought them seven miles beyond Bagshot, upon which we drove them to St. James'smarket; I went into a house to lie down, and left another man watching them; a man came to me, and said, one of the butchers had looked at the sheep, and said, he thought they were stolen; I said I did not believe so, for what profit, says I, would it be to him to pay me to drive these sheep here, if they were stolen: so with that I met this man, and, as he tells you, he talked with me about the sheep; the other man ran away, and I was taken up; I have but just come over from the East Indies.
I know nothing about it.
That is not the same blanket that I had, and she sheet I know nothing about.
I do not know what to say.
I was drinking with the prosecutor and two soldiers till about half past two, and Mr. Phillips desired I would see the prosecutor to bed; before we two left the tap-room he was very much agitated, and fancied he saw his mother stand before him, and attempted to shake hands with her, but when he had lost her he went into a sort of hysterical sit for about a minute or so, and his eyes run over with water; I got him as far as the stairs and he was taken in the same manner, exclaiming, \Oh, my mother!\" he said, that although he knew she was dead, he had been four hours on his knees in hopes he might see her again; then he began to pray to himself, and I begged him to go to bed, saying I would say prayers for him; I got him to bed and fetched my prayer-book, and read two or three evening prayers to him; I was going for a candle and he begged me not to leave him; I went for the candle and returned again instantly, but before I entered the door he called to me \"where is my small cloaths;\" I entered the room and pointed my finger to the floor, saying, there they lay; he said, give them to me; I did so; he pulled out his notes and counted them over and his cash, he then said he had been robbed of two or three guineas and two or three notes; I said I knew nothing of it; he said I must, for nobody else had been there; I wished him to search me, but he would not, only said he would take me to Bow-street next morning; he went to Phillips but he would not get up, as he did not believe him; in the morning they sent for an officer; I never attempted to get out of the house, which I might have done had I been guilty."
I have nothing to say in my defence, but leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I leave it all to my Counsel and the Jury.
When I went to work with my master, it was agreed I should have a weekly allowance of bread; he having a large quantity of loaves on hand, proposed that he and I should fill baskets, and sell them in St. Giles's at a low price; not doing so, it was to be kept for my use, and it was kept till it became so mouldy I could not eat it, and I made those cakes to eat instead, and not to sell.
I bought the coat the same morning for 1s. 6d. and finding it was not good enough to wear, I sold it for 2s.
I don't with to give the Court any further trouble, I am guilty of the fact.
I have nothing to say.
It is my first offence, I beg for mercy.
I bought them of that gentleman, Mr. Driver.
I know nothing of it, I never was across the hedge, or near it; the boy went to the house to get something to drink, and while he was gone, I never left the piece of turnips that I was on.
I was never guilty of the like before, but I got a little liquor.
I know nothing of the saws.
I leave it entirely to the mercy of the Court.
I had been at work at Paddington all day, and found these pots in the Park as I was coming home.
I picked it up in the Kennel.
Prisoner's defence I did not take it in the name of Mr. Wilson; Mr. Habberton knew I had left Mr. Wilson's service.
I never was on that side of the way at all.
I picked up these things in the walk where the carriage comes up, at Clapham; my master gave me the bags to take to town.
I picked up the handkerchief in the street; I did not see the gentleman drop it.
My wife had laid in that morning, and I had no coals to warm my three children; I went on board a sailing barge, and the man gave me some coals.
I had a fare, a man desired me to row to that barge, which I did, and he took the sack into the boat; when this man came and pulled the boat back again, the man then jumped over board, and swam away; I could have done the same, if I had been guilty.
I picked up these cloths under the shafts of the waggon.
I saw two sailors running in Fenchurch-street, this gentleman sung out stop thief, and I sung out stop thief; one of them dropped this handkerchief, and I picked it up.
I have nothing to say, I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I was coming through Leadenhall-market, and found a bundle, which contained these sheets. GUILTY .
I bought the cards in Fenchurch-street.
I bought it in Rosemary-lane of a woman that sits there and sells garters and ribbons and other things, and this girl asked me to give it to her, which I did.
I never saw the books.
Was there not music playing in the court, and a great many people about?
How can you swear to me out of a mob of people that were standing there?
I am innocent of the crime alledged against me.
I saw the handkerchief lying upon the ground in Fenchurch-street, and I picked it up. NOT GUILTY .
I have nothing to say; I leave it to the mercy of your Lordship.
The prosecutrix took ten shillings from me, and wanted me to go and sleep with her.
I then came out of the house, and a man beat me, taking the woman's part.
I leave it to the mercy of the Jury.
The young woman is mistaken in the person. GUILTY , aged 42.
I did not make away with it; it was too heavy for me; a shipmate of mine took the bag of cloaths, and I saw no more of him; the hammock I sold. GUILTY , aged 17.
The money is my own; I was formerly a jockey, and a gentleman that I used to ride for, being successful for him, gave me the 1l. note some time ago.
I have nothing to say.
There was a great noise, and a cry of stop thief; I was stopping to make water, and a man running by threw a hat up the passage; I picked it up, and gave it to these two men, and then they laid hold of me.
I bought a cow of a cowkeeper, in the neighourhood of this lady, and borrowed the five pounds of her.
I am a shoe-maker, I work at Paddington, and I was in the care of a house in Hill-street, Betkeley-square: I went past this gentleman's house, and there was a man standing at the door; I had not got far, when I heard a cry out, and a man rushed by me; a gentleman stopped me, and I went immediately back with him.
I had just left my ship, and coming up this street, a man said I had something belonging to the shop, and another man run away at the time; I know nothing of the robbery.
I locked my pantry-door every night, but the lock catches; I am frequently obliged to lock it several times before I can make it lock. I went to bed that night, and did not come down any more till the next morning; but Susan came up for the tinder-box. I know nothing of any body getting into the house; I am very innocent of what I am charged with; there was no occasion for me to have broke the lock when I had the key in my pocket; there is a door at the back part of the house that is very seldom locked; there is nothing but a latch.
(To Miss Morhall.) Did you ever miss any thing after I had left your shop?
I bought the tippet some time ago of a person of the name of Sarah Moore.
On the 25th of October I called at the King's Bench Prison; M'Connell told me he had got a bill which his brother had remitted by Post from his correspondent at Dover. I told him it was too late that evening to do any thing with it, but I would call the next day. I called the next day, and carried it for acceptance. I got it accepted, and then I called upon Mr. Hogg, and he told me Mr. M'Connell had used him very ill not to pay his acceptance of 13l. I told him not to make himself uneasy, for he had received a remittance from abroad, and shewed him the bill. He told me it was a very good bill, and he would cash it for me. I told him I would inform Mr. M'Connell of it. I went to M'Connell, and he said he had got the promise of it from another gentleman, and desired me to call again the next day. The next day I went to M'Connell again (there was an account between us at that time); he desired me to get it cashed. I went to Mr. Hogg, and got it discounted. I wrote my name upon it, Oxford-street, where I then resided. I took the whole of it to the King's Bench, and gave it to M'Connell, in the presence of Mrs. M'Connell and my son. He gave me 2l. on account, which I have accounted for in my books, and then he said, he would settle the balance in a few days, and I heard no more of the business till I was taken up. I only acted as an agent. I was requested to take the bill for acceptance, which I did. I understood he had very great property, and I knew his schedule was 40,000l. when he wanted to take advantage of the Insolvent Act. I heard from a number of persons that he was a man of property; I knew he had recovered 2 or 3000l. upon the ship Hope, and I had no doubt of the bill, especially as he said it was a remittance from his brother. I did not observe the name of John, nor Mr. Hogg either.
I have nothing say; I am guilty. GUILTY , Death , aged 17.
I have nothing to say.
Did you see me in your house. that day, or for a week before?
When I was taken up, Mr. Agar was desired to look at a pair of breeches. He had a great mind to own them; they were a pair of breeches that I have had fourteen months, He told me I had broke open his master's stables, and that he had traced me to Northampton. I know he is a man of very bad character and would swear a man's life away almost for a guinea. He had offered several people thereabout then guineas to take me up on suspicion. I had been round about there handy times enough. At the time that they swore to me I was at Reading market.
I know nothing of it. I never saw the other persons who were in the shop before they were standing at the window when I went in.
I am a staymaker, and left my work at eight o'clock; I went to market, and walked backwards and forwards to see what I liked; I heard the cry of, stop thief, and run, and they took me, and used me ill.
I never saw the watch or man at all; I was at the Coach and Horses that night with my comrades. GUILTY , aged 25.
I know no more of it than the child unborn.
I had been out of work a long time, and being in distress, made me do what I did.
The note that is produced I found; I was going to get change at the baker's, and he asked me if it was for Colonel Monson ; I said, yes; says he, I am told if any one comes for change for a five pound note it is to be stopped, very well, said I, I will immediately go and call James Neale; I went and told him the baker wanted him; that is all I know.
I was going on board my own boat, I happened to be in that boat where Mr. Rowen saw me; he asked me what boat it was, I said I did not know, and shoved my boat astern, and went about my business.
I had been of an errand, and a lad came up and asked me if I wanted to buy a great coat; I said, let me look at it, and I carried it four or five yards to a window to look at it, and that man took me back into the shop.
I bought the shoes of the prosecutor in his shop at six o'clock that evening; he served me himself.
Was I in the street, or inside the door?
About half past five o'clock, as I was going by the door, I was struck down by two men who run out, and I picked up those two things which they threw away. I suppose they struck me with one of them at the door.
What time did you take me?
As I was going up High-street, St. Giles's, I picked up the rings and went to a shop, where there was a light, to look what they were; I put them in my pocket, and the watchman immediatley came up and began to beat me with a stick without my knowing what it was for GUILTY , Death aged 26.
Did you not ask me what man run away from me?
I was employed to carry the copper to Old-street, and was to have 2s. I never saw the silk. GUILTY, aged 24.
I stood in my down defence, or I should have been a dead man.
I leave my defence to my counsel; the witer at the Mitre did not serve us with any thing; the mistress brought the first quartern of rum and poured it out.
I had been on an errand, and saw several men pass me, who I did not know; then Vickery stopped me, and searched me, but found nothing; he then said there was a pair of shoes at my feet, but I know nothing of them.
I had been in a public-house, and had asked change for a guinea; I could not get it, and two young men followed me out, and asked if I got change; I said, no; we then went into this house, and asked for change, and one of the men said to me, here, master, here is your change, you are in liquor; I said, very well, and was taking it up, when Mrs. Wisher said, stop, that is not the same half guinea I gave you; I laid the change down again, and said, I am sure it is; then she said, it was very surprizing it was her's, and then the two men run out, and I was stopped.
I was coming out of my own court, and heard the cry of, stop thief; a man run against me, and knocked me down, and as I was getting up, they said I had stolen the bacon.
I never had any care or charge of them; they were taken on shore by Joseph Gordon , and were found at his lodgings; I was ordered to throw them overboard; Gordon said, he would take them, as they would serve his wife for her caps and ribbons.
I was going to work, and a person passed me very fast, who dropped the trowsers, I asked him who they belonged to; he said, I might have them; I then picked them up, and walked away; upon which the prosecutor followed me, and said I had stolen them.
I was taken short, and stepped into the house; I was not two minutes there, when a man jumped out of window, knocked down a board, and knocked my hat off; I was going away, and the patrol came up and charged me with a robbery. GUILTY , aged 55.
I was going along, and heard an outcry; I turned about and saw a man running; I said, my friend, there's a woman calling after you; upon which he dropped the things, and knocked me down.
I have no defence to make, but leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I bought the duplicate of a man who lodged in the house, and gave him two shillings for it.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Why did you not stop me before I went out of the shop?
Why did you not call, stop thief! when I was in the street?
I had been in the habit where I have been at work of taking a little tobacco for my own use, and I took this; I acknowledged it when I was apprehended.
In walking among such a quantity of tea, some of it got into my shoes.
Did you not lend me a stick the Saturday before?
I went out and got drunk; he owed me money, and I took the things for it.
Did you not ask a boy if I was the man?
I ply at the markets; I was returning from Billingsgate, and met an acquaintance; we went to a public-house, and that man came and charged me with a robbery, which I know nothing of.
I took two shillings in change of a half crown piece; I supposed them to be good; I had no intention to defraud any one.
I have nothing to say.
I leave my defence to my Counsel
Wildman was sitting upon a piece of timber by my door, very much in liquor; my little boy threw his ball upon the house; I went to fetch it, and went up to the two-pair-of-stairs for my wife; as I returned from the room I saw the lead on the landing-place. I lodged at the bottom of the house.
I told him I would shew him the house where I bought it at Barnet, and he would not go with me.
I picked them up in the street.
God, the searcher of all hearts, can testify that I am innocent.
I found this watch; I had a wife, and a child sucking at her breast, in great distress, and almost famishing for want, and I pledged it.
When my master gave me this watch, I considered it as my own property.
When I was waked, these things were in the room, I don't know how they came there.
I went to have a pint of beer, and put the pint pot down in the passage, I don't know what became of it.
I deny stealing the trunk; I sold a trunk to Mr. Stevens, which I bought of a fellow-servant; I have been in his Majesty's service, and bought it of my fellow-servant, who told me he was going to sell it.
I know no more of the watch than the child unborn.
I found the hammercloth in the morning.
The handkerchief was dropped, and I picked it up, and gave it him.
It was laying on the ground.
I found the watch.
I bought the things at a sale in Brewer-street.
I went to lay down on the grass, and the saws were there.
My Lord, I am entirely innocent of the charge. Croker has made the man and boy come round, and swear my life away; he has been with them every day, and told them I was the man. I never was in the man's shop in my life. He wanted me to swear against my wife; he would not swear against me at all when I was before the Magistrate; all he said was, that if I was not the man, I was very much like him.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I have nothing to say; a man in my situation would do any thing to get away; I had not done any thing amiss when they took me, but was going to work till I could get a few things, and then I was going on board a man of war.
After I was liberated, did I not send home a pound note, and some oysters, to my wife?
I sent my daughter back to know if my wife would have a glass of wine, she said she should like a glass of Lisbon; I sent for a bottle, and went home and kissed my wife, and took leave of her, as I was going away.
Mary-Ann, my dear, did you see me strike your mother when I came home with a neck of mutton?
No, you did not?
Emma, did you see me knock your mother down?
The night before I went to that gentleman's office, I met Mrs. Heasty in Shoe-lane, and she asked me to fetch the money for her; she told me she would give me a new shirt for my trouble.
My Lord, I am entirely ignorant of the affair I am indicted for.
At the first hearing, before the Magistrate, she said she never saw me in the court; I saw some people running up the court, and I run with them; I am innocent of the robbery.
Finch says he gave me thirty shillings for it; he only gave me twenty-six; he knew it to be stolen, and asked me if I had stolen it; I said, I had; William Hollis , of Shoemaker-row, took me down to him to sell it, and he wanted me to get him two gold seals.
I know nothing of it; I am a stranger here, and have no friends; I work hard for my living, and never did such a thing as I am charged with.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I found this watch in the privy; I have been nine or ten years in the service of my King and country; I am a lieutenant in the navy; I am unprepared for trial, or I could have had witnesses here. GUILTY, aged 29.
You say you cannot swear to my face?
Did you see me after I went to bed?
How do you know that the person who slept in No. 17 was the first that went out in the morning?
If my trial had been put off till next Sessions, I could have brought evidence to shew how I came in possession of the watch.
I have worked for Messrs Hatchett and Co. twenty-one years; I paid Kendall ten shillings and sixpence a week out of the money I charged for him; I had received no money from the club for nine weeks before; and as for Deering, I charged the time for him, and I have frequently allowed them for three or four days before hand on account.
I was coming home from spending the evening; I heard a cry of stop thief; I walked up, seeing the watchman in the middle of the street, and asked him if he knew what was the matter; he desired me to stop, and I did immediately; a man then approached, and addressed himself to me, saying he had been robbed; he did not say I robbed him; I asked him by who; the watchman said, there was no other person in the street but me, and then he said, it must be me, and I was taken to the watch-house.
I have nothing to say.
Did I not tell you, when you came up to me, that I was sold?
I hope your Lordship, and the Gentlemen of the Jury, will be as merciful as you can, I have lived with Mr. Abbott nearly two years.
I am innocent of the charge.
I was fuddled, and I don't know what possessed me to take it.
I found the lead in Lothbury, in the Bank-buildings.
It was the bottoms of the ladle, and the foreman desired me to save it till the morning, and I forgot to put it out of my pocket.
I am innocent of the crime.
I leave it to the Jury.
Mr. Castle has taken a false oath; I did no such thing at all.
On the Saturday evening I got too much liquor, my wife came to fetch me home, and I would not go, we had some words and she said she would lock me out; I said, I did not care if she did; I went to lie down in the straw, and then I altered my mind, and thought I would go home, and as I was going away I was fired at.
I had been at work all that morning at Blackwall, and never had a copper upon me at all.
I picked up the lead in coming up the street.
I weighed both parcels, to the best of my knowledge, six pounds exactly.
I never saw the notes, now did I hear my mistress say any thing about them.
I went into the back kitchen to ease myself; I asked leave of a man who stood in the passage; the last witness followed me, and knocked me down.
I cannot say any thing in my own defence; I am a man greatly afflicted with a rupture, and very poor.
I was very much intoxicated. I had been at a house in St. John's-street, Smithfield; I had a green money-bag in my pocket; I went to Gregory's house, he was not at home; a gentleman in the parlour told me, if I wanted to see Gregory, he was at a house in the neighbourhood; he went with me, and after taking me through several courts and turnings, we went into a public-house; Gregory was there; he asked me to sit down, and he would pay me; I repeatedly objected to staying, but he prevailed upon me to drink to a great excess; I staid about two hours; I then came out of the house, and became insensible; Gregory left me; I went through several turnings, and at last fell against a wall, and went to sleep; I waked about two o'clock in the morning; my recollection returned, I missed my pocket-book, green bag, and every thing out of my pocket; I then went into the fields, and remained the rest of the night. Through fear and shame, I absconded for a fortnight; I then went home to my mother's, and was concealed there till I was apprehended; Mr. Wright came in a blustering manner, and said if my friends had come forward, he would have taken it at half-a-crown a week.
I had been interrupted by the deceased several times to fight, and I told him I did not want to fight.
I bought the things in question at a public sale, at Mr. Squibb's, in Saville-passage.
I picked it up outside the door.
I picked up the pocket-book, and several people who saw me pick it up, claimed half of it.
I was going to meet an acquaintance, and I ran for fear of being behind my appointment; I was stopped in Fetter-lane, and charged with stealing a handkerchief; I never did any thing of the kind.
This man discharged me, saying I was in liquor; I had a bottle of wine in my hand at the time, and he took it from me.
I took the sixpence in change of a shilling the over-night: as to the napkin, I know nothing of it, for my door was open all day.
I have nothing to say.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
Did you not lose sight of me?
How far did I run down Bolton-street?
Was there any body behind the coach besides yourself?
Did you ever lose sight of me?
How long was it before you saw me laid hold of?
On the 5th of October I was going along Piccadilly, I heard the boy making a noise, as I thought; I went across the way to him, and asked him what was the matter? he immediately said to me, you have got my parcel; some man came up to him and gave him a shilling. and told him to go along, which he did, and I went on till I met the witness Smith.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
What did I ask you for the mare the first time?
You said, I will give you five pounds, and I said, I dare say you will, and another to it, for it was worth twelve pounds?
I have nobody here, or any thing to say.
Was any part of the house broke open, or any wards broken?
He asked me if I knew the shoes; I said, no.
I have nothing to say.
I was in liquor, and a man asked me to carry it to the White Horse, Fetter-lane; I know nothing of the robbery.
I am innocent of what I am charged with; the old man was so drunk he could not stand.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I went out of the house to make water at the corner of Liquorpond-street and Christopher-street, and as I was standing at the corner of the place, very much in liquor, somebody sung out, stop them, and I ran after them, and I did not cease running till I was stopped myself.
I went with the bricks, and my horses startled, and broke the line; I threw the tail-board and great coat into the cart, and run to my horses' heads; they then came out, and said I had stolen a shift; I did not know it was here.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
A young man came to me at the stairs, and asked me if I would assist him to carry a bag of smuggled coffee which he had purchased, and I did; I did not know it was stolen.
Do you remember seeing me a minute before?
What did I say?
Did I not say, Lord have mercy on me?
I was born in the city of Frankfort, in High Germany, and have been in England above ten years; I have lived in Birmingham, and came to London for a pass to go home to my mother; going along to the Imperial Ambassador's, I met Cummins with those things in his hand, and he asked me if I would buy them; I said I was no such person, being a watch screw maker, and finisher; he held them up before me for half a minute, till Lee came and took me. When I was in the New Prison, a young woman came to see her husband, and said she lived at Cummins's, who had heard him say he had catched a nice green horn; I questioned her about it, and she promised to come in my behalf, and tell what he said; but as her husband is in confinement, and she has three or four children, she is afraid of being turned out, I suppose, as she is not come.
I am a soldier , I had just come off duty, and went to bed; I am as innocent of it as a child unborn; there were other lodgers in the house.
Did you not lend me a sack when I bought two bushels of peas of you?
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I leave my defence to my Counsel; I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I had two small phials of brandy, as samples; the servant said he should like some brandy for the winter, and he said he had no money, and I told him a gallon of brandy for the breeches.
Did not Clarke say before you, that it was his, and that he gave it to me to keep for him?
Clarke told me it was his own that he had to do a job with, and asked me to carry it home for him; he gave it me openly in a public-house, in Whitechapel; I immediately told who my master was when I was asked.
I was helping a drayman close to the cart; I threw my great coat into a cart, and I thought this had been mine; my own was gone.
I am in the same line as he is; I went with another man through the stable, both doors were open; I took them out to the other man to shew them to him.
I never saw this woman before.
I was committed for the value of ten-pence, and expected to be tried at Hick's Hall; my friends have been attending there, and did not know but I should be tried there.
I never was in the street at all; I was in Red-lion-passage when I was stopped.
I have nothing to say; I never saw the man before that is swearing to me now.
I have nothing to say.
This man came to me, and wanted to take my public-house; I had heard a bad character of him, I did not like him, and told him not to come after me, and then he got another man to take it, and then he put him in.
I found it honest and just, and put it there for safety till Monday morning.
I did not take it by way of stealing it; it was at the head of the dock, lying between the deals, and the basket of nails lay amongst the planks; I did not intend to carry them out of the yard.
I never was within thirty or forty yards of the men; there was another man on one side of me, who ran away.
On the 26th of October, Tyson came to me, and asked if my master was gone to the Review; Tyson desired me to come to the warehouse, and he gave me four dozen of files, and desired me to send them to East-Smithfield; afterwards he gave me four dozen of rasps, and told me to send them to Brice's; I called the soldier, and sent him with them.
I had been at work in the day, I went into a public-house in the evening, and a man told me if I would go into the craft, he had got a bag and a handkerchief with some sweepings, and he would give me something for myself, and accordingly I went and found it there; he said there was some loose, and I put it in my hat.
I know nothing of it, I never saw any body near the place; another man, of the name of Tucker, was taken up, and was acquitted before the Magistrate; my master wanted me to swear to him.
The prosecutor's wife has known me for twelve years; I was going past, and stopped ten minutes; she said, she was going to see her mother; we went out, I left her, and did not go back that night.
I am a waterman, and was plying at Blackfriars-stairs; a man came and asked me to carry a chest for him to Pepper-alley, and to help him down with it; I went, and found it too heavy; he asked me to mind it while he went for a porter; I said I would, and while I was watching, four or five men came, and being frightened, I certainly did attempt to escape.
The copse was full of chests, therefore I could not move one from the other.
Mr. Smith was very badly off for tools, and I took my own tools, and his apprentices worked with them as well as myself; Mr. Smith and I had a dispute about the sort of work he gave me to do, and I left him.
I work at the gun work; I was going to buy a file for my work, and met a young woman, who asked me to go with her to buy a gown-piece; I went with her, she looked at several, and when I was going away, the lady laid hold of me; I am as innocent as the child unborn.
I am as innocent as the child unborn.
I picked it up in the passage.
I have nothing to say.
If a lady comes into the shop for an article, and chooses that which is made for a customer, we sell that, and make another for the person who bespoke it, rather than lose the sale; so it was in this case; I had the hair myself, and made the one which is produced for a friend of mine; I made it up on a Sunday, and I believe a person is here who called upon me at the time, and saw me making it.
I took it for my master's horses, for I had not sufficient.
I have nothing to say.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I was coming down Compton-street, and saw that witness with a stick and watch-coat on, and saw the things laying at the door; I spoke to him twice, and he passed me, and let me go two streets off before he took me.
I found the parcel in the coach-house amongst the straw that comes out of the different mail-coaches, on the 24th of October.
I found it on a heap of dust outside the gate.
I did not take it with a view of making a property of it.
I was coming down Highgate-hill, on the path-way, when the guard came up to me with a pistol in his hand, and said, I was his prisoner; I was not near the coach.
She lent me the cloak to pledge it, and had half the money.
It was my own money.
On Saturday morning, about half past seven o'clock, I was going to work, and in a lane I saw a bag laying behind a little bit of a bush, about a yard from the road, with meat in it; I took it into the hay-loft, and said nothing about it; I did not go to work till Tuesday, when my master asked me how I came by the meat; I told him I found it; he said, he heard Mr. Phillips had lost some, and I had better go to him, and clear it up; I went to Mr. Phillips, and told him what part I found; he said, take it home and boil it, or do as you like with it; I told my master, and said, I did not like to eat it; he said, if you don't, give it to the dogs, and they had a great part of it, and the carter had a leg; I had about three quarters of a pound, which I was boiling when they took me.
My master is here, who knows that boy is an infamous thief.
I have nothing to say.
I bought the chaise of him a fortnight after it was delivered to me; it is very unfortunate that I cannot get my witnesses here; he would not take my bill at a short date, but would give me credit for three weeks; after the expiration of the month, I called upon Mr. Harris, a few days before the chaise was returned, and told him I had been under the necessity of borrowing some money upon it, but he should have it again in a few days; Purvis is unfortunately a debtor on the other side of Newgate.
She never was tried for it.
It will do me no harm, say you did see me.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I picked it up after the things were taken away.
I was very much intoxicated, and did not know that I had struck any person.
My Lord and Gentlemen, I stand here before you a horrid spectacle of misery, of guilt, and of disgrace. I will endeavour to be as collected in my reason as possible, though unhappily for me, at certain times and seasons, I am particularly under heavy pressures of mind, which my wife well knows, and was well aware of it. That I have committed the horrid deed laid to my charge, I have no wish to deny, any more than I have to avoid the dreadful punishment that awaits my guilt, to that I am resigned, nor was it my wish from the unfortunate moment of my crime, to evade justice; but that I committed the deed maliciously against my poor child, who was the victim of my fatal passion, I solemnly deny. I loved my child, and I hope no one will think it was done in malice. I solemnly declare it was not, in the presence of God, before whom I now stand, and before whom I must shortly appear, and whom I hope will direct you and guide you in your decision upon me in the course of this day; for malice I had none, I loved her most tenderly, and love to the child, wishing her not to be from me, strange and perverse as it may seem, is owing chiefly the sad cause that brings me here this day. I am married to a second wife, by whom this was our only daughter; we had long known each other before our marriage, when I was in better days; and when she and I were the wife and husband of others, I thought I could be happy with her, but I did not know the nature and temper of her family; I found afterwards the friends and family with which she was connected, thought her marriage to me degrading. As her family disliked the union, she knew me well, why did not she avoid having me. What has occurred was done through the height of passion and despair, as disputes and controversies had taken place between us for ten years, in which unhappily both were in fault too much so. Those disputes were often carried to a pitch of fury, and what still more exasperated me was, that those she called her friends, always sided with her whether right or wrong; and, what is still worse, they would put their hands to mischief; and many of them, I am sorry to say, were strenuous professors of religious principles. May the Lord forgive them and me, and take me to himself! Our disputes at last ended in a mutual agreement to separate, and the child I so tenderly loved was to go with her mother. This my unhappy temper and feeling could not bear, and led me to the fatal resolution that neither she nor I should have the child, by committing the horrid deed of putting an end to her life, in the manner I have done. I pray God Almighty to forgive me, and to direct you in it, and may this spectacle I now stand be a warning to those who form second marriages, if they meet with double families, to have more love to their duty than giving way to intemperate disputes that may lead them, as they have done me, to acts of desperation and vengeance beyond the controul of reason and reflection! If my wife was present, she could vouch and prove that it was impossible I could ever have deliberately executed such an act; she could vouch that my disposition is not cruel, and that my resolutions have always led me to the side of virtue; but as here I stand, in the presence of God, when unfortunately under agitations of mind or provocations of temper, I am not really the same man at all times, and my weakness, under such circumstances, when I have been under the most resolute purposes for good, have very frequently led me into excesses of frenzy. I have often felt it, and I have wondered at it; in cool moments it has often astonished me how I could do so. There was a circumstance that happened to me at one time; my own business failed me, it has often failed me, and I frequently, when I could get no work at my own business, used to strike out to out-door work; but once in particular when I could get no work, forced by distress to apply for relief at my parish-workhouse, there was something that disappointed me, I had come too late in the day, and because I was disappointed, I broke as many windows as cost the parish four pounds, and yet the parish-officers did not punish me, though they might. I have no more to to say, but I hope God will of his infinite mercy forgive me; I must die a spectacle of sin, disgrace, and horror.
There was a single point I have got to mention, which I wish my wife was here, she could attest the truth of what I am going to say; that when I have been the most resolute to good purposes, that frailty and weakness would often prevent it; she was well acquainted with my misery, I have been frequently so, as well as my mother, an old woman, that was sensible, and yet at times she would go the same way; she has often asked me to cut her hair, for unless her hair was kept cut in a particular close manner, her weakness was upon her so as it has been with me.
I did not take them: On Tuesday, the 4th of December, I was out cutting of wood, as I had no work to do at home; I was not in my stall at all; I am a shoe-maker, and about four o'clock I went home to shut my place, being dark, and there was a coachman in Bond-street waiting for a pair of shoes that I had to mend; I was going with them to his stable-yard, two men followed me; they took hold of me, and said, I must go along with them; they said, they had got the old b - h.
I know myself very innocent of the crime alledged against me; I was going over the way; this gentleman took me on the shoulder, and shoved me along, and said, you have stole a sheep of mine, will you come to the shop along with me; I said, by all means I will; they overhauled my cloaths to see if I had any grease about me; I had no grease whatever about my clothes; that man said I had it on my back; I am a hardworking man, I have been with Lord Nelson at Egypt; I belonged last summer to Alderman Curtis's pleasure boat.
If I was at home I could tell; it was at Ramsgate.
I cannot really say the day of the month.
My master trusted me to carry out a dozen bills a little while before; I called on that lady at one time, she was not at home, and then I called again, she paid me the money.
I had been going about for work, I was coming down the road, and these men met me; they began knocking me about, I thought they were going to take my life away from me.
I am a private soldier, I belong to the 23d regiment of foot, I never was servant to captain Shaw, I only came up with him; as he was an officer, he said, he would renew the pass to Sunday morning following, neither did he trust me with any property whatever; I never received any property from the woman.
When Mr. Pike came to me to see the bacon, he saw it in the shop; while he was looking at it I said to him, here is some more of it; he saw it all; I then had a man who had bought two hocks, I told him; and I said, if you please, I will go, and fetch the two hocks from the people, if possible, perhaps there may be some marks on them; he said he did not think it was the bacon, it was too wet to be her's; I told him I could sell it all, a man had bid me 7 d. a pound for it, it was all open in the shop, and if I had known it had been stolen, I would not have put it there; the man came back that bid me the money, and I let the man have it that bid me the most money for it.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I was walking along Russell-street with my hands in my pocket; I had nothing of the kind; that gentleman came after me, and said I had stole a piece of flannel from his shop; I know nothing of it; he swore at Bow-street Office he saw me take it.
I have been distressed, and several times Mr. Champante has thrown me back, though he has had thousands that came from my father abroad; I have been put on one side as a beggar; I unfortunately lost a trifle of money, I have applied to him upon several occasions, and could get no relief.
The man that sold me the pots went about selling Jews pots, his name was Green; it is all spite and malice of the publicans in the neighbourhood; when I first took the house it had but little custom to it; I brought the house round from three butts of beer a month to three butts a week; the publicans in the neighbourhood have even sent people into the house to quarrel with me, on purpose to ruin the house; the house for many years went up seven stone steps; I took them away, and made the tap-room and bar level with the ground, but seeing how I was envied, I agreed to let the house; the pots I bought of this man on the same morning of the sale, part of them he marked in the house that day, but on account of the small engraver, the edge being broke, he could not mark them all; I said to him, you must be sharp, because I am leaving the house; I did not with to stop at Westminster.
My Lord, I had liberty to go on shore; I had drank rather too much liquor, and staid beyond my time; I was afraid to go on board again, for fear of punishment, and I came up to London for employ.
I was taken with that canister in the room, and I have people to come forward that will prove, that I have had that canister a twelvemonth; at the Office they asked them if they could swear to the canister, she said she could; they asked her what marks were on it; she said, no marks at all; they asked her particularly if there was any mark at the bottom; she said she was never so particular as to look; there is a mark and it is stamped; they asked her what tea was in the canister; she said it was full of green tea; when I was taken there were about four ounces of black and green tea; I will call a witness to prove that I have had this canister a twelvemonth.
As I was coming from my wife, who was out to a day's washing, I was rather distressed, I had been out of business a long while, I took it to support my family; it was merely for want that I did such a thing.
I am guilty ; I was never guilty of any thing of the kind before; I leave it to the just Judge and Jury.
(To Prosecutor.) Did I stand near the bin where the money was found?
I was down at Brighton, I came up to town from a gentleman on board a ship, and when I came into Little St. James's-street, I I saw a gentleman's servant and two Jews bargaining for these articles; the Jews offered him fourteen pounds, I bid him fifteen pounds, and purchased them all; I think it was on Monday the 2d of December; I had a witness, but he has taken me at a disadvantage.
It was given to me.
I would wish to ask Mrs. Williams respecting my behaviour during the time I was there?
I am not prepared for my defence; my friends are not here; I do not know what to say, or where to begin first.
I had lived with Messrs. Garner and Co. about four months ago; I was promised a place by Sir Robert Braslet in the India-house, and during the time I and my father lodged with Mrs. Williams, my father went to Woolwich for three weeks; he was looking over a transport that was taking in stores; the rent was running on to Mr. Williams, and I expected my father up every day; he did not come; I was very much distressed, and Mrs. Williams wished her money paid; I did not know what to do.
The horse stood at Hobson's stables, as I told him.
I was walking through Hammersmith, and coming back I met this man, he said his name was Baker, and he was a Gloucestershire man, he was on this horse; he says to me, groom, will you buy a horse? I said, if it is worth the money; he asked twenty-five pounds for it; I bid him sixteen pounds for him, afterwards I bought him at eighteen pounds, the horse, bridle, and saddle; I rode him to London, and put him up at Mr. Hobson's stables, I do not know the name of the street, it is in Moorfields; I put him up at livery there; I bought him as he was, he had got two splints and a very bad sand-crack, which I did not see till afterwards; I asked Mr. Hobson to sell him for me; they examined him, and said he was lame, they had no chance to sell it, they having many horses of their own to sell; my landlord knows that I had such a quantity of money, I took twenty-four pounds when I left my last service, and ten pounds I lent to a shoe-maker; I have been in the habit of buying beasts, I have had three hundred pounds stock; I produce a letter
I was at work with my father on Wednesday, the 30th of January, and about half after four o'clock in the afternoon there was a man came and told my father, if he would send his son down to his house, he would give him some work; I went out to go there, I met some young men, and I staid out and drank with these young men; this watchman laid hold of another man, and whether he gave him something I do not know; he let him go, and took hold of me.
I am innocent of the charge; I never had them in my possession.
I am innocent.
Do you think you can swear you had this stuff in your shop two days before I came to your shop
A Jew that travels about declared to me, that Mr. Weddell had sold that piece of stuff to him three weeks before I bought it; he is at Portsmouth, on board of a man of war, with slops.
I was going to call James Clay , my bed-fellow, and found the watch on the outside of the threshold of the door.
I am innocent of the charge laid against me.
I was coming through that court, it is a thoroughfare to Conduit-street, for any body to come through; I picked up this umbrella, and as I was walking towards Conduit-street this man ran after me, and said, that is my umbrella; I said, it is not mine, I have just picked it up.
It is real necessity and want.
I did give him the shawl for his wife to wash; I bought the shawl of a man at the corner of Chick-lane, one night; I gave fifteen pence for it.
I bid him a shilling for the bit of beef, I laid the shilling in his hand and then he walked over to the corner of the shop.
I did as soon I came in.
I paid him a shilling for it; he followed me out and brought me in again; I gave him the shilling into his hand, when he stretched his hand to me, when I took up the bit of beef in my hand; I told him he would not get any body to buy this bit of beef but a poor man like me; if I had stole the bit of beef, I would not have gone in again when he tapped me on the shoulder; and when I came back with him into the shop, he gave me a slap in the face, and took the beef from me; now, says he, go about your business; no, says I, I shall not go without you give me a shilling; he said he would not give me one at all.
I would ask you whether I was in my senses at the time I did that?
I am a porter at Leadenhall a I hope Mr. Baker will tell the gentlemen in Court there was a gentleman came forward at the watch-house to speak for me.
When I came from breakfast it was near ten o'clock; I had never sat down to file at the board; these four spoons I had left loose, they were what I had been working upon; I put them in my pocket, as I usually do, and met my master at the door; I took them into the other room; my master called me down; I did not hear the first time; on my not hearing, the man came up, and said I was wanted; when I came down, he said, I have a suspicion that you have got something in your pocket of your master's; they searched my pocket, and found those filings; I declare to God I never knew I had them; it must be the carelessness of his boys, who take up the filings in the spoons to carry into the accompting-house; they are often playing with the spoons, and carry the filings in them, and whether they had been taking up the filings I cannot say; I never touched a thing before I touched these spoons; I did not find them as I left them, they were one in another when I put them into my pocket; the filings must be in some of them. This is the truth, if I was never to stir; I have worked forty years in the business, and was never under confinement, nor never impeached in my life; I worked for Mr. Lias five years ago.
I went in for a penny lace; he told me he did not sell any; with that he called me back; he said, as I looked like a poor boy , he would give me a bit of hat-binding, and he gave me a little better than half a yard; I went in again with the penny in my hand, and said, if you please will you give a little bit more of that binding for a penny; he jumped up to get it, and knocked the hat down; I picked it up; then he came and caught hold of me.
Have not more people access to that room? Have you not left the key? You know the woman of the house had the key, that I might not be prevented from going into my bed.
I know nothing of the stockings; Mr. Flint is the first master that I served in this country; I came from Ireland.
On the 18th of January, I was about thirty yards up Fetter-lane, making water at some inn that is just at the beginning of Fetter-lane, when the prosecutor came up to me; some man halloaed out, do you want the White Horse; sir, said I, the White Horse is as far as you can see on the same side of the way; the gentleman walked on, and I walked on about my business; he turned round, and said, you have picked my pocket; I said I had not done any such thing; some gentleman came out with a light, and I was taken to the watch-house.
I am not the person that took the counterpane from the child, I was in a public-house, the corner of Duke-street; there was a young man there who had been a gentleman's servant, but was then out of place; he had yellow buttons to his coat; the little boy said at Marlborough-street I was not the same person who took it from him, so I was taken in very innocent.
I was coming from my work with my tools on my shoulder; I met a woman that asked me to pawn these things, and she said she would give me a shilling, so I went into this pawnbroker's shop to pawn them, and he said he would not take any hats in to pawn.
I have been in the habit of buying shawls of different people, and likewise stockings; some gentlemen are here that will prove that I have bought both shawls and stockings of them.
There is a gentleman who has promised to be here to-day, but he has neglected coming.
He told me he would provide me with things for the voyage, and I was with him three days; I was to get every thing ready, and he was to provide it; I had five shillings of him, which I must have paid when I got on board a ship; he called upon me in a coach, about six o'clock in the evening, for me to come to the other house where he lived, for me to go to the South Seas; he had been drinking very freely with two men, and I was to go with them with the bag, and the jacket and trowsers, to the Spread Eagle, in Gracechurch-street, and when we came into the tap-room there was a gentleman there; I was the cleanest man along with him; the gentleman looked round and said, are you going with that man, d - n you; the two men that were with him then turned out of the doors; he took his bed on his shoulder, seeing them go, and I, being in a neighbourhood where I knew no one, I could not find him again, if I had a mind; I took the bag on my shoulder; we being both drunk, I could not find him out; I made no property of the things; I did not want to have the luggage; the next morning I was looking for him; I was not obliged to be answerable for him; I belonged to a man of war; I had my discharge; he was almost as drunk as I was.
I asked this lady for a lodging, she said she would get it ready on the Monday following; I had been to get work of Mr. Bramin, and if I could have got work of him, I should have gone to her lodging, but Mr. Clark, whom I was to work for, told me I might sleep with his boy; I never saw the place after the time I went away; I went back to her, and told her I would have come to her lodging but I had this offer; I am as innocent as a child unborn; when the child was examined at the Office, she had not a word to say but what the mother put in her mouth.
You did not see me throw it into a shop.
Did you see me pick your pocket?
Did you see my hand in your pocket?
That is a falsehood, sir.
Please your honour, I was coming over the bridge, on Thursday evening, about a quarter after three; I was going to meet a waggon with some flour, and saw the handkerchief lying on one of the seats on the bridge; I did not know who it belonged to any more than any gentleman who sits here; so soon as this gentleman saw me put it into my bosom, he sung out, stop thief; I am as innocent as either of the gentlemen of the Jury that sits round there; I am not guilty of any thing of the kind, I never did see who it belonged to, nor I never saw the gentleman's pocket.
My Lord, and gentlemen of the Jury. I acknowledged receiving the money, and that it was totally an omission on my own part in not bringing it to account.
Seventeen years the 22d of last January.
It is a prickler to pick up the fish with.
I never touched it, nor was I nigh it; I was never so nigh the cask as I am now; I am not the man, as God is my judge; I had been very ill, and was going to get a little money that was owing to me, and I stood talking to a man, and that man came to me and said, I had robbed his cart; I am as innocent as the child unborn; I saw a man with a cask go by me, but what it was I do not know.
I am charged with an intent to defraud; I did not mean to defraud; I meant to make the money good on Saturday night when I received my wages.
I am as innocent as the child unborn.
I wish to ask him whether he saw me take it off the shafts?
I had been to Leadenhall for my friend; I lived at Mr. Wright's, a sheep's head shop, in Whitecross-street; and returning home, at the corner of the court, a man asked me to carry that cask; I carried it to the corner of Cornhill, and that man accused me of taking the cask.
A little after three o'clock my landlady was in a hurry to go out to a funeral, she said I must make haste, I went up stairs and left two persons in the room; I said to Solafont this is not an agreeable lodging. we cannot get a fire when we want it; I went down stairs and went to a neighbour's house and drank tea with them, I saw nobody in the court when I went down it.
I was going down Field-lane on Saturday night, I saw a row before me, when I came up I was knocked down, and my hat fell off, and I picked up the first hat I could, I do not know whether that is the hat or no, I was drunk, I did not know what I was doing of, I was going home.
I was along with a few relations, it was late before I came home, I went up stairs and pulled my shoes off; I was taken so bad with a pain in my bowels, I came down to ease myself, I saw a man run away; before I could get my breeches unbuttoned the watchman came and took me to the watchhouse.
I have been in the habit of receiving orders for Mr. Harrison, whatever order I received from Miss Clift, or any other person's order, I entered down in my book; during the time I was at Mr. Thresher's, Mr. Harrison came after me, he wished to get me away, he knew I had a good connection, and during the time I was in his house he never went round to one customer, I have even given him the money in public company, he has been the person that has introduced me into company, (for singing) which has been my ruin.
I walked from Chatham to the Gravesend boat, then I came up to London in the boat, I was half tipsey when I went on board, and in the room of taking my own bundle I took this gentleman's; I lost my own at the same time.
In the morning I hung up my coat about eight o'clock, I never was nigh it till after three o'clock, I know not how the coffee was put in my pocket, there was nothing in my pocket when I hung it up; I said for God's sake do not say this coffee is in my pocket, it is unknown to me.
I took this shirt with intent to bring it back when I received my wages.
The prosecutor in one place observed that there is a button which is nearly coming off, which supports the gallowses, which is in consequence of his wearing his breeches so high; when I had these breeches this button was perfectly fast, and it is lose now, in consequence of the heavy irons they put on me at Bow-street; I purchased these breeches promiscuously, in the middle of the street of a Jew, I saw them hanging across the man's arm, they attracted my attention seeing them a good pair of breeches, to the best of my knowledge I gave twenty-three shillings for them, if they are stole it is unknown to me.
He swears to the shoes; I I bought them honestly, I bought them in Rosemary lane, I gave all the money I had for them, which was three shillings and nine pence.
I was called by a person in Cheapside, at two o'clock in the morning, he ordered me to Finsbury-square, he stopped me at Moorgate, there a person came to the coach, he said something, what I do not know, to the man in the coach; I was desired to go up Chiswell-street, I waited there two hours, when a parcel was brought to the coach; I went away according to his directions, he ordered me to 61, Smithfield, when I got there he stopped the coach again, he ordered me to go to Back Hill, when I got there he pointed to the place opposite of the hill, that leads to Clerkenwell Green, there he went out with the things, he told me he should be back again to pay me my fare; I waited there a considerable time, and during the time I waited I got into the coach, and on my sitting down in the straw I put my arm on the parcel; I waited, no person coming to me, I went home, I informed my wife that I had had a job and had not got my fare; I described the person, saying, that if he called by that description, there was his property; it was on my drawers, I went out with the coach the same day.
I was not home till half after five.
I was in Fore-street then.
I think he is swearing very false.
I have just come from Ireland, I have been out of the kingdom twelve years, I have been in Egypt and every where, as I was going down this street, when the word Stop thief was cried out, I ran as well as the rest; this boy swore that he never lost sight of me, he said to the alderman that he lost sight of me for ten minutes, and that I had a white coat on; there were two hundred people in the street besides me.
On the 2nd of May as I came along the street I picked it up.
I had been to this fair with gingerbread and nuts, I got a little drop of beer, I went into the farm yard about eleven o'clock, and about two o'clock, to the best of my knowledge, I was going to come home; a man hallooed out what have you got there, I said I only came to lay down and no harm to you; when I was coming just about five or six yards from the gates he laid hold of me by the collar, and says what did you do there over that gate, I said nothing, he took me to the house and called the men up and his father; now says he I will go and fetch a constable; the constable came about three o'clock and put me in the cage; I am innocent of that charge.
I know nothing at all about that saw; last Monday I went to pledge two saws of my own, and the first place I carried them to, a pawnbroker's in Chiswell-street, I told him I wanted seven shillings, he said that was too much, he would lend me six shillings, he said are they your own saws, I said yes, he said there is a young man has lost a saw, and it has been found in Whitecross-street; as this gentleman would not let me have seven shillings, I went to this gentleman's in Whitecross-street, I laid the two saws down on the counter, I told him I wanted seven shillings, he asked me my name, and I not telling him my own name, I happened to think of the name that that saw was pledged in; the pawnbroker says, have not you any tools here before, I said I have not, he said are you sure of that, he brings me this saw down, and asked me if I knew it, I said I did not, he detained me and sent for the prosecutor, that was the instigation of my being brought here.
I never wronged any body of a farthing, I have dealt with this gentleman four or five years, for new hats; for him to say that I had his money, I never saw it; when that gentleman came to see me I was very glad to see him, I asked him where he came from, he said he came to see me, I owed him seven pounds, I said seven pounds for what, he said do not you recollect that you owe me seven pounds, I said again for what, for if I want money, I can have it lent me in the neighbourhood, he says come along with me, when I came out of doors there was his brother and two other gentlemen; when we came to Lambeth-street he told me that I had robbed him; I never in my life did hurt a worm, nor was I ever dishonest to any body of a farthing, I was fit to faint, they shoved me into a public house and tore my clothes to pieces.
I never had the coat so help me god.
I leave it entirely to the mercy of your lordship, and the lenity of the prosecutor.
Where was I when I took the copper from the boy.
I have a witness to the contrary; it was in Eagle-street, the boy asked me to carry it for him into Holborn.
I shewed him the boy who hired me to carry it, and begged of him to take him.
I never saw the boy before.
I have a witness that saw the boy call me to carry it, that was coming by at the time he hired me.
Which way was I going.
I was not in the house at all at that time.
I never was in that place at all, nor never received any pots, nor nothing of the kind.
A man gave me the basket to take care of while he was going the other side of the way; I went into Mrs. Stewart's house, and had half a pint of beer, I was very dry.
My lord, I hope you will take my case into consideration, as I am poor and friendless; this man will swear my life away; I declare I never saw him, nor do I know any thing about him.
I acknowledge my fault; I maintained my character for seven years in the company's employ; I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I resign it up to the court altogether.
I worked with this gentleman above a twelvemonth with my own tools; his tools and my tools I carried all in one in my apron sometimes to my apartment, and as we wanted them we fetched them. we used each other's tools, his tools were nothing to me, I did not want to sell them; he called me from the shop, and this gentleman took me; he said, he had found some tools in my room; he knew at the same time some must be in my apartment; I have done very imprudent, owing to his not lending me the one pound note.
(to Stevenson) Was not the man in liquor.
I am not guilty of the charge that is alledged against me; instead of the prosecutor putting the money in his pocket, he kept it in his hands and dropped asleep, then it dropped out of his hands, I picked it up and put the seven shilling piece in my mouth while I put the other money in his pocket.
I leave myself entirely to the mercy of the court.
I am innocent of the charge that is alledged against me.
I came from on board aship the same morning, I was very groggy the next morning, I did not know nothing of it nor where I was till one of the keepers told me I was in prison; I have been sixteen years in his majesty's service, I came to look after some prize money.
I was in liquor.
My observation to that is, that it is all false. When I was in the Poultry Counter I wrote to Mr. Swinton to come there, that was only to know from him what he had put me there for; at that time I never knew what it was for. On Tuesday morning Mrs. Kerslake had been out twice, once she went out to market, she put some money in a canvas bag, which Mr. Swinton bought for the purpose during the whole time I settled the books with him, and she was put out of the way that she should not be subpoena'd; I said to Mrs. Kerslake I do not think you have lost the two pound note, Mr. Swinton said, no d - n her, she has not lost the two pound note no more than you have; about half an hour after that he said, will you go up and look for Dr. Brodum's day book, he said you had better take off your coat you will dirty it; I thought he was making fun of me, it was an old coat, I would not, I was going up, he said stop till my son Anthony comes in; then he sent me down to fill some bottles with Dr. Brodum's medicines, when Mr. Swinton said I might go home early that evening if I liked, as he had some gen-men coming there, consequently I went home about six o'clock that evening; the next morning I went in at the back gates (there is a communication made backwards to convey the goods from one house to the other, neither is the business at this time Mrs. Kerslake's no more than it is mine; Mrs. Kerslake keeps false books to shew the commissioners, which she has shewed me), when I went in that morning I laid my hat down, he (Swinton) said, Mr. Hall you had better go down and fill some nervous; before I had done that, he said to me, have you written out these false accounts to give the assignees, I said I have not, he said will you be so good as to write them out now, I made half a dozen pens out of some quills, I said to Mrs. Kerslake will you have the goodness now to let me have the writings to copy, she said I should have them presently, she walked out again, I sat down for about twenty minutes or half an hour, she came to the door herself with two constables, she says there is your prisoner, I give you charge of him; they searched me, and while I took off my coat Mr. Swinton tapped the officer on the shoulder, took him out in the passage and came back again, he says where is your pocket book, I gave them the pocket book, they took out a paper containing an account of what I I had received and paid, after that he tapped the man on the shoulder again, and took him out, and when he came in he said where is your hat, I said that is my hat, with that he took hold of my hat, takes out a paper, he says this is it, and took and gave it to her, he then asked Mrs. Kerslake what the note was.
This woman now says that it laid on the counter; at Bow-street she said it laid on a board in the window; after sir Hugh Owen had got my character I was with the prosecutor in the afternoon, he never accused me with a piece of theft till he and the constable came to the stable, the constable went to my lodging, he found nothing there but my property; it was not half past eleven when I saw this young woman.
I am extremely sorry to tell you that at the time this misfortune took place I was in a state of inebriety, more to my shame; I can only add that hitherto, and up to this time, I have had a character with reputation; I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
I told him I found the bag as I was walking along, they never a one of them saw me in the place, nor can they say they saw me steal it.
I should not have carried that bed to Mr. Ellis's if my wife had come home; may it please your lordship, I bought that bed in Spital Fields, with a view of going to housekeeping again; I went to my wife and asked her if she liked to come and live with me again; she told me she would go to service, for if we came together again we should not agree; I sold the bed to Mr. Ellis for one pound seventeen shillings; as for any of her things, I never touched them, nor did I go away with any thing.
These articles were sent to my house to keep them from the assignees; the four boxes that they have made the excuse of\\ send\\ ing them to my house was that they were to be sent by water; he never put any direction on the boxes, they were for a gentleman in Wood street, that order was countermanded; after he found a messenger was to be sent into his house, he ordered me to go to the inn in Fleet market to get some porters, which porters were to be none that I knew, nor should they be followed to see where the articles went; there were some small articles besides, he desired them to be taken to my house for fear the assignees should have them; since which time he has been carrying on the business, he receives the profits of the business, I settled the books with him every Saturday; once or twice he brought in Mrs. Kerslake, that I might swear that I settled the account with Mrs. Kerslake; he has sworn to a tobacco dish that I had three years before I knew him; last night Mrs. Kerslake swore to a table spoon that was my own; there is Mr. Chapman that drawed the beer, he is in court, he came into the charge room with me, he knows that when he offered me the change of the seven shilling piece I first of all pushed it from me; the next day he came to me and said, if I would sign the commission of bankruptcy he would not appear against me.
It is the first offence that ever I have been guilty of of this sort; I have always endeavoured to maintain my family in an honest way before; I have served my king and county both by sea and land.
If I understand Mr. Sharp right, he says I left Mrs. Rainsdon's service without making up my accounts; I made up my accounts to the last day of April, sometimes I made up my account in one month, sometimes two, and sometimes it was three months; I made up my account last April to the\\ amountof sixty-three pound odd.
When Mr. Sharp and Mrs. Rainsdon came to Newgate, I said I would rectify the mistake.
I was going to a country job to Dover barrack buildings, I went up for my tools, I found this lead, and I was going to bring it home for safety to my master.
(read in court) May it please you, my lord, the defendant was employed by Mr. Richards to deliver for him as porter, certain goods and articles, and on the delivering of the same to give a bill and receipt for the same, for five pounds nine shillings and ninepence, which he the said defendant did receive in cash of Mr. Harvey, and the said defendant returned home in order to return the cash to Mr. Richards, when to his great astonishment he could not find the money he had received, but by some accident found he had lost the same, which misfortune prevented him from returning, but the plaintiff immediately procured a warrant and had the defendant taken into custody, the said defendant on account of his confinement was unable to support his family or of paying the said money, and wishing to make some compensation to the defendant for the loss he had sussained, wrote the plaintiff a letter, desiring him to grant him his liberation, and he would repay him by instalments, but instead of that the plaintist has proceded to the utmost rigour of the law; the defendant therefore humbly prays that his innocence will appear in not making away or disposing of the said money, but having lost it by accident, and not with intent of any fraud, or to wrong him of it by any means whatsoever.
May it please your lordship, in the first place my taking the name of Preston, was not in any way to commit any fraud, but merely from embarrassed circumstances; I solemnly declare that when I went out I pulled to the street door after me, I went out of town not with any view of defrauding the prosecutrix, neither did I know any thing of it at the time; I knew not of the robbery till such times I was accused by the prosecutrix, I had no other intent than to pay the lady for the lodgings.
The lady said I might pay it monthly, I was expecting remittances, I actually did send her a letter, saying I was obliged to go out of town, and that I meant to send her the money
I hope the honourable court will not suffer this to prejudice my case, I was in there for debt; there was a gentleman called there that morning; when I came down stairs I found the door had been unbolted, and that somebody had been out.
(to the servant.) Whether I have not called you up several times to go to your sweetheart.
From my embarrassed circumstances it has not been in my power to have brought forward witnesses to my character; my reason for stopping away was I was every moment expecting to be arrested, I went to Gravesend, I was ashamed to send to any body to let them know the situation I was in; during all the time I was in that house, the house was totally free and open for me; if so be I had a bad intent, why go out in that manner, I might have gone when they had been out to the play, as the house was totally open.
I did not drop the shilling and sixpence in the shop, but I offered him the shilling.
When I first came to this bar I pleaded guilty, for this reason, I would not wish to trouble your your lordship, nor offend my prosecutor with a tedious defence.
The brass pullies belong to me, only the brass nobs belong to him; I beg for mercy.
When I was going to goal he saw a woman, he said that was the woman; he did not take her.
There was another man took in the watchhouse with me; he let that man go away, and kept me.
He says very false indeed; when I was in the watchhouse there was another prisoner there, a lamplighter, they turned him out of the watch-house, they mentioned his name, and they said they knew his father.
I was coming from Westminster, I had been to sell a horse, it was late when I took it, the man said he would not buy it without he had a trial of it; with that I came along Fleet street, and that gentleman said he was robbed by the woman, and if she did not give him the money he would give charge of her; we came along, and the lamplighter too, he knocked the woman down, the woman got up, held her patten up, and knocked his hat off. I never saw the woman before in my life.
I hope you will take it into consideration, I have a wife who is lame at home and two children; I have been a soldier thirteen years, I have been wounded abroad; I beg for mercy.
In the first instance I wish your lordship to understand that the prosecutor has perjured himself in his evidence twenty times; Mr. Henson's amounts to the same thing. So far when he asked my name prior, I told him Frederick Smith , that I acted as agent to St. John; he charged me with respect to the acquaintance I had with that man (I am speaking of Mr. Henson), I said that I come from him, I would show him the man, and take him myself; that was refused. The last time that I was brought here I had respectable people from the country; at the present instance I have none; many of them live in Hampshire. The prosecutor has brought these people from Manchester, whom I know not though I do not deny that I negotiated the note. The man was with me and put his dot on the note.
I was a scaffolder at the mint ; I went upon the flat to get me a brace for the scaffold, there I saw this lead lay, I took it up, says I, I do not know how this came here; I chucked it down below, and when I came to the gate I was thinking of giving it into the gatehouse, but in going out of an evening the place is so crowded I could not get into the house. Mr. Wood stopped me with this lead; and immediately he charged me with it, I gave it him.
I am innocent of the charge brought against me. I was not on the spot that morning, I was at Lambeth.
I should be very happy to go to sea.
I did not own that I stole the copper.
The charges that my prosecutor has raised against me are not facts, nor is there any truth in what he has alledged against me at all. I have served that man in every shape, I have done my duty, and I have protected him in every transaction. I am now a prisoner standing at the bar, and he is a gentleman that has come out of nothing, not so much as I am myself, although I am cast down. I know Mr. Smith for ten years past, he is rising, he has left his duty. I have been the man that is faithful to him; my wife is in the millinery and mantua-line, and what was in her possession I know no more than a child unborn; but this Mr. Smith came to me in prison, he came to try me with all his invention, which is his character, and he is well known by every person in the line to be one of the most deceitful men upon earth. He invents things which is most astonishing, it is beyond the conception of a human being to imagine, that man has such things in his heart. He has come to that property which he possesses by nothing but merely by his own artful invention, and the very person that has gone into partnership with him he knows a mere nothing in the business, he knows he has a tool in his hand; this is the character of my prosecutor, which is my misfortune to be his servant. As to those things I know no more of them than a child unborn; as to those wrappers, he mentioned to me one day, he says, when we have some wrappers, just take them home to your wife to get some bags made; he knew my wife was distressed well enough; she made some for him although she had other work to do, by doing which she would have got a great deal more money; there were some wrappers left, and as she was to make them into bags, I thought it frivolous to bring them back; and these wrappers are brought against me as if I stole them. All this he knows if he would speak to his conscience.
I found this basket of tools by Russel square; I stopped there five minutes, I took it up; not seeing any person own it I went and pawned it.
I never saw the hat.
I was coming from Black-friars road, and going across the end of Water-lane I found this lead coming on as far as the Temple I had occasion to go to the privy, and when I got to the privy I heaved this lead down on the flag stones, and when I got out again I took it up. I was going to Ogle street.
Mr. Keen gave me leave to drink some beer in the brewhouse, which I saved; I had to get up at four o'clock in the morning to go to Whitechapel; I thought I should want some beer and some victuals before I went out, and I took that cask. I had saved that beer up,
I work in ballast lighters. Upon the 30th of December; I went to my work about twelve o'clock, my wife always knows me to come home at high water, she expected me that night, and coming into my own bed chamber I catched this man sleeping in my own bed where my wife and I sleep together, I catched him by the breast and asked him what business he had there, he did not speak a word to me, he appeared to be very much in liquor. There was a watch laying upon the table at a distance in the room, I took the watch, I could get no sense of him; I took this watch till I knew what he come about. I went up stairs, having a strong suspicion of jealousy, but finding her locked up in one of my lodger's rooms I went away. In the morning after my going away to my work, he arose and went up to where she lay, and sent the woman out of the house and had connection with her in the bed. I never denied having the watch to the officers; I put it in my pocket only to find the man out; he fetched this Mr. Walker and swore against me, and that he was captain of the Canary; he is neither captain nor owner, nor does he belong to the ship. At the time of my imprisonment in Clerkenwell he lived in my own house with my wife, and took her from me. He came up to Newgate to tell me if I would not prosecute him for having to do with my wife and give him some money, he would not appear against me. I have witnesses to prove the same.
In the morning when I was coming down stairs, I saw two boys in the privy, I asked them what they had there, they said that they had some leather that they found in the privy; they said it did not belong to them; I asked them what they wanted, they said they were going to call a drover up that lived there, if I was a mind to have it, I might have it; when the officers came the drover was out; the drover came up to the office to me, I asked him for the boys, he told me he would bring them, but the boys have gone on board a ship this fortnight.
The muslin was not in my pocket.
Here is several of them, they all tell one story of my having this in my pocket; I deny it. I have no one for me but God; I said how much, they said four shillings, me give two shillings; and after me put down two shillings, they would not take it, they bring me a prisoner.
When I was in Mr. Harman's employ I had it in my power to break up as many cases for fire wood as I pleased. I took this home for a rabbit hutch, I meant to pay for it.
I was employed to carry some pork down in the street, and the gentleman said he would give me sixpence for carrying it.
I was a going to Mr. Dixon's in Cheapside, that I work for, I called into the Flower pot, Bishopsgate street, there was a young man in there that told me that there was a shop in Threadneedle street where he could get a cheese for nothing, and if I would go with him I should have half of it. There was a call out when I got to Threadneedle street of Stop thief, and a man stopped me and said I was the thief.
I know nothing about it.
Will you swear that those nails found upon me were your property at the time they were found upon me.
When I came out of Mr. Hornby's shop I went to Mr. Stone's shop, I pulled off my coat and left it hanging up in the shop; there is a man that works for Mr. Stone that would take my life away, he might as well have put them in my pocket as well as any other man.
Did I not say that I did not know that the property was stole at all. One of the young men gave it to me about three or more streets off. I should not have come back to the court if I had known it had been stolen.
It was in the night when I fetched the chest away; I was very drunk, I put the chest in a coach; the lock sprung up, and so I put a padlock on it.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I went to that gentleman's shop, I asked to purchase a waistcoat, he shewed me some, for which he asked me ten shillings; I offered seven shillings; with that he was very angry and we had some words together. The gentleman was alone, and because I would not give him his price he charged me with this; I never took any thing from him nor did he take any thing from my person.
I am not guilty.
I am innocent of the charge alledged against me.
I was stupid in liquor, and I have had a hurt in my head ever since I was discharged from the service.
I must leave it to the mercy of the court.
I went home on Sunday afternoon to my father, I told him that I wanted my small clothes mended, I told him I did not like to ask my master, because he was mean enough to deny me. My father gave me half a crown. On Tuesday I got up to work and went down stairs, and cut off a piece of cake of gingerbread, I was hungry; with that my master thought I was robbing the till.
I am quite innocent of it, I know nothing of the lead.
I was hungry, and I took it.
It was about eleven o'clock when I was coming from my sister's house, when I heard the rattle spring; somebody jumped off from the top, and the lead knocked my hat off.
When the boy was knocked down, I was of the other side of the way.
I sold the gentleman no spoons; I have been eleven year's in his Majesty's service, and I was wounded in my head, and I lost an arm with lord Nelson. I cannot bring to my recollection any thing of the kind, being very much intoxicated in liquor; if done, it was not meant to defraud. It is the very first crime that ever I have been charged with.
I am innocent of the fact.
I never saw the plane till it was shewn me.
I bought them in Smithfield market, the Monday in Christmas week.
Ever since I have been from that unpleasant situation in Woolwich, I have been in his Majesty's service in the Isle of Man, stationed under lieutenant Clark; and by my wife being taken remarkably ill, I came to see her. I was in a vessel, laying along with the Princess in the river; I received a letter from my wife, I went to see her; in consequence of that, a bosom freind went and sold me to these gentlemen. I was a midshipman under lieutenane Clark, and that your lordship will see.
Two years and seven months. I was a midshipman on board his Majesty's tender, Three Firends, stationed the Isle of Wight.
Yes.
I did get the tobacco and snuff. I meant to have paid for it.
On Monday I was returning home along Thames street, a man like a porter says, soldier, will you go of an errand for me to No. 10, Bush lane, for a dozen of large size, and a dozen of small size frying pans. I will give you eight pence, he says; come to this place, and I will be here when you come back. I went to No. 10, Bush lane, and received the goods.
I know that I owe Mr. Anthony Lewis the money; he lent me the money, and now he makes it a defraud.
Did you see me stand by the counter, or touch any of the goods in the shop
I wish to ask whether I was not in liquor
I know nothing at all about it.
The customers owed me so much I was afraid he would be angry; I was turned away without an hour's notice.
I gave Mr. Perry a month's warning; I settled with him except five shillings and ten pence; I told him I was agreeable to stop till all was settled if he was agreeable. Soon after he got another man; I was willing to have all things meet with him.
There are eighty seven pots he took out unsettled.
I contradict almost all the evidence which they have given. In the first lace, the prosecutor says he did not ask what he spent the over night - he certainly did ask me; I told him I could not tell, as I was not there. With respect to their halloaing after me in the road, they did not, as I could hear them. I asked a parcel of boys where there was a barber's shop; from there I asked where I could have my boots cleaned, which was not above twenty or thirty yards from the place.
I would wish to know who it was that gave the information that I had the watch, because it was given to me; I had it of a young man against Bartholomew tavern, I do not know the young man's name, only I have been in his company before; I never knew him to be guilty of any thing of the kind.
I had been in the habit of going to this house for lodgings for eight or nine nights; I went in there very much in liquor myself; I knew I had to go down to Enfield the next morning along with two or three friends; I undressed myself and went to bed; when I awoke I got up, it was much earlier than I thought, I knocked at the door and the boy opened it; I came out of the room, and on the first stair I stepped my foot on something, I picked it up, and not knowing what it was, I put it in my pocket; the reason I went to sleep there was my not being settled with a private lodging.
I was rather intoxicated at the time; I meaned to return them in the afternoon.
On the 26th of April, in the evening I went into that gentleman's shop, and enquired for a pair of shoes, he shewed me a pair of round toed shoes, I told him they were no good to me, I was a seaman, I could not get them in between the ratlings; he asked me seven shillings and six-pence, I said I could buy a pair of slop shoes for five shillings and sixpence; but I would rather have a pair of his making; that pair of shoes laid on the prosecutor's desk; I said these are a better pair than those you asked me seven shillings and six-pence for; he said they are my shoes, I said I know they are; he then said if I let you have them for five and six-pence, you will treat me with a drop of gin, if you will not treat me, I will not let you have the shoes; he sent for an officer. I had none of his property about me. I never robbed a man of a penny in my life. I never offered to go out of the house.
I did not take the watch.
I had been punished by the regiment a great deal; it made me quite careless almost to think I should be punished, and not in fault; for that reason, I was careless what I did. I did not take the horses with intent to make money of them, or steal them. A gentleman that I never saw in my life before, persuaded me to ride the saddle horse, and be rode the other. We went on the road, I cannot tell what place it was; I never was in the country before. The other man took the traces off the horses; I asked him what he was going to do with them, I thought it was wrong; he said you never mind; he told me to put up at the house where the ostler lived, he would call at eight o'clock in the morning. As we were riding along, I perceived the horse I was riding, go lame; I said we had better get him shod, than for the horse to go lame. When I came to the stable in the morning, I asked the ostler where I could get a blacksmith, he told me. I took him to the blacksmith; I saw the other horse wanted shoeing all round. I told the blacksmith to fetch him.
I am a man that has brought up a large family; I have experienced a deal of family trouble; so much so, that I am in a derangement of mind at times.
I worked at the London d ocks; as I was coming home from work, I went into the privy in Leadenhall-market, there I saw two men; I never spoke a word to them; and coming along Threadneedle-street, I saw the two men, they asked me to carry the sheep to Long-alley, they would give me sixpence. I was pursued, and taken; they ran away.
I am innocent of taking the watch I am accused of, the same being given me in the following manner; I was accosted by two men who said they were going to walk for a wager, they told me to take the watch to tell the time. I am now sixteen years of age, and should I be so unfortunate as to be found guilty most humbly beg the clemency of the court to order me on board one of his Majesty's ships of war.
I shall leave it to God Almighty' and the gentlemen of the jury, and you. I am sixty-two years of age.
I have lived in the house; I left the house on the Wednesday, as the robbery was committed on the Monday. There was no lock on the door; the box was not locked, I left the key in it; there were only some rags in it; I had not fetched it away.
I know nothing of it. I was out the over night, and the key was out side of the door. I was intoxicated when I was at the office.
I had not the things about me; he would force the shift about me. I am a stranger here; I was afraid of the press-gang.
The coats in question were lost unknown to me, I was so intoxicated, I cannot account how they were gone; the butler told me if I would give four pound Mrs. Chaplain would proceed no further in it.
I went to the London docks to see a cousin of mine; this man wanted me to buy some clothes before he called me in; I called on that day to see whether that young man was there, and this man told me he would go and call him; his brother took me up stairs to look at a coat, this man never mentioned that it is the brother I dealt with. I bought a pair of breeches of him about two months before.
Your lordship, I cannot tell who put it in my trunk, the trunk was open; I persuaded him every day to get a constable and have every body searched in the house; I told him I should then be satisfied, and he would too; I said it grieves me that you should lose your watch. I cannot say that the lad had done any thing against me; I told him to do his business; he always said stop a bit, by that reason I had to do it myself, which sometimes made me so tired I could hardly walk up to bed; I told him I was in my master's place in the bake-house; and two or three times the maid did things which was not her place to do to me.
I bought the knives of a man up in the loft, I gave him five and six-pence for these ten knives; this boy came and over-hauled my pockets; he told me to come along with him; and if I had five hundred knives I would have given them to him sooner than go to a prison.
I found these books in some waste paper; I put them in my bosom; I thought them of little or no value, and when I came to the gate the officer stopped me; I had them in my bosom.
I only beg the lenity of the court, I have a large family, and I am an old man.
I know nothing at all of them. They fetched the woman of the shop in Rosemary-lane, and the daughter to prove that I was the man; no, my dear, said they, this was not the man; this man is a man and a half, the other man was a little man; I know nothing at all of it no more than my dying day.
I did it for want.
It does not stand to reason that I should tell the prosecutor so; he has not put me there so much for punishment, it was more for gain; he asked me to get a friend to advance him the money.
The crime that I am now charged with I am innocent of; Mr. Shephard took me up on Sunday; I had not the opportunity of going to satisfy my master that I had bought that piece of cloth.
I was coming from Westminster near about ten o'clock on Monday evening. I had occasion to ease myself at the New church in the Strand, there I found it, I took it home and cleaned it. Trott asked me what I had, I said a bear skin, and some bones; he said shoot it out; I shot it out. and went with him; I said I was going to take it to Rag-fair, or somewhere thereabout, to get vend for it.
There is witnesses to prove that I bought the wheels in Smithfield market.
When I took the skins to Mr. Scrivener; I never told him that I had them of a mate of a ship; I had them of Brice, that Brice had a commission of a mate of a ship to sell these skins.
. Yes, I did; Brice said he had them of a mate of a ship to sell some beavers; he asked me if I was acquainted with a hatter, I told him I was not particularly; there was an excise officer of the dock, I was employed by times in it, I would ask him the question. I asked Mr. Serivener if he used any such thing, he said he did; I asked him then if he would buy them, he said he would if they were worth his money; he could not tell the worth of them until he saw the bulk; Brice asked me if I knew where Mr. Scrivener lived, I told him I did not; I asked a man that knew, it proved to be No. 111; I told Brice that Mr. Scrivener said he would buy them if they were worth his money. On the 1st of May, when I was going to the dock, he said Watkins, I have not sent these skins, I told him I was going to my employment, I could not go; he said my employment was over at four o'clock; I told him I had no objection to go at four o'clock; he said the skins lay at Temple-bar, it was a short way to carry them, he would pay me porteridge. We went into the Crooked Billet; he told me to go in there, he would call upon me; I stopped there an hour. I was on my feet going away when in he came; I asked him why he stopped, he said the people were not at home, they were at home now. I went with him a short way, he told me to stop at a door, the stairs faced the door right up; he went up and brought the bundle down; Brice brought it down. We walked in company to Scrivener's house; I was at the door before him, he was close by my side. I laid the bundle down in the passage; Mr. Scrivener asked me if these were the skins, I never saw the skins; I told him I supposed they were; I asked Mr. Scrivener, when he could give an answer, he said he would let me know in the morning. Brice asked me when I should see Mr. Scrivener again, I told him I should see him in the dock; he then asked me to go up to Holborn with him to ask Mr. Scrivener for twenty pound; I told him I had other things to do that evening, I could not go; he said he had a bill to pay he wanted twenty pounds; I accordingly went. Mr. Scrivener brought up fifteen pounds, he said it was all the money that he had in the house, he gave that in part of payment; and if he did not bargain for the skins the fifteen pound was to be returned, and the skins were to be taken away. I pressed Mr. Scrivener to go into the public house; I acted as porter, I told him to make the bargain as cheap as he could, as I got nothing by it, he said that perhaps it might be a penny or two pence a pound, they might split upon that; I told him then not to concern himself with me. I accordingly went into this public house; Brice was there, and we went away together. On the evening of the 5th, Brice was determined either to have he money for the skins, or to take them away, as he had not seen Mr. Scrivener, he wanted to see him particularly; I went into this public house, and Brice by and by comes in; I said I was waiting for you. There were three men that saw me take the money out of my pocket-book; I said I had fifteen pounds, and in case they did not make a bargain, the money was to be returned. Brice has denied of ever being in company with me, and ever knowing any transaction in the business. These men have swore to him at the office. That jew swore that he did not see Brice; his wife was in the passage at the time that he put the bundle on my shoulder. I never had any connections with Brice; I never knew any of his connections or transactions whatsoever in my life. I keep a chandler's shop, he served me with half a hundred weight of soap, and half a dozen pounds of candles; I never had any other dealings with him, than he asking me to get a customer for these beaver skins.
I bought it of a waterman by the water side; he is not here.
When I was taken I was innocent; I was coming along promiscuously from my work; I was intoxicated, and falling in there to lie down that evening, that gentleman came and took me. I was very much in liquor when I was taken.
I only beg for mercy.
Did I ever offer to fire a pistol at you
Did I tell you that I had a partner on the road with a horse
Did I offer to pull out any pistol and fire at your husband
Did I tell you that there was a man at the gate with the horse
I never offered to fire any pistols at him. I went to this man's house, I was informed that he wanted to buy pistols; I went there on purpose to ask him; I knocked at the door, they opened it; I went in, they asked me to have a bit of supper; I got one of these pistols out of my pocket to shew him, meaning to ask him to buy it; he took one of the chairs up; I never offered to fire at all, nor held my arms out; this man put the chair and struck at me; I dropped the pistol out of my hands; I took hold of the chair, I said, what do you want by this; he said, d - n you, I will kill you; I struck at him with the chair. I stood in my own defence: his wife ran and locked the door; they swore they would kill me among them, so therefore I hit them again with the stick; he got a fork and swore he would run it through me; then he knocked me down and overpowered me; I only stood in my own defence all the while.
It is a thing quite impossible.
I know nothing at all about it.
I was going by the place, I heard the cry of \stop thief.\" I ran, and this gentleman came and took me."
That young person said, I put the note in the till, which I deny; and after I had given her the change, I wrote the direction on the note, which she gave me, and put the note in my pocket, there being another man serving at the till; I intended to put it in the till, when an opportunity offered, it slipped my memory.
It was in the dark, was it not.
I belong to the Tower-Hamlet militia. I had been to Deptford. on my return, I went into the Bull's-head, Leadenhall-street, with my wife and the corporal, on my going out, I was stopped by the landlord, who told me, that there had been a pot of beer ordered to the shoemaker's over the way, and I was the man that ordered it, they sent for a constable, and searched me, my chief witness, the corporal, who was with me, has got a furlough. I questioned the boy when I was going out of the house, he said, I give it to some man, I believe you are the man.
I was crossing along Cornhill, a young man crossed over the way and accused me of dropping some stockings. I was twenty yards from the door behind a coach. I knowing myself innocent, went back. It was the 23d when I was stopped; he said, the 22d.
I was coming towards his master's house, a man met me that I know perfectly well, but I cannot find him out since, he asked me to take the glass to Mr. Wilkes's house, Moorfield's, and when I received it out of his hands, I had not gone two doors before that gentleman came to me; and as to my being in the shop that day, I was not.
I am quite innocent.
I have nothing to say. I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I was going my round at half past three on Saturday morning, I found this watch by the corner of Duke-street; it was laying on the pavement. I kept it in my possession for nine days, to see if I could find an owner for the watch. I carried it always with me on my beat: I heard no enquiries. I happened to go into this pawnbroker's to get the particulars of the watch for the purpose of getting it advertized the next day. I asked the pawnbroker's man to tell me, whether it was gold or not; he said, yes. I said, could I pawn it; he said, yes. I said, for three guineas; he said, yes. The master came in the shop and asked me many questions, and then told me to go away, he would keep the watch. I went out to get an officer. They took me. I was in Clerkenwell four days; and when I went up to the office, there was no owner to this watch: they let me go. I told them where I lived; and when they sent for me, I went to the office.
I got up, and went out in the morning, at day-light; I took nothing with me but the clothes that I had on my back; I owed no rent till the Thursday. I was going along the road, about ten o'clock in the day, I lit with a man with a bundle in his hand; he said, he came from Bristol; he asked me to buy it; he said, he wanted some money; I asked him to let me look at them; there was a coat and some stockings, I saw but three waistcoats; I gave him seventeen shillings for them, I thought it was the value of them. I went to this man's house, and let him look at them; I afterwards happened to go into a public-house, where I lost the things; I never made a farthing of them. I left with that gentleman, a tea caddie, three waistcoats, and a pair of old shoes, and what things else I do not know, I told him he was welcome to them.
The note and check I picked up under the tap-room table in the morning after that gentleman was gone out.
I have been in London about seven years, I have lived in as respectable houses as any in London, and never was at the bar of justice before in my life.
Some of that glass I had from glazing a large sky light at Barnet, and some I bought some of it was broke. I cut it into squares and put it into the cellar.
It was a new skylight that I glazed entirely new.
I have been in his Majesty's service and in the Merchants service a long while, I happened to come up the Old Change a coach was coming, I ran upon the pavement these two men catched hold of me, a man came up and said I had been robbing the warehouse, I had only been in England five or six weeks.
I never touched any thing but a trifling thing.
I went into that gentleman's shop and knocked three times, and when he looked up I took up the chest; as soon as he came to me I asked him the price of it; he said I wanted to thieve it.
I found the notes upon my beat as I before said.
He lent me an old handkerchief.
On the Saturday morning I went into the chandler's shop, I asked them how much I owed them, she said she could not tell till her husband came in; I told the young man to pay the woman; he said, George, you did not pay me all last week, I want my money; I said I shall pay my landlady and you as far as my money goes.
I am an hundred miles from home. I have no friends here.
When I brought the pocket-book to him, I shewed it him. I told him, when I picked it up it was open.
I was employed by Mr. Whitnell to look after Hollincrest, with the sheriff's officer.
I know nothing of it.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the jury, I have never been before a court of justice before The copper taken from me, I had no intention of stealing the same being given to me by a person in the dock, alledging, he wanted it for a sample, unconscious that I was doing wrong; I acceeded to his wish when I came to the gate, although I had a pass I was stopped with the property, I informed them I was not carrying it for myself, I was carrying it for another person coming out of the Dock before me, who on my apprehension absconded. I was advised to run away, I therefore beg my crime may be considered to arise from ignorance.
I was in the House of Correction at the time this lamp was taken away.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury. It is with extreme concern I now appear before you, it is the first time in my life; I have only to offer in extenuation of my conduct, I have been confined three months with sickness, during which time I was obliged to make away with all my tools. I beg my offence may be considered to arise from necessity, and not from depravity, and should I be considered an object to experience the lenity of the court, the most grateful sensations of heart will be ever acknowledged, by your most penitent servant.
I am very sorry for the offence I have committed; I hope you will have a little mercy on me, I will never do so any more.
If you please to forgive me this time I will never be guilty of the like again.
I am innocent; I never had the paper of starch. I was running along, I heard somebody call out, I turned round to see and somebody knocked me down directly.
I was going past that way, I happened to go into this privy, this gentleman came and took me out, he said I was the person that stole the goose, because I had a brown coat on.
The crime I now stand indicted for I was led to believe I was totally clear of, as I was in custody for it in January sessions, and was discharged from the sessions house, Clerkenwell.
I know nothing at all of the plate that I am accused of. At half past eleven o'clock, when I took up Mr. Noble's supper I found Mrs. Noble in the pantry, she said, you wretch, I shall take the key away, you have broke all my china. The bottles that I am accused of, they did not belong to Mr. Noble, the bottles belonged to me and Mr. Gill's lodgers. I have lived there two years and a half, there were several bottles sent me while I was there, and a few of the bottles, some families that were there, they left them, and my friends sent me a bottle of rum and a bottle of blacking.
I have nothing particular to say in my defence.
I do not know any thing about it.
I had been out all day; I broke a glass; I wanted to buy a dram glass. I went into the shop and knocked with my foot, nobody answered; that gentleman ran in, he said, you rascal, you want to rob the shop. There was nobody along with me; the door was standing a jar, it was not upon the latch.
I must leave every thing to the gentlemen of the court.
Another man took the coat, and gave it to me; I was very much in liquor; I did not know what I was doing.
On my going down Holborn I saw three men at Mr. Moon's window, they gave me three watches to hold; they went towards the window again; they came to me and took the three watches from me; they gave me this watch; John Brown asked them if they would give him any, they hit him and ran away.
I am a dyer by name; I worked seven years in one shop. I am innocent of the crime.
I was going up Fleet-street with my wife; seeing a mob I stopped to see what was the matter. I put my hands against this gentleman. I deny taking the handkerchief; the gentleman never saw the handkerchief in my hand.
I was walking in Union-street, I saw three men, I asked them where I could get a job, they said at Mr. Richards's. I went there, walked down the yard, not seeing any body I returned, and coming back I picked up this cloth. This man met me and said, where are you going. I said, to take it in; he struck me and I knocked him down.
The money I took was to defray a small debt. I offered to serve his majesty, my prosecutor and the magistrate denied it.
I was coming through this passage, I had like to have fell over it; it was an old board, I thought it was fit for the top of a table. I am fifty-five years of age, and never was before a magistrate before.
I found the straw going to my work.
As I have the misfortune to be hard of hearing, I will give my defence in writing.
I wish to know what money I am indicted for.
It is a false indictment.
I am innocent of what is laid to my charge; I was very much in liquor.
I have a witness to come forward to prove that I am innocent of the charge who can prove every hour where I was that night.
On Wednesday last he came to me in Newgate; he said he had found no bill against me, if I would give him 2 l. he would make it up.
When I went back to Clerkenwell the people said, that man that swore to me, and one Rogers in particular said, that man that swore to me would swear any thing for the price of my blood.
No, they were all in custody at the time I was.
I know no more of the man, I never saw Mr. Judge with my eyes before he came in the country to take me before a Justice. I am as innocent of the crime as you are, I know no more of it. I was at Mr. Hensley's that night the mare was lost.
My prosecutor was drunk at the time he had me taken to the watch-house. That gentleman stopped me; my prosecutor said he was one of my companions, he thought he knew as much about it as I did; and when my prosecutor had me taken to the watch-house, I said, sir, if you are in liquor I am not, I was going home.
My Lord, as I was coming home, I was surrounded by a parcel of men; I did not know who they were; they knocked me, and kicked me in the mud. I was taken home afterwards by some friends that came up and interfered; I know nothing further; I was speechless.
I met a man on the road; I bought it for twenty-five shillings; I brought it on the road till that gentleman bought it of me; and when I lit on him again, he said he had lost the horse, and if I would give him the money again, he would not hurt me.
The prosecutrix had lived with me fourteen days, and on this night we were both half intoxicated, we went home together, and afterwards went out again to other public houses, and had more drink; I was very much intoxicated; we went to bed together; she bit my finger, here is the mark; she catched hold of me in a tender part, and I, feeling great pain, did bite her; she scratched me, and we fought together. I do not know any thing about the fork. I, being intoxicated, did not know what I was about.
On Saturday the 3d of March I left work, about seven o'clock in the evening; I went to Mr. Knight's, an ironmonger in Foster-lane, to purchase a bit of copper to finish my work the next week, and coming up Holborn. I called in a strange public house that I never was in before; I had a pint of porter, and hearing a few songs sung caused me to stop till between twelve and one o'clock. When I left the public house I lit with a couple of young women that I never saw before, they asked me to give them a glass of something to drink, I did so, they took me to a public house facing of Hatton Garden; I stood outside of the door, where there were several more people standing; I took a walk a little way with these two young women and after I left them I went down a turning which brought me into a coal-yard, a man came running towards me. I heard the cry of stop thief, I went to run towards him, he knocked me down, and when I got up the watchman stopped me, and the gentleman accused me of robbing him. I was all over mud, and no one was nigh me till I got up, and then the watchman came and stopped me.
The other boy that was with me took the watch and gave it to me.
The cloth has grown, has got four yards bigger since I came from Bow-street.
No, Sir, I did not.
I never was in the Old Hummums in my life.
The watch that I sold to Myers in Swallow-street, I had it of captain Graham, of St. James's coffee house, and the pantaloons and the great coat belonged to him, they were his old ones that were thrown off; the watch I had in my possession a twelvemonth or better; I was short of money, I went and sold them; the watch I sold him was not a hunting watch. I asked him five pound for the coat, pantaloons, and the watch, he bid me three guineas; I said I would not take it; he afterwards said he would give me four pound; I took the money and left the watch, coat, and pantaloons; it was better than two months before I heard of this; I dressed my master and went to the Talbot Inn to dine, dinner was there always ready at two o'clock. After dinner was over the officers came in, I went to Bow-street with them, they said they had a detainer against me; I went before the magistrate, Myers without looking at me swore I sold the watch to him, and the person at the Hummums swore he saw me in the house; the magistrate asked if the gentleman was in town, this man said he was not, I was detained till Saturday, on Saturday I saw the gentleman, he swore the watch was his; I was turned over at the next sessions and remained till now.
I found the spoon.
I did not say I found it; I said I took it off the nail, I told my prosecutor I am guilty.
When Mr. Lack the officer took me into Bow-street he said that White took that handkerchief, that handkerchief is worn out, it is not bitten out in the corner, he told me in Bow-street office he would endeavour to transport me because I was a jew .
On Sunday morning about a quarter before seven, as I was coming up Harley-street I heard a cry of stop thief; I saw a man go by me; at the corner of Portland-chapel there were a number of people pursuing of him, some were riding and some on foot; one of the men came up and said, you are the man; some said I was not the man, and some said I was the man; that gentleman came up and said he was almost sure I was the man; directly I said, if you are sure I am the man I will go back with you. The key that I had found on me was the key of my lodging, every lodger in the house gives the landlady a shilling for the key to open the door themselves if they stay out late.
The reason I was out so late, I had been having a little drop of drink along with a couzen of mine close to where this gentleman lives, and I was making the best of my way home.
I was eighteen years in the forty-fourth regiment, and I lost my sight at Egypt.
I am innocent of the crime that is alledged against me.
On last Monday week I had been out in the fore part of the day. Going home at the end of Drury-lane there was a gentleman buying nuts of a basket-woman. I passed by; he said, young man, could you tell me of a porter. I said I could not. He said it was only a light table to carry into Oxford road. I took the table on my shoulder. He said, you had better drink first. I put the table down and went and drank with him, and then I took the table, and the person that employed me was a few steps before me. When the man stopped me he would not let me call him back, the gentleman told me he would walk forward, I should see him at the White Lion opposite of St. Giles's.
I met two men, I was intoxicated, and when I came into this house I called for a quartern of gin. I never touched a halfpenny belonging to him.
I asked my master for a bit of colour; he said, what colour would you wish to have; I said, beggars are not to be choosers. He then said to the foreman, suppose we give him some green; no, I said, green is too dear if you will be kind enough to give me this yellow; he gave orders to the foreman to give me as much as I wanted; the foreman acted according to his orders; he gave it me.
She followed me out of the house, she said she would not go home to her husband any more.
There was another man going on before me, it was him that had the saw by all account, it was not me.
I never stood in such a situation before. I must leave it to the counsel.
I leave myself entirely to the mercy of the court.
I would wish to receive my wages of my master.
I was in liquor, and wantonly drew this chaise out of a joke, not with intent to steal it, or make any property of it. I hope you will be merciful to me, as you shall see fit.
As I was returning from the theatre the gentleman charged me with picking his pocket; I was in a hurry to go home, I had as far as Bethnal-green to go; the gentleman said, you have got my handkerchief; I said, I have not got your handkerchief, the officer collared me and searched me, and took from me that pocket book and the handkerchiefs; I told him it was all my own. The gentleman never came to identify his handkerchief. In respect to Mr. Hart, I do know the person, I never saw him before to my knowledge. And the reason I put the handkerchiefs in my hat I had no pockets.
I picked the duplicate and the handkerchief up.
Which handkerchief was it you took out of my breeches
My prosecution being closed I will take the liberty to state the exact case. I was taken in custody at the corner of Bow-street, and charged before the magistrate with picking a gentleman's pocket. Prior to his taking me to a public house he searched me, he found on my person three handkerchiefs, one in my hat, one in my pocket, and one in my breeches. Before the magistrate the officer stated that he saw me in the act of picking a gentleman's pocket; it is false, and had I been so doing, it would have been impossible for him to have seen it; it was a dark night, and the shops being all shut, how is it possible he could have seen it. My handkerchiefs being found in such a situation, I acknowledge it had some suspicion, but the reason of one being found in my breeches, from my infancy I have been afflicted with an incontinency of time, when I have not a convenience to go to a proper place. I do declare, solemnly, my innocence, and have no doubt but I shall find that justice from your lordship that my case merits. At the last Sessions I had several friends to speak to my character, who now are incapable of coming; one of them, by reason of sickness.
I took the gown off the ground.
I do not know what time it was.
I was not guilty of such a thing in my life
As I was coming from my work the gentleman said I took the hats out of the shop, instead of that I was running home.
He asked me when I came down stairs to give him all the money, and he would have no more to do with me; I gave him the money, and he knocked me down. I sold a watch that I bought myself for one pound eighteen shillings; he took that money from me.
I acknowledge pledging the spoon.
At the time I pledged the spoon I was in want of a pair of shoes; I changed a ten pound note in the morning to give the charwoman the bill, and as I had changed the captain's ten pound I asked the captain for my quarter's wages, seven pounds ten shillings; he replied, I will pay you in two or three days; I was barefoot. I, unfortunately, knowing captain Drummond to be a passionate man, I was afraid to ask him; I said to myself, I'll get one shilling and six-pence on this spoon till he pays me my wages, and then I will bring it in again. As to the affair of Mr. Harrison's, I was acquitted.
There was a bit of loose hay; the ostler took it off the waggon; I said you must not have that; he said why? I said I shall have a piece of work with master; he said, here is sixpence for you. I said that will not do. The ostler said, if I give you any more, I shall not make my money of it. I told him not to take it.
I was very much in liquor, and do not remember any thing about it.
On Friday the 6th of April, at the corner of Robinhood-lane, I was accosted by a well-dressed man, he asked me whether I would drive the said pigs to Smithfield-market, he would give me five shillings; on our way he was desirous of knowing my residence, and when he got to Shoreditch church he desired me to go off, and if he did not see me till I got to Smithfield, to go into the Brown Bear-yard; I might ask nine pounds, but not to take less than eight pound eight shillings for the pigs; I did not see my employer at nine o'clock, I sold them for eight pounds seven shillings and six-pence; I, wishing to get home, would rather lose sixpence than stay any longer. As my employer did not come I supposed he would call on me for the money. In the evening I was taken in custody. I am sorry I did not tell the truth to the magistrate. I resign myself to your lordship.
As I was going down Noble-street to work; this man came up and challenged me with thieving a rug from his door; I told him I did not steal it; he told me he would transport me; I ran away from him, I was stopped again and taken.
I am as innocent of robbing the cart as a child unborn.
I am in the habit of travelling the country. About three months ago I kept a clothes shop in Shire-lane. I took this place in Shorts' Gardens with intent to make it a shop. I purchased them three seals in Croydon market, and when they were found in my possession I owned them as my own property. I gave 30 s. for them in trade. As for Limbrick saying I was a thief, I never was taken up before in my life.
My master employed me at night to pack up things when he returned from the country to send away before day-light. I told my master, that when my hands were up to my elbows in oil I could not run to the book.
I have been in Mr. Phillips's shop a considerable time. I have done his business duly and truly. I have acquaintances of my own that I recommended to buy shoes of my master; this pair of shoes in question, I sold them to a young man; Mistress Phillips, or the son, took the money; he had one or other in the shop always ready to take the money. This young man never tried the shoes on, he went away with them and brought them back, and I changed them; this pair I took home to bind to change for the man; and before I could bring them back, the officer came and took me
I took this metal by the pound, whatever was wasted I was to make it good when we came to a settlement.
I had no soap; as for the bags, they are not Mr. Moore's; Mr. Cherry gave me them clogs out of the accompting-house.
I had been in Somers Town looking after employ, I was coming along Phoenix-street, I met Mary Smart , she told me to go into the Fox public house, I told her I had no money, she said she would pay when she came back; I was taken out of the public house before Mary Smart came back; I wanted to go after her, she could not have gone an hundred yards when this young woman accused me; I sent to her as soon as possible, she said she would come in my behalf.
I am a lamp lighter; I brought the scissars with me to be rivetted; that gentleman catched hold of me about three doors from the place, he said he could swear to me because I had a white apron on; I was searched, and a pair of scissars was found on me; I was sent on board the tender, I was not fit to serve his Majesty, I came back and had another hearing and was sent here.
My lord, and gentlemen of the Jury, I never was in any court of justice before this time charged with any offence inimical to the laws of my country; I am now twenty-one years of age, and the rectitude of my conduct cannot be impeached previous to this; I was led into this crime by a designing and wicked man, whom I never saw before; I saw him in Long-lane, West Smithfield, and the goods I obtained from my prosecutor, I received an order from this man, and only received a remuneration of one shilling and sixpence, and I never had any conception that it was an illicit transaction, therefore, was the same person to ask me to go again of the same errand, was I to see him, I might have so done, without any guilty knowledge, particularly as I am not able to read writing, and being illiterate; I hope the respectable housekeepers with whom I have lived will satisfy this court that this crime is not wilfully done, and as such I expect the word of acquittal in my favour.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury - this being the first time that I have been arraigned at the bar of a British court of Justice, I have taken the liberty of confuting the charges brought against me. First, I am charged with obtaining goods under false pretences, I answer, I never did, directly or indirectly, do any such thing; I never saw the evidence till I saw him in the Poultry compter, and to all the charges I am perfectly innocent; but if this assurance of my innocence should be over-ruled, I beg for the lenity of a British court of Justice; and I beg it to be understood that that is my hand-writing that I have just delivered.
I have been in the habit of working for Mr. Slaymaker, and during that period nothing has been missed, nor has he doubted my honesty.
I found the shirt in the street; I did not take it from the line.
Did you give me the purse or did I take it
He has spoken false, I never spoke to him.
On the 23d of June, this young man came down to the house where I was quartered; he asked me to have something to drink, I told him I would, we went in there, and then went to another public house, and on his looking for money in his purse, and finding none, he threw it down, and said, he did not want it; I knowing of him, took it up to take care of it for him.
I know nothing at all of the property, nor the people, I never saw them before in my life, I was never at their house or premises.
I found the box broken open when I went into the room, the boots were never found in my possession.
I was coming up Leadenhall-market, I met a man of the name of Johnson a porter in the market, he told me to leave the coat at the King's Arms, he was going for a load, he would be after me in five or six minutes; when the man came back he asked me to go for the coat, and as soon as he heard I was taken, he went on board the Tender.
I never saw the flat.
I beg my master's pardon.
I belong to no parish; I could not get into any workhouse; I was born in the city of Dublin; I was drove to the greatest distress.
He found me after I had been asleep in the field.
I came up from Bath to get some prize money that was due to me; finding that I could not get it I went down to Hampstead a baymaking, being tired I went into this field and went to sleep, and when I came into the road they said there was a robbery done, and that I was the person. This pistol I found on the road, I took the priming out of it and put it in my pocket.
They all knew I was going away in the morning.
She is not the wife of Samuel Sippel.
How can he look your lordship in the face and say he was awake at four o'clock; it was half after five when I left the room.
There are two other houses in the yard, to go out they must come through the house
I am very sorry that my prosecutor is so hard against me. I found these notes going to the Artichoke public house. I am quite unprepared. There were two other sailors drinking with us, they are neither of them here. I never saw the inside of a gaol before. I have been twenty two years in the navy.
Have you ever seen me before
Had you ever seen me near the house, or have you ever seen me before
I came from Cheltenham, in Gloucestershire, last May, twelvemonth, I brought thirty pound with me, I rented a little house in Shadwell parish, and I worked in the West India Docks; I left work at three o'clock, I went to Rosemary-lane and bought clothes, these things were part that I bought in Rosemary-lane.
I think it to be about the 22d of June, there was a regiment of soldiers marching through Bow, I was going to the brewhouse at Bow to tell them to bring in a barrel of beer for me; one of the soldiers said he was poor, and wished to sell a shirt, I told him I did not want it, the man followed me to the gate of the brewhouse, and with his saying he was distressed, I said I would give him 5 s. for it; I did not open the shirt to look at it untill I had gone fifteen or sixteen yards, and then I saw a mark on it blotted out with ink; I went to the brewhouse gate to look for the man, he was gone.
My Lord, the first alarm that I heard was, the maid was making a noise in the room. I got up, and saw the maid dressing herself. I asked her what was the matter: she said there was a fire in the house. I ran down with my shirt and night-cap on. I went to the drawing-room and opened the door; the smoke came out so strong it nearly stifled me. I went down to the street door to see if it was open, and then I ran up into my own room, and took all my clothes and trunks and put them upon the leads. I let them down by a cord that belonged to my wife's trunk, and it stuck by the way on the railing. I put my clothes and trunks on the leads for safety. After I had done that, I ran down and assisted in extinguishing the fire. The first thing I saw was the fireman on his hands and knees. He drawed out the table and a picture of my master's. I heard the fireman call out, that there was no occasion to take the things out, he wanted water. I assisted in carrying up water as much as any body else did. I went into the room. The first thing I saw was this desk broken open. I asked the fireman if he could give any account of the desk being broken open, he could not. Mrs. Thompson was in the room at the same time that I was there. She said, why did not I take care of this desk, as the property was in it. I stationed myself in the room, to see that nobody took any thing out; I thought it was the properest place. When my master returned, he saw the desk was broken open and questioned me about it, that is all I know.
Having not half an hour's notice that my indictment was preferred against me, I am quite unprepared; I was told when I came up to London, that I was going to have an action against me at the Court of Common Pleas. I plead ignorance entirely of the customs of this Court.
I am innocent of the crime; I lived with a woman that was in the habit of buying and selling lace; I never bought or sold any myself.
I never was guilty of any thing of the kind in my life. I knew nothing of the transaction until I was stopped.
The horses took fright and run away from me, at their first starting I run for my life and caught them, I saw afterwards I had lost my cross bar; I turned them round and put them behind a waggon, they ran off again, and when I was by the shaft horse, the fore horse started and run over the boy by the pavement; they will not follow, they will run by, they saw a gentleman coming in a little cart, the fore horse started immediately, and in danger of my own life, I run after them to stop them.
When I got up in the morning I went down stairs, the washhouse door was open, I had some of my things there, I took them home to my mother and told her I had took them in a mistake, and told her to take care of them until I returned back.
It is all false what they have said.
Some of the things that have been bought, there is the man that cut them out, they were not entered in the book.
I was in Shoe-lane, this gentleman came up to me, and said, you have got my silk handkerchief; I said, I have no silk handkerchief of yours; up came a man, who before the alderman, said he lived at No. 2, Shoe-lane; he saw me throw it down. I heard a woman say, here is a handkerchief; I never saw the handkerchief before I saw it before the alderman. I am innocent of the charge.
I have been to sea all my life. I bought these things of a marine, in a public-house.
I am accused of a thing that I am not guilty of. I was returning from a friend's house, and passing along the street I just kicked the things; they laid about six yards before me, when I was laid hold off.
The bridle I found coming across Finchley-common, and the boots I bought three months ago in London.
I received the King's pardon to go into the Marine service, it did not agree with me, I ran away.
On Sunday, the 1st of July, I was taken by Peter Egin to his house, for the purpose of shewing me a big drum. We were going to see a person in Newgate, I carried provision, and they gave me a bottle of liquor; I left him at Gray's-inn-lane, I told him the occasion; I went into the first public house, and there I met a friend, he told me the consequence of taking liquor into a prison, in consequence of that I did not go. I returned in about three quarters of an hour, to Egin's house, I asked if Egin was at home, they told me no, I returned down, I saw Egin no more untill I was taken into custody, he told me at his father's, that he should not stop in Newgate more than a quarter of an hour, and my stopping with my friend made me go to his room.
I am as innocent as a child unborn, I received the property of a person that lived formerly as a valet to Mr. Bryen; he attempted to committ a rape upon Catherine Bryen ; I received them, not knowing them to be stolen, at a public house.
I met the prosecutor, he asked me where he could get a bed, he said he was locked out, and so was I, we agreed to sleep under the trees in Chelsea college, about two o'clock a man came past, I got up and went with him, he informed me he was going to Bristol, he had no money and could I sell the watch for him; I asked the watchman, he said he could not purchase it himself for want of money, he could recommend me to a man; I own I sold the watch; I am innocent of stealing it.
On Sunday afternoon I was at the other end of the town, I returned at night; I was going up Long-lane, I went into a public house to get a small glass of liquor, before I drank it, I heard the cry of stop thief, I saw the prosecutor running after a man, I followed them up St. John-street; and when I was taken in custody the man was before, and when the prosecutor left off running after the man, the petrol asked him if I was the man, he said yes; I then was behind the man.
I am innocent of it. I was formerly brought up to the hatting business, my father was forty five years in the hat business, a Charing-cross, and retired from there; and after his death he left me that property which I have now to live upon, and I am in the hatting business at Lambeth; I am well known.
Upon the virtue of your oath, where was the first place you met me
Where did you meet me on last Tuesday night was a week
Upon the virtue of your oath, did not you make me a present of two pair of cotton stockings, and did not you make me a present of the watch
Did not you put your hand into your pocket and give me a dollar and two shillings
I never extorted a shilling from Mr. Price, as I am to dye, he gave me five-pound; we walked round Berkley-square, and came down St. James's-street. He said, meet me to morrow, I will give you money to go to the salt water, He laid hold of me by the private parts, took cut his own, did not you do that at the chapel, at the five fields; did not I tell you I never was accustomed to any such thing.
Did you not go into the Wheatsheaf along with me as the clock struck ten
Did not you have a glass of cold brandy and water, and I had a glass of gin. Did not you tell me you would get me a situation under government; I gave you my hand writing
Mr. Price met me when I was pumping cold water on my legs, he frequently walked with me; he brought me to the five fields chealsea and brought a young woman there, he wished me to have a connection with her; he asked me if I was large, as Irishmen were in general; I asked him where she was, he then said it was dangerous; he unbuttoned my small clothes and took my penis out in his hand; I told him it was not a thing that I was accustomed to; it is a shocking thing, he said, say nothing about it, now my life is in your hands, now I will ever be a friend to you as long as I live; he walked down with me as far as the wheatsheaf, he had a glass of brandy and water, and I had a glass of gin; he met me on the Tuesday and gave me three shillings, he told me to call on him at the office of the medical board, I did, he came and gave me a dollar and two shillings. On Tuesday evening he gave me a five pound note to pay my lodgings; he told me to go down to the salt water, and if I should go to Colchester, where he came from, he would get me the best connections that he had. In Albermarle-street, he brought me down there, he put in my hand a two pound note; I told him I did not want that, but to get me a situation, and to go down to the salt water. I own that Mr. Price gave me the money, I never extorted a shilling from him.
I leave it entirely to the mercy of the court.
As for the cord; there are not London, that do not make use of the same cord, and if they can say they have seen them bottles, I am willing to abide by the punishment.
I was on the bridge. I met Russell, by that means I crossed over the way; I spoke to him, he asked me if I was going home; Limbrick came and took us both, and searched us both, he found the handkerchief on me, and the watch on Russell. I bought the handkerchief for sixpence of a man, he said, he was starving; he would sell the handkerchief off his neck to get him a bit of bread.
I went to see the rowing match. When I got to Astley's, there was a crowd of people I felt something drop on my toes, I picked it up; a man in a flannel jacket said, that is mine, I said, I would not let him have it; I put it in my pocket, there was an hole in it, it fell down the lining to my knee.
It is my first offence, I hope you will be as favourable with me as you can.
The property this man has been shewing to you, he found in another man's bundle, the shirt on my back, and the breeches, I was to give him six shillings for them.
I cannot talk English.
The cord I have had twelve years; and these baskets, a person, in court, gave me three shillings to buy them.
I was very much intoxicated. I am very willing to serve his Majesty.
I know nothing of the plates, they would be of no use to me. I could buy a plate for a penny that would serve me as well.
I was lately discharged from the army; I have been wounded. I had a job, I only wanted a saw, a plane, and a rule, to go to work with.
I had been to Deptford to seek for a ship, it was late at night, and it rained very hard, I went under a gateway, this bundle laid there; I picked it up and brought it away with me.
As I was coming by two men were running, one of them knocked me down.
I am a bricklayer , I had been out of work three parts of the winter; I went into the building and was coming out with these things. I beg for mercy.
I have nothing to say for myself.
I was walking about looking for work, I saw them slings in the gutter, I picked them up and put them on the cask, I some time after took them up and put them under my coat.
I am a drover and have been for thirty-one years, I got liberty from a man in the place to lay in the straw-house, I had no money, the man picked up the coat, he said I will give you this to cover you.
The man used to take sugar out and put it in beer, and grate nutmeg upon it, I was never told that I was not allowed to have sugar. I took this sugar to put into small beer.
I did not put them there to steal them, I found them in a bye place in the garden, I put them there until I came back from breakfast.
I was going up Oxford Road, a gentleman came and tapped me on the shoulder, he said I had been at his window, he took me back and searched me, he found nothing about me.
A poor man living by there asked me if I would give him some mortar to fix up his fire place, I brought a bit of mortar there in the barrow, and in the morning I meaned to take the barrow back again, it was not half a barrow of mortar.
I found the watch in the privy, and it lying there so long a time I took it to the watchmaker to be repaired.
How much liquor had we after the man parted with us, the two women, her and me.
When was the first instance that you remarked me
I am not guilty of stealing any, I do not recollect that paper was in my possession.
I am not guilty of what is laid to my charge.
My Lord, I hope you will consider my unfortunate case; I was drawed into it by Mr. Carron, and one of the witnesses against me; that man took the ten-pound note. I had no more than two shillings of it, and he has got 9 l. 18 s. of it, which is the property of my unfortunate master. He bought me a watch, it stopped, I returned it to him. I have never seen it since. The witness Carron keeps a room to harbour boys and girls in, and encouraged me into my offence. I hope your lordship will let me go to sea, and serve his Majesty, that I might get rid of all my bad connections.
I have to inform you, that I have attended Mr. Britten's sales by his request, and have bid for articles, they have been knocked down to me, and often given into my possession; I very often gave a deposit for the articles and at the conclusion of the sale I gave them to the auctioneer, and he returned me the deposit.
The ninety pounds I received at the bankers.
The gentleman says he know my person well - I wish to know where he knew me.
I met a brother-in-law of mine. I had been drinking with him the most of the day. I came to see him home, and coming along Gray's Inn-lane; I saw the window open. Two men came up to me, and asked me the way to Holborn. I said, straight along. They ran off; that gentleman came up to me, and struck me. He said I must go with him; I shoved him off. I did not strike him at all.
The prosecutor promised to send me to sea if I would tell him who the other was.
These people were about him before; I was passing by: I never touched him at all; I was by myself.
I was standing at the corner of Golden-lane waiting for my father he was drinking; I was waiting there, a young man came up and asked me to carry this; he said he would give me a shilling; I took some on my shoulder, and he took the other; the watchman stopped me; I said, that is the gentleman that employed me, the watchman let the other man run away.
I never was guilty of making, I am not guilty of selling. I have six children, five in Ireland, and one in London.
I want to ask Gaskin whether he took me out of the waggon, or was I on the pavement before he took me....
I was coming from Hackney, a person gave me this property to carry; the bundle came loose. I put the bottle and matches in my pocket. I am a stranger in town; I came from Birmingham.
There was only one key found on me.
Some time ago he had a woman in custody, he said that woman robbed him.
I never saw Mr. Green nor Mrs. Green before with my eyes.
I bought it altogether, except the bag; I cannot say whether I brought it home for an apron or no.
On Thursday the 16th of January I went to my work as asual about seven o'clock I opened the shop and went to get some refreshment I had a pain in my bowels; my master followed me and asked me what I had got, I said, nothing; the officer searched me and found nothing. My wife, who was acquainted with the landlord, was in there, which was the occasion of a loaf of sugar being discovered On the night before she had been to a house at Downe's warf, and on her return from that house she passed two sailors, one of them gave her a punch on the shoulder; she found he was a person who had been formerly a lodger of her's.... He entered into conversation with her, and told her that he had been twice cast away; that he was in possession only of one sixpence; he asked her to lend him some money; she said she had none. She knowing him some time went to her son's master and borrowed him twelve shillings; he waited for her return in Burr-street. He requested that she would go the next morning to his ship; she went and received of him a loaf of sugar. I declare I do not know of any felony respecting the loaf of sugar in question. I am bound to believe my wife's description of the loaf of sugar to be true.
I had been in the habit of borrowing planes of Mr. Dove who worked there; I went to the bench and took the plow plane, thinking it was the same that I had borrowed before, intending to return it.
I wanted bread for my family.
I never saw the prosecutor in my life before he came and gave charge of me.
I was coming down the Old Change, I met a man with this tub on a post, he asked me to carry the tub, and he would give me a shilling; when I was taken he ran away.
I request my property that is taken away for my wife and child.
My sister was starving in the street, I took it for my sister to get some sprats in.
I found the things between Edmonton and Bush Hill. I was in distress.
I had a brother that was sick for six years, he worked at home, and after he was dead I looked over his box I found these filings, there is a very little gold in it I believe.
I was coming along the highway, I went into this man's shop, he asked me nine shillings, I offered seven shillings and sixpence and went out about my business, I went to the public-house, a man came to me and asked me to pawn the shoes, he would give me something to drink, I went to the shop, he asked me if they belonged to me, I said, no, they belong to another man. I declare to God I never stole them.
The Sunday before that I went away from the house, I came back on the next Sunday, and asked for my shirt, I asked if my shirt was washed, or not, I took John Wade 's box, and put my box on it, I set on the bed, I found my shirt dirty, I went down stairs and washed it myself. I am quite innocent.
I beg for mercy, I hope you will take my case intto consideration; an opportunity offered, I took the advantage of it, I have been at work ever since. Mr. Harris is my master.
I did not take these things from the child, she gave me them to carry; I went over into the field to do my oocasion, I lost the child, I enquired after the child of a great many people.
I came in the public house ten minutes after the alarm was given, I have subpoened three people up to prove it.
My lord, it is not with the intent of denying my charge, that I pleaded not guilty, but humbly hoping there are some circumstances in my case, that deserves your lordship's commiseration. At Westminster quarter sessions I was tried for the attempt of stealing a pocket handkerchief, by only moving the pocket handkerchief from one pocket to another; since my return, which is about fourteen months, I have had the satisfaction to say, that no police officer, or any other, can lay the slightest charge to me; I was, for the first ten months in the country, residing on my friends' bounty, since then I lodged at Mrs. Hoare's, Blackfriers, never quitting her house till seven in the evening to enjoy the fresh air, and invariably returning at nine o'clock. I am by trade a glass-cutter, and should have ever been a useful member to society; I therefore humbly implore implore your Lordship to recommend me. With respect to my doing any hurt to the community, I declare to God I have not.
I have no friend please your Lordship, I throw myself on your mercy.
I am innocent of it.
I was unfortunately married to this woman when I was an apprentice, I lived very sociably with her upwards of a twelvemonth, when her temper became so violent and disgraceful to all human society, that I could not bear to live with her any longer, I parted with her, and lived from her six years. It so happened that I had to go down into Oxfordshire, she wrote letters repeatedly, saying that she would be happy to live with me, and be a different woman to what she was before; I consented so to do, we lived in peace and comfort nine or ten months in the country, when I had finished my job I came to London; it is only two years ago that she robbed the house where I lodged, where I was taken up, the people knowing me innocent, never offered to prosecute; she frequently told me that I might go out on the highway, and get more money in two or three hours than I could earn in a month. I parted with her on the 2d of last September twelvemonth, I agreed to allow her a crown a week, and to pay ten pound a year for her house rent, I paid the last half years rent for her on the 10th of September last, when she found out I was married, she would not take my money any longer. When I became acquainted with Ann Bignell , I told her I was a married man.
It is not the truth....
I did not steal it, I bought it of the prosecutor.
I am innocent of what is laid to my charge.
I went to Iron-gate with the lighter, I was going to row the skif down to Union-stairs. In an empty lighter I found the tallow, I put John Maud on shore at Iron-gate, out of the skift, though he says, he left me in the lighter.
I found the geese in a sack near a pond upon Harefield common.
It is the first offence that ever I committed, I hope you will extend mercy to me.
I am a carver and gilder , I had been out of employ, I was starving.
He said he only wanted the things back, I told him I would bring them back, I wanted him to stop till the next day, he would not, he knew they were in pledge.
I have been twenty-six years in the British service, and if I had not been in liquor I should not have done it.
It is all false.
I left the blankets and sheets in the room when I went out to work.
I did not take it without the apprentice's leave. My mother was ill, I wanted three shillings to buy her victuals.
I have nothing to say in my defence.
I am a chimney sweeper; I was out of empley; I had been down to several houses in the street to ask them if they wanted the dust taken out; I was never nigh that house in my life.
I was going home, two young fellows stopped me and asked me if I would buy the coat; I took the coat in my hand and looked at it; that woman came up and took it out of my hand, and immediately the two young fellows ran. The woman cried out stop thief, and when I was stopped I asked what I had done.
The property was never my mistress's, although I made use of her name in the bill.
I was at Mr. Markey's yard on the Friday, I borrowed a shovel and returned it again at night. That is all I have to say.
I leave it to the mercy of the court.
I have lived four years with the prosecutor; I mostly read of a Sunday, and when I had done with the books I put them away: and the copper pieces of money were all my own.
Were not you tried here last sessions
I sold four dozen of lemons to a countryman, he gave me them six shillings, there was nobody by at the time.
I was going up Watling Street to go to Billingsgate to see if any fish had come up, this door was a-jar, I thought I saw somebody go in that I knew, I put my head in, and Mr. Groves seized me.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury, As I was coming down the Commercial-road to my lodging in Sun-street, Bishopsgate-street, on the morning mentioned in the indictment, some person was calling out stop thief. A person called to me, do you hear the cry of stop thief? I answered, what is that to me? He said, I was pertinent: he would charge the watch with me. The prosecutor came up when I was stopped. He said, he had been robbed of his watch. He said nothing about losing money at that time.
That is a false witness.
No, I leave it to my counsel.
I beg leave to state that I have served a number of years in His Majesty's service. I have left that situation only a year, and I have been a purser in an East Indiaman.
I have lived with Mr. Parson's, a wholesale grocer, for a number of years, and innocent I came to this bar, with respect to the charge; and when I go I shall go innocent. I was only employed as a broker. I know no more of the robbery than a child unborn. The barge-man brought the sacks to me; his name is Cooper. After I was in custody, he came to my house, to hear if I had sold the sacks. He was informed that I was in custody; and, since that time, I have not seen nor heard any thing of him.
On Monday, the 8th of June, as I was passing along Oxford-street, I observed two sailors much intoxicated, surrounded by a number of people. Curiosity induced me to go along with the rest; among whom there was a gentleman who had lost his pocket-book. A gentleman, seeing a crowd he inquired the cause. He was informed a man was taken with a pocket-book. He had no more suspicion of me than any other person. I was taken to Marlborough-street. I can only attest, before your lordship, I am entirely innocent. I never was before a court of Justice in my life before. I am a stranger in London, and not succeeding in business in the country, I came to London, where it did not answer my expectation. I had firmly made up my mind to enter into His Majesty's service. I rely upon the candour of an impartial jury.
The man's name is not Smith, in the first place. I came to his service after coming out of trouble. I have been in trouble upon a vexatious point of his. He sent for me to return, and I did return. I was under necessity. I had to attend Westminster Hall for him, upon the name of Lovell. An action was brought against him in the name of Lovell. He wanted me to swear that it was Smith.. I went to Westminster Hall. I was subpoened by him in his own home. I went there to say what he directed me. He wrote down that which I was to swear; and because I did not swear that he wanted me, when I came home on the Thursday he found himself aggrieved:\\ not\\ withstanding that, he said, I must come to work. I did go back; and on the Wednesday following this circumstance happened. He then attended with the officer, and said, he had lost the two-pound note. It is very unlikely I should go to Mr. Coward, the maker of gold size, and going there I met Mr. Bell, the frame-maker. He asked me to go into the Black Horse, Tottenham-court-road. After I left Mr. Bell I went to Crown-street, for pencils. Master came there with an officer. In consequence of that I was taken to the Justice, and afterwards was committed. When I went down stairs to work, as here I am, I put my hat under the bench; and at that period the note must have been put in my hat. Had I known of the two-pound note being in my hat, it is very unlikely that I should have left it there. I know no more about the note than a child unborn. The spite is because I lost him the trial. He has been arrested since in consequence of it. His name is not Smith, but Lovell.
Sparks and I had some words on the 20th of June. We struck one another. I got rather the better of him. He said, he would either transport or hang me.
I leave it to the mercy of you, my lord, and the gentlemen of the Jury.
Between twelve and one I was talking to a gentleman in the square. That gentleman came and took hold of me by the arm, and gave charge of me. I never insulted him at all, so help me God.
I had been out of work a long while. I wanted a bit of bread, and that was the instigation of my doing it.
I had not got hold of the drawer; a boy had taken it, and put it by my feet.
I do not know what to say in my defence. I am a stranger here.
The charge that is laid against me I am entirely innocent of.
My Lord, I humbly implore you to extend your mercy to an unfortunate female. I came to London to get a place of servitude; not succeeding in my endeavours has been the cause of my being brought here. It being my first offence, I beg for mercy of the court, and I shall be ever bound to pray.
I was very young when I married the first wife. I was just turned of fifteen. The parson shut the books up. I thought I was not married. I married again. I did it innocently.
I was drunk and hungry when I did it.
A man gave me a pot of beer to carry the shovels. I had the halfpence in my hand when she stopped me.
I know nothing about the soap.
These tongs, in question, I never saw; they never were in my possession.
I had sixpence farthing about me. I was searched when I was at the office.
I gave that watch to Mary Murray .
Being unexpectedly called on my trial, I throw myself on the mercy and protection of the court, and the gentlemen of the jury.
May it please your Lordship, I have but little to say in my defence. I, therefore, beg to throw myself on the mercy of the court. I feel bitter sorrow and repentance for the disgrace I have brought on myself, and can say, I was never suspected of being guilty of the like. I lived seven years in my last place. I humbly beg to assure your Lordship, that if I should experience the lenity of the court, I shall labour to regain my character, and never offend more.
These lads came in. I did not know them. They asked for halfpence, and presently they went out of the house. She ran, and catched hold of me. I said, she was welcome to stop me. I am innocent of it.
I was very much reduced in poverty by the losing the use of my arm two years back.
I know nothing at all about it.
I did not take the handkerchief out of the gentleman's pocket. The star-pattern handkerchief belongs to me.
Are you certain you saw me with the breeches.
A young man gave me them breeches.
I had been at Millbank to see a boat-builder. The mail-coaches were coming out. One of the coachmen's hat fell off, and the horse pranced up. That gentleman laid hold of the horses heads, to prevent them from running into the crowd. And that gentleman accused me of robbing him of his watch. I immediately said, if he thought I had his watch I would go any where where he thought fit. They then said, the watch was under my foot.
I did not intend to make any property of them.
I am totally innocent of the crime that I am charged with.
I was out of employment a long while. I did it through distress.
A young man that deals in birds gave me that waistcoat. He was going down in the country to settle.
I know nothing of the nails I never said they were my master's.
When I came into the tap-room, were not you very much in liquor.
Please to take notice, one of the dollars I own to picking up in the tap-room. We were all there together. The dollar that I picked up, the die has not struck the Spanish marks out. When I pulled a dollar out of my pocket, the girl that is there, she said, that is the five shilling piece.
The prosecutor owes me for a bushel and a half of coals that I carried to him.
On Saturday night I was half tipsy. There was another man with me.
He knocked me down first.
I picked up these things as I was coming through Brentford. I was going to Deptford to see my daughter
I know nothing about the cotton. I went about with a shipmate of mine. His bed and blanket were in pawn in that shop. I was taken in possession for the cotton.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I took the skin up, and looked at it. I never put it in my apron.
I leave it to the mercy of the court. I am a soldier in the seventh fusiliers. I am just come home from Spain. I am wounded in the left arm.
I had occasion to go into that house to inquire for a person of the name of Crab, and going into the house, a man rushed out; he dropped that carpet, I picked it up.
I confessed to Mr. Cook, the high constable. I was taken up for something else, and then I confessed.
I was never in the shop before.
There was a young man waiting outside, he gave me the coat.
I only just come on shore the other day. I had leave of my captain to come on shore. He is at the Isle of Wight. If he was here he would give me a good character. I can have a good character from the officers of the ship. I was wounded. I was in Malta three months; how I came here, I know not. I told the man, if I had done him any harm, I would give him a five pound note.
I was very much intoxicated. I did not know that I took it.
I am as innocent as a child unborn of what I am indicted for. I bought the horse of a man in an honest way as I thought, to support my family.
I beg for mercy.
I am a chimney-sweeper. On Tuesday the 4th of August, I had been out the whole day; on my return home I found a man and a woman had been there. The prosecutrix went towards my bed and took off my quilt, which she threw on the floor, my wife having purchased the article at Rosemary-lane, for eighteen pence and which, if it was stolen, I am sorry as we has astonished. My room was searched and no other property found. I am an honest industrious young lad, who lives honest on the produce of my labour, and never did an act of dishonesty, and hope to prove the same in court. I am perfectly innocent of any felony, and hope to be restored to my wife by an acquittal.
I was employed as a porter, to carry these things to this house. I am a poor friendless man.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury, I am not guilty of the offence with which I am charged; the witnesses may be mistaken. I had been in town a few days previous to my apprehension, and provided I could find a favourable opportunity I would go into his Majesty's service. I trust the court will grant me that indulgence.
I was coming from my lodgings in Sun-street, Bishopsgate. I heard the cry of thieves from out of the window. A man came out of the house, and shut me in. I was called up for trial last night, my witnesses were then here, they cannot attend to night.
Was not I in the act of crossing to the Clown
I trust, with the indulgence of the court, I can explain in a satisfactory manner the circumstance which seems to involve me in an act of shame. I am a labourer in the East India Company's service, and also a scene-shifter at the Theatre, which brought me eight shillings a week. I told the girl, I would bring the pots home as soon as the Theatre closed. I have ever maintained an unblemished character, and with honesty alone endeavoured to maintain a large family.
The prosecutor states of my having assaulted and robbed him; whereas I was only passing by near where this unfortunate accident happened. I wish to ask the watchman, whether he has not known me as a quiet inhabitant of that place.
I would wish to know, whether any one else sells shoes in his shop during his absence.
I was entirely intoxicated in liquor. I did not know what I was doing. I promised to buy a pair of shoes or two for a young woman; she was my wife. I spent the money, and had not a farthing in my pocket.
I am guilty in selling the posts. I did not know that they were stolen. A man asked me to sell them. I knew him ten years ago.
My Lords, and gentlemen of the jury, trembling under the awful situation in which I am now charged with a crime of the most brutal enormity, appearing before this Honourable Court with all the mischievous consequences created against me by public prints/, &c. I most humbly appeal; confident, however popular clamour may condemn me, a conviction of my innocence, to which I call God to witness, and of your humane and impartial hearing, that you will permit me to submit to your consideration those matters irresistibly attached to the case, which will convey to the Court the impossibility of my guilt. On the contrary, satisfactorily convince you, that so far from committing the horrid act with which I now stand accused, I have uniformly endeavoured by every pacific persuasion to calm the perturbed state of mind under which my late unfortunate wife laboured, and to convey to her feelings,\\ not\\ withstanding her innumerable faults, attachment to her person. Permit to represent, since my infancy, I have pursued a life of honesty and industry; the former part of which was devoted to the service of my country, in his Majesty's ship, Ville de Paris; since which I have pursued every means of procuring an honest livelihood. With solemn grief do I state, I unfortunately married the deceased eight years back, and, for a period, lived happy, enjoying an uninterrupted means by my honesty, confining myself to the humble following of a sawyer; of providing every comfort any well disposed couple might expect, for which I feel grateful to my Maker; when, unfortunately, my wife launched into extravagances impossible for me by my labour to support, continually pledging what few articles I had worked hard for, and contracting debts in every quarter unknown to me, which, however distressing to my feelings, I have, by the most pacific persuasion, painted out the inevitable destruction awaiting such conduct, which, however, only tended to kindle the flame of disaffection, and produced in her new inventions to plunder. Upon various occasions, after having pledged every thing she could move, she has, under various false pretexts, borrowed articles of my neighbours, which she has systematically consigned to the same fate; and, to avoid public detection, she has left her home, and, at the moment when we were entrusted with an infant to nurse, she has carried with her the child's apparel, which she had likely taken from its person a few minutes before, on putting it to bed, when staying out sometimes until one, two, and three o'clock in the mornings, intoxicated, after rolling about the streets, completely disfigured with mud and dirt, she would return; not withstanding all which, I have silently submitted to the same, and afforded her admittance, when she has declared she has lost her pockets, with their contents, amounting sometimes to twenty or thirty shillings; a wilful pretext to enable her to redeem part of the property borrowed of the neighbours, and pledged; a glaring instance of which will be satisfactorily proved by an industrious woman, the mother of the child, who upon some occasions she has actually called from her bed, and persuaded her to accompany her home, to plead in her behalf; who cannot deny, instead of my maltreating her, I have kindly signified my distress of mind at her staying out, and kindly invited her to my polluted bed. Detection upon detection of her infamy followed When at a moment of self-conviction she has absconded, plundering me of every article, not leaving me any thing except the clothes on my back. While at work, instances of which I shall prove by a work-mate of mine, and who unfortunately gave her to me in marriage eight years ago, at Christ Church, Newgate-street, of whom she has repeatedly borrowed money, under various pretexts, to whom, after roving about in a state of whoredom, for a week or so, she has applied to ask forgiveness, and persuade me to receive her; which, upon all occasions, I have, be it known to my weakness, readily complied with, and by other industrious and respectable persons, who have commisserated my fate, to whom she has boasted her finesse in deceiving me about her pockets, and acknowledged her pleasure in my weakness, in believing her. These desertions, with other acts of profligacy, reduced me to a state of wretchedness beyond human conception. My humble home repeatedly deserted, applications upon applications for money she owed, and articles she had pledged unknown to me; incapable of supporting it, although I worked like a horse to support an honest character, in which assertion, thank God, every one that knows me will gladly bear me out; imprisoned, as it were, on the Sunday, by her; as often as I might redeem them, pledging my decent clothes, and often deprived of but one shirt for weeks, I was compelled to form a resolution to restrict her from purchasing our necessary food, &c. by performing such offices myself. This added to her fury; and incapable, by her repeated falsehoods, to deceive her neighbours or acquaintances, as heresofore, she gave way to immoderate passions, and became ungovernable, as often when no person was in her room as otherwise, and I absent at work all day. She would indulge such flagrant passions, often screaming and tearing herself, as one would suppose, to pieces. She would open the window of the room, when she has been known to alarm the neighbours, fearful she might throw herself out. One instance of the latter act can be proved by my landlord and landlady, on which occasion they were induced to rush up and persuade her to descend to her parlour. Sorry am I to repeat these instances of ungovernable passions, but my situation imperiously demands it; and I hope, as my miserable life depends upon your decision, you will humanely forgive me.
Suspecting her, a few weeks before this fatal catastrophe happened, of having spent the trifle I had given her to pay the rent, I, on Saturday, made known my intention of paying my rent that evening myself, and went down stairs to my landlord accordingly, when in lieu of having six shillings to pay, which I conceived was this due, which he himself supposed was my opinion, he informed me, in lieu of my wife having paid him the money he knew I had given her, that she had spent it in inebriety and debauchery, and that he had a claim upon me for twenty-four shillings, when, on my return, I discovered she had decamped with every moveable, however trifling they were; upon which occasion she secreted herself from me from Saturday to the ensuing Friday, when she again returned, nearly naked, when I again, with the most kind intention towards her, received her, although I detected her. During such absence she applied to a Mr. Smith, in Charterhouse-street, in an apparent state of agony, and informed him, that I had that moment been brought home, by two persons, in a dying state, shewing him an old out-patients ticket for the hospital; under pretext of just having obtained such, and to buy me indispensible and immediate nourishment, borrowed six shillings, and of Thomas Cherverton , a one-pound note. To guard against her organized schemes of deception was impossible; to repeat her actions for the last two years would astonish the most profligate, while it would claim from the dispassionate and philanthropist the tear of compassion and pity. On Saturday, the 24th of August last, as was my invariable custom, I returned home at four o'clock in the afternoon, when my deceased wife being out, I commenced shaving myself. I had scarce finished doing so when she returned, and as if pleased to see her, as I supposed, thoroughly collected, I addressed her by saying, my dear girl, if you continue this way we shall soon overcome our difficulties, and still live happy, when she informed me she had been taken ill in the street, and had reached in her apron, shewing it me at the same time; upon which I expressed my regret, and in as tender a tone as I was capable of, requested her to lay down on the bed, which she did, and to the best of my belief, fell asleep; upon which, having a lock and key to purchase at a neighbouring ironmonger's, for a box I was then having made by my workmate, and also to attend for my wages, I left her three shillings in silver and in halfpence, and went quietly out of the room, fearful of disturbing her.
I purchased the lock and key, and on going to the sign of the Crown public-house, at which house the sawyers who worked for master regularly met on a Saturday, to make out their bills for the week's work, I called on Mr. Strachan, butcher, in in the Minories, and agreed for the aitch-bone of beef for our Sunday's dinner. At the Crown public-house I met my fellow-sawyer's mate, to whom I gave the lock and key, who, as he regularly did, made out our joint week's bill for work, which bill I took to my employer, who, about half past eight o'clock, paid me, when I returned to the Crown, and paid my mate his portion of the said work-bill. A few minutes conversation passed, when my shop-mates enquired how my wife conducted herself; upon which I informed them we agreed very well, and that I was in hopes, if she continued as she now behaved, I should, I flattered myself, I should by hard-work, be enabled ere long, to relieve myself from difficulties created by her improprieties. Upon which, one and all expressed their conviction. I did not know half she owed. She had borrowed money of every one she could. Amongst the number was my workmate, of whom, during her flight, and about the same time she borrowed six shillings. Of Mr. Smith, she had persuaded him, to lend her one pound, begging him not to acquaint me of the same for a time, intimating, she had pledged my Sunday clothes unknown to me; she wanted to redeem them, and replace them the next day, (Sunday); the whole of which she squandered away during her exile from home, from the Saturday to the following Friday before mentioned. Inclined to be home by my regular hour; called at the butchers, and paid for the aitchbone of beef, which I immediately took home, it being then near ten o'clock. On my going home, to my utter astonishment I beheld my wife intoxicated, and discovered,\\ not\\ withstanding I had left her three shillings, she had taken the gown off her back, and had put on an old bed gown, which, upon enquiry, she acknowledged she had pledged. Disappointed in my hopes of any reformation, I, as well as I could, with a sorry heart, expostulated with her of her innumerable acts of treachery, and the difficulties she had plunged me into; besides acquainted her of the information afforded me by my shop-mates, and very likely chided her in a harsh manner for obtaining the one pound of my mate. Chagrined at my unexpected dectection, she first began to cry, and deny the whole, which hurt me the more. I call God to witness I never struck her. She permitted her passion to overcome her, and most completely terrified me by her screaming, jumping, and knocking about, exclaiming, dear Frank, don't believe them. Upon which she made a desperate attack upon the room door, no doubt to fly out to avoid further animadversions, which I prevented by placing myself before it, in which I believe a scuffle might ensue for two or three minutes, in which I let fall on the floor the aitchbone of beef, having been from the moment of my entrance into the room, and missing the gown off her back, struck, as as it were, senseless. Observing her in such a violent rage, and persuaded my continuing speaking to her would only add to it, I silently set myself on a chair, with my back to the window, at the opposite side of the room, reflecting with silent grief, at my wretched situation; still determined not to let her go out of the room, especially as I was convinced she had been drinking. After screaming and jumping about the room, as if mad, she, unknown to me, flew to the window, which unfortunately was opened, and raised herself upon the sill of the window, and precipitated herself into the yard, paved with sharp pointed stones. Casting my eyes round I first saw her flying down out of the window. Distracted, I rushed down stairs; how, I know not; but, when collected, I found myself assisting my unfortunate victim of self-destruction, from the fatal spot where she alighted, to the step of our street-door. When I discovered blood gushing out of her head or face, suffice it to say, I was completely senseless for a few moments. When she held out her hand to me I embraced it for the last time. She wished me to accompany her up stairs, but Scott, the constable, denied me so doing and took me in custody.
My Lords, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I once more appeal to God that I have set forth the truth, and nothing but the truth, and hope, when you consider the case fully, which I rest satisfied you will, you will easily convince yourselves of the improbability of my being her murderer. God forbid. Were I so, the sooner I quit this earthly career the better. Pardon me. I must disclose one more act to prove how bent to every species of advantage she was, even during the short time I left her to buy the lock and key, and obtain my wages. She had not only pledged her gown, but had actually borrowed a pair of flat irons of the landlady, and pledged them also: and more wonderful, after she had jumped out of the window in a state, dreadful as may be expected, told her of the same, gave her the duplicate, and requested her to keep this act from my knowledge, and privately gave a number of duplicates to Mr. Smith to keep for her unknown to me.
I was returning home between eight and nine. I dropped my handkerchief and stooped to pick it up. The amlets were in my handkerchief.
I am as innocent as a child unborn.
I was standing by at the time as the mob of people were. It is true I was at the side of the gentleman there. When I was walking away he came after me, and said, he had lost his seal. I said, I did not know any thing of it. A tall man passed me, and made a rush, which almost knocked me down, and then these things were found.
I am as innocent of it as you are. I will be upon my oath that man never see me take it out of his pocket.
I was running down Tower-street. A man knocked me down. That gentleman came and said I had robbed him.
I was hired as a porter by Charles Lee , to carry these things, and I was to have two or three shillings.
I went in to ask for charity.
I am quite innocent. That handkerchief and the waistcoat I bought of a lad. I came from Madeira as a sailor, and I was going away again.
It is true.
I have nothing to say in my defence.
On the 4th of August last, on my return home from trying to get work in getting in the harvest; I took up some canvass I saw in a ditch by Hernsey; coming home, I was met by the officer. He asked me what I had; I said canvass. He took me in custody.
On Sunday afternoon, I took a walk to Houndsditch. I met some friends; I walked with my friends to Holborn, where we separated, and just as I turned down Gray's Inn Lane, I was stopped by this man. I was going up to Mr. Perkin's, in Gray's Inn Lane, to receive twenty-four shillings. I gave charge of the prosecutor for stopping me.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
I was going of an errand for my father, for an ounce of tobacco; and returning home, a boy came up George Alley, Union Court; he chucked a bundle at my feet. The boy ran off; presently, I heard somebody call out, stop thief. I ran after the boy, and could not find him. I know nothing of the boy, or the bundle, or what was in it.
I did not know what I was doing at the time; I was in liquor.
I was a porter . This morning I came over London-bridge; a man asked me if I wanted a job, I said I did. He said, if I would carry that kit of salmon on in his cart, he would give me sixpence. Mr. Rogers followed me; he said, where are you going with that. I said, I am going to Mr. Martin; he said, it does not belong to you or Martin; directly I took it back. He did not give me time to stop and find the man. I have been led into this very innocently.
I was at the fair looking at the shows, and wild beasts I stooped to pick up a handkerchief, and two gentlemen laid hold of me. I have not a friend higher here than one hundred and fifty miles, only God.
With regard to what they swore against me; I was at work at a public-house in Princes-street, Westminster, doing a job for myself two or three days before this happened. I had occasion to buy nails for the job; and when I had completed the job, I put the remainder on his bar. He said, take them, they may be of service to you; you have got a large family. I put the nails he gave me in my basket. I went to work at the Tower, and these nails I took there, they being with my tools; some I made use, and some of those nails, the nails I had in my pocket, I found among some old sail-cloth. I certainly did put some in my pocket; I was wrong in so doing.
I received this bill of Mr. Whitehead, in Hobart-town, in June last, and left it for acceptance at the Marine Pay office, in Parliament-street. After the bill was accepted, I took it to Mr. Cuffy, to have it discounted; which he would not do. I afterwards went to Mr. Gladstanes, he did accept it.
I am in the habit of selling goods in the silversmith line for many silversmiths. It is so long ago, I cannot call to mind any thing of the transaction; and if I had known there was any thing wrong in it, I should not have taken it to Mr. Dobson. He knew my residence; and when Mr. Dobson informed me, I told him, I knew nothing of it. It was a month before I was taken up, that he informed me of the danger. I did not go away; I staid with my family.
My Lord, and gentlemen of the jury, on the 13th of June I received a letter from Mr. Finch, stating, that a box was left at his house, supposed to contain some gun-barrels. I said to the person that brought the letter, that I had not ordered any of any body, not had I received any advice. I said the same to Mr. Finch as I did to the messenger. I received a letter from Griffin, saying, that he had sent thirty-seven gun-barrels; he would call on the Saturday night to know if I would have them. He did call. I told him, no; I did not want them. I saw no more of Griffin. After Griffin left my house, my wife informed me, that when I went out to be shaved he returned, and wished me to fetch the box, as Mr. Finch wanted it out of the way. I went, and had the box pitched in my yard. The letter I received from Griffin, I gave to the officer as a proof of their being sent not to my order.
The door was only shut; the window was open.
I never was near him. I was sitting by myself.
I was at this house, and this young man, and six or seven came in, and played at domino's. I got up and was going out; I bid them good-night. That young man said, he had lost his watch. I said, they should search me, and under the table they found the watch. They said, I put it there.
I am a tailor ; I heard the cry of, stop thief; I ran with the rest of the people; I was detained. I am quite innocent of what I am accused of.
I never was guilty of a criminal action in my life.
I was starving for six or seven days. I saw these gentlemen following me. I did it on purpose for them to take me. I cannot do any strong work; I am broken all over.
I would wish to ask Mr. Baxter if he has not been convicted of perjury since
I am not guilty of the charge that is laid against me. I have worked for my father the two years past.
I am innocent of the charge.
I was at home, and in my own house at the time this robbery was committed. I am in the habit of buying goods, that I can get something on by commission.
Having failed yesterday in putting off my trial to the next sessions, by which time I had hopes that James Mason, of whom I bought the horse and chaise, would have returned from Yorkshire, which must have procured me an honourable acquittal, I am now deprived of procuring the evidence of a man that would have saved my life. Should he have stolen the horse and chaise he would prove that I purchased it of him, as his receipt is now in court. Gosport is the place of my nativity. I did not know that the horse and chaise belonged to my prosecutor. When I arrived at London I slept at the Bull Inn. James Mason came to the door of the Bull Inn, and entered into conversation with me. On the 5th of July I slept at Fulham, and that morning I purchased the horse, which, unfortunately, sailor-like, flushed with hopes to have a horse and chaise to ride about for a time, thinking I should not lose much when I sold it. The chaise was sold publicly at the cross-roads. I then came to Paddington, the White Lion; and after riding the mare up and down the road, I sold the mare to Mr. Jenkins, for fourteen pounds, and gave him the receipt, that I had just bought the mare. I am deprived of putting my trial off. I had lived with my master from fifteen to eighteen months.
I am innocent of taking the pot. The pot was given me to carry.
I know nothing of the transaction.
The prosecutor was so drunk he could not give charge of me. A woman did. I rely on the mercy of the Jury.
The gentleman asked me what I had got about me. I said, nothing I went in immediately. He searched me, and found nothing.
I wish to go to sea.
I am not the same man; my name is not West; my name is Pearmund.
I bought the waistcoats of the man that came out of the shop. I gave four shillings and sixpence for them.
I can give a true account of myself, where I was all that day.
I saw the pocket-boot falling. I was going to touch the gentleman's shoulder. The officer got hold of me, and swore that I had picked his pocket.
I went into the shop to buy a pair of stockings; another man came in. I asked the price of stockings; they were too dear. I went out, and the other man followed; and said, he would sell me a pair for eight shillings. I bought them. If they had taken him, the justice would have found him the guilty man and not me. When they stopped me, I told them I bought them of that man; to lay hold of him. They would not.
My lord and gentlemen, your petitioner begs for mercy. I am seventy-one years of age, and in a low and feeble state.
I was never there.
I was in the Nag's Head public-house the same evening. A bricklayer there said, he worked at a gentleman's house over the way; he said the gentleman wanted some smith's work done; he asked me to go over the way with him to the house. Going along, he said, he had got the copper out of the brickwork; he wanted to take it to the braziers to have it tinned; he helped me over the wall into the house, in the dark.
I am quite innocent, I know nothing of it.
On the 22d of July, I was at work at Mr. Greathead's yard, Leather-lane. I went into the White Hart to have a pint of porter; and, as soon as I got into the tap-room, I saw Peter, George, and John Flowers , drinking together. Flowers asked me how I did, and asked me to drink, which I did; he said, you are in the habit of working for a great many cabinet makers and carpenters, do you know any body that wants to buy any fine timber; I said I did not. He told me that he had a friend that had a large quantity of it in the Deptford road; he could not get a customer for it, therefore he must go to the King's Bench in a short time. I asked him if any of it was fit for Venetian blinds; he said some was, and some was not. I then told him I was in the habit of working for a person that used a great deal, if he would call on him he lived in Gray's inn lane, perhaps he would buy some of it. He asked me to buy it. I asked him the price; he said he could not tell then, he should see a friend of the owner of the timber, and he would call and let me know. He called the next day and said, his friend said the timber cost twelve pound a load; he told his friend I kept a yard. His friend said, if I could make it convenent he would satisfy me for the room, and for the selling of it. He then told me, that his friend would come along with it, and set a price to the timber himself, if I would consent to it; I consented. The next day, as I was coming from Greathead's yard, I met this Flowers at the corner of Baldwin's-gardens; he told me the timber was at the bottom of Holborn-hill. I told him we should be at the yard by the time the timber got there. As soon as the carman brought the timber to my house, Flowers said, here is my master with it. The carman, Hoads and I, unloaded the timber and got it in the yard. I then asked him how many feet there were of this timber: he said, eighty-three; I set it down on a piece of paper. He said he had made a mistake, there was eighty-four feet; then I altered the figure. The lowest, he said, was ten pound a load, and sixpence a foot superficial. He then told me he would send the remainder to make it up three load the next day: and, if I could sell it, he should be glad: he wanted money very bad, and he expected to be arrested as soon as he went back. The carman, and he, and I, and Flowers, went and drank two pots of porter, and they went away. The next day, about three o'clock, the carman, Mr. Brockelbank, and the officer, came; I was sharpening my saw before they got to the saw-pit; there were four of them. The carman asked me if Mr. Norden was in the shop. I called Norden to come down; he answered me. I asked the officer whether he wanted Newton or Norden. I told him I was the master sawyer. He said, he hoped Mr. Newton and Mr. Norden would behave like gentlemen; I said by all means. He then asked me whether I had not some timber come in yesterday; I pointed to the timber, and shewed him where it was. He said that timber is stolen; I told him I did not know it. He asked me where I got it, or whether it was mine; I told him I did not know the proprietor of the timber; I knew the man who solicited me for yard room for the timber, his name was John Flowers , he was a sawyer, and lived somewhere in the Mint, but where I did not know. He then asked who this man was that I called the proprietor of the timber; I told him a jolly faced man, with sandy whiskers. Mr. Brockelbank made answer, we have got him. They sent for a cart, and I helped to load it; I went with them to the Thames Police. I never saw the man but when he brought the timber, and before the magistrate, in my life.
I never took the lead.
I had been out of work for six weeks; I went up to this house to ask for a job. The bricklayer told me to come at eight o'clock and take this lead to Earl-street. I went; and they took me. I said where I was going with the lead.
As for me keeping the room; it is false. I only slept with that young woman two or three times. The papers are not mine.
I was in distress.
I am a young man; I hope you will shew me mercy.
I never saw the saddle.
I was in a ship, and bought a coat, and changed a twenty-pound note, and that ten-pound note was given me in exchange, and as to the bill of exchange I found in a pocket-book on Tower-hill.
I bought the breeches of the prosecutor; I gave him sixpence for them, and the stockings he gave me. I drank a pint of porter with the prosecutor. He rifled my pocket with force. A gentleman passing liberated me. He has been twice to Newgate, and agreed to compound felony for twelve shillings.
When I came in she pulled something off the counter. She said, I thought you had the tablecloth. She said, now you have. I took it from under your arm.
It is the first thing that ever I was charged with in my life. I did not take it intentionally. I took it to work with.
I have nothing at all to say.
I took four hats, and went from one public-house to another to dispose of them. I found myself the worse for liquor, and finding that I had not sufficient money to pay Mr. Ruth I did not return, and may God, of his infinite mercy, direct you to do what is right.
I was hired to carry these tools. I showed the prosecutor the shilling that I had for carrying the tools.
I know nothing of the shawl.
I had not the least reason to expect that I should be called upon to answer this charge.
I did not mean to take the halfpence away.
I got up that morning. I got over the stile. I reached these pieces of wood out; I am very sorry for it.
I saw the coat down by the horses heels. I picked it up. That goods man came and took me in Union-street.
The lad says I chucked them stockings down in Broad-street. I was taken in Portland-street. Another man was taken in custody before me.
I ran up the street, and had a glass of peppermint in the public-house, and when I came out, he said, you have got my watch-chain. He took me to the watchhouse, and searched me. I shewed him every thing I had about me, and then he was satisfied that I had not got it.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
When I was taken into custody the constable took from my person part of a one-pound note; I should be glad to have it again.
I was taken short; I went down that yard to ease myself. A man came and asked me whether I had been stealing his glasses. I told him, no. He beat me and cut my mouth.
I know myself clear and innocent of what is sworn against me.
I never opened any door or lock, nor did I go up stairs.
I was stopping by the window to see a man strike a light; this woman came out, and said, where are the shoes. I said, what shoes. She said, the shoes that I took out of the window. She directly collared me, and took me into the shop.
The prosecutor said if I confessed he would forgive me, and he came to me in prison the day before yesterday. He told me, if I could find money to make it up he would not appear against me.
Please you, my lord, as I was going across Hanover-square, a young man of the name of William Thomas asked me if I was out of place. I said, I am. He said, he would thank me to carry this as far as Carnaby-market; he would meet me. I took the basket, and went very fast with it. Two young men stopped me. I am as innocent of the theft as a child unborn. I have never seen William Thomas since. I have lately come from the East Indies. I kept a shop before I went to the East Indies, near Mr. Gadd.
If you saw them turned out of the bag why did you say, never mind the shopman, he is a fool
When I went in to see the horse I threw my bag down by the parlour door; the shopman said, I had something in my bag. I said, I know it; I have a hog's head, which I have bought. Edward Gotch came out; he said, do not mind that fool, he has lost three or four games at cards, and now he is mad with every one. I took out the hog'd head; I said, is that your master's. The pig's head fell on the lasts and leather, I do not deny, as to say they were in the bag, it is false.
About six o'clock I went into the Nag's Head, I had a pint of beer and a pipe of tobacco. Pocock said to me, are not you a villian. What for, said I. He said, I had a pint pot of the landlord's. I am innocent of the charge. I did not know that the pot was behind me at all.
These stays are my own goods; I cut them out at my leisure hours at my lodgings. I took the stays to my master's shop to prop them off with the hot irons, having no opportunity I withdrew my attention. At the watchhouse I was so confused I did not know what I said.
I hope your honour will have mercy on me. I was sold by the French to Tippoo Sulton, for refusing to fight against the English. On that day, at Blackwall, he told me to meet him at Leadenhall-market, and when I came to him, this sheep laid on the ground. I said, what have you got here. He said, a sheep; will you have it. I said, I did not care. They came and caught hold of me.
I was coming past there between one and two o'clock, going to Smithfield-market. The prosecutor was at the door: as I went past he catched hold of me. I know nothing more about it.
I beg for mercy. I am very sorry for what I have done. I never will be guilty of any thing of the kind any more so long as I live. Distress brought me to this bad way of life.
I was coming down Fleet-market at five o'clock in the morning. I am troubled with fits. Mr. Beadle's door was open. I went in to see if any body was there. I was afraid to come out again for fear the watchman should take me, and when they said the door was open, I hid myself for fear they should find me in the place.
The piece of timber that I owned to were muddy, and a fisherman washed it for me.
There are a few remarks I have here, if your lordship will permit the officer of the Court to read it.
With contrition I acknowledge my guilt. It was distress drove me to do it.
I never saw the cart, nor did I ever see the bundle, until I saw it in the Poultry Compter.
My lord, and gentlemen of the jury, I can assure you I had no intention of wronging my employer, but faithfully returning to him every shilling. I have served several gentlemen of the city, who will testify my character when I had the honour of serving them.
I was going to take these pieces of timber to put up a cart that was broken down in the street. I asked a man in the public-house to help me to take it down to the cart. I meant to return these things again when I got the cart up.
I bought the ass at Uxbridge. You have taken me at non plus; my friends will not be here till Monday.
I bought them two books of two men, who were at the Auction Mart, in Cheapside. I gave five shillings for them.
I know nothing at all about it.
I am quite innocent.
I acknowledge my fault in this instance. I should take it a favour to be sent to sea.
I did not commit the fact myself. I was employed by one George Wood . Wood and me took a boat, and went on board a ship. Wood gave me the things charged in the indictment, and when the officer came on board the boat, Wood knowing what he had done, left the boat, and the officer took me.
I was passing by that gentleman's shop, a young man came out of the shop. He asked me which way I was going. I said, to Oxford-road. He said, if I would take the piece of carpeting, he would give me a shilling. I carried it as far as Ogle-street. I heard the cry of, stop thief. I turned round, and the young man that gave it me ran away.
I was coming down High-street, Marybone, about six in the evening, at a pawnbroker's window, in the corner. I saw the cheese wrapt up in an apron. I instantly picked it up. Two young men saw me pick it up; they said, I picked up a prize. I put it under my arm. Coming by Marybone-lane, Mr. Roper took me in custody. That is all I have to say. I never saw the two young men before in my life.
As I was coming along a boy overtook me; he asked me if I would buy that, and before I had time to look at it he ran up the gateway. I ran after him, and on my coming out of the corner of the gateway the gentleman catched me.
The prosecutor wishes to take my liberty away. I wish to go to sea if you please.
I did not know where it was until my mistress told me.
I should like to know whether the halfpence belonged to him.
The halfpence belonged to me. My father gave me fourteen shillings in halfpence, and I had a shilling in my pocket.
I took the property out of my pocket to shew what I had got.
Did you see me at the cabin door
A man in the dock told me I might go and lay down there.
I have been twenty-four years in his Majesty's service, and I am willing and able to go again.
With respect to the one pound eighteen shillings, on the 6th of May, that I am charged with, sorry would I be at all to attempt to to injure mortal being. I could not, by any means whatever, attempt to destroy my fellow man in any respect. I never was arraigned at the bar of justice before. I appeal to that Great and Almighty being, before whom I shall one day appear to answer for all the sins I ever have committed, and before whom all the ends of the earth must stand and tremble, at the vengeance of the Almighty. I never did attempt to injure any man whatever. I appeal to him who judgeth the hearts of all men. I have only to say that as I have been sworn against, my punishment, with Cain, of old, is greater than I can bear. I know in whom I have believed. I know that he is able to save to the uttermost. In him I believe, in him I trust. He will never leave me. I therefore commit myself humbly into his hands. If I am transported, my punishment will be death itself. I cannot bear it. My health is in a delicate state. I throw myself at your mercy. These gentlemen, who are to try me for death itself, and therefore, I know, I have an advocate with the father, Jesus Christ the Righteous, and he is the propitiation for my sins. He has made an atonement for me. I have poured out my soul in prayer to him, who is able to save to the uttermost. I commit myself to your mercy, and look to him on whom you shall look at the great and terrible day of judgment; when all nations of the earth shall stand before him, at whose bar have I pleaded guilty. I know nothing of the transaction of the 6th of May, merely only that all accounts of the 6th of May were settled with Mr. Briggs. I call on Mr. Briggs now, whom, perhaps, in some respects, I may have injured. I am sorry that ever I have injured him. With gratitude I must say in some respects I am indebted to him. Let him go to the utmost extremity, I forgive him freely, for all he has done or said, and brought against me. Man is but a creature of the day, that cannot foresee future events. When left to himself, he becomes fiercer than any beast that roves the woods of Africa or America. Oh, when the spirit of Christ departs from him, what a desperate state must he be in, and I will say, with David of old, let him who thinks he stands, take heed least he fall. Surely wee see with our eyes; the sword is going through the nations of the earth and why are not we awakened. It is our sins we all see, though we are not brought to the bar of justice; for our sins we are securged. Pardon me for taking up your time. I only plead, and ask for mercy. I was tenderly brought up, and lost my father and mother in the infancy of my youth. They were snatched from me. In my situation I have no friends to come forward here in this country. I am friendless and desolate, cast upon a miserable world. I can say no more. I am quite overcome. Let your judgment be tempered with mercy, I beseech it. My prosecutor has not stated what I have done with the one pound four shillings. I kept an accompt in my pocket-book. I don't think I saw him produce that book to see whether there is, on the 6th of May, goods entered. If so, then I must have actually have handed him over the sum. He has not produced the Book to satisfy the gentlemen of the jury.
I received the money of Mr. Hewitt. I lost it at Billingsgate. I was fearful of telling of it. I thought I should be able to pay it by my industry, but was prevented. I offered to pay it at five shillings a week. About eight days after that I was taken in custody. My brother went to the prosecutor's, and offered to give security. This was refused. The prosecutors said, the money must be paid. My brother borrowed the money, and went to the prosecutors. They informed him all was settled. The officer went to the prosecutors, and took the money that was paid by my brother, and I was fully committed for trial.
The pint pot they found in my room, I had half a pint of beer in it, and the pint pot they found upon me they lent me to get a halfpenny worth of milk, in the morning.
They all speak very true as far as I know. I was employed to roll or carry it in the best manner I could, to King James's stairs, and when I had rolled it four or five yards, he desired me to roll it back again. I said, I suppose it was New Crane stairs he meaned. He said, it was. I rolled it to Kelly's house. I met the other man. He said, where are you going. I said, to New Crane stairs. I looked round, and the man that hired me was gone. I went into several public-houses to look for him. I said to Carter, you must assist me in rolling it back. He said, what must you do with the cask. I said, I did not know; I know a man of the name of Kelly, near here, he will let me leave it in his place. I left it there. Carter and me went down to Three Crane stairs; we enquired of the waterman, and at the public-houses; we could not find the man. I went home until the morning. I was going down in the morning again, I met a man; he told me the officers were looking after me. He said, I had better keep out of the way. I replied, I shall not keep out of the way; I shall call at Shadwell office; and as I was going to the office, I met with an officer. He said, is your name James Smith . I said, yes. He then said he wanted me to come along with him; very well, said I. I am a stranger in the country. I am mostly at sea.
I would wish to go to sea.
I was in great distress. I had had nothing to eat for two or three days scarce. I took the rope. I was going to sell it to get a bit of bread.
I was not going to steal them; I was only looking at them.
The woman that I lived with brought me these breeches.
I would wish to go to sea, if they would accept of Plea.
I have lived in some of the most respectable families in the kingdom. I am totally innocent.
On Christmas day, I was standing in Cornhill, selling oranges. This gentleman bought fourteen oranges of me for a shilling. He gave me two sixpences; one of them did not appear to me to be a good one. I refused it. He gave me an eighteen-penny piece. He said, give me a shilling. I took my shillings out of my pocket; I said, take one. He took one; he said, it was a bad one. I did not know it. I had just taken it. I said, I would change it for him. He said, I will not have it changed; he would give charge of me.
I never knew any body call me Bateman but Mr. Mills. I am innocent of the crime imputed to me.
Mr. Chamberlain gave me a bottle of gin at Christmas, and these were the savings of three Christmas's.
The note I offered the landlord of the tap was a Guildford note, I believe.
I have been thirteen years, and never was brought to a suspicion of this in my life before. I found the notes on Wednesday last on my return from the old barracks to the new barracks, my quarters.
When I was taken in custody was anything said about the gown.
The charge given against me was for robbing the club-room. The girl said I had a knife in one hand and a bundle in the other.
I went into the house to get a pint of beer. I asked the boy if I might take the liberty of going into the privy, and as I was just bracing myself up the girl came down stairs. I never saw the club-room, nor did I ever see the gown until it was produced before the Lord Mayor.
I own that I was wrong. I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I stood seeing the sprats come up, and thinking no harm. A man took me in custody.
On Saturday afternoon, I was walking along Leadenhall-street, and down Houndsditch, home, I heard a sudden call of, stop thief. I ran the same as other people did. I saw a short man with a parcel under his arm; I knocked him down. He made his escape. I ran after the man down Houndsditch. A gentleman said to me, you are the thief. I said, no, he is gone down Duke's-place. I was stopped for it.
What is alleged against me is false.
I had been out of work two months; I could not get any employ. I had burried my wife a few days before. There were nobody in the building; I was tempted to take them through necessity and hunger.
I was in the habit of fighting and feeding a few cocks for some gentlemen. That morning I was taking my fowl for a little walk. It got from me and went into this yard. I went in the yard and catched it. I was not going to take these fowls away. The other fowl was my own property.
I am innocent of the crime that is alleged against me.
My lord, and gentlemen of the Jury I as was returning home from Drury-lane, going out of York-street into Charles-street, crossing the street, I picked up a pair of pantaloons, when a person came up and accused me of taking them out of a shop in Tavistock-street. I had not been in that street that night. I am a plaisterer ; I was out of work. I have a wife and two children. I hope your lordship will take my case into your consideration, as I am an innocent man.
The prosecutor is a baker ; he resides in Charles-street, Curtain-road. On the night the prisoner is charged with committing the robbery he was coming through Crown-court, in Still-alley, and just as the prisoner got into Crown-court he heard a man cry out, just as if some man was ill-using him. The prisoner went on when a a man and the prosecutor were on the ground. When the prosecutor got up the prosecutor got hold of him and cruelly used him. The prosecutor's conduct was as if he was mad drunk with liquor. The prosecutor gave charge of the prisoner. The prisoner was searched, and on him a three-shilling piece was found, which was his own property. The prosecutor's conduct towards the prisoner will be best proved by the patrol. The prisoner has an aged father and mother, which he supports by his honest industry.
I was coming up Bucklersbury; I heard the cry of, stop thief. A young man came out of the box-maker's and took me, and the young man of the name of Wevill said I took it out, and he said there was another young man like me had taken another out.
I am a plumber . I worked for Mr. Robertson, in Gray's-inn-lane; there came a new act up, no man could work except he served a seven years apprenticeship, so I was discharged. On this night I tumbled over a coarse sack; I undid my apron and put the soap and bottles in. I was going home, the patrol stopped me. He said, what have you got here. I said, soap. My mother kept a house in Bottle and Hay-yard for many years.
I have nothing to say.
I never committed such an error before. I am willing to serve in any of his Majesty's ships that your lordship shall be pleased to send me to.
I do most solemnly declare I am in no ways guilty of what I am charged with For the last three years and a half I mostly resided in the country; my business has been left to my son and my servants. I do declare, if any forgery has been committed, it has been done without my knowledge.
I know nothing about the watch. I am as innocent as a child unborn. I never before was in confinement, nor never had a key turned on me before now.
Gentlemen of the jury, I know nothing about this business, what I am taken for. I am quite innocent.
My lord and gentlemen of the Jury, in the month of July, 1811, I was engaged by James Southworth , master and part owner of the cutter called the Minus, in the Newfoundland trade. We took in a cargo of fish, and after performing quarrantine several days, we proceeded to Southampton, the master being on board the same time. I then went home to my family at Brighton, a wife and four children. In a few weeks after the vessel came into the Brighton-road. I was obliged to sail, and went another voyage. We sailed for Broad-stairs, at which place a letter of the Lords of the Admiralty was produced, and which was read by the master, together with the Custom-house certificate. We sailed to the coast of France. I, therefore, having faith in the master that the license and certificate was proper, I sailed with the same James Southworth , as master, under his command and controul, thinking that the vessel was properly licensed to go to the coast of France. I did not know who was the owner of the vessel, neither did I read the certificate. I have obtained by a friend a copy of the license and certificate, signed by the churchwardens and gentlemen of the first respectability, if it is consistent to your lordship's judgment to have it read to the jury.
I was very much distressed. I had been some days without anything to eat. I had no place to put my head in. I saw this gentleman's door open; I stepped in.
I had been over to my own country to settle some private business of my own, and I had sold all my tools that I had, and this instrument is a chissel that I made to fit up some brass work, and the springs were made to fit up some brass work. I turned the brass, and was bringing it with me in order to give it to my serjeant-major. I brought it and my shirts and things with me, and came to London. I put up at the sign of the Grapes, in Ratcliffe Highway. I had two one-pound bank notes. I had a bed there, and was very well accommodated. I asked the landlord what I had to pay. He said, a shilling for my bed. I had one pint of beer made warm, with a little purl in it. I desired the landlord to give me change. This woman said I was at their house at eleven o'clock. I do not know whether their clocks might he right; it was dinner time when I was at the Bunch of Grapes, Ratcliffe Highway. I paid a shilling to an hackney coachman to draw me up to the India house. The coachman said it was about half past twelve. I attempted to go my journey. A man asked me if I was a Lancashire man. I told him, no; I had worked in that country a long while. I told him, I never had been over since July. He asked me to go and drink with him. I do not know the sign; he pointed to the entry, saying, go into the house, and in a few minutes I will come in. I had not been long in this house before a man came in, and asked me if I would go for a sailor. I had two glasses of rum, I asked the girl if I could have a bed. She took me up stairs and shewed me the bed. She charged me eighteen pence. I came down to my liquor. I had not been long there before this young man asked me if I would be a sailor, I thought I was in a wrong place. We hear of kidnapping in the country. I insisted upon my clothes. She fetched them, and said I had not paid my reckoning. I asked for the landlord. She said he was not in. I asked for the landlady. She said she was in the bar. I immediately attempted to go to the bar door. They tore my coat right down my back, and the young man struck me in the face. I received a violent punch on my private parts; I cannot tell by whom. The surgeon knows, ever since I have been in prison it has been a great injury to my health. The man tore my bundle open, and took out a pair of pepper and salt stockings, a sermon book, and a Ready Reckoner. These have never been returned to me. The charge she lies against me is two shillings and sixpence. I sent a friend for them, this gentleman. The officer brought me them. I had my breeches pocket tore, and I lost a one-pound note. I am quite a stranger. There never was one of the name before a bench of justices in the world.
I am innocent.
On Wedensday, the 13th of January, I was calling clothes in Noble-street, Goswell-street; his daughter said, master, my father has got some clothes to sell. I went up stairs. He sold me to the\\ amountof three shillings and sixpence. I called again on the Friday. The girl said, her father was not at home, She said a clothes man offered her nine pence for the boots. She said, you take the boots and bring me the money as you come by. On Monday following, I went again. I said, Mr. Davis, I come to pay you nine-pence for the boots that I bought on the Friday. He said, I want my boots back. I said, how is it possible for me to bring them back, when I have sold them. Mr. Davis said I will not take a farthing less then five shillings. He charged an officer with me. A little while after he came into the public-house, and said, young man, you had better settle it before you go into custody. The officer said, no, I will not settle it; I have got charge of him. I said I would sooner go to jail than pay him five shillings for the boots.
I was coming along upon my business; stop thief was called out. I had as just right as any other man to stop a thief. I knocked the man down. I had a right to knock a thief down at any time, and the second companion of the thief, he pretended to be a constable. He collared me.
I am a coachman. I drive for Mr. Ware, Black-horse-yard, Leather lane. The wheel had broke; I went down the yard to get another wheel. I never touched any glass.
I was going along, and the beef was hung to my coat by another man as I was going along.
The copper I found under some pales. I knew no more of stealing the copper than a new born babe.
This gentleman has got a back way into the premises and into the shop. My dog, he ran in after a cat. I went into the premises after my dog. I put that box against the hole where the dog ran in. It was not my intention to rob or take anything.
In pleading guilty to the indictment I am well aware of the consequence, yet I am induced to pursue this line of conduct, and will bear that punishment your lordship thinks fit. I hope your lordship will, in the painful duty allotted to you, assign to me the same punishment as to every unfortunate criminal as to the first offence. I am, my lord, a young man, by trade a blacksmith , and having been out of work some time, and having a wife and two children, I went to this house to ask for work, and in one unguarded moment, I was induced to do this. I acknowledged my guilt before the magistrate, and must before your lordship.
This man brought this timber to me in Whitefriars, to my barge. He asked me whether I worked for Mr. Robinson. I told him, I did. I asked him, whether he had got a note with the timber. He said, he had not, but a note would be there as soon as the barge. I took the timber in the barge to Brentford, to Mr. Robinson's wharf. He asked me whether I had got a note. I said. I had not. I am innocent of this felony you may depend upon it. I did not know of the timber being stolen. I took it up as carriage.
I am innocent of it.
I purchased the coals of a man. I went to the stable and got a sack. I was carrying the coals home, and Mr. Carter stopped me.
This gentleman said he saw me come in and take the ham out of the window; why did not he apprehend me at the time.
I was making through Clement's inn to go to Westminster. The prosecutor said, I was the person that took the paper. He never saw me before.
A man asked me to drive the pig to Shoreditch, and as I was coming along the officer stopped me.
I was in extreme distress. I have a wife and three children starving. I humbly beg your lordship's mercy.
A man told me to take them trowsers, and go along with them.
I did not rob him. I played it cards with him in the morning, and as he had lost the money he fetched two women to swear that he had the money stolen from him.
Carlisle knows nothing of me. Matthews came into the Key and pointed me out; my having a blue coat on, he told this man to swear to me; and by, a false promise of Mr. Bardon to my mother; he told her he thought I was innocent, and he would have nothing to do in it. I have got nobody to speak for me.
As I was coming from the cook's shop, I saw the man laying down; his eye was cut, and his nose was bleeding. I picked up his hat. He fell down again. I gave him his hat. He said, give me the handkerchief. I said, you are a pretty one to get a man in a hobble. The man that assisted him in getting him up, ran away. He then gave me in charge of the watchman. I know nothing of the handkerchief. The prosecutor has been at my house, and offered to make it up for five shillings.
I came honestly by the notes.
I had a coat and a waistcoat to make for myself; he has a large shop-board where four or five can sit and work; I asked him to let me come and make a garment or two for myself; when my waistcoat was made we pledged it for twenty shillings, the money was all expended; he said when my coat was made he could pledge the coat for more money than I could; I said to him my friend, I will give you a couple of days lift. When he took me up the constable said, I was a fool if I did not take my wages; he told the magistrate he owed me three days wages; I said he has perjured himself. He then said I gave him my work; he then told the truth. It was day-light when I went out, I could see it was a foggy morning; the street door was open; Mr. Smith was jawing the boy. I wished him good morning. He was with me yesterday, he said if I could give him a little towards the clothes, he would not prosecute me.
I bought the drawers and stockings twenty years ago; the two pair of stockings actually belonged to myself.
I had no intention to take them; a poor man went with me to buy clothes; I had no occasion in the house; I am a stranger here.
If I had intended to steal the ring, I could have throwed it away, and not let it been found upon me; It was not my intent to steal it.
There was no lights in the shop; I pushed the door open, Mr. Brown called Mr. Ride to bring him a light; he told Mr. Ride he found a bundle of stockings on the ground. I was out of employ and in great distress, having a wife and four small children, Mr. King knows me and my affairs.
I did not take it out of the chest, it was laying on the ground.
I was walking down Lombard-street by myself; I told the young man I had not got his watch; I then went to the Compter.
I did it through distress, and starvation.
The pots were found on me they must have been put in my pocket by somebody else.
I started from the prosecutor's house at nine o'clock in the morning, to go to work for Mr. Collet at Barnet; Mr. Coles came to Barnet just about eight o'clock, as I had left work; he said he missed his things; I told him I knew nothing about it, I shewed him every thing I had; I said if I have got any thing of yours you shall have it; the shirt and handkerchiefs I had, I put them on on my going out in the morning; I told him I had the shirt and handkerchief.
I am quite innocent of every thing that is laid to my charge; on Friday evening at half past seven o'clock, I met a person (now in court) on London-bridge; I remained with him in a house until about nine at night; I then went to where my wife was laying in; I remained there untill about half past ten; then I went to Greenhill-rents; I remained there until seven in the morning.
The prosecutor promised me if I would give him his watch again he would take no more notice of it.
My lord, I am entirely innocent of the crime imputed to me. I received the notes at a gaming table where I lost some of my own. I believe it was in Oxendon street, or some of the streets at the west end of the town; being lately out at sea. I am not perfectly acquainted with the streets; I was ignorant that they were dishonestly come by; I took them for payment I trust that your lordship and the gentleman of the jury must be satisfied of my innocence. Had I stolen the notes, or known them to have been stolen, is it possible to suppose that I should go and offer them at the very bankers where they were advertised to be stopped, surely no guilty man could not act so; he must have known they would not be paid, and that himself must be brought into trouble. I have recently returned from abroad, I have no witnesses.
My lord, with humble submission to this honourable court, I beg leave to state in November 1814, I was going down Bull and Mouth street, in distress, I went into the stables in Bull and Mouth street, I was tempted to do the offence I am charged with; I have lived with Mr. Willan, I took a box of wearing apparel; I was taken into custody at Bisham and committed to take my trial this is my first offence.
At the time that I took these things my wages were becoming due; I meant to replace them when I got my wages. This is my first offence, I never was in confinement before in my life.
I had linseed in my premises which belonged to my master; I used to clean linseed for master, and that is the way it came in my shoes, and one wet night I put a sack over my shoulders to keep me dry as I went home.
I am quite innocent of the crime that is alledged against me; I went up to Mr. Pollto's, it took my whole attention to look at the gass-light; a young man said, he should like a piece of that scarlet cloth; two little boys came running along, and throwed my arm in the window; I am quite innocent.
I know nothing of them in the World, I never saw them before I saw them at Marlborough-street office.
I am guilty, therefore I leave it to the mercy of the court.
I keep a boarding-house for seaman, at Liverpool; Coughland, of whom I took the bill, I had known him some time, I cashed this bill for him; I have got a witness to prove it; I took this bill knowing the man, I supposed it to be correct.
It appears from the evidence that the man shot in Grosvenor-place lost a great deal of blood; the blood was even traced to the White Horse, Piccadilly; I can make it appear that I bled none, not even the sheets that I lay upon.
I pawned the seals; I did not know how the person got them that I pawned them for; I cannot produce the persons because I do not know where they are; all that I had for pawning them was one shilling.
I cannot.
I was standing close by; a tall boy put these seals into my hand.
I was returning from my masters in Holborn, to my lodgings in Mitchell street, Old street. I was running, fearful I should be locked out. There was a cry of stop thief; the watchman stopped me; the prosecutor came up and gave charge of me because I was running.
I did not deny being at your shop.
I solemnly declare I know nothing of the knife I am charged with stealing. I acknowledge I was in the prosecutors shop; I did not take any thing from the prosecutors shop but the knife that I bought and paid for. I am quite innocent.
I am innocent of the charge. I know nothing of it; I was at work at my father's at the time the robbery was committed.
It was distress that drove me to it.
I bought these clothes in Petticoat-lane.
I was in liquor when this happened. On Christmas morning my master sent me a pair of shoes to do; I promised my master I would get them done on the day following; he told me to borrow a last of Mr. Shuter, I drank freely indeed that night with an acquaintance, I was very much intoxicated; I did not lose my recollection; I knew I had these shoes to make; the liquor took that effect on me, I knew it would make me ill on the day following. I considered I should not be able to make the shoes, I thought of getting Shuter to assist me in making the shoes against the next morning. I went up to the room, and knocked at the door, the door was opened by an old man; I asked him if Shuter was at home; he said, no, if I wanted him he would go and fetch him. The man went out, and whether he locked the door or no I cannot say; I went in and fell asleep; how long I was there I do not know; when I awoke I knew where I was. I really thought Shuter locked me in by way of a joke. I went to the door for the purpose of coming out; I raised the latch for the purpose of coming out. I felt the lock, there was no key in it. I then thought I would get out of the room as well as I could; as for entering the room for any robbery, I am as innocent as a child unborn. My prosecutor has worked for the same shop that I have worked; it is out of his power to say he ever knew any harm of me.
I was charged with having some carpenter's tools in my lodging I worked at Hounslow Powder-Mills. I was taken in custody. The tools I found in the bag one night, as I was going home. I have always borne a good character.
I went into the building to lay down. The tools he took from me were mine.
I bought the tools of a man in Whitechapel.
On the 26th of October, Thomas Nott engaged a lodging-house in Han's-place, Chelsea, of Mrs. Bishop, for two hundred guineas a year, and had a written agreement; this agreement was taken out of my pocket by Gilmore, the officer. On Monday the 5th of November, I was arrested; Mrs. Bishop let me this house, and before the the rent was due, she took possession of the house without my knowledge. What things I took out of the house was done with no fraudulent intention, only for my use while I was in confinement. I consider myself in possession of the house. I having left a cat, a living creature of mine, in it. Mrs. Bishop refused me admittance. I left a quantity of wine and a pair of boots there. My housekeeper can prove Mrs. Bishop refused me admittance; my housekeeper's name is Louisa Smith .
These feathers were never in Mrs. Bishop's place at all.
I am a Dane, I did it through distress.
I was walking up Holborn; a man came and asked me where Brownlow-street was; I told him. This gentleman came and took me; the cheese I never lad in my hand, nor did I see it until I saw it in the gentleman's hand.
I am a butcher; I was selling meat that day; a man asked me to carry that chair to a grocer's shop.
A man asked me to carry the trunk, he said, he would give me sixpence for carrying it.
I did not take the property nor did I lodged in these peoples house; I came up to London exporting to receive some prize money, I had not sufficient money to find myself in a lodging, For three nights past, I slept in a hay-stack. just by the New-cut.
I denied robbing him not of having his money; he gave me his money to pay for drink and coach hire.
A soldier tore it off, and gave it me.
On the night of the 17th of December I was in the Edgeware-road, a man asked me to carry this bag to York Mews; he said he would pay me for carrying it there. The watchman took me and the bag to the watchhouse.
Distress made me do it.
A severe wound in my throat renders me incapable of distinctly articulating; I have therefore reduced to writing a few observations; no man could feel a greater regard for the young woman; never for a moment had I a thought of killing her; I have but a confused recollection of this melancholy event; I very much regret the absence of Mr. Ricord, he would have been a most important witness in my behalf, as he alone is acquainted with all the circumstances of this case; the gentlemen who conducts this prosecution, have done every thing in their power to obtain his presence; I understand their applications have been ineffectual; I express my acknowledgement for the endeavours they have used, I leave my case to your lordship and the gentlemen of the jury.
I never intended to defraud Mr. Maul, at the time I was embarrassed in signing a bill for my friend; when Mr. Maul came in Clerkenwell Prison with Hutt and Vickery, Mr. Maul said, did not I recollect buying a poney of him; I was always ready to pay him; I can only say I had no intention to defraud him.
The evidence alledged against me is that of the crime charged in the indictment; I never before had any thing imputed to me dishonest, or of a disgraceful nature, which my master can testify.
I was there about one o'clock, I was coming down Newgate street; I saw the handkerchief laying on the pavement; I picked it up and put it into my breeches pocket; there was a hole in the pocket, it fell through, the officer said it was not my property; he knocked me down; I asked him what he did that for, he said, to take me in custody.
I was coming along Queen-street about nine o'clock in the morning, a young man of genteel appearance asked me which way I was going; I said towards Cripplegate; he asked me to carry these parcels for him; at the corner of Queen-street this young man tapped me on the shoulder, and asked me what I had got; I looked round for the other young man, he was absent.
It was a general rule for me to take what corn I thought proper for my horses, and what the horses did not eat; I left in the stable for them when they returned.
I was in real distress, I did not force the doors open; I found them open.
I was employed by a man to take the box, to the Spotted Dog in Holborn.
I was coming home from Kennington, and coming along Fleet Street there was a mob; I went to see what was the cause of this mob; I then proceeded towards my home; I heard the cry of stop thief. This gentleman came up and said, I was the person that had robbed him of his watch; I was then dragged to the watchhouse; I told them I had not robbed any one of his watch.
I am a person quite different to what that Gentleman represents me.
I bought the paper.
I was walking by Mr. Cox's door; I picked up a shawl; the young man came out of the shop and took me into custody.
At the time this offence was committed I was in a state of intoxication, and when I am so I am in a state of insanity.
I did not take the fender, I was employed by a person to take the fender to 35, Blackfriars-road.
I have nothing to say; I trust to the mercy of the court.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I called on Mr. Harwood with this piece of an elephant's tooth; I asked him three shillings a pound for it; he detained it, and said he had suspicion it had been stolen. I had called upon him before; I said I was sorry he had brought me into trouble. I told him I could take it to the man I bought it of.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I never saw the prosecutor in my life.
I had no work to do for two months.
I had no intention to defraud the society.
On the 17th of February, Mr. Brazier asked me to take this horse to Smithfield to sell it for him; I said, yes; I was to have five shilling for my trouble; I have got witnesses.
I was coming along the road I saw the trunk fall from the carriage; I was going to take it to the first public house until it was advertised.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
A gentleman gave it me to carry to such a place, it was tied up in a handkerchief.
I was taken at a nonplus; I leave it to the mercy of the court.
I am quite innocent.
When I went out in the morning, I passed the landlord, he could see I had nothing with me.
I know nothing about the boot.
I kept my clothes in that cupboard, the range had dirtied my clothes; I took it out of the cupboard, and was going to put it into Mrs. Wood's cellar.
A young man dropped this print I picked it up, not knowing it was stolen, and when I heard the cry of stop thief, I threw it away immediately.
I was induced to pledge the coat through the distress of my family, to buy them bread.
I was hired to carry this lead; the man that hired me I have not seen since.
I am innocent of the charge as God is my Saviour.
I did it through distress.
When you was before the magistrate, you said, you stopped me?
To Britton. Was your shop door shut, or open
Did you see me
Did you ever see me at all
He told the magistrate that he did not see me, for the bed clothes were over my face
How was this money concealed about you, was it loose or in a pocket-book
That witness has taken away a commission from me
I should wish to ask that witness how much she got from me
Did you not say that if I would give you two pounds, you would not prosecute me
Did you take me, or did the other person take me
How can they say I had glass, when I was not in Browlow-street at all. I heard the cry of stop thief, and joined in the pursuit. I heard some glass smash down at my heels just before.
I was coming along, and saw the snuff-box on the ground, just behind this gentleman; I picked it up, and put it in my pocket. He came after me, and said, it was his, but I did not choose to give it him, until he had described it; when he had, I immediately saw he had a right to it, and of course surrendered it up to him.
I had been to work as far as Hendon, on Saturday, I am a plaisterer by trade. I spent my weeks wages on Saturday night at Hendon. I got very much intoxicated; I layed down about one o'clock in the morning in the fields, close to the Regent's Cannel-bridge, in the Hampstead-road; I slept a short time, but feeling it very wet, I got up about day-break, and perceived a foot-track along the dew in the field; I followed it up for a short distance, and it led me to this sack; upon lifting up which, these ducks and fowls layed all in a hole.
The Vivien's horse was rather tough in riding, and therefore, he wished me part with him. I was to sell this horse, If I could; and as he was at Bath. I want to give the money to my mistress. After I sold him. I was going home and I called in at the, White Horse, in Fetter-lane to get a pint of beer and some bread and cheese while I was there two men came in who wanted to try the horse two days before they asked, me what I had sold him, for I told them, and when I was going out between six and seven o'clock. They came after me, knocked me down and took away the money; I was afraid to return to my master and so I deserted but gave myself up in a week afterwards.
I was employed by a gentleman to carry it to the itching block at this end of Oxford-street for a shilling; and I was going along with it when I was stopped, and the gentleman run away.
It was my intention to have returned the things as soon as I could get money to redeem them.
I hope for mercy, as I have aged parents depending on me for support.
What Barber says is quite wrong for he had kept the parcel behind some boxes for four or five days, and he told me to take it to the Talbot.
I am indicted for embezzleing this money in different notes, and that has not been proved.
I live with my mother in Rosemary-yard, No. 1, I have been in gentleman's service; my master is gone abroad with the army. I never saw the prosecutor before he stopped me. I had thirteen shillings of my own money.
At four o'clock on the morning of the 19th, I went out to look for the deceased as she had stayed out all night; she lived with me, I found her quite drunk, and brought her home; she wanted to have something to drink in the room, and I would not suffer her, and locked the door. When I was at work, being a shoemaker, I was sharpening my knife, and the deceased went over to the window and threw herself out; I had no time to save her.
I am not the person at all, the prisoner ran, and was pursued.
I am a poor old soldier, and came to get some sleep that night at this house. The men who were in the house, and who slept in the room, were teazing me the whole of the afternoon, because I was an Irishman; I requested they would not teaze me, and if they would not, I would give them anything they chose to drink; they very readily drank all the money I had, amounting to ten shillings, all that was left of my marching money. When the money was gone, they again commenced teazing, and I was very much afraid of them. When I went up into the room, I had never seen this man; the rest of the men went to bed. I assure your lordship I was afraid of my life, and did not lie down but stood against the wall all night. I thought if they should attract me I had no means to defend myself, I searched about the room and found on the table a piece of an old rusty razor, which I wrapped up in a stocking to defend myself, I had no malice against any of them; presently some of them got up to teaze me again when they found I would not get into bed; and a man was coming round behind me, and I made a blow at him; immediately there was a watchman sent for; I was taken to the watchhouse, and remained there all night; if I hurt any one, it was not with any malice, but merely in my own defence, I was afraid of my life.
I should wish to ask that witness whether there were not other persons in the shop, and whether they might not have given her a three shilling piece
I am innocent of the charge and have a wife and eight children.
I was told to sell the lace by Viglezzi; and being in want of money, I pawned it; I intended to have taken it out of pawn, when I got money, and to have returned it.
It is impossible for Mr. Sammell's to swear to those shoes, after they have been stretched on a last the marks must be effaced.
She has foresworn herself. I never sat behind the door, nor ever had the razor in my hand.
She never was ten minutes out of the room with me during the whole night.
I have nothing to say in my defence; but have some witnesses to my character.
I have nothing to say in my defence.
I am innocent of the crime laid to my charge.
I was asked by a shipmate to pawn these breeches, and he told me if he never returned from sea, I might keep the duplicate.
I am a labourer in the London Docks; I saw the prosecutor in the public-house with three girls, and heard him say, he had been robbed of five-pounds.
If there had been twice as many more, I should have taken them, for I was quite insane at that time. About sixteen years ago, I was bitten by a mad dog, and was dipped in the salt water at Gravesend for it, and I am always insane in the months of July and August. I really do not know how I came by these sheep at all.
On Tuesday morning, I was taken very bad with the rhumatism in my hips, and wrapped the sheet round them, and hearing the soldiers going off to the continent, I jumped up, and put on my clothes and forgot to take off the sheet.
Did you never say you saw a man in a black coat running away?
Ask that witness what sort of grain it was?
I took this corn and shot it into the bin, and then fed my horses all round.
I confess the crime imputed to me, and committed it to stop the mouths of my crying infants and sick wife.
I was one night, about this time twelvemonth, sitting in the stage box at Covent Garden Theatre, when Captain Parker came in, and fell into conversation with me; after the play was over, he went and spent the evening with me, at the King's Head coffee-house, just by Furnival's-inn, in Holborn, and I paid five and thirty shillings for him, as his share of the reckoning, and this evening, I was in the Green Park, he met me as he was walking with Sir Lumley, and said, how do you do, Manners, where have you been all this time; I told him, I was in very great distress, and would thank him to let me have the money that he owed me, but he said, he could not speak to me then, as I was dressed so shabbily, and Sir Lumley Skeffington was with him.
Being deprived of my papers and money by the Police, I have been unable to procure an advocate: I have therefore committed my defence to paper in my own language, and will take the liberty of reading it to the court. I am an officer in French Army , and served under the Emperor Napoleon in all the battles on the Continent, and in Egypt, where by an ophthalmia I was nearly deprived of my sight, and cannot distinguish any object except by the assistance of my spectacles. On the return of the Bourbon family to the French Throne, I was honoured by having a commission in the Garde De Corps. But soon after Napoleon returning from Elba, and I wishing not to draw my sword against my lawful Savereign, I returned, by the advice of my friends, to this Country, where I remained at bath for a considerable time. In June last, I came to this City to meet some of my brother officers; I took up my lodging at the York Hotel, at which place the innocent cause of my present misfortunes arose. I have been reared in the paths of rectitude and truth by my excellent parents, and am confident that justice for which a British Jury is celebrated throughout Europe, will this day be shewn towards me. I am most innocent of the charge which is imputed to me, and I will in a moment account for this unhappy mistake. The morning after I arrived in London, I received orders with some of my brother officers, to join my regiment; the next morning, I packed up all my clothes, and went to the Golden Cross, Charing Cross, but then found the coach had gone off. I returned to the York Hotel to change my trowsers, and without going up into my own room, went into an empty room, which I saw open, and there unpacked the whole of my things in one trunk, as my trowsers were at the bottom; in re-packing them, I suppose it was, that I put up the clothes of the prosecutor's; for as I said before, I am so blind that I never perceived them; I then went to the Golden Cross, determined to sleep there that night, in order to be in time for the coach the next morning. When I went into my room, I put my spectacles on, and on examining my clothes, was greatly surprized to find a coat, waistcoat, shirt, and stockings, which did not belong to me; I could not conceive how they came there, and it was not until I was in prison, that I supposed they came there, by the means I have suggested. I did not conceal them as if stolen, but put them openly out, and locked my trunks. Unfortunately all my papers and trunks have been kept from me, together with a pocket-book, which if I had, I might be able to convince the Court and Jury of the rank I held in the French Army, and of my belonging to the Legion of Honor. I have not a friend in this Country, as all my brother officers are gone. I have only again to repeat my innocence, and place myself in the hands of a British Jury, from whom I am sure I shall receive justice.
I have to say that I did not know the note was forged when I passed it.
I am a smith by trade, and went to look after a shop mate, who told me he lived in Little Gray's-inn-lane, but did not tell me the number of the house, and I went into the first house to enquire. I was in the greatest distress, and have a large family of small children.
By the good God I am innocent of robbing this man, I had the note to take care of for him as a friend. I went down to Woolwich and went on board his ship, knowing some of the crew; and he being a stranger, and a man of my own colour, I asked him to lodge with me when he came to London, which he agreed to. He told me I had better stay on board, for there would be blankets and things which would be throwed away, and as I might as well have them as any one else. When the crew was paid off, he sent one here for half a gallon of rum, and we got all quite comfortable; and when we were coming off, they all made me commodore, and this here Jack, (pointing to the prosecutor) was drunk, and very riotous, and disobeyed my orders; when we came on shore, he would have more rum; I told him I was commodore; I was superior officer, and would not let him, but he would have some, and went and got some. We hired a cart to bring up the chests, and my blankets and things, and we all got on board, and was very merry; but this Jack was drunk and quarrelsome, and would have something to drink, at every public house he came to. After we came up, he changed one note, and gave me the rest to take care of; and went to a cook's shop, and got something for supper; we went into him at the cook's shop, and he wanted to go with girls; we went to a house where there were some, one got one, and another got one, and this Jack made a bargain with a lady, but something was the matter and she went away. I fancy they did not agree. Jack made a row, because she would not stay, and blamed me for it, saying I took her away. At last we agreed to go home to our lodgings; he was very quarrelsome; and in the way pulled out his knife, and swore he would kill me Portugue. I was obliged to knock him down to try to take away the knife, and when the watchman came up, he swore I had robbed him, and I was taken to the watchhouse. He came here to swear away my life to day (addressing himself to the prosecutor.) You Jack, you know it was all a drunken frolick; so help me God Almighty I am as innocent as the child unborn.
On the 4th of May, I was directed to get two powers of attorney stamped to go to India. Not knowing the amount, I got ten pounds from the cash clerk, to pay for them; when I got to the office, I found it was a holiday, and they would be three shillings and sixpence extra each; the usual charge being now two guineas, that made two pounds nine shillings. I left two pounds to pay for them, and said I would call for them the next day as they could not then be done; which we learned when I accompanied George Ashley to the Mayor's Court; and I intended to call and pay the nine shillings the first time I went that way.
Do you remember my returning with any clerk to Mr. Windle's office
Don't you know I paid you two pounds - A. I don't recollect any money being paid at all by you; if any had, it would have been entered in the books.
That letter was sent by me immediately after my discharge.
Here is a bill sent me by the prosecutor, charging me with three pounds as money lent, and this three pounds he lent me. I would wish to ask him if that bill is not his hand-writing?
Nothing that was taken out of the house was taken out with a fraudulent intention. Here is the great coat, which Mr. Wansborough lent me, and which was in the country.
I bought the coat from a man between Highgate and Hyde Park corner, on my way from Liverpool.
My mother told me that a gentleman had been, and seen that ham, and had said it was his; I went with that gentleman, and told him where I found it. They searched me, and found nothing on me. The person is here who saw me find it.
I was not sober when I went into the shop; and I picked the handkerchiefs up off the floor.
I took these books for the purpose of reading, and intended to have returned them. Those towels are mine, and the initials are those of a relation, who gave them to me.
From my earliest youth my exertions have been devoted for the prosecutrix The reason I parted from her, in 1812, was owing to some disgusting treatment I received from her husband's executors. When I returned, I had the absolute controul of her affairs, with the expectation of being taken into partnership, and was told to supply myself with my salary, from the money that came into my hands.
I got these things for my support, as I was out of any situation.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court; I had been twelve years at sea, and had no friend.
How many houses does your master pay rent and taxes for
Does he pay rent and taxes for this here house, where you say a robbery was committed
My Lord, I am indicted for breaking and entering the dwelling-house of William Henry Bodkin . This witness says, William Henry Bodkin does not pay rent and taxes for it; and my Lord, I think it can't be his dwelling-house.
My Lord, it has been decided by the twelve Judges.
The watchman knew nothing of the matter, for he was in his box.
Was it not on the 25th that you brought the warrant
The present prosecution against me is by Mr. Teasdale. For many years past I have had several persons conspire to cause my ruin, and they have brought several actions against me. Mr. Teasdale said, that if these did not do, he would spend a hundred pounds a year to be my ruin. I had not, before the transaction, seen Mr. Teasdale for a month. When I came in and saw him, I asked him his business, he told me; and I replied, that I had appealed once, and had been rated by spite, and not by the commissioners. The magistrate said, it was not with his consent that I was over rated. I had tendered the money and it was refused. Fotherby asked me the price of the sword, which was the cause of my taking it down; I stuck it in the boards and there I left it. I requested them to leave a man in possession, but they refused. Teasdale was taking the goods away, I said, I would not suffer them to be taken. Mr. Fotherby refused either to take the goods away or to let his man do it. He sent for a constable, but I neither molested one or the other; about an hour after the constable came Teasdale requested him to keep the peace. Teasdale took hold of the chair on which I was leaning with one hand, the other hand being on the sword, which was stuck in the ground; he struck me once or twice, and I caught hold of his finger in my hand: he called to the constable to interfere; the constable requested me to let go the sword, and I let go of the sword and his finger. Teasdale called out he has stabbed me, and requested the constable to take me to Hatton Garden. I went before the magistrate and he bound me over.
Was there not two chairs standing between us
Did he not lay hold of the sword while it stuck in the ground
Did I not say I had been imposed upon
Did I not offer to pay 9s. 4 1/2d. in the pound.
Did I not pull my notes out of my pocket and tender them to Teasdale
Had I not plenty of time while you was in the shop to stab Teasdale, if I had been inclined
Did I not tender 6 15
On Teasdale saying he was stabbed, did you not request me to let loose
I had called the hour of one, and found every thing in order until I came to Turnstile, when I heard a crash; I had got as far as my box; I looked up and found the two shutters down; I sprung my rattle, and saw two men, one of which was Riley; I asked him if he knew any thing about this; he said about what? I took him into custody, and gave him to Shreve; as soon as I came back Cowell was there; he asked me what was the time, and I told him; that is all I know of it.
I met a man who gave me the coat to take to Mary-le-bone-street, and a man ran after me and said I had stolen it.
I know nothing of the robbery; I lodged with Noah; he came home with a bundle, and took it away the next morning, and sold the things at different places.
I am a porter in the market; a man asked me to carry it, and I did.
I saw the trunk lying on the pavement, and asked who it belonged to; nobody answered, and I took it.
I had been to Peckham, and as I was coming down Wood-street I saw the baker fall, I helped him up, and he said \d-n you, you have got my watch;\" the officer came and took me into custody; I am a carpenter by trade, and perfectly innocent."
Did I pass you several times
I was on my way home; I saw three gentlemen, they addressed themselves to the prosecutor, and said, go; and who are you talking to, do you think you are in Field-lane? The prosecutor came to me, and asked me if I knew where to find a constable, I told him I would shew him the watch-house, which I did.
I did not say I was in the company of the man who took it.
I was going down Friday-street, a man came by and threw the pantaloons down and I picked them up.
I was walking along and the gentleman collared me, and said I had picked his pocket; he took me to a shop and searched me, I had nothing about me, somebody brought the handkerchief to him.
Did you not kick me and let me go
I do not wish to add falsehood to fraud, I own I took the coat, but it was from mere distress.
If your face was towards Exeter'Change how could you see me
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
What can you swear to me by
When I was taken to Worship-street, Miss Swan said I was not the man. I heard the officer tell her to swear to me.
You only gave me 3s. for the saddle
I did not steal the horse, they gave me liberty to ride it on the main turnpike-road.
I had been with Thomas Parker; I was looking about for a night's lodging, and as I was going in I found the things by the step of the door.
I was going down the Minories, and seeing some handkerchiefs hanging by the door; I stopped to look at them; the gown-pieces were hanging by them; I lifted them up to look at them; the shopman ran out, and I knocked them down just as I was going to ask the price; he laid hold of me, and gave me in charge. I am quite innocent.
Are you sure I am the man
If you thought I was doing wrong, why did you not stop me
I was on board a 74 gun ship since the 25th of April.
I went and bought some bottles of them on that day. When I had looked them over, I went back, and asked if there were any more; I was told there was in the cellar, in the binn, No.10. I went to look for them; as I was coming out of the cellar, I met Mr. Abbotts; he asked, who is there? I said it was me. He called for a light, and we went down together. I knocked against some bottles; he told me to take care; he then turned round and asked what brought me there; I said business; he said nothing, but sent for an officer, and gave me in charge.
Was I unwilling to go with you
I have been eighteen years in his Majesty's service. I have been in great distress. I was looking for work. I know nothing of the robbery.
Can you swear to the blankets
What time did I take the lodgings
I gave 30s. for the things; I was just by Drury-lane and Crowley stopped me, and asked what I had got. He took me down a bye place, and asked for something to drink. I said I had no money, and he took me into custody.
I picked it up in Fenchurch-street.
Did he not pull off his coat to fight, and challenge you to fight
I was in the coffee-house when the two men came in; the prosecutor was drunk, and offered to play any body for 5l. He sent me out of the room, and called his friend a d-d thief. He came to me with the pocket-book, and said I was a thief. He went to the house, and sent his friend out, saying, I had stolen his pocket-book.
I was going to Little Britain, and I meant to take it home as I returned.
I was at the top of St. Martin's-le-Grand; I saw a man with it, and he gave it to me.
I went out to get the money; when I returned the house was shut. The next morning I heard the officers were after me, and I was afraid to return.
I had been to my sister's, and coming home, I was shoved off the pavement; a gentleman stopped me, and brought me back to the shop; I had lost my hat, as I was in a hurry.
I did not have the other money; there were other men in the shop.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury, I beg to state that I am perfectly innocent of the charge; I trust, when my witnesses are heard, that you will think so. It is very unlikely that a person in my situation of life should be guilty of stealing a loaf: my situation in life has ever been respectable. Esthelby is the only witness I have to complain of, he has not said what it true. I have been a Yeoman in the Guards, and have been always ready to exert myself for the public good.
It was hunger drove me to it.
I saw a man drop the coat, and I picked it up.
I saw the handkerchief laying on the ground, and I picked it up.
I heard a ery of stop thief! I saw the thief knock the man down; he got up, and said I was the thief.
The distress of my family caused me to act as I did. I was going along with the stool as my master had desired me, and the gentleman asked me if I would sell it, and I did; I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
I was coming from Tottenham-court-road, and the gentleman came up to me and accused me of the theft; I was never in Red-Lion-street.
I was behind the prosecutor on the 14th of November; I was going to the George public-house, a young man ran past me, and the gentlemen were following him; that is all I know of the matter.
Did you not take another man, and let him go
Why did you not say I struck you at the office
I had been to Somers Town. I heard a cry of stop thief! and I took one man, when the prosecutor came up, and swore to me, and let the man go.
Did you not ask me to go with you
Did you not ask me to carry it
I was coming over London Bridge; she asked me where I was going. I told her, and she said she was going the same way. She said, she had something to sell. I asked her what it was, and she said, four jackets. I asked her where she got them; she said, that was nothing to me. She went to several shops, and offered them for sale. They said, she had stolen them, and threatened to take us, up. She asked me for some gin. She said I had robbed her.
I am the father of four small children, and hope you will have mercy.
As I was going to Montague-square, I met a person who offered me the scutle for 3s. 6d. and I bought it. A man at a shop door asked me if I was going to sell it; I asked him 4s. 6d. for it.
I beg for mercy.
I picked the sack up in the Strand. There was no mark on the leather; he might cut a mark, and fit it in. I bought it of a man who came from Lancashire.
My Lord, and Gentlemen of the Jury. My feelings are so much hurt at this most dreadful calamity that has happened, that I cannot say any thing; I therefore leave it to the court.
I saw the watch laying on the ground, I picked it up, and asked if any body had lost one. I was answered, \No.\" I put it into my pocket, and the officer took me."
Did you not say, at Bow-street, you was sure it was not me
Do you recollect saying, when I described the person who had got the things, that you suspected him
I had been acquainted with a man of the name of MKenzie. Last Sunday week, as I was returning from Drury-lane, I met him with three packages under his arm; he asked me to carry them, saying, he was going the same way as me. I took one of them; he walked faster than me. As I was coming down Cheapside the watchman stopped me, and said, he suspected me. I threw them down, and endeavoured to escape.
I lodge with the young man. We were both out of bread; he asked me to shew him where I worked, and I did; he went in, and opened the door, and let me in; he gave me the bundle; I have not seen him since.
That quadrant is my own.
I am innocent.
I bought the things.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
The young gentleman said, I had got his handkerchief. He would not search me.
I went to see my brother, I saw the iron lying down, and I picked it up.
Did you not lend them to me
He lent me the breeches.
I was looking at the crowd, and he took me.
I had been doing a job for a person, and they gave me the timber. I sold it to Clowe for 14d., and they took me into custody.
I was coming home with my truck, and a man made me carry it for a glass of gin.
A man dropped the fish, and I picked it up.
I only took it as a jest; I did not intend to steal it. I thought it was my friend's.
I went to dinner with Amos; it was impossible that I could go to the pawnbroker's, and get back at the time I did.
I was on Tower-hill, and a black man and a woman told me, to go and sell the watch.
I was going to my barge, and I met a man who gave me the things to carry to Ealing.
Are you sure I struck you
Are you sure that I struck her
I met these boys at Westminster; I neither spoke to them, or took the bundle.
Was it not my spectacle case
I went there for my tools. I had got a job to do and wanted them; I was coming by and thought I would call for them. I tried the door, and found it fast; I went away, and a man ran out, I called out watch, and they seized me.
I went into the shop for some twist; I had some twist in my pocket at the time, but I wanted some of a lighter colour; the other man came down and shoved the ball which I had in my hand up my sleeve.
I was in distress.
Pople secured me, and let me go the overnight, and the next morning he took me again.
A young man came up to me, and gave me the coat.
A gentleman gave me the glass to take to George-street, Westminster.
The man searched me, but found nothing on me; my sister changed the note. The pencil and sealing-wax were in a basket of cinders which I carried up stairs.
A man gave me the coat to carry.
I was in the Crescent; a man threw down the hamper, I stopped to see what was the matter.
A man gave me the beef to carry for him, and when the man stopped me he ran away.
In the absence of the constable, Mr. Williams measured the ribbon, and charged 13s. 9d. for it; I offered to pay 4s. 6d. for six yards.
I saw something laying down, I picked it up, and found it was lead.
As I was going to Chelsea, I bought the breeches of a Jew, for 6s.; a few days afterwards I pledged them, after taking the buttons off, and putting them on my waistcoat.
I met a lad with the bacon; he said, he would give me something if I would carry it for him; when he saw the officer, he told me to put it under my coat, and he ran away.
Did you not tell me to stop, and I did
The prosecutor has spoken false. I am not guilty. I was in company with the man who did it, and I can give information where the seals were disposed of; they were sold for 24s., they have sent me four shillings of the money. Being innocent of the robbery, and knowing the party who committed it, I hope I shall be allowed to give up their names in evidence.
Did not the shift fall off the counter
I never entered the pawnbroker's shop.
Did I tell you I bought it of an Italian
I am often deprived of my understanding, and think I could not be in my right mind at the time. I have several times attempted my life.
The officer told me it would be better for me to tell; he said, the prosecutor was a good natured man, and would be merciful: he said, he had offered him 1l. if he would get the watch.
I was taken ill, and went into the house. The locks found on me are mine. I am continually pestered with officers. I was once transported, and since I received my pardon I will defy any man to say I I have robbed anybody. I can produce a hundred locks of the same description.
I was in distress, and my wife was in labour at the time.
I went there to ease myself.
Did you see me there
Did you see me in the house?
Did you not ask me if I knew my broad-sword exercise?
I was in the Minories; there was a great crowd there; a man came up to me, and put the sword into my hand. I had drank half a pint of rum. I began to flourish it; I did not take any thing, nor was I in the shop.
I shall state nothing but what you have heard.
I went to look for work. The gun lay in the Minories; a man pulled out two pistols, and told me to pick it up, and I did.
I went out to look for work. I saw the arms lying in the street, and picked up the sword.
I picked it up.
I was coming by the man's box; he called to me, I came to him - He said, you have been to Levy's; what have you got about you; I pulled my hat off, and I said I had got some lace.
Distress drove me to it; I had nothing to eat for three days, and my family were starving.
Have you not often heard your mother find fault with the prosecutor, for going out and leaving the door open?
I was at Holland's house the whole of that day before tea. I wanted some paper to write a letter - He had no paper. I was there till after tea. I went out with Holland after tea. I was going to Mile-end. I went back to write the letter; when I got to the side-door, there was a man pushed by me. I found the room-door locked, and came out, and found the coat lying in the court, and I pledged it.
Did I not speak to you after I came down on the Sunday morning
I went to lodge there; I took the lodgings for a night or two, at 6d. per night. On the Sunday morning, I got up and asked the prosecutor what the box was, he said, it was his clothes box. I talked some time with the landlord; if I had got any thing when I went out he must have seen it; I could not leave the house without going through the bar. I bought the two duplicates of a man at the public-house opposite the prosecutor's. Prosecutor first said at the office, that he saw the things on the Sunday Morning, and the pawnbroker said they were pledged on the Saturday, he then said it was that day.
Was you intoxicated at the time?
The man came and looked at me, and said he did not know me. I have witnesses to prove that I was at home on that day.
Was you not in liquor
Did you see me before you saw me at the watchhouse
Where did you first see me
Which way did I run
When Stubbs came into the watch-house, did he not charge two or three persons with it
I am totally innocent; I had been spending the evening at my cousin's; I heard the alarm, and went to the lady to see what was the matter, she ran from me towards Cross-street - I followed her, a young man stopped me, and attempted to stop two or three more, Mr. Stubbs was intoxicated, and charged several men with the robbery; his wife said, she could not say I was the man.
A man gave me the bundle to carry.
The man came up to me, and said, I had got the shoes, another man brought a pair of shoes; I am innocent.
I heard the cry and ran across.
Why did you not stop me when you saw me come out?
Palmer called on me with the mare, and said he wanted to sell her, he said it was his own colt. I knew him, and went with him. About a fortnight after, I found it had been stolen.
I picked the bag up two or three doors from my master's house, and got a young woman to pledge them. GUILTY. Aged 16.
Did you not say at the office, that you found the door partly broken
It is the key of my lodgings. I was shut out of my lodgings. The flap appeared to be loose and I opened it, and went to sleep there for the night.
I was running to keep myself warm. I saw a man running who was dressed like me. The watchman did not know me at first.
I am a watch-maker by trade and was in business for myself. I have dealt wtth Mr. Hall. I bought the things in question.
I am innocent of the charge, which I will prove. I shall prove that I was not there, I was at a public-house in Berwick-street, Soho, on the night until eleven o'clock. I was apprehended for an assault, and the magistrate admitted me to bail; I attended at Hicks's-hall, and to my surprise, I found an indictment against me for a capital charge; I have now surrendered to take my trial.
I had a bill to make up, and pledged the veils, and intended to take them out the next day.
The gentleman took hold of a sailor, and he got away; the gentleman then took hold of my arm and gave me into custody.
Did I attempt to go out
I did not attempt to leave the shop with any property, nor was any found on me.
The prints were above two yards from the door, and not appearing to belong to any person, I took them.
I went into the shop to look for work; I took the cushions out to look how the carriage was finished.
They searched me, and could not find any thing about me. I am innocent.
I was coming from Edmonton, and I met a man, who gave me 3s. to drive the pigs.
Are you sure I am the man
The articles were not pledged by me, but by my wife, and without my knowledge, I found it out after they were pledged, and I sent her to the prosecutor to acknowledge what she had done, and to give notice that I should replace them on the Monday, and leave the lodgings; I went out, and on my return, I found my room had been entered by Daws, I told him, I would settle with his mother, he would send for the officer. I had no intention of going without redeeming them.
I found the duplicate.
When did you make a memorandum of the notes
Was you sent by Mr. Dixon to buy the trunk
The gentleman looked at a 27s. trunk, and I thought that was what he bought, I put it down in a hurry; I forgot to set down the little trunk, but thought of it after, and meant to put it down.
I found them in the street,
Did you receive it out of my hand
A woman gave me the watch to pledge.
I took the bag one wet day, to throw over me. I bought the starch of Mr. Fenton.
I borrowed it of the prosecutor.
I was going to purchase some tea, I took it as a sample.
Did you not lay hold of another man before me
I bought the screws and locks. Rosset tied them up for me, and I paid him.
I met a man who told me to carry it to Whitechapel, and said it was salt.
I met a young man in Cow-cross. who saw a man drop the beef; I picked it up, and took it into the public-house to have some beer.
I was a great distance from them.
I received the money, and got drunk, and lost myself in going home; I slept at a public-house, and left the 6l. with the landlord, and told him it was not mine; the next morning as I was going to take it to the prosecutrix, I was taken.
Did I not ask you to go to the Borough, and would shew you the man
Did I not say I had a note in my pocket
A man of the name of Brown employed me to take them to town from Reading, he gave me a note with them, which was lost while I was being searched.
I was taken into custody about a mile from the place; they took me before a magistrate and I was discharged.
I wanted to return them to her, and beg her forgiveness.
Did you not lose your key of the chambers before the 15th
I had been out of work sometime.
I met the men, who asked me to take care of the things.
I picked it up.
A man met me, and asked me to take them on till he overtook me, and he would give me 3s. I never saw him afterwards.
I have a witness to call.
Some person behind pushed me against him; he collared me, and said I had robbed him. He called for assistance, and I was secured.
I found her in Ball's-pond-road, with the bridle on - I rode her about, and did not go to sell her.
I was pursuing the man, and they took me for him - They knocked my hat off.
There were three or four men shoving me against him.
I was in Fleet-street-two men ran across, and threw the bundle down - I picked it up.
I beg for mercy.
I did not take it-it was found on the ground.
I got intimate with Boulton, and she gave them to me. I hung the seals to my watch, and wore the handkerchief-if I had stolen them, it is not likely I should have worn them in the house.
I picked it up.
I am innocent. I know nothing of it.
Did you not say you could not swear to me
Did not the officer tell you to say I had a blue coat and white apron on
Dobson said the man said he could not swear to me. When I was examined, the prosecutor said, if his watch was made good to him, he would not prosecute me. My brother gave him a watch, and he promised me not to appear against me; the watch was deposited in Bradstone's hands.
Will you swear, that I left it, or did you do it yourself
When I came out, Gavernor came out with me. I picked the shawl off the ground; the woman was not within 20 yards of it at the time. I gave it to Gavernor, we then went to the coffee-shop, and she pledged the shawl for the coffee.
I bought them.
I was passing, and heard the cry of Stop thief! the young lady charged me with the robbery. I have been in his Majesty's service fourteen years, and was severely wounded. I have a wife and small family in great distress, and have always endeavoured to support myself honestly. I was discharged from his Majesty's service in November.
I did not know that they were bad.
I was in great distress.
I paid 1s. 6d. and gave him the ticket.
I never mentioned any person's name.
I did not lock the door. I left him, and never went back.
I went out about half-past six o'clock, and found them tied up in a bundle in one of the seats in St. James's Park. I told Fielder how many there were. I stopped willingly till the prosecutor came.
It was not his money; he did not give me the note.
I bought them in the street.
They have sworn falsely.
My wife manages the business; she says she bought them of a hawker. If the officer had come a little later they would have been hung in the window.
Carey swore that another man took the watch.
I picked them up.
Did you think that I meant to rob you, or that I took you for another woman
When the other man laid hold of me, did you see me with the knife, stabbing it at her
I had supped with some friends, and not being well, my liquor had effect upon me. When I got home, I had some words with my landlady; I went out again, and a woman laid hold of me, wanting me to go with her - I gave her a 3s. piece, and she ran away. I followed her, but lost her, and took this woman for her. I took hold of her, saying, \shew me my property.\" I put the knife into my pocket, and afterwards gave it to them. I have been eleven years in his Majesty's service with respectability."
The black man called upon me for some money that I owed him; while I was talking to him, I heard some person coming down stairs, which alarmed me, and I, imprudently, instead of explaining it, denied that he was there. I placed the property where it was found for safety. GUILTY . Aged 36.
I found it.
I found them.
I was in distress.
A man said I might have them.
I took them out of pledge.
I saved them from some I had bought.
I was in distress.
I found it.
I know nothing of the first marriage.
A man came up to me in Oxford-street, and offered me a shilling to take a parcel to Mrs. Smith, No. 32, Hart-street, I thought that was the street, and seeing No. 32, I knocked at the door, and went into the parlour - I kept knocking, and they came up.
I was tried last Sessions on a similar charge, at the suit of the same prosecutors, and acquitted; the same evening I was apprehended again at the suit of Snow and Paul. Mr. Rose made a charge of embezzlement against me, I was remanded till the next day, and then committed here for stealing 22l. 8s. It is extraordinary that Mr. Frowd does not call his clerks to prove the hand-writing.
I was in great distress.
I was in distress.
I did not take it.
I know nothing about it.
I beg for mercy.
I met Sibley, and he asked me to walk down to Knightsbridge barracks with him. We got there at six o'clock, and staid drinking till eleven, and coming home we met the watchman; we were singing, he took us to the watch-house. The next morning the prosecutor said he believed I was one of the men. I know nothing of the robbery.
The money was paid at the office. I entered it in the book-it was not paid till four o'clock. Mr. Frowd sent the boy out, and when he returned it was too late to send it to the banker's.
I was in distress and intoxicated.
What did I say when you took me
I have two witnesses to prove that I bought them.
I heard the alarm, and ran after the man that collared me.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
It was left in my care by a man.
Curry had been with me. It is not likely I should remain in the house if I had got the property.
I met a man who took me to the house, and told me to go up to the second-floor and whisper Harry, and tell him to come down - I did so, and as I returned a man met me, and said, \for God's sake run up and hide yourself!\" which I did, for fear of the thieves."
A man shoved me against him, and he secured me.
It is my first offence, and I beg for mercy. I have been misled by wicked boys, who said they would have some fun. I did not know what they meant to do.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
Were there not three or four more sitting by me, in custody
I found the duplicates in the Park that evening. I was confined with other persons.
When your son came home with the bag, how long was it before the officers brought me to your house
Did not your son say he had no knowledge of me
The boy said I did not rob him.
I met a man in Bloomsbury-square, who asked me to sell it for him. Davies gave me 1l., and told me to call for the other to-morrow. Davies sent for me, and the officer secured me. The man was to give me 5s. for selling it.
I came from Exeter. I told Israel I could not pay for the clothes at present, he said he would trust me; I went to Bath; it has never been in my power to pay him; there were no other clothes with them.
The two women who came, said there was no blood; it is very strange that there was no blood on the body or the floor, as she had cut her eye.
I did not intend to take his life; I only meant to duck him, and haul him in again.
Where did you first see me, after you saw me go by with the bed
Were any other personer round when you took me
I know nothing of it.
I heard the alarm, they stopped me. Shand came up and said I was not the man, and let me go, and then gave me in charge again.
They have spoken falsely.
You did not stop me
As I was coming along Foley-place, I saw a lad with the parcel under his arm; the gentlemen called out stop thief - I ran after him, and they stopped me.
I had received my wages, and went with my fellow-workmen to a public-house near the place; I got intoxicated, and went in by mistake.
Did not you offer to make it up with me for 30s.
They have all sworn falsely.
Is it likely I should steal in the presence of strangers!-what benefit could I reap, and ran the risk of losing my situation?
I never saw Caine before this day - I am innocent.
She asked me the way to St. James's-street, and gave me in charge.
Did you not give me a written direction
I could not find out the cottage; I met an old shipmate and got intoxicated, and meant to return to the tavern the next morning. I asked Affleck to keep them safe for me, and gave them to him as I received them; he must have taken the money himself, he should have been indicted instead of me.
I was taking a walk.
I saw the scuffle, and went to look at them; one of the men knocked my hat off; I heard the cry and tried to make my escape, to avoid disgrace.
I was robbed of it in the fields.
Did you not let me out
I am innocent, and know nothing of the picture.
I heard the quarrel, went up, and they took me.
A man gave me a cup of coffee to carry them.
A man gave it to me to carry.
I had been into the city, and was returning home, in haste, when they took me.
Why did not you apprehend me at the time
I was in Drury-lane; the boy came to me, and asked me if I knew the spectacle-maker's-shop in Russell-street - I said I did - He took me back, and the woman said it was me.
I was at the public-house-Gavener was there also, she was present when the shawl was taken, and gave it herself to the coffee-man.
Was I running when you took me.
I know nothing about it.
I have witnesses to prove I was in bed at the time.
I bought them.
A sailor, who slept in the same room with me, gave it to me.
I hired it to go to Enfield; I went to get it at the stable, and went back for the money; I was taken ill and confined three weeks; I told the stable-keeper I should receive some money soon and would pay him. I never said I lived opposite the Two Brewers, but gave the name of Drisdale, No. 7, White-street.
It is impossible to go through the gate with property. The men have sworn falsely-it is my steel.
I picked it up.
I saw Gregory and spoke to her; they said I was one of the men.
I found it.
I was in distress.
I was in distress.
I found it.
I am a poor boy, and was out of employ .
The stockings were taken off my legs when I had been in custody two days; I had every means of disposing of them if they had been her property.
I had a loaf in my hand, and the watchman stopped me.
I found it.
I went out to see for a man who came with me.
I heard the alarm, and ran after the man.
I left because I could not pay my rent.
I picked it up.
I did not intend to steal it.
I had the note-my witness will prove how I got it.
The sweep asked me to go to Brentford with him. He threw a stone at me which made me run.
A man asked me to sell them for him.
Did you not say if I told the truth my master would forgive me
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I got a constant place in the country, and used to come home every Saturday night.
I leave my case to my counsel.
I beg for mercy.
The young man threw it at me.
It is usual for the porter to put out the gass, which I went to do.
I took it to take care of.
I am innocent. I was with a woman, the watchman collared me, and I struck the prosecutor.
I had been with two young women from half-past eleven o'clock I heard the cry of murder, and went in immediately after the gentleman. I believe the watchman and patrol followed me.
I was going by, and was stopped. I knew nothing of it.
I beg for mercy.
A gentleman gave it to me, to carry for him.
I beg for mercy.
I beg for mercy.
I beg for mercy.
I got drunk at the fair, went into a man's boat, and went to sleep in his ship; about two o'clock he brought the things down, and told me to take them into the boat - I was to meet him next morning.
I met a man coming to town, riding the mare, and bought her of him, at Doncaster, for 10l.
Prisoner's Defence (through an interpreter). I went to take the lodgings for a friend. A man brought me the things to pledge.
Bad company and evil propensities have induced me to commit this offence, which is great; I have endeavoured to make all the reparation in my power, and beg for mercy.
A man asked me to assist in carrying the things; when the cry was he told me to run.
I asked Mr. Devey to intercede on account of the disgrace; I was walking down Shoelane.
I sent the boy, to take a note for me as I was drunk; five days after, he accused me of stealing the flute.
I was behind Mr. Shaw, the people were clapping their hands, the prosecutor's pocketbook fell out of his pocket, he picked it up, and it fell out again, he then said I must be the person.
I found them by the river.
My father gave me 5l., my brothers 3l., and I had saved 3l. myself. I am innocent.
The things nearly fell out of the package, I removed them for safety.
I deny it; the handkerchief which I had was mine.
I picked it up, and asked who it belonged to.
I was passing the prosecutor's house, a man came out and dropped the plate against the door; I went down to pick it up, and knocked at the door-the servant accused me of the robbery.
I leave it to my counsel.
I know nothing of it.
Did you not tell the magistrate that you did not write the name on the note
I found the note which was found on me, and did not offer it to any person; but kept it by me to get it taken to the Bank.
The note belonged to a young woman, who gave it to me to take care off; I did not know whether I gave him my note or hers. He said it was bad - They were both folded up together in my pocket; I gave him the other saying, \They might be bad for what I knew.\" He said he did not think that was good. I was so terrified I did not know what address I had given, but soon after I recollected. He said I must surrender myself. I was frightened, and ran away."
Did I not return silver for one of them
I received the note from one Johnston, of Plymouth, who I empowered to receive my prize-money. I cannot find him out. I never gave the name of Brown. GUILTY . - DEATH . Aged 23.
I solemnly declare I did not know it was forged. I was going to Hoxton to seek for lodgings, a decent man gave it to me, with a bottle, and asked me to fetch half a pint of gin; I asked him his name, he said he lived in Turner-square. I told them my name was Ward, and I lived in West-place, John's-row. I have four small children.
Did I not stop in your shop twenty minutes and outside, when you sent for the watchman
I found it on Tower-hill on the 25th of July, as I returned from work. Not being a scholar, I did not know the amount, but thought it was a note, and took it to Curtis, who said it was forged, and that I had been there before with forged note. I was confused at the charge, but did not attempt to run away.
I took it up with my handkerchief, and did not know it.
I bought them beyond Bowbridge for 50s.
A man told me to wrap it up in my apron.
I saw a man throw it down, I picked it up.
I bought them.
I bought the seals of a man in Holborn.
I do not know how they came there GUILTY. Aged 20
I am innocent.
I never had the tea in my possession.
I kept a carver and gilder's shop in the Kent-road. About the 27th of July a man drove up in a chaise, bought two boxes, and paid me the note. On the 7th of August, as I came home, I bought the linen at Walmsley's, and paid him the note, after having looked at the Directory, and saw there was such a bank. They did not ask me for my name, nor did I give any. I moved to Joiner's-place - They took me there. I did not know the note was bad.
I received the note from my mother. I gave the man the name of Gracey, and told him I believed it was on the back of the note. I asked him to let the lad go with me. When I got to Finsbury-square, I recollected I had to call on a person. I took the boots from the lad, and told him that if I came that way in the morning I would call and leave the shoes. I had to go another way, and did not leave them. It is very unlikely that I should have gone into a neighbourhood where I had been known for fourteen years, if I knew the note to be forged. I entered into conversation with the prosecutor at his house, about the neighbours who knew me.
When you took the note to Cornish he returned it to you, you came and said you could not give change. When I said I could not have the gin, you returned to Cornish, and then sent your daughter out for change
What was your reason for doing that
Did you not say at the office that it was Whit Monday
I met a man named Johnson at a public-house in Carnaby-market, he pressed me to go into the City with him. I went into two wine-vaults with him, when he tendered the note; he went into another in Aldersgate-street, and came out laughing and said it was droll that he could not get change. He sent me to get change at the prosecutrix's; he said he did not like to go in as he owed her a score, gave me the bottle and told me to get a quartern and half of gin, and put my own address on it, I refused - He told me to put his, which I did. The prosecutrix took the note to the gentleman, I observed him hold it up to look at it; she brought it to me and said she could not change it. I said I could not have the gin, she returned to the gentleman, and sent her daughter for change-who returned without it; her mother sent her again, she brought it. When I came out I observed Johnson on the opposite side, he beckoned to me, I went to the corner and offered him the buttle and change - He told me to wait there till he returned; the man came and took me. I did not know it was forged.
Did I not drop it
I work very hard for my living. A man bought several articles of earthenware of me in Hatton-Garden. I could not give him change. He sent a boy with me to the grocer's shop to get change. I went out to look for the boy, he was gone; I caught sight of him, followed, and lost him. I have learnt since I have been in prison, and that his name is Edward Powell . I took the other note of a man instead of a bad one. He had paid me before.
I never had it.
I bought them that morning.
A person said he lodged at the Marquis of Granby, and asked me to go and fetch a box. I saw a woman on the stairs, and told her what I came for, she said I should find it in the room. I was stopped in the passage.
I know nothing of it.
Did you not tell the officer that you knew there was an officer following you
I took the note of a Jew that I gave to Crosby; the other I took of a man for a pair of shoes.
There was nobody with me
I am inocent.
I lost it, and was afraid to return.
A man gave them to me to clean.
I was intoxicated.
I did not drop it.
I and the prosecutor were in partnership together. I received the money from Levy; the money was my own. Articles of partnership were drawn up between us.
I heard the alarm, ran after the boy, and they took me.
I never saw the plate. I thought it my duty to examine the box. I took out the funnel, the witness came up, and I gave it to him.
I have witness to prove that I bought the boots. I had business at Edmonton.
I was returning from the country, where I had been looking for work, and met two men, who offered me 2s. 6d. to carry the bundles (which were as large again as those produced), to town; they told me to put one in the shrubbery and return, which I did; as I returned I saw two men outside the prosecutor's gate. I went away, and afterwards met the men again at the door - I thought it was not right, and went away; shortly after they overtook me, and we walked together. I was afterwards taken.
I never touched it. I was looking in at the window.
I got a light to look in the coach for the turnpike ticket, and found the notes among the straw; I thought it was my duty to keep them; when he went to pay me he missed his money. I said if he would describe his notes I would give them up.
I am a porter , and was employed to carry it to Saffron-hill.
I have lived as a porter in some respectable houses, since which I have experienced great distress, and got so ragged I was ashamed to be seen. On this night I determined to drown myself, but afterwards thought it was very wrong, and determined to get into a watch-house that I might not be seen in such a deplorable situation in the streets. I got put into two watchhouses before this, but upon my telling them what I did it for they descharged me I attacked the prosecutor, but did not mean to do him any harm. I would not tell them at the watch-house why I did it, fearing they would turn me out.
I took them in change.
I took three of them of a gentleman for some hare-skins; while I was examining them the officer took me.
I bought them.
I understand the prosecutor lays things there to tempt people to take them.
It is mine. I bought it at the Maidenhead.
I intended to redeem them.
Did you not tell the magistrate that you would have shot me if you had had a pistol
Could not the fastening be undone with an instrument as well as with a man's hand
I was in a public-house in Lei cester-fields. Two men asked me why I was so low in spirits? I told them that I was poor and had no friends. They said they were servants to a gentleman at Kensington. One of them said he would give me some clothes-and proposed that I should go with them, and have them in the morning - I went. One of them asked me to let down the window and let him in. I went over with them, they began opening the window. I began to think I had done wrong, and atttempted to escape. The shutter would not open, and they left it. I picked up the crow, as I was determined to fight to get away. I did not go there to commit any offence.
Another man who worked in the stables took it.
I beg for mercy.
My daughter and I had words-the people came round the door. Black came close to the yard and said pull the old fellow's tongue out; I came down and asked what he wanted-my cutlass hung behind the door; I took it and said if any man came on my premises I would cut him down. Black tore out of the womens hands and jumped over into my yard and knocked me down - I did not wound him, and do not know how he got it.
Was you ever tried here
I know nothing of the parchment, the coat was lent to me. I now produced the remnants of it (holding them up)
I put it under my coat, and gave it to the gentleman when he asked for it.
I was distressed.
I am innocent.
The things are mine.
A man gave it to me to sell for him.
I did not take them.
A woman dropped them, and I picked them up at the prosecutor's door.
The prisoner took me and another girl to a public-house to drink, and said he must go home with me, which he did - He behaved very rude to me. I called the watchman and he came. No other person was in the room.
I was in distress.
I found the sack in a ditch.
I was sent to pledge it.
I have two journeymen to prove the boy gave it to me to make him a jacket.
I found it.
I did not know they were his.
I told the prosecutor I had pledged them, and would make them good on Saturday.
I was led away by bad company.
. I overtook two men, who asked me to drive it to Islington.
I am innocent.
I never touched it.
I was hired to fetch them.
I was out of employ.
I found it.
I was employed to carry it.
Did you not owe me my wages
I saw a man pass me. The prosecutor took me. GUILTY . Aged 20.
Did I not stop and pay my reckoning
The prosecutor was very much intoxicated. He said two women robbed him, and was desired not to disturb the company. I went out.
I took them up to look at.
I was returning from Chelsea, stopped to tie my shoe up, and was taken.
I found the saw, but know nothing of the plane.
I heard the alarm, and was taken.
I know nothing of them.
The other man gave it to me.
I am innocent.
Did you allow me any wages
They used to supply me with wearing apparel. I borrowed the boots of him, intending to return them. The friendship subsisting between us induced me to make so free.
A boy was between me and the gentleman.
It was given to me to take care of.
It is a spiteful prosecution. I am innocent.
I found myself alone in the night and missed my waistcoat, which had 10s. in the pocket.
When I went home my mother informed me a man had left the things there, and I was to meet him at a public-house; as I was going, I was taken.
I know nothing of it.
The women gave them to me to carry.
I meant to buy it of him again.
I was taken, but know nothing of it.
I was in distress.
I told him to wait - I came to the place in about half an hour, but he was gone. I fell into bad company, and spent the money.
I bought the reel as old iron-my master lent me the other things to use in my business. I used to work for him in my cellar.
I picked it up in the pit.
I was in great distress.
A sailor sent me to sell them.
I never saw the bag.
I found it.
I know nothing about it, my father lodged in the same house.
I hope I shall be sent abroad for life.
I was in great distress; and had nothing to eat for two days. GUILTY . Aged 20.
I am sorry for it.
Several boys were behind him. I saw one of them take it, and throw it down.
I understood I was to fetch them. I afterwards got drunk and sold them.
The boy gave me the watch with the 2s., and being in distress, I did not tell him of his mistake.
Did you count the bread
I only took thirty.
Did you not see two men come into the Dock
I got drunk in the ship, went to sleep, awoke, and saw the people walking about the Dock.
I bought the duplicate of a man in Spring Gardens for 1s. I could not find him again.
I was going to meet a young woman; I mistook the prosecutrix for her, and took her shawl in a joke.
I had agreed to call for it at the public-house. I was taken, and told them two men gave it to me. The officer took the wrong two men.
Poverty induced me to do it.
I beg for mercy.
The prosecutor was in liquor, and said I took his watch. I know nothing about it.
My mistress told me to take it to Soho-square. I left it in Short's-gardens while I got my breakfast.
I was in great distress.
I can prove where I was at the time.
I was intoxicated, ran my barrow against his basket, and knocked it over; two loaves fell out. I put them in, and he called me a thief.
I picked it up in the mob, it was all smashed to pieces.
I beg for mercy.
I exchanged the glasses.
I intended to redeem them again, not thinking they would be missed so soon.
I took a basket in with some broken victuals, and fell asleep; a woman sat by me with a basket. She must have taken my basket away, for this was not mine.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I was in Tothill-street, saw two boys running, and followed them. A woman came and said I stole the tea-board.
Was you not intoxicated and with another woman when you took hold of me
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I heard the cry, some boys were running, and a gentleman took me.
I could not come down the ladder without concealing the lead in my coat; if it had fallen I should have been tried for my life, as many men were underneath.
Being out of place, I was recommended to a situation at the house of one Dudfield, in Shire-lane, Temple-bar, not being aware that it was a common brothel I went; the prosecutor lived there with a common prostitute, called Dandy Sall , until she was obliged to be taken to the hospital. He sent me for these things, and on my arriving at his new lodgings, in Mead's-row, Lambeth, I found I had lost the letter which contained the money. I wrote to him, telling him of my misfortune; but was foolish enough to get out of the way, and make money of the things. He would not have prosecuted me if it was not for Dudfield, as I had given information against him for selling spirits without a licence.
I was in liquor, and do not know how I came by them.
I picked it up.
I picked them up.
I know nothing of it.
Jefferson has false-sworn himself.
I had been drinking with my shopmates, she came to the public-house, and drank with us, we then went and bought different articles. She went home, and I stopped with a friend. I went home about a quarter before one o'clock, she was abed in her clothes, and began to blow me up for sing out. I said,
\If you blow me up I will go and walk the streets all night.\" My little boy said,"
\Don't go, father\" - I hit him a slap. She said,"
\D - n you, don't murder him!\" She jumped out of bed, and fell against the bedstead. I did not think she was hurt until the woman came up; I then went and got her some liquor. They said I must go to the watch-house; she held out her hand, and said,"
I know nothing of it.
A man knocked me down, and swore I took the hat.
I went there to buy pork, pulled two notes out and gave his wife one; she gave it to Best to look at, and said she believed it to be good - I had another. He said he should detain that and me. I ran out, as I could not bear the thoughts of a watch-house, and a man caught me. They wanted to search me; I said the watchman might, but he did not offer. I had no coat on when I was taken to the watch-house, I said I would tell my name when Best came, which I did. I gave my right name and address, I did not know the note was forged, and had no silver about me.
I was intoxicated. I thought the person who lost the note would have come forward, which made me give a false address.
Did Hawkins's son say I was the woman
I leave it to my Counsel.
After you made an alarm, did no one come to your assistance - A. Mary Langley ; she did not ask me if I could identify any of them. I went to where they said he lodged, and being told there was a very low set there, I said I did not think I could swear to any of them, as I was afraid to speak there. Nobody was produced to me there as the person.
Did you not see me in Bishopsgate-street at near five o'clock that night
Was I not talking to some people at the corner of Primrose-alley, and you spoke to me
Was she not in the Justice-room when you brought me in
When I went home I was told I was charged with robbing a woman, and that Langley had given information of it; Next morning I went and asked her why she charged me with it? she used bad language, and said she knew nothing of me. I told her husband I would go to any office, and gave myself up to him. When I got to the Mansion-house I had my liberty in and out until the prosecutrix came. I am innocent. I saw Langley in the evening - she interfered with company I was with. She said I was a thief, and she would seek some way to take my life. It is through family affairs.
If the last witness had been as cautious as the other, he would know me. He has certainly made a mistake.
The gentleman said he had lost his handkerchief, and I was the person who had taken it. I said I was not. I was taken to the Rainbow public-house, and in about a quarter of an hour, a woman pushed the boy in, who said he could tell about it.
As I was crossing from the Compter the officer took me, and charged me with it. I saw the handkerchief on the pavement. I am innocent.
Did you see me drop it
Did you see me with it
I was going home, and saw the people running in Fenchurch-street by Cullum-street. A young man stopped me and said I was the man. I was never in the office in my life. They said they thought I was the person, but the Lord Mayor said,
\Be positive,\" and they said I was the man."
A person on the premises engaged me to go with him; he said he had been assisting a plumber and wanted to fetch some cuttings. I lent him my apron, and he desired me to come into the building. I said,
\Why should I come in? I think you are after no good - it is an untimely hour.\" The gentlemen stopped me, and they brought Pig down, who had been stealing lead as I suspected."
I never touched her. She was intoxicated, and could not stand.
I was walking along, kicked the thimble, picked it up, and put it into my pocket, it fell out of my pocket as it had a hole in it. I was not in the house.
Did I not speak to a man
I was out of work, and was obliged to walk about, having no place to sleep at. About four o'clock I met a man at Tottenham-cross, he asked if I was out of work, and said if I would lead the horse to the White Hart, at Shoreditch, he would give me 1 s.; he gave me a penny to pay the turnpike, and told me to say, if any one asked about the horse, that it belonged to Mr. Russell, of Edmonton.
I beg forgiveness.
The man laid hold of me, and tore my coat. I am innocent.
I took it by mistake, left it at Fitzgerald's, and bought a paper cap instead.
I have six children, and was in great distress.
I was inquiring for lodgings, saw a mob, and ran with the others, but was stopped by two men, who said I dropped the property.
He searched me before the watch was thrown down, and found nothing on me - he took 6 s. 6 d. from me.
I went down the court, and found it was no thoroughfare. I was picking something up, and Clitherow said I stole it.
I was in liquor.
I picked them up.
I was distressed.
I was out of employ; the pigs ran on the pavement. I took no notice of them.
Did you see me in the room
My sister-in-law, who lives at Knightsbridge, was robbed of a bonnet. I was hunting for it; a woman, whom I do not know, sent me up there, and said it was there. I knocked at the door twice. I took the bonnet in my hand to look at it. It is my wife's bonnet.
Another man asked me to sell it.
I was in distress.
A stranger gave them to me.
I was distressed. The witness has sworn falsely.
I saw a man in Smithfield with it, and bought it of him for 18 s.
I was distressed.
I ran with the mob, and was stopped, but am innocent.
Did not the landlord shew you up to bed as well as me
I was out of work.
As I was passing the house a man said he would give me 18 d. to watch it - I sat in the pantry, being sleepy, and somebody came and stole my coat.
My cart was being repaired at Turnham-green, it stood out on the Common. On Monday I heard a cart was detained with my name on it, and went and claimed it.
I took it by mistake. The boy said
\Here is your butter\" - he did not say what quantity."
He gave them to me to pledge.
I pledged it for a person who lodged with me.
The other took it - he wanted me to take it for him, but I would not.
I was in liquor. A man offered me half a pint of gin to move it away.
I meant to redeem them.
A man gave me the rope to carry - he said he would meet me, and pay me for carrying it.
I have been in the habit of pledging the coat for him - I gave him the money.
I was very tipsy.
I saw something go from the prosecutrix's arms, and ran after the man who took it - they took me.
I conceive there is nothing against me. I am not the person, and there is nothing to support the boy's evidence. Is it to be supposed that a man with a wooden leg could commit a highway robbery? he was asked at the office by what he knew me? - he was mute. A person whispered in his ear,
I went to see if they wanted any wood; the shawl laid on the window-ledge, and I carried it into the passage. He took me, and it fell from my hand.
I was in the utmost distress, and have had no work since July last. I put myself entirely on the mercy of the Court.
Two of the handkerchiefs are mine; the other three were thrown away by two lads.
There was a crowd at the shop; I went to see what was the matter, and they said I stole the handkerchiefs.
I was greatly distressed.
I did not steal them - the other lad had the money.
I saw a man put it behind the door, I took it up, and they charged me with the theft.
I do not know that I burnt him; I attempted to frighten him away because he would not work - I do not think I touched him with the iron. He hit me on the arm with his hammer, and I struck him.
I heard the cry, and saw a little boy about my size going along; he dropped the handkerchiefs. I told him he had dropped them; he said, \Never mind, keep them,\" and I put them into my hat."
I was looking for a job, and met a man in the Kent-road, who said if I would meet him at the Bull, in Kent-street, between five and six o'clock in the morning, he would give me a job - I met him. He said he was going to Romford, and told me to drive them through Whitechapel, and if any one asked me where I was going to, I was to say to Romford-market. I met this man, sold them to him for 20 l., and said they belonged to my father. I saw the man again, and he sent me for the money.
It was a slippery night; I went home with him, and he said I robbed him.
I picked them off the ground, to wipe the wet off the window-sashes.
I never saw it.
A sailor asked me to carry them to Tower Hill, and said if I was asked what I had got, I was to say nothing.
I picked it up between the gentleman's legs.
I was much in liquor, and recollect nothing of it.
I went to the distiller's, but they were shut up, and I meant to deliver it in the morning.
I went in for liquorice. I was reading the label of the bottle, and he said I stole it.
I took it in payment. I frequently endorse notes with Bryant for brevity, as it is my mother's maiden name.
Brown knew I was at the Brown Bear . I rather think he told Thompson that I was in the habit of passing bad notes, as he once told me so himself. I never had one in my possession.
I did not know that I had them.
The things were thrown into the room.
It hung out of the gentleman's pocket.
I was walking with two lads before me, one of them threw the handkerchief down, and I picked it up.
Did you find the bundle on me
There are things in the bundle which were not there when I was at the Compter. I saw the door open, and went in, knowing the place; I stopped there sometime. The door was shut while I was in there. I went to the hall-door, intending to go out that way - two women, and other people, went in and out while I stopped.
He took me half a mile from the house.
I received it in change.
I gave the full value for them.
A man brought me the direction, and said another parcel was to be received - I gave it to Smart, The same man came and told me to follow him, and I left the cart.
He sold me the scales, and I held the candle for him to get them down. I was to barter them for potatoes, but could not agree about them, and took them to be sold by auction.
I was in the habit of calling at the house. I acted according to his instructions, and issued process.
Peck was tried for this offence, and he was sworn to be the man.
I beg for mercy.
I was very much in liquor.
I know nothing of the things.
I took the 3 s. to pay a debt of 12 s., as I had only 9 s. in my pocket, and could not get to my box.
I was at work at the canal - I was paid on Saturday night between eleven and twelve o'clock, and staid half an hour at the Chequers, public-house. I was very tired, and went into this yard, saw the door open, walked in and laid down, being very tired. I said I came there to rest.
I said I found the seals, not the watch.
A person asked me to carry the bag, and when the man came he ran away.
It fell down as I passed the cart.
I agreed to buy the watches on credit. When I left the room I received a letter from a friend, who I expected some money from, and was obliged to set off for Bristol. I did not think proper to write to the prosecutor till I could pay him.
I went to the privy, and a man gave me the lead at the door.
I am sorry for it.
I meant to redeem them.
I was running home and they stopped me. I know nothing of it.
I never asked him any such a question.
The man asked me to hold it for him while he ran over to his cart.
Not a word that he has spoken is true.
I was in great distress.
A man asked me to carry it to Leicester-square.
I found them at the corner of Newcastle-street, Strand.
I never said a word of the kind. I understood I was charged with stealing it, and went to the office, where I saw Welch's brother, and told him to send for an officer.
I know nothing of them.
What the officers have stated is wrong. I said my name was Lane, and I was going to the Three Cups, and that a man gave it to me at the top of Hatton-garden.
My brother gave it to me. I wrote to him not to honour the bill, because Parkin only advanced me 15 l. on it. He keeps a noted house for thieves. My brother Samuel is ill, and not able to attend.
I was out of a situation.
It is my own.
I am sorry for it.
I met a man, who called me by name, and asked me to carry it to Jews'-row. I was to meet him at the Prince of Wales, public-house, when I had sold it.
I never robbed my master.
I had eat nothing for a day and a half.
I leave it to my Counsel.
Will you swear I robbed you
I was going home; a parcel of boys came and knocked me down into the mud, and kicked me; I got up and crawled to a gate. The gentleman came and said he thought I was the lad who robbed him, and at Lambeth-street he did not think it was me.
I told you to tell my father I was in custody for a watch
I was coming home, three fellows laid hold of me, shoved my head into the gentleman's waist, and ran away.
I was never in Wessunt's place, and never saw the property.
I bought the things.
I was running, and the gentleman took hold of me - I know nothing more.
The other boy took them and gave them to me.
Did you collar any one before me
I was going down Wardour-street, saw several people at the corner, and heard a gentleman say he had lost his seals. He collared a man, who got away, and he seized me.
I do not know what I do when I am drunk.
I did not say my name was Oakley.
I am quite innocent.
I throw myself on your mercy.
Was not you the first person that shewed me shirts
I went to buy two shirts, for a young man at Brighton. I measured one by my arm, and she charged me with putting it into my pocket.
Two men told me to take the cheese from the door and carry it to Fleet-market.
I was at home at the time, and the next day I was out, the officer took me.
On the 7th of November I met a friend in Monmouth-street, and went with him into St, Giles's. We stopped at different places; I was rather intoxicated, and waited there till half-past five o'clock, then went out and left my brother in New-street. I was in St. Martin's-court, the watchman came up, called us pickpockets, and took me to the watch-house.
A man gave me the bundle to carry, at the fire, to Seven-dials; he said he would follow me. I believe it was the prosecutor's nephew.
On the night I heard the cry, three men knocked me down in the kennel. A man said that Blundell said it was me.
I can prove where I was that night.
I found the property.
I know nothing of it.
I went out when I awoke. I had received 10 s. 6 d. the night before, for work. I never stole it.
The handkerchiefs are my own - I know nothing of this charge.
I hope you will have mercy on me.
I found them in Ducking-pond-lane.
I can prove I was at home at the time.
I got them from a man to pledge.
I was drunk, and got into the garden by mistake.
I know nothing about it.
I gave myself up to the regiment. I was called to account after this, but the man freely forgave me.
I am friendless and in distress. I should be thankful to be sent where they will do me good.
I never saw it till about a quarter before eight o'clock.
I have witnesses to call.
The property belongs to me.
I had them from a gentleman.
I picked it up on a lot of hay - the gentleman wanted it - I refused, and they took me.
I found it in a ditch as I returned from Kew.
I met a man as I came from Deptford, who asked me to sell them.
I found it in the road.
I was going along, and heard the cry; I fell over a post, and was stopped.
I throw myself on your mercy.
I saw a skirmish, and the gentleman collared me instead of the man.
I picked it up.
I was at Battersea about one o'clock in the morning, saw a boat set these boards adrift, and I picked them up.
I found it.
I saw it laying down - I took it up, and put it down again.
I wish to know if they can swear to them. I have them on now.
I bought the shirt at Shields.
In the morning a man asked me to fetch a load, he took me into Grub-street, and laid it on my shoulder.
The facts are so clear, that I shall not justify myself. I was in distress, and beg for mercy.
I am innocent.
A boy gave it to me.
I have a bad arm, and could not lift it.
Did I ever ill-use you or waste your money
Did I not come to you to know where she was
I did not know the consequence of it - I am sorry for it.
They are my own.
I beg for mercy.
Some chap put the watch in my hand. I gave it to the prosecutor.
A man gave it to me to carry to St. Andrew's-street for 2 s.
I found them in Drury-lane.
I never saw it.
I heard the prosecutor wanted me, was going to him, and he met me - I had none of his money.
A man borrowed a shilling of me, and gave me the shirt till he paid me.
I was sent to buy one.
Clifton did not pay me for it.
I never had the sword in my hand - they must have cut themselves. They were laying a wager that they were worth more money than I was, and struck me with a candlestick and fender.
I had the misfortune to marry a bad woman, whose husband was living when I married her - she left me to live with him. I married this woman. went into the country for eight or ten days, and on returning she had made off with my property. I demanded her; they went and found out the woman - she told them she was married, and had another husband. On the 8th of December she came to me, and wanted me to let her lay in at her father's, and to allow him so much a week. I said if she came back to me I would do all I could.
I never had it.
I had it, but did not intend to defraud the prosecutors; a man told me to fetch it, and said he would be up the street. I had been drinking all day, and did not know what I was about.
I was going home; in going up Newgate-street, the prosecutor was before me - I saw a tall man behind him run across the road, I picked a handkerchief off the ground - he took hold of me; as to the other handkerchiefs, they are what my mother used to put me out victuals in, as my father-in-law turned me out of doors.
I heard a cry of stop thief, and ran with the rest.
I did it through necessity and want.
About three days after I gave up the duplicates, upon condition, that if I got the things out of pawn, nothing was to be said about it.
I was out of employ and very much distressed.
Did I not say I found them
The watchman says I wanted to escape; as I was walking with him my foot slipped, he knocked me down, and said I was trying to get away - I made no resistance.
When I was taken into the public-house, that man was there - the muslin was dropped in the street, how could he see me drop it; I was running after the thief, and got the muslin from him, they took me because I had the property. A carman came by who knew the man that took it.
I turned King's evidence when the officer's took me, and told them every thing. I was going home and met two men, who asked me to go with them and the horse, I refused, but they persuaded me and gave me money to pay the turnpike, and said they would stop on the road while I went to town to sell the mare, and not to sell it under 6 l., and make haste back, and they would satisfy me. I am not so sharp as I should be.
I owed the gentleman some money, his wife asked me many times for it; when I went out, I said I should get some money, I could not get it, and did not like to return, and went to lodge at another place, I soon found the officers were after me. I said I had only left my lodgings in debt; I got ill and went to the London hospital, I was in there the day that the prosecutrix says she met me, and was not able to move.
Another man was riding with me, the horse the other man was riding slipped and ran away with him, then my led horse began galloping, which caused the other to start as well; I kept pulling them as hard as I could, but the more I pulled, the more they ran. I never saw the man till I got within three or four yards of him, as I was noticing the horses all the time; when I saw what danger I was in, I called out stop as well as I could.
I was cast away on the coast of Cornwall. I walked to town, and applied to the prosecutor for work, which he gave me, at 1 s. a day. I came on this day as usual, the maid brought me four pair of boots; I laid them on the bench in the back shop, and went out to breakfast; I met a friend, who told me of a better place, at Greenwich, where I could get more wages. My master had told me to leave if I could better myself. I went to Greenwich about it, and did not return to clean the boots. I did not succeed, and did not like to return, thinking he would not employ me. I shut the door when I left, and did not steal the boots. I have been fourteen years in his Majesty's service.
Was I not drunk
Were not two men walking by the side of me
Did I not give it to her, and she threw it into my hands
I had been to Guildford-street, after a situation, and was coming down Oxford-street, quite tipsy, and might have reeled against this girl - I suppose she was waiting for me, or some one else; she turned round and threw the muff at me - I said I wanted no such thing; somebody said call the watch, she did - when he came, the muff laid on the pavement; he said I had better take it in my arms - I did, and he pulled me to the watch-house.
I am perfectly innocent, and throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
My mother sent me to my aunt's about seven o'clock - she lay dangerously ill, in Paul's-alley - on my arriving at the corner of the alley, the prosecutor was walking by me - he turned round, and accused me of running against him. He said, have you seen what has happened? I said No. He said, I beg your pardon for running against you. He stopped a few minutes, then said I am robbed of my chain by a boy, and I imagine you was in his company. I said no, there was no person in company with me - I gave him my address, he collared me, and I submitted, without the least resistance, knowing my innocence.
I was looking at the Odd Fellows' procession, and saw a watch lay on the ground - I picked it up, and was going on when the gentleman stopped me.
I went to several brass founders to look for work; I went into this place, and staid hearing the trials; the gentleman turned round and charged me with it - I denied it; after that, he went for an officer, who found a handkerchief in my trowsers - my pocket was torn, and I put it there by accident.
I did not take it, the dog killed it as I was going along the road, the dog went after the ducks - I never meddled with it.
I had been walking out on Sunday morning, at a quarter past six - by the side of the wood, I saw two joints of mutton, took them up, and carried them home, and did nothing else with them.
I leave it to my counsel. I was never near the empty-house.
I was never near the place - the bounds were out that day hunting, I was running after them, they called after me, and I was stopped.
I bought the tickets of a woman for 2 l. 10 s. I was confined, ill in the hospital at the time they say I was at the inn.
I heard the cry, and picked it up.
I am not guilty of thieving.
Master said, if I would tell him where it was he would not prosecute nor hurt me.
Did you lose them all at once
Distress drove me to it.
I declare myself innocent, and was never in the shop.
I took them at market.
I saw the door open and went in after two boys.
I never saw him till the morning when he asked if I belonged to the house. I was apprended at work at my shop.
You stated you were not aware of any money being due to your mess
Is it not within your knowledge that you were one, two, and three months creditor, and you told me whenever you were creditor, I was justly entitled to it
I believe you admit that, at various times, you were creditor to different species of provisions
I could have charged for the provisions you had, a higher price than what I should have to charge for the savings
There are numerous documents taken to different officers to sign, when it is almost impossible for them to tell what they are. At times they write when the ship is reeling to and fro, and they sign them on their knees - and a few hours after, would say they had not signed them. I have sent Government regular accounts, and they have debited me with provisions, thereby subjecting myself to five or six times the amount I should be able to realize - they cannot be injured. The midshipmens' mess and the gun-room mess generously gave me leave to take what was due to them, in lieu of my contributing to their comforts. There are books in the office to prove the Government could not be injured.
What part of the room was I in
About two hours after he left the room, I swept it, and found the pocket-book.
I was standing in Leather-lane, at half-past seven o'clock, and met a young man who offered me one shilling to sell them.
If I had thrown them away they would have been broken to pieces.
I picked them up in the street.
What I have done is through poverty.
I am innocent. I was going along with Reece, he said he would pay me if I carried the bag for him, I said I would - we went up Quaker's-lane - I put it down by the wall and waited for him - then took it up; they called out Stop thief, I threw it down and ran away, being frightened.
I was crossing the fields between six and seven o'clock, and picked up a bundle with the sheets and shoes.
I was in liquor.
A man threw it into the road - I picked it up.
I could not pay the rent, and took a cheaper room.
I bought it of a Jew for 30 s.
I beg to say I particularly wished Mr. Fearman to bring all his books, and sent him a letter to that effect, telling him they were necessary to establish my innocence, particularly a red book which he well knows that he burnt before me, with an intent to defraud his partner, and laughed at the idea of it; also a green book in which I entered money I received. I frequently collected perhaps 29 l. in a day, and laid out 25 l. All the money in the concern was Mr. Coakley's. I kept the business together - I wanted 100 l. a year, he gave me 30 s. a week. I was to be advanced as business increased, but I never had that honour, though I made his business to exceed 1000 l. a year, and was always considered to be Mr. Fearman, and was sent by him to attend the opera, and visited every place of amusement with him, and he promised me part of his business. When I left him I was confined by illness, and I told him I was going to live with Mr. Parkes, in Dean-street, Soho; he knew I lived at this house for six months, and never slept from it - I went out every morning to my business. I was told he had a warrant out against me, but knowing my innocence I never absconded. He frequently met me and turned round to look at me, and why not take me, but no, he had not then proved that inveteracy against me which he is so capable of. When his partner died he knew his friends would enter an action against him for burning the old books and making new ones, and at that time I did not countenance him as I did before, and he did not take me to places of amusement as before. I was appointed arbitrator between him and his partner. I met him one night to investigate the books - he bought a new cash book, and said, \Now I will do them for all their deepness\" - he got me to call over the sums - he entered the large ones in the new book, and left out the small ones, then burnt the book. His poor partner was in a dreadful state of mind and came to the shop - he told him the concern was going to the devil, and the business was worth nothing, when it was worth 1000 l. He frequently told me to turn him out of the shop. When he came to enquire when his partner died, and he found I would not countenance him, he charged me with embezzlement. I trust the Court will see this is as great a conspiracy as was ever heard of. I declare my innocence."
I have been many years in the Customs, and was transferred to the Excise; in execution of my duty I gathered up what loose coffee there was to put into the packages. I put it into my pocket, not with intent to take it - for I would not forfeit that solemn oath I took when I had my place.
The handkerchief found in my bed I took out of my master's coat pocket, when I brushed it, and forgot to take it up. I found Mr. Reynold's son's handkerchief in his pocket, and forgot to give it to the housemaid.
I am not guilty of the charge.
I have three children who were starving, and I throw myself entirely on your mercy.
I was in liquor and carried them on my arm one in the other, and did not know I had them till he came after me.
Will you swear it is the basket I dropped
He cannot swear I was the person.
A man asked where he could get a porter. I said I wanted a job, he gave me the box to carry, then struck me, and charged me with stealing it.
I went to Bedford-row to enquire after my brother, who had lived with Miss Doughty, I met a groom whom I had often seen, he asked me if I was going to the west end of the town, and gave me them things to carry to the Oval.
I saw it drop from the cart, and told him of it, he said I stole it, and struck me, and followed me.
They have sworn falsely.
I passed Atkins, and heard an alarm, saw a lad with the coat on his arm, I followed, but could not take him.
As I went out of her shop she flew by me and said I have lost a table, she collared me, and said you are one of them; I said if so, give charge, the watchman came up and said, I know him well, let him go.
I am innocent.
I did not intend to steal them - I intended to redeem them.
I heard halfpence fall, and helped the people to pick them up, and gave them to the watchman.
It is my first offence.
A man gave me some liquor, which overcame me - I fell against the pail, picked it up, and was putting them up when they took me.
They are swearing very wrong.
It was necessity. I merely took it in my hand to price it.
I called in the morning, and left the basket there. I got a little too much to drink, and went to bed - my basket was on the floor.
I am innocent.
I met two boys who asked me to buy them, I tried one pair on, and the gentleman took me.
He said he could not say any of it was his.
I met a friend, got drinking, and had the misfortune to lose it. I wrote to him to offer to pay it at 2 s. per week.
I had some ale with a friend, he kept me some time - it was too late to go home. I fell in with a woman, went home with her, and do not know how the money went.
I was going to my uncle's - I saw the handkerchief laying down, and picked it up and gave it him.
A man told me to meet him at this shop, and he would give me work - they said there was another room up stairs - I went up, and picked this quilt up off the floor.
It is a troublesome business - I wish you to settle it among yourselves.
A lady bid me buy one - I was measuring this, when they took me.
I was out of place, and had pawned and sold all my clothes - hunger drove me to do it. I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I have no more to say than what I told the constable.
Mr. Blake took four casks from me, and three from the shoemaker's. I told him they were sent there by his man's desire.
What this man swears is all false - I never saw him in my life - and as for the place where the priest lived, it is quite a different land. Her father and mother lived next door.
I was returning from Brentford, I called at his house and got in conversation with Mr. Close, we talked about trade - he asked if I knew the landlord, and told me to ask him to take care of his horse and cart, and let him have a bed; he asked me to call him at four o'clock - I said I would, but did not awake till six, and then called him, as I had to go to Brentford; he said he would give me a lift in his cart - I said it was too late to go, he said he must go as he had particular business, but did not say what it was. I wished him good-bye, and did not see him any more. Between eleven and twelve o'clock, the officer came and took me out of bed - he took me because he had seen me at the house.
I have a wife and five children - my wife is pregnant. I applied to the parish four times.
They swear false, they were my old masters.
Two lads tapped me on the shoulder and said, \Has your father lost a carpet;\" I went with them directly and said I knew nothing about it."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I never saw the boy or blanket.
I picked them up with three potatoes.
I met these boys as I was going to work, they said they would come with me; I turned aside for something, they followed me. The man said, \What have you got?\" they then threw them down, and ran away."
The prisoner pleaded distress.
The boy said he did not know that I was the boy, but he should lose his place if he did not come.
Prisoner's Defence I leave it to my Counsel.
I was in great distress.
Was I sober or not
I finished my work by twelve o'clock, and went to a public-house where my fellow-workmen were; about five o'clock I went with a man into the City, found myself the worse for liquor, and said I would go home; I met a woman, who asked me to go and fetch her box, as she was in arrears for rent, and wanted to get away; if I had been sober I should not have gone up. She went up with me, and showed me the box; I put it on my shoulder, and it fell off - I did not touch it again. I told them I was hired by a woman, but they would not go to look for her.
I leave it to my Counsel.
The robbery was committed at half-past one. I had been to Stepney fair with my master, and got home about eleven o'clock; I never went out again until three o'clock in the morning, and was going home to my lodging. I went up the yard for a necessary purpose, and fell asleep.
The coat was given to me.
I was unfortunate, and bought and sold old clothes. I met one Joseph, at the Blue Boar public-house, Rosemary-lane - he told me to meet him at the foot of London-bridge at six o'clock in the morning, which I did. He took me towards Carter-lane - he went up to this room - returned, and took me up with him. He ran out and the gentleman took me.
It is my first offence.
I bought the property, on the 26th of June, of one Simpson. I had bought household furniture of him two months previous. I left it at this house for sale, as I wanted the money, to go to another sale. I pawned the flute, as I wanted money to go to market. When I went back I was detained - if I had stolen it I should not have returned. I paid for it in the presence of a respectable witness, named Bartholomew.
I was coming down the Strand - I heard the cry, and a man stopped me.
Are you sure I am the man who robbed you
About half-past nine o'clock, I was walking down Paternoster-row, with another young man named Charley Lewis , we were on the left hand side and heard the cry of Stop thief! and at the corner of Duke-street, we saw the young man running; he threw his hands behind him, and dropped the chain and seals. I picked them up, called Charley to run after the thief with me, and the gentleman took me. I said I am not the man, let me go. He let me go, and run after the man, and caught hold of me again. I said I have a right to keep them to give to the gentleman, to get a trifle, being a poor lad. I would not let them go without force.
They are mistaken in my person. I never saw them.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Was I running when you saw me
The knife is mine. I was up, looking at the fire-works till half-past two o'clock. I saw a young woman home to Middlesex Hospital, and found these things on the head of some steps - I could have got rid of them if I had knewn they were stolen.
Did you not change a sovereign in the morning
On Tuesday evening I was sitting at the Black Boy, public-house, this man came and called for a pint of beer, and stopped there drinking till near one o'clock; then went home with a girl. I called him up in the morning, and went round to several public-houses till night. I left him in the house, and did not see him again.
Did I not go out of the public-house with you
Did not you give me leave to take liberties with you on the road
Did you not ask me to go home with you
Did not a tall man go by in a cart, John Earl , of Kilburn; and heard you insist on my going home with you
He came in and took me. I said I had done nothing. I waited while they went to the prosecutrix, she said I was the man. I asked if he wanted me. If I am hung for it, I never had any thing of hers. She gave me leave to take liberties with her, and I wanted to take them.
I picked it up near the shop.
I was looking at a book, saw a person pass whom I knew, went a few yards to speak to him, and they came after me.
I was in distress.
I had left a friend in Lad-lane; a gentleman stopped me at the top of King-street, and asked if I would carry a box for a shilling; I said I could not, as I was going over the water. He said he wanted it taken there, and would fetch it. In about five minutes he brought it, helped it on my shoulder, and told me to cross into Bow-lane.
I was with two comrades at the time the property was lost. I offered to go any where with them, knowing myself innocent.
I leave my Defence to my Counsel.
My father ran away from me when I was a child, and my mother is out of her mind.
Henley does not belong to all the property it is his fathers; they made me promises to confess.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
My handkerchief was on the counter. I did not know I had taken them up with it till. I got out.
I was at Maidenhead at the time.
I never was with him.
I did not take it from Marshall.
You said at the office, that the summer-house was open
On the morning of the robbery, I called my nephew up at one o'clock; we went to Spa-fields, I went into the carcase of a house, and found these things, if I had followed my nephew's advice, I should never have touched them - I feel that I did wrong, in not informing Applebee.
I got tipsey, lost my hat, and found the basket.
I bought them in Petticoat-lane.
They would not say what they wanted, and I would not go with them. A man with two donkies said he saw a man in his shirt sleeves ran with the bundle.
Were you not drunk
I looked for the man, but could not find him.
I was with my father and three brothers, the crowd pushed me from them, close against this gentleman; a hand came across my breast, and they seized me.
I saw the handkerchief lying down and picked it up.
I was in distress and beg for mercy.
I am innocent.
She only gave me 1 s. 6 d. for it.
It was not found on me.
The figures are my own property, agreeably to an Act of Parliament passed some years ago, as I am the inventor.
I worked for it.
I picked it up.
Distress caused me to do it, I could not get my wages.
At Bow-street, he said the landlord was present; he was fetched, and said he never saw me in the house. I got the shoes from the depot in Smithfield.
I wanted some money to settle with my master.
I saw five of them run up the street; and went to see what was the matter.
I never had it.
I came home drunk one night, and went into his room by mistake, I laid my hand on his wife, she called out murder! I then went to my own room, and she said she would have her vengeance if it was five years after. Next morning (I owed her 12 s.) she took my waistcoat, breeches, stockings, and hat, and turned me out. About nine o'clock one night I went to his yard for my working tools, he said if I did not leave the premises directly he would put me in the cage. I went to the Justice, who was not at home. I got fuddled, came to this man's house, called to him for a quarter of an hour for my tools, he would not open the door; I was in a passion, got a shovel, and broke it open.
Did I ask 25 s. for it
Did I not say, I had seen it
I was looking for work, and met a man, who took me to a public house, called for a pot of beer, and gave me the watch to pawn; I asked what name I was to pawn it in, he said Collins. I said, they would not take it in, if it was not my own; he said then bring it back. The gentleman asked if it was mine, I said \Yes, and I paid four guineas for it,\" I returned to the house, the man came out, I never saw him again. I went up Bow-street, and asked a Jew if he met a man in a white apron, going down Long-acre."
My Lord, I feel confident from the evidence adduced against me, that it would be useless to say a word, but in mitigation. I simply, and humbly, throw myself on your mercy, and state, I was instigated to commit the crime through having in an unfortunate circumstance before done wrong, and lost my character. Wherever I applied for work I could not succeed, not having a character. My wife was ill, and I was driven to this by necessity.
I did not put them in the basket. The other man offered me 2 s. to carry them, and said he bought them of the footman.
The temptation of so much money being so easily got, I could not resist, and therefore lay myself entirely on your mercy. I have been 36 years in His Majesty's service by sea and land.
I have no father, and my mother turned me out of doors. I had nowhere to go, and did pick the gentleman's pocket, as another boy persuaded me to do it.
My fellow servant paid me the 2 s. on the Sunday before.
It was never in my hands. Some men, passed me, and the gentleman, charged me with it.
It is my first offence.
I know nothing of it. I was merely passing by, and asked the gentleman what was the matter.
I was going by, three men laid hold of me, and shoved me up the alley - two ran down the alley, I ran after them to know why they did it, and the gentleman took hold of me.
I had left my master in St. Ann's-lane, and came to Newgate-street, to look for my sister; I could not find her, returned towards Cheapside, and two young men, taller than myself, dropped the handkerchief. I picked it up, called after them, then blew my nose with it, and put it into my breeches.
I was walking home, across the square, three or four ran by me, and one charged me with stealing a watch. I stopped immediately.
I was behind the gentleman - he said his pocket was picked. I put my hand in my pocket to secure my own money, and held it in my hand; he took hold of my hand and tried to take it from me, I would not let him - I said,
\Gentlemen, I have 2 l. and two half crowns.\""
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
How long after the robbery, did you write to my wife
I wish two letters to be read, which I received from the prosecutor. My master and I had a few words about the price of work, he said he could give me no more - I left him, I went to Lambeth, to see for work, and wrote to the prosecutor to say I had left, and went into the country, to my wife, that man sent me two letters, which I answered, telling him I never had the 6 l., but he might sell my clothes for what I owed him.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I changed a sovereign at Newgate-market that morning, and another sovereign was paid me. Knapp knew I had money, as I have given him change.
I was at the fair, there was a crowd round this box, enquiring whom it belonged to; I picked it up, and was taking it to the watch-house, several people came round, and said the officers were after me, and I had better drop it, which I did, and then ran away.
You told the Magistrate you was sure I did not take it
I was coming down Holborn, two young men jostled against me, and ran down Field-lane, I turned round to see what was the matter, heard no cry, and was going on, when the prosecutor came and laid hold of me. It is not likely I should have let him take me without resisting, if I had been one of the party.
I heard the cry, and was knocked down, and almost strangled.
A gentleman asked me to carry them to the London Docks, and told me to go on; the watchman stopped me - I said the man was coming up, he would not stop for him.
I had been to the Theatre, a gentleman came behind me, and pushed me into a public-house, and swore that he took the handkerchief out my breast.
I was coming up the street, on the other side, when the gentleman called Stop thief! two men ran up the court, and nearly knocked me down, Woolf caught hold of me.
I leave it to my Counsel.
I am extremely sorry for what I have done - it was through distress.
At the time the officer shewed me to you, did you say you did not know me
I leave it entirely to my counsel.
I had been away from my master a fortnight, and the coat and waistcoat were in my box all the while. I have the coat on now which I wore while I was away.
I have lived in Shire-lane at the coffee-shop nine months; and opposite, three months - I was apprehended and taken to the pawnbroker's - he said I was not the man who took out the watch; he afterwards said I did take it out - they have taken three bad notes, one which has my name on it - I was minding my father's shop at the time this was passed.
I know nothing at all about it.
How do you swear to me
I was not before the man
I was in Bishopsgate-street, and heard the cry of Stop thief! turned round, and saw the gentleman run on; I was coming up, a mob come out of the public-house, I came up, he looked hard at me, and said,
\You are one of them,\" and if I had not been in the way, he would have caught hold of some one else."
Having been apprized that to person's standing in my forlorn situation a statement from counsel was not allowed, I have committed to paper such topics of defence as my mind was capable of suggesting, under such an awful visitation.
I unfortunately took them out of my master's shop, meaning only to raise two shillings on them, in order to go to Bartholomew fair.
The man must have lost sight of the thief.
I had been drinking with a man, and went to see him home; the gentleman caught me at the door and almost choaked me.
I was working in Whitecross-street, and going to get my supper, as I passed the yard the gentleman ran out and collared me; a woman told them at the time. that I was not the thief.
Did you not say, you could not swear I was the man
Did I not wait in the shop while you sent for the officer
I have had it some time, my wife and I had some disturbance, I went to Wise's to pawn it, he detained it. I said I would not go till I got it. I was taken to Bow-street, and brought three people to prove it was mine, and the Magistrate discharged me. I went twice to the Magistrate's afterwards I got a warrant for the pawnbroker to have it given up.
I was at the Compter at the time he says I uttered the note.
They have made a mistake in the man - I have nobody to give me a good character or a bad one.
I found the pepper loose.
On the 8th of September I was at Barnet, and bought them of Smith, between seven and eight o'clock in the evening - he has a team and van. I got a man to give me a lift on his cart, and came with him to Holloway.
When Partridge and the witness came into the public-house, I sat there, Partridge told me to stand up, which I did. They went out for a quarter of an hour, then came back, and said, he suspected me to be one, and I must go with him.
I am innocent. I never had a felonious intent in my mind - it was through distress. I have a wife and seven children. I had an execution in my house - the man saw what distress I was in; I told him of it - he put his hand to his heart, and said - So help him G - d, there was not the least illegality in it; that he had known me in better circumstances, and only wanted to relieve me.
What do you swear to me by
I was crossing the field and all at once heard the cry, and saw a parcel of people coming; a man passed me and got over the ditch, I followed him - lost him - and a gentleman took me.
I have only to say that I am perfectly innocent, or I should not have exposed it as I did. As to the money, in the early part of the summer he returned from Margate rather distressed, and I advanced him money which he paid me.
When I went to the ship, Ridge said I had given information where some goods were concealed in the hold. I said if I had known they were there I could have seized them myself. Soon after the steward came on board, and invited me to drink, after that he locked the cabin and left the key with Ridge, who pressed me to accept of two bottles of wine. I refused, he still pressed me, and I pushed him from me; he began to vociferate against me in a blasphemous manner. I went to bed to get rid of him.
I had only left my mother's house at Islington at a quarter after four o'clock.
Look at me, and say if I am the man
I was married to Eliza Redkison , I met her at Cheltenham; she went with me to Bath and Reading, where we lodged some time; she had a former sweetheart named Smart, and she found out that he lived within a mile or two of Reading, and repeatedly went after him when I was away. I then brought her to town, and furnished her a house at Chelsea. I went to Cambridge to see my uncle, and she sold off every thing, and when I returned, I could find her no where, but at last heard she was at Mr. Shackle's. I went sixteen times after her, the master said if I came there, he would shoot me. I kept single for three years, and thought it necessary for a young man like me to marry again.
I was coming down Montague-street, and picked up a bag with the pots, and put them in my pocket to take them to where they belonged, as I cannot read.
I was going down the Strand, went up to the shop, but never put my hand into the baker's pocket. I had some halfpence in my own pocket - I pulled my hand out, and they all fell down.
I was at work near the place - I was coming down Swallow-street and went into this privy, which we all used, and as I came out the watchman sprang his rattle, and said I was after the lead - I never touched it.
Did not Johnson's cart bring them
It is all false. Southwood had a job to do, and employed me to get him stones. I asked several people where I could get them; Storey's carter said he had a few loads to sell, I told him if he went to Southwood he wanted some. I was in the yard when he brought one load, and let him in at the gate. Storey's carter brought them, Southwood paid me and I gave him the money. A week after they sent Michael Shehan to know if I could get some more. I came down with the cart, and the two men loaded it, the carter satisfied them for the stones. Gardener sold them, he is Storey's carter. Fish heard the man agree to sell them.
Did you not see the cart with a grey horse
I told you before that Gardener could not go out to work and he sent is man, Michael Shehan .
Did I desire you to conceal them
I do not know where to find the person I had them from.
Did you not offer it to M'Donald first
Did not the Magistrate send you to the House of Correction for prevarication
Did Bass say he had it from Williamson
As to Bass he has quite contradicted what he said at the office. As to my leaving my lodgings, I was in Hughes's debt and went to live in Clerkenwell.
All I have to say is, that Griffiths is false in saying I was not in bed at 4 o'clock. I went to bed at 2 o'clock as near as I can imagine, and from then till about five o'clock was not out of bed. I never awoke till five o'clock, and then he awoke me by throwing his arms across the bed. I then looked at his watch, and said, \Dear me, it is half past 6 o'clock,\" he said his watch was an hour too fast. I got up, and Clench came and said the house was broken open and the plate gone. I said, \"How could that be when I had the key in my pocket;\" which I believe I shewed her."
I have some recollection of the things being brought down either in master's trunk or gig seat. I have unpacked his trunk and brought things down in the laundry to go away, and they were put in a drawer where table cloths and napkins are kept; I saw no more of them till this morning, when I found them wrapped in paper. I put them on the table, intending to take them up, but in the hurry forgot it. I never put them in the bundle, nor were they ever in it; the officer scattered the things over them, and said he found them in the bundle.
I working there a fortnight, and told him where I was going to work, and about an hour after I got there, he came and asked if I expected to see him, I said \No,\" he said,\"A'ynt you got some things which don't belong to you,\" I said, \"No,\" and while I was shewing the other man's things, he ran away - it was the other man's bag."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I was going along on business - was very thirsty, saw a pump by - the window was open, and a school-mistress was hearing the children's lessons; she asked what I was going to do; I said, to get some water; she said, I had better put it down, for it was put there to see who would meddle with it, and I did.
Another boy took it.
I was coming from Colchester, and saw a man drop the bundle, I called to him to stop, he did not and I picked it up.
He said I was a dozen yards from the rest.
I saw the shawl laying down, and pulled it out of the crowd, saw nobody who belonged to it, and put it in my coat.
Do not you know that I sell plumbs in the street
I bought them at market.
I own I am guilty, but I did not take it forcibly.
I went to see the Abbey. He charged me with picking his pocket; I took out my money and shewed it to him, to see it was not his. He said, if I gave him the money back he would not wish to hurt me.
I bought it on my own account, with the honest intention of paying for it.
Do you swear I got in at the window
He asked the servant if she left the window open - she said, she did. I came in at the door and asked a man if he had any boots to sell; he said come in - the brewer rang the bell, and the woman called out
\Oh, my G - d, here is a man in the house\" - they found nothing in my basket - he took the bag out of the basket."
I was walking down Adam-street, a gentleman stopped me, and said I was wanted. I went quietly to the office.
I said, \There goes the man who stole the thing\""
He said if I made him a recompence he would have nothing to do with it - I accordingly gave him 3 s., the duplicate, and 1 d. to pay the interest.
The money was sent me from the country by my friends.
I heard the cry, turned round, and the gentleman took me and said, \I think you are the man who picked my friend's pocket.\" I said, \"I am not.\""
I lodge with my mother in Somer's-town. I was out late - a man came up and said, if I would carry it to a shop in Wardour-street he would pay me - I never offered to run away when the watchman stopt me.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
They were given me by a journeyman baker to take to another house - he heard I was taken, and has got out of the way.
I was distressed.
The handkerchief is mine. I did not steal the clothes.
I was employed by another person to take it to Great Queen-street, and he would give me sixpence. I did not consider what I was doing.
Did you see me take them out
Did you not ask me to fetch you a wh - e
This lad's uncle came to him at the watch-house and said, \What Bob, you have robbed me six or seven times before, and I shall go to the utmost of the law, and what have you led this young man into it for.\""
I heard the cry and ran into Bury-street after the thief.
I was out of work.
I was walking round the square, heard the cry, ran up, and they laid hold of me.
Were you not in liquor
I was coming by and am entirely innocent of knowing any thing was stolen. I had been drinking with a shopmate.
I was coming along, a boy gave me the brushes and ran down the court, the gentleman came up and took me.
They promised if I would confess and tell every thing, they would not hurt me, that they suspected somebody else more than me.
I saw this man and another stripped, and fighting, in George-street, the prosecutor was in liquor, and the other was striking him. I pulled him off - they fought for a quarter of an hour, then the prosecutor gave me some beer; he said he should like to lay down, and the man who drank with us said he could lay down at his place; four of us, and two girls of the town went with him, the man pulled off his coat and shoes. I went home in ten minutes, as I did not lodge there.
A woman came up to me in Church-lane, and asked me to pawn them, and offered me sixpence. I said, \If they ask any questions, I will say they are my father's.\""
The witness, Henry Mitchell , employed me to fetch his cart from the wheelers, after that he set me to clean the horse and cart to go to Barnet races, and to keep it a secret from his father; he said he would give me something handsome if I attended him on his return. He told me to keep the horse and cart out of the way till his father was gone; he then set me at different jobs, and asked me to buy one bedstead and to take another to another person, and told me to put them in the hay cart, and if his father met me I was to say I was going to take them to Murray's; he was in the habit of selling things unknown to his parents; he said they would not miss these; he used to pay people in furniture for work they did, unknown to his father.
I know nothing whatever of it.
A boy stole it and gave it to me.
I pulled out 3 s. to see what money I had, the gentleman came and said, \You rascal, you have been robbing the till.\""
I was very much in liquor. The man said at the office that somebody else took it.
When I met you, did you not say they were for me
On the 12th of April, I went to a lime wharf at Paddington with my cart, stopped at the Red Lion, public-house, Edgware-road, and met a man who called himself Mr. Wilson, a corn-dealer, of Edgware-road. He said he wished to exchange his cart away for a good horse; my horse came to 7 l. 10 s., and his cart to 4 l. 10 s. He proposed to pay the 3 l. in about a week, I refused; he said he would furnish me with two quarters of beans, at 30 s. a quarter - I agreed, and was to meet him next morning, and on the way, I met him; he said he was going to Tottenham-court-road, and expected the beans would be there soon, and authorized me to take them in my possession. I went to the White Lion, public-house, saw the cart, and asked the carter if the beans were for me, he said, \Yes.\" I asked if he had brought any bran, he said, \"No;\" I received the beans, and left them at my house."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I had been on an errand, and was returning about nine o'clock, and heard the cry - I joined the mob, and picked up the seal and key, in the gateway.
The man came to my shop about nine o'clock in the morning, and said, \Here are some goods for you Foy,\" I said \"Very well\" - I generally worked out, and left the shop to my wife's care; he asked me to give him a lift - I took hold of the truck, he told me to help him with it; I said my wife was not in the way, and she knew more of the business than I did. Garton came in, and said I had bought some stolen lead - I said to my knowledge, I had nothing of the kind; I never saw the man before, I did not leave the shop for some time - I had occasion to go out, and never heard that any charge was against me."
I leave it to my Counsel.
Did I say I worked for Baldwin's
I picked it up in the churchyard.
Mr. Thomas seized me so violent, it would make any one struggle. I deny being guilty.
I am innocent.
It is all false. I live two streets off and had just come from home, I was going to a public-house, and was entirely by myself.
He told me to take the bill-book out of the cupboard to clean it, and told me to take the other things out of the cupboard and clean them.
The watch was given me by another girl. I did not tell the corporal that it was mine.
Can you say you found the coat on me
You told the young man he ought to be taken in custody himself
You said at Marlborough-street that you was one hundred yards off and would not swear to me
I go on the canal with a boat, and about ten o'clock on Saturday night our boats were at Pickford's wharf, I went to see for my sister who lives at the Red Lion, public-house, and at the Coach and Horses, public-house, a young man was there with the coat on, we went to the King and Queen, public-house, he told me to put the coat on - I pulled it off in the room, and gave it him.
I never saw him, nor touched his watch.
I was hired to carry them to Hounsditch, by a young lad for 1 s., I was to stop at the corner of Hounsditch for him.
His handkerchief hung out, I took it, and gave it into his hand, I did not mean to keep it.
Was I running when I was stopped
You told the Lord Mayor that another man passed me in Birchin-lane
I was going to Snow-hill, and turned down Birchin-lane, I heard the alarm, saw nothing, and went on, the prosecutor and woman turned the corner, and said \Stop that man, he is one of them\", I said I knew nothing of it, he said he would hang me if it laid in his power."
I was shut out of my lodging - I met a man who gave me a half-crown, I walked through the square into Pall Mall, it was near one o'clock, I got over the railing, and sat down in the area, and was asleep when the man called me.
I leave it to my Counsel.
I was at a public-house in Lambeth-street, and about half-past ten o'clock, was coming down Brown's-lane, to go home, and in Red Lion-street Miller took me.
When he came to the privy I said I was come to make water. I came to render assistance.
I told you a woman knocked my hat into the area and I got down for it, heard the alarm, and was afraid to come out
I was talking to a woman who wanted me to treat her, she knocked my hat off, I got into the area for it, and hearing a call of murder and thieves, I was afraid to go up stairs and went into the house.
Was not the money offered you for the goods
I was engaged as clerk to Taylor and Co. The man brought the goods, I received them with a bill and receipt - I said I had not sufficient money, and Mr. Taylor was not within, he said he must take them back, I said, very well; he hesitated for a quarter of an hour, I said \It rains hard if you like to leave them, and ask your master if you may leave them, I will take care of them,\" he did not return, and at four o'clock I left the warehouse. I told Mr. Taylor the goods were left, he said he would call and pay for them. On Monday and Tuesday, I was helping a man who opened a new shop, on Wednesday I went to the counting-house, and was apprehended - next day Taylor said he had tendered the money - he was taken in custody. Mr. Corf the partner, was arrested, and is in Whitecross-street prison. Taylor lived at Blackheath - I cannot find him."
How was the boat fastened
I fell in with this girl, and lived with her till my money was gone, and then left - I lodged up stairs, not in that room, I had left some handkerchiefs with her, and thought these were mine.
My LORD - I must request your indulgent permission to read the short statement I have to offer in my defence, because I am wholly incompetent to address you by speaking, not only from being overpowered by the awful situation in which I stand at the bar, but because it is foreign to all the habits of my life to speak before a public Court. My Lord, it is my unhappy lot, at the age of seventy-three years, to be put upon my trial, on an accusation affecting my life and character, before a Court and Jury, far distant from my own home, and far distant from the place where even the fact for which I am to answer is alleged to have been committed, instead of being brought to trial before a jury of my neighbours, who know my conduct and character, and (which would be far more important for my interest,) who equally well know the character of my prosecutors. Although I now stand here before the Court, a poor miserable old man, accused of a most base offence. I have in earlier life known the bounties of fortune, I was once in an easy, and I may say, in a wealthy condition; and although by the vicissitudes incident to men, who are highly engaged in commercial concerns, I am now comparatively poor, yet until this accusation was raised against me, my moral character was never impeached, and so all my neighbours would have known, without producing witnesses, if I had been brought to trial before a Jury selected from amongst them.
Gentlemen of the Jury, the facts of the case are shortly told; the testator, Mr. Robinson, whose will I am accused of forging, was an intimate friend of mine, and I was in the habit of continual social and friendly intercourse with him. In the early part of the year 1815, he was in declining health, and on Sunday, the 30th of April, in that year, I called upon him, as I frequently did. Finding his situation as I thought precarious, and being alone with him, in friendly talk, I asked him if he had made any dispositions of his property, he said he had not, but that he wished his step-mother to have it. At the same time, he added, he would be glad if I would get a will drawn out for him, as I knew he had very strong aversion to any intercourse with lawyers himself, I promised him I would get it done, and accordingly wrote down on a slip of paper his directions, by way of instructions, from which to get a will formally drawn up, and that is the paper which has been produced in evidence. I believe I wrote as nearly as possible in the very words he uttered, I then read them to him, he said it was right, and signed it. I took away the instructions, meaning to get a formal will drawn up from them, and to bring it to him for his signature. At that time I did not consider Mr. Robinson to be in immediate danger, and being particularly occupied the next day, (Monday,) I had not an opportunity of getting the will prepared. On the following morning, (Tuesday,) I learnt that Mr. Robinson had become delirous, and as he never afterwards recovered from that state of mind, I thought it useless to proceed further. The paper remained unnoticed in my possession, as I conceived it a thing of no value, not then knowing or supposing that a little loose memorandum of that sort could have the force of a formal will.
A day or two after Mr. Robinson's death, another paper was found in his desk, altogether in his own hand-writing, by which it appears, he bequeathed to Mrs. Robinson the purchase-money of a house, he had then lately sold it, and was doubtful whether the papers did not make Mrs. Robinson universal legatee, and I understand, the opinion of Mr. Hart, the Chancery barrister was, that it bequeathed to her the whole of her son-in-law's property. Under this paper, accordingly Mrs. Robinson claimed Mr. Robinson's property, but the will was deposited in Doctor's Commons, by the testator's relations. On hearing these circumstances, I thought the paper which I had written, under his direction, might be important, and therefore I sought for it but was unable for some time to find it, at last, in the month of September following, I happened to discover it among some loose papers, and I immediately gave it over to Mrs. Robinson. Until that suit was instituted, I never conceived that this little slip of paper would in law amount to a will. Gentlemen, in that suit I was called upon to make a deposition, which I did, stating the same circumstances as I have now stated to you; and although that is all I have had to do with the business, I am now called upon to answer, at the hazard of my life, the charge of wilfully having forged that will.
Gentlemen, I would ask you, what motive I had to be guilty of such a crime? I got no legacy, nor a farthing benefit under the will. There was nothing improper in the conduct of the testator, in leaving this property to his step-mother in preference to his uncle or aunts; for although he was not the actual son of Mrs. Robinson, yet she was married to his father when he was about a year old; and from that time, until the hour of his death, with the exception of a short absence at Shields, he had continued to live with her. She had, throughout his infancy and youth, been an affectionate mother to him, as he frequently acknowledged, and he, apparently, had all the affection of a son towards his mother; insomuch, that it was not till after I was intimate with him for several years, that I learned she was only his step-mother; and indeed, from their conduct to each other, I had, until then, always supposed her to be his natural parent. The paper which was found, altogether in his hand-writing, will sufficiently prove his affection for her. Of his uncle, Thomas, he had often said, he would waste whatever he had; and with respect to his uncle, Richard, it was not at all unnatural that he should overlook him entirely. In truth, he had known nothing of that uncle, who had been long absent at Botany Bay, to which place he had been transported for a felony, which he had committed many years before, when his nephew was not more than a year or two old. This uncle, and his attorney, Mr. Rushworth, and other persons, disappointed of expected legacies, are my prosecutors. I can believe the uncle may be disappointed at the loss of his nephew's property, but it is awful revenge to seek the destruction of my life and character, because I was the unfortunate hand to write down his nephew's last wishes.
Gentlemen, You will bear in mind that this is not the first time the validity of this paper has been questioned. After a long suit in the Ecclesiastical Court, where all the evidence which my now prosecutors could bring forward to impeach the paper, and shew it to be a forgery, might have been legally heard, and deliberately considered, that Court decreed the paper to be a genuine instrument, and established it as a legal will. Nor did it rest there. Early in the present year, the prosecutors applied to the Ecclesiastical Court, to re-hear the case, but after hearing all the allegations which could be further adduced, the Learned Judge refused the application, and confirmed the former sentence, thereby establishing the genuineness of the instrument.
Gentlemen, after an ample investigation of this matter, before a Court of competent jurisdiction; I should have thought my prosecutors would have been satisfied of my innocence of the crime which they now allege against me, but you may judge from their subsequent harassing conduct towards me, whether they are actuated by motives of justice, or of revenge, for disappointed expectations. Five years after the will had been established, by the Decree of the Ecclesiastical Court, which was in the year 1816, they preferred an indictment for perjury against me and Mr. Stephenson, at the York Assizes, against me for making the deposition of the facts, under which I wrote the paper, and against Mr. Stephenson for deposing that he believed the signature to be the testator's hand-writing - as these indictments were prefered in my own country, where all the parties were known, myself, the prosecutors, and the witnesses, I readily and cheerfully prepared to meet the charge, but the first delay the prosecutor interposed, was the removing the indictment by certiorari, which delayed the trial for the late then assizes - In dus course, however, they stood for trial at the last York Assizes, in August, and again we were ready to meet the charge, but on the evening before the day of trial, the prosecutors withdrew the records - in the mean time they came to London, and at the last September Session, they presented a bill for forgery against me, before the London Grand Jury, but this bill was thrown out - again in the last October Session, they presented another bill, which is the one I now stand here to answer.
Thus, Gentlemen, I have detailed all the instances of this case, and I earnestly but humbly intreat you to give them your attentive consideration. Consider the disadvantages I am placed under; called upon to answer so heavy an accusation, at a distance from the place where the fact is alleged to have been committed, and before a Jury to whom my former life and character are unknown. Consider too, that my prosecutors have evaded bringing the matter to trial before a Jury of that county, where both they and I are known. Consider also, Gentlemen, that the whole business has been already fully canvassed before a Court of competent jurisdiction, who have patiently heard all that could be adduced against the paper, and that having established it by their decree, they have thereby virtually pronounced that I am Not Guilty of the charge imputed to me by this indictment. But above all, Gentlemen, I pray you to remember the time at which I am called upon to answer for this supposed offence; It is now near seven years since the date of that transaction - in the course of that time, death has removed from my aid three persons who would have been material witnesses for me on this day - Mrs. Robinson, the mother of the testator, Mrs. Stephenson, and Miss Jane Hewson , the two latter were witnesses in the suit, in the Ecclesiastical Court, and spoke to material facts respecting the testator's intercourse with his mother. With regard to Mrs. Robinson, as it is clear I took nothing by the will - it is insinuated I must have had some bribe from her, she rests now in the silence of the grave - death has sealed her lips, and she cannot now give testimony in my favour to prove the falseness of that accusation so long as she lived; no charge whatever was made against me.
Gentlemen of the Jury, these are the circumstances under which I stand before you, and although I am greatly weighed down, and depressed by the magnitude of the accusation, knowing that both my life and character depended upon the issue of your verdict - yet I do not despair, I have voluntarily surrendered myself to take my trial, I know and feel my own innocence, and I have the firmest reliance on your justice. But above all, knowing that there is a God who judgeth the world in righteousness, I cannot believe he will desert me in my old age, and deliver me a victim to the malice of my disappointed enemies.
I was going to Rugby fair, early in the morning of the 17th, and met Johnson, who I knew, by seeing him at fairs; another man was with him, he said he was coming to Smithfield, and had three mares to sell, and as he had seen me buying horses, he thought they would suit. I took him to Thompkin's between six and seven o'clock, and put the horses in the stable; he said he had them from Whitney, in Oxfordshire, of a Welshman, who had rode them some time. I took his word and bought the mare which West claims, for 22 l., he would not warrant them sound. He went to London by the coach, I took them to Ives, exchanged one, and left the other for trial.
I was coming from the Royalty, he was crying out watch, and took me, I never saw him before.
I went to Barnet, to see my sister, and at Hadley I was engaged to fill a young man's place who was ill. I wrote a note by the Barnet coach to say it was uncertain when I should return; and just as I came to town I was apprehended. I lived with Mrs. Keath, the widow of the late rector of Barnes. Three other men lodged in the same room.
I found the duplicates in Fleet-market, wrapped in brown paper.
I could not get my money. I only had 8 s. a week.
I am innocent. I have lived in highly respectable families.
I never touched it.
I am very sorry, and will do so no more.
I saw it on the step of a door.
I found it..
I met a sailor, who asked me to get it out for him, I refused, but being half drunk when I went there, he gave me this to put about legs, saying it was his own.
I met a man who comes to the Green Man public-house, Oxford-road; I had a ham which weighed nine pounds and a half, he offered me the sauce for the ham.
I did not know it was bad.
I picked them off the ground, supposing them to have fallen from the counter; the man came in and collared me.
The house leads into the field, like a thoroughfare, I was on the grass when they took me.
I said I worked for Mr. Jordan, of Fore-street
I heard the alarm, and they took me. The prosecutor was very drunk, and did not know what he lost.
I drank with her and gave her 4 s. 6 d., to go home with me. She would not go when we got out of the public-house.
I never saw it.
I saw a man go from the shop, he threw some papers away, which I picked up, and followed him; this will explain how I got the tickets.
A parcel of boys were hitting one another I trod on something in the road, and picked the hat up.
I picked it up in the passage.
A boy threw them down, and I picked them up.
It is false.
She borrowed 5 s. on the counterpane, she gave it to a man to carry home for her, which he did. She was very much in liquor; I was in the next room, we had five or six pots of beer, and two pints of gin, then went to a house with her and had five or six more, she was brought home drunk and had seven or eight pots; after that she gave me the counterpane to get two pots of porter and some gin on it.
They laid on the curb.
I saw the gown in the cart, I picked it up, and gave it to him.
I was in distress, and the parish would give me nothing better than dog's meat, I was turned out of the work-house and could get no relief.
I sent the order for my own things as I had left a frock there.
When did you come to Bethnall-green to take a furnished house, and say you were Mrs. Felton?
Did you summons me?
They came and said if I returned them the 2 l. they would not prosecute me.
I found it in the park.
Did I not come over the way to you?
I found them in Hampstead-road.
She first told the magistrate she lost 40 l. I was remanded for a week; and she said if I gave her 5 l. she would not prosecute. I refused. She then said 2 l. I refused. She then said I was done.
I went there to ask for work; a man went rather quick out of the shop. The knee boot laid on the ground; I folded it up, and went towards the stairs with it..
I saw a parcel of boys playing, and a man after them with a stick in his hand; I run away.
I went by, my daughter said, \Here is some beef and mutton, which I have bought for my mother.\""
I saw two boys treading it under their feet and picked it up.
He took me and showed me the lead.
I happened to look in at the window, and the gentleman collared me.
He said he believed I was the boy.
I was out of employ, and called on him, he gave me them to repair; I took them home, and on the 6th of October, I had a letter to inform me a bill was unpaid, which I was arrested on; I pawned the property to take it up, but intended to redeem it.
Mr. Richards persuaded me to take a shop in the City; my friends promised me money to commence business, but did not fulfil that promise. I was obliged to have goods on credit, and sold them on credit; sea captains frequented the shop, I took their bills, which were dishonoured. I was arrested for 22 l. and pawned the watch to give the officers money to leave the house till the afternoon, when I should have the money. I could not redeem it, and next day had an execution in my house, I gave Richards the duplicates, hoping to redeem them, but never had it in my power.
I was going a long Whitechapel, and met a man, who asked me to carry the copper; the officer stopped me, I never resisted; the other man was brought back - I said \You employed me master, and you must clear me.\""
That man would swear the ball of St. Paul's was only five yards round. I have no witnesses, I want none.
I picked the box up in the walk by Wood's door.
At the office, he said a boy with a fustian jacket broke the window. I was coming by and stopped to look at it.
I know nothing at all about it.
We had three glasses of spirits together. I went to the Harp, public-house, and in a half an hour he came and took me, and said, \Where is my hat,\" I said I knew nothing about it, and struck him."
I was distressed, and took it to get some water.
We were drinking and singing together till past one o'clock, and then went to bed; I took his watch, intending to play him a joke. I was sorry it had gone so far, and told him where it was.
I went to Waltham-cross, and kicked against these whips.
I saw a boy snatch the lady's reticule, and was running after him; he turned down Cavendish-street, the gentleman took me, I said I was running after the lad.
He missed them, I said they have come off with my wrapper, and here they are.
I never saw them before. Cummings said he had lost them three weeks, and Helt said he bought them three months before.
I had been drinking all day, and did not think of doing it, till it happened. Being boxing-day, I was intoxicated.
One Backett, who had charge of the premises, handed me the bottles to put in the hamper.
I humbly leave it to your mercy.
The dog followed me, I was returning with it when he met me.
The 5 l. note was put in my pocket by some of the officers, I cannot say which; I never put it in.
I beg you will shew mercy, and spare my life.
I went to get something for supper, the officer came into the public-house and took me out.
How could you swear to me
I heard the cry, and happened to go out of the way, they caught hold of me.
I left them, as my eyes would not suit the trade, which was an engraver. I was distressed, which urged me to do the crime.
A porter gave them to me in Newgate-market, to carry to a butcher's - Debenham swears false.
With feelings of the deepest regret, I stand here in this unpleasant situation, one act of my life forfeits all claim to respectable society; should your sentence be inflicted with severity, I should be lost to all friends, an awful picture of indiscretion - I wholly depend on your mercy, and my future life shall be my only pledge. My tailor was pressing for money; I had no wages due, and intended to redeem them when I was paid.
I am innocent; I do not know any thing about the man.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Jury.
The gentleman says another prisoner was at Worship-street with me, I was at the bar alone. I assure you I was innocently led into it.
It dropped at my feet; I saw a man running, and picked it up.
I found them in Bishopsgate-street, shewed them to Sadler, he said they were bad, and we were going to throw them away.
They have all sworn false, for the boy was at the shop when I was brought back, they told him to swear to me, right or wrong.
I was returning from Brunswick-square, it rained hard, I ran to Montague-place; the rain abated, and I walked leisurely towards the Museum, the patrol said, he wanted me; the footman said,
I bought the spoons in the street; I bought four and gave two away - as to the key, it was made to fit my door, and is not a skeleton.
I leave it entirely to your Lordship.
The hat is my master's. I know nothing about the bundle; I left because I would not work on Sundays.
Was the watch broken
I was going about to get work; went down to ask if any chimnies wanted sweeping; I saw nobody, and went up, the butler came up the steps; I asked if any wanted doing - he said,
I went down, and he said, You have got the watch; I said I had not; he found nothing about me; he looked in the cellar and found it and he beat me over the back with a stick.
I had been with a friend; and as I returned, a man threw the coat on my shoulder; I thought it was my friend, and said it was his.
I found it in Whitechapel - nobody owned it, and I threw it over my shoulder.
I certainly took them, and my reason for denying it was, because I was known in the neighbourhood. I had been waiting for the man a long time, I was elevated in liquor, and what possessed me to go away with them, I cannot say, I did not intend it; but I got on the coach, and intended to return them.
You have authorized me to take things to pawn
The prosecutor has authorized me to pawn things before - my fellow prisoner has been sent to pawn his gold watch. My master went to Brighton for three months, and left me without money. I took the cloth to pay the porter.
What I did was by order of Hargrave.
A man took the sugar and threw it down; I turned round to tell the constable, and he took me.
I met a man in Tottenham Court-road, who gave me 9 d. to take it to Goswell-street.
I picked it of the ground.
I was going home when the gentleman tapped me on the shoulder.
I sent my hammock to Ord's, and suppose I must have got this away by mistake.
I know nothing of it.
He was drunk - he took me home. I was going backward, and missed my way.
The gentleman laid hold of me. I saw two boys running - the handkerchief was on the ground.
I never had it.
I was coming from tea when I was stopped.
I found it.
I told him I dare not take my Christmas-box till the 9th or 10th.
I never had it.
I was distressed.
It is a lodging for all description of characters, the tools were put in my room, to get me in trouble.
I went to the privy, and met a woman, who asked me to carry them to Orchard-street.
It is false.
I picked the things off the ground; I did not take them from you
I met him in the road, we went and drank together, he came out quite tipsy. I overtook him, he fell into a ditch and his things fell from him - I picked them up and put them in his box.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
When you were at the door, did you not let two lodgers in
I heard the cry, crossed over, and this gentleman took me.
I am quite innocent.
Did you not come at half-past ten o'clock and break all my crockery
He begged me to let his three children in, and not to mind his wife. He left them there all the week, and never brought 1 s. to support them - his wife went to look for him as he was spending all the money. While I was out he came and broke my things; he came again about one o'clock, and said he would break in; my wife said, \Don't let him in\" - I said I was as good a man as him, and opened the door; he wanted his wife and children; I said he should not have them that night - he struck at me, and we got hustling. The watchman came by, and he said I had robbed him."
I go about buying old umbrellas. I heard a cry of Stop thief! and ran the same as others. The gentleman collared me and I struck him.
I pulled out my handkerchief to use it; was walking with it in my hand, and somebody threw a blue handkerchief on my shoulder.
I was seeing if they would fit me, as I wanted to buy them.
A mob stood by a farrier's shop; I went up the court and picked up the handkerchief.
I heard the cry and ran in pursuit.
I came out of a public-house, saw a man running; I looked round and was laid hold of.
Do you recollect going into a coffee-shop in St. James's
Did you not say you had been out all night, drinking
He pulled me into the Compasses, and said I should not leave him, but that I should see him safe home.
You could not swear to me at the office
I know nothing of it; he would not swear to me at the office.
I was walking with my hands in my pockets when the gentleman shoved me over some steps, and accused me of this.
He said if I told where it was I should not be hurt. If my master had paid my wages I should not have robbed him.
I found the duplicate.
I just turned into the court for a necessary purpose and was taken.
A strange man in the yard helped us to load the dung. The hay was put into our cart without our seeing it - the dung smoked.
When I entered the yard, Hankin had half filled his cart - as I was going away they said I had a truss; I said it was unknown to me.
I was distressed, and beg for mercy.
I heard this woman cry Murder! in the fields - I went to assist her, and she said I had saved her life. She went behind him, and took a bottle out of his pocket - he put up his stick, and said he would murder her and me too. I took it from him, and threw it away.
I went with a boy to Highgate, he left me, returned in a quarter of an hour, and called to another boy who was with us - they ran away and I after them.
I recollect nothing of it.
I was going along very steady, I heard people call out \Stop carman;\" I stopped as soon as I could, and saw a person run off with the child."
I intended to redeem them.
Two men went before me, took the sheet, and ran away - I picked it up, and put it on the bush.
I was distressed.
It is a foul conspiracy between this man's brother and him. They were lodged in my room on purpose to destroy me, because I told about Sir Thomas Strutton 's plate.
On the 28th of April, about half-past ten o'clock I was coming home, and met a middle aged man in Sutton-street; he said he would give me 1 s. to take the horse and cart to the Horse and Groom - I did so, and said \I have brought this horse and cart to put up;\" he said very well, and I left. Last Tuesday I met a man at the corner of Aylesbury-street, he said \"Will you go to the Horse and Groom for such a horse, and ask the man 9 l. for it\" - I went and asked him 9 l."
A gentleman ran by me, and I was stopped, but know nothing of it.
I can prove I was at my master's premises at ten o'clock.
A man asked me if I wanted a job, he opened the gates and gave me the truck to drag to the turnpike for one shilling. They would not go after him.
I agreed to take his bag to the vessel for him.
I was at the Rum Puncheon at the time.
I stopped to hear what was the matter, and the boy said I had stolen two coats, and being irritated, I said what he mentions, and ran away as every one would have done.
Were you employed to buy the pamphlet
You found out in the streets that it was blasphemy
Will you be kind enough to state what you understand by blasphemy
I met a baker who said he was going to pawn the coat, and I paid him 16 s. for it.
I acknowledge pawning them, but not with intention to defraud.
She said I was not the man for he had a watch, chain, and seals.
Did I not buy all these things
She went to live with Matthew Henchman , and took these things away.
I have a witness to call.
I was out of work, this laid on the open field; I thought somebody had dropped it.
I have a wife and four children.
A man stopped me before the prosecutor.
I lost 8 s. in her room, also my watch, and found the watch in her box, and took these things for the 8 s. She robbed me also last summer.
I was coming down the road, heard the cry, and saw three or four people running - I ran myself, and the gentleman called Stop thief!
The woman asked what I wanted - several people came round, and I ran off.
I found it at his door.
I can prove that I bought them.
Another boy took it and asked me to pawn it.
He would swear fifty oaths as false as God is true. I found it.
I was at the Red Lion, public-house, Oxford-street, where I was in the habit of seeing carpenters, who took me to a man whom I bought them of. I was going to a job when I was stopped.
I was at home at the time of the robbery..
A boy gave it to me.
That is not the cheese which was taken from me.
I took it to enable me to follow my relations to France.
Treviss swore they were taken in the afternoon, but they were taken at two different times.
I went to sleep there, and put the tools aside.
I bought them of a man.
I heard a cry and followed the people. A man took me and I said I was pursuing them.
Did I not always write to her as Miss King
Did not one Harman elope with her from your house
I separated from my first wife on account of her eloping with a lodger, whom she is now living with at her father's house. We had drawn up an agreement for a divorce.
I was made drunk, and entrapped into the first marriage, and never claimed her as my wife. I am, and always was a Protestant.
I was in distress.
I got intoxicated, and met Walton just before I got to the house.
A young fellow who was before me, threw the handkerchief right in my face.
He found my own property in my pocket.
I found it on the back galley stairs, wrapped in brown paper. I enquired, but could hear of nobody losing one, and being pressed for rent, I pawned it.
I came from Coventry to look for work - a young man came and gave me some victuals, and said if I did what he told me he would give me 5 s.; he said,
\Snatch that gentleman's watch, I will stand by, and he shall not hurt you\"."
I went to buy goods; he put his hand across and tore my gown open, and being frightened at his handling me, I went round the counter. I saw nothing of the goods; it was not found where I stood.
I was going to Mr. Collett's, whom I formerly worked for, and in Compton-street I met a man who I supposed to be a porter carrying some things, besides the weather-glass; he asked me to carry the glass to Crown-court for 6 d., and on the way I was stopped, and told them what I now state; and in answer to the question whether I would sell it, I said it was not mine. The watch-house door was not open, and I went towards the door again, when they took me. They would not go after the man who gave them to me.
I had spent the evening at Walworth, and got intoxicated, and found this bundle in front of the area; and when I saw the watchman I offered them to him.
I was going about a job, and met a woman in Moorfields, whose nephew I knew; she said she heard he lived up the first court on the right-hand side of Coleman-street; I walked fast, a young man came and asked if I had dropped a bag and keys; he said they were of no use to him - I thought I might as well have them; I then went to the top of this house, found the door open, and on coming down met this woman; she called me, and I walked back myself.
Do not you remember coming to my shop in Nicholas-lane with your grandfather, and finding out that I was married
I saw it laying on the pavement, and took it up.
I saw two young men behind the gentleman, they picked his pocket, and threw the handkerchief behind me.
I left this man at Highgate at eight at night, and saw him next morning at half-past eight o'clock.
I went to Portland-place, to fetch a bundle for my wife, and as I returned, I met three women, and took them to two public-houses; I got rather heavy, and they persuaded me to go to the Bedford's Head, public-house, where we had two pots of ale - I fell asleep, and do not know what passed.
I was in distress.
I declare to God, that they betted their money as fair as any man.
I brought the coat from Ireland.
I went to see Colonel Hare , and was told he had left town.
On Wednesday evening I was enquiring for a lodging about a quarter past nine o'clock. I bought this new frock and jacket, having had money given me to go into the country. I had a 1 l. note from the Royal Hotel. I inquired for lodgings about Westminster, and the last place I enquired at was about forty yards from the Park; and as I could get none, and thinking that if I travelled on the road with the bundle I might be stopped for stealing it, I determined to sleep in the Park, and took off my frock, and in came a young woman (the prosecutrix) arm-in-arm with a soldier. They looked at me, and I did not wonder at it, as it might look suspicious to see me changing my clothes. Directly after I saw her sitting down with a stout man; she directly called out Master, master! and I thought to myself, if I go to assist her, I shall get abused and insulted, and perhaps robbed of my clothes. Well, he kept scrambling with her for five minutes, then got up, and came by me swearing, and she calling after him; he had a brown coat and light breeches on, and appeared a smith, or something of the kind. Directly after that, a soldier came up and asked what was the matter, and she told him her case; he spoke kindly to her, and asked her all about it. He laid down by her for two or three minutes; they then got up and came near me, and looked at me; then the soldier said,
\Ah! Yorkshire, what country.\" I said I did not know what country I came from. The prosecutrix had hold of his hand, and she had something in her hand - he was taking it from her. She said,"
\It is mine\" - and he said it was his. She said,"
\Why don't you take my part;\" I said,"
\What do I know about it - how am I to know which is right.\" Well, he went behind her, took her under the arms, and dragged her round, but did not hurt her; he then took her bonnet, and set off; she said to me,"
\You are no man, or you would take a woman's part;\" I said I should get into trouble if I did - I was sorry to see her ill-treated, but he was a man of more strength than me. Well, she grumbled at me and went on. I took up my things and went a few yards into the trees; she followed up to me. This young man came up, and she told him I would not take her part; then another man came up, and two or three more; they began to search me, and I said I should lose my money. Then they said,"
\Where is the woman's handkerchief or shawl?\" They began to hawl my things over, and took hold of me. I said,"
\Here is a deserter - here is his jacket and waistcoat.\" Well, they determined to take me before a watchman, and met one, who said he would have nothing to do in it. They took me to the same public-house where I had enquired for a lodging, and the landlord and landlady both said I had been there about a lodging. I told them to search me there - they would not. At last they met another watchman, who took me in charge. The young man threatened me, and said,"
\You bl - y rogue, I will pay you;\" I said I had injured nobody, and the innocent had nothing to fear. Well, they took me to a watch-house; several people bolted in after me - they laid very heavy charges against me, and called me a Methodist, and things of that sort. The beadle searched me at the watch-house, and found nothing on me but my money, which they counted before me, and said if I spoke a word they would strike and beat me. They locked me down stairs without a drop of water, and when the girl came to have her trial, she had another gown on."
The gentleman called Stop thief! I saw somebody running, and ran down the passage.
You said, if I would take care of your money and watch, you would be glad
Distress was the sole cause of my committing the deed.
I am in the habit of holding gentlemen's horses; I ran after a gentleman to hold his horse, and was stopped in Princes-street.
A gentleman laid hold of me, I turned round, and he said,
\Go on, you are not the lad;\" another came up and took me into the shop, and in about five minutes the coat was brought in."
Did you not give them to me to endeavour to sell them
Mr. Cox gave me the goods to sell for him, and was to allow me five per cent, commission. My father-in-law being in the country, I was induced to pawn them - intending on his return to restore them. Mr. Cox promised not to prosecute me, if I sent him the duplicates, and sufficient to redeem them - together with eight guineas which I owe him.
The ribbon was returned; I did not say I brought it back myself. I meant to take the fans down on Sunday. Mr. Cope was well aware of my\\ send\\ ing goods to my sister.
I was taken fifty yards from the place, and charged with running away with this bacon - I am lame, and cannot run.
How came you to accuse my wife of it
I came seven miles to town on purpose to have it investigated - the money was my own. About half past three o'clock a waggon came by, and we we were going to get into it - he dropped his bundle, and said,
\D - n me, if I have not lost my money.\""
He got fighting with the others, his hat fell off, and a man ran off with it.
Hearing a noise, I ran across the fields, and the gentleman took me.
I found the shirt in my basket - I did not put it in. I was almost starving, as I could not get my wages.
I saw this basket in the middle of the road in King-street, Westminster; the watchman said he would take me to the watch-house - I said
\I wish you would, for I want to find the owner.\""
I was in a wild fit - and then, when any thing comes in my way, I am sure to lay hold of it.
I bought a hat of a man at night, and in the morning took this by mistake.
They were given to me by a man in Holborn, to pawn for him. I was starving.
I am in the habit of making sashes, and perhaps every sash in a street is the same size. I said at the Office that I had it from my master; he asked where I got it - I said,
\Don't you know you ordered me to break them up, and get 6 d. for them.\""
The constable told me to stop, and I did.
I did not take it. I stopped to hear some music - a gentleman came and took me.
I saw the handkerchief on the ground, and picked it up - I pointed out the boy who did it.
I was coming along, and an old lady asked me to run after the thief; he dropped the bundle, and they took me.
I picked it up, and the gentleman called me; I asked what I had done; but mentioned no name.
She called out Stop that boy! I stopped immediately.
I met a boy with it; he asked me to put it in my apron.
Why did she not detain me.
I leave my Defence to my Counsel.
She missed her shawl, and said she suspected the plaisterers.
Two young men took the beads off the child's neck, and ran by me; I called after them.
A bricklayer asked me to carry it to Saffron-hill.
This woman pulled me into her house and overhauled me, and took a sovereign from my pocket; she said she would fetch some beer - but she never returned; and as I missed my money and found some things on her shelf, I took them for it.
I picked it up, and the gentleman immediately took me.
Spearing said, \ There is a hat on the coach.\" Somebody called me, and I went away."
I never saw them.
I saw this man in Oxford-street, and agreed to meet him in Gee's-court, he said he had to go for a plank; and when he came to this gate, he said,
\There it is, take it.\" I took it up, and saw his countenance change; he said,"
\Run Jem!\" and I did run, being aware that he was doing wrong."
I saw them on the ground, and asked whose they were - nobody could tell me.
I am entirely innocent.
When I first applied your foreman stated the terms much higher; but they were lowered in considation of my taking it for three months
Did I not apply to you two days before on the subject
Did I not see you two days before, and talk with you for twenty minutes
Did I not say Kemp recommended me to you as a person who lent money on different property
Did not you make an express stipulation to take it as a pledge for one month, at a certain interest, allowing a month's keep
Did I not ask you to write the terms agreed to, at the back of the receipt
I hired the horse and gig under the belief that if I paid regularly for the first month, I was to have it for three months, and before the expiration of the first month, I was unfortunately embarrased, and wanted to pledge it, hoping I should be able to redeem it before the time expired. I applied to Kemp, a pawnbroker, of Pimlico, who said it was not in his way, but that Parker took pledges of that kind, and I went, and saw him in the presence of his clerk - he said, No, it would eat more than its value in the year, but if I chose to make a sale of it he would insure me the return in a month, and if I called on Monday, he would look at it, which I did; he came down, and looked at it. I had said I only wanted 20 l., but on Monday asked for 25 l. - he said,
\You said 20 l. at first, and 20 l. you shall have.\" He asked where I lived, I gave him the address; he asked if I would let his clerk drive it into the City to get a bill cashed, and if I called in an hour I should have the money; he agreed to keep it for a month. I returned in an hour, and when his clerk returned he laid the money on the table. I repeated the stipulations before his clerk. I asked him to write the agreement at the back of the receipt; he said he often had dealings of this kind, and never had his credit called into question, and it was not customary to write the stipulations. I gave him the receipt, he engaging to keep it for a month, and said if it was a day over the month, and the interest and keep not paid, he should not keep it. He asked what interest I gave, I said 3 l. would be sufficient; he said 3 l. would be too much, he would say 2 l.; and at the time I pledged it, I had every idea of being able to redeem it before the month expired, and had no idea of making away with it."
I meant to ask my friends for money to redeem them.
I was passing the shop, and a man ran out - there was a cry of Stop thief! I ran after him, and was knocked down.
I had occasion to come from Pimlico, where I live, to Poland-street - I crossed the Park, and finding it very cold, I ran or trotted across the Park into Pall Mall, up Kings-place, into King-street, and was met by a man, who made a heavy thrust at my stomach with a stick or umbrella, which irritated me - I turned round, ran a few paces after him, and thrust at him with my umbrella, and struck him. I saw one or two persons whom I thought belonged to him, and ran to prevent my being ill-used.
I was going home, and stood at the end of the passage to hear a woman singing, and as I was moving away, a young man came and said, \Have the goodness to lay hold of this for a moment;\" I said, Yes. A person came up and laid hold of me - I turned round, and they fell - he said I had stolen the books, I said it was false, there is the person who gave them to me, why not take him - he said, No, I have got you, that is enough."
I am very sorry for what I have done, and leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
May it please your Lordship and Gentlemen, I stand charged with stealing a handkerchief, which I deny - though it is of little use, for you are bound to give a verdict according to the evidence, and it is my misfortune to be in custody at a time when I am too poor to employ counsel. I understand two persons can prove my innocence, but have nobody to send for them. I was convicted here at a former period, and soon liberated having His Majesty's Most Gracious pardon. All I can say is that in this, as in the former case, I have been pursued by bad men, who seek my destruction.
I hope you will have mercy on account of my wife and family.
I took away the clothes I had on, and nothing else. I left none behind.
I was waiting in a public-house, and a sailor came in, who appeared distressed - he asked me to buy the two handkerchiefs for 8 s.; I gave him 6 s. for them. I put them into my hat, went out, and was taken.
I was coming from Oxford-street, and found them.
I was in distress, and thought it would fetch 6 d.
All I have to say, is that I went skaiting, and passing by this house, I saw two young men reeling in the snow; one went away, and the other laid hold of me as I stood there, and said I was the man.
I have nothing to say, except that my uncle gave me the things.
I am innocent. It is only through inhumanity that I am brought here.
Did I not say \Send them to Nicholas-lane, and you will see Bolton on the door\" - A. He wrote down Bolton and Co., as the persons buying the good. I found he was a judge of bombazeens."
I have been in good circumstances, but through unforseen misfortunes have fallen into distress. When I bought the goods I expected to receive money to pay for them, but was disappointed. About six weeks ago, I obtained a respectable situation at Mr. Ferguson's, in the Old Change, and meant to pay for them.
I met two men whom I knew to be smugglers, they said they had some tea if I could find a customer for it; I said, I dare say I could, and they gave it me.
I did no such thing.
The girl said there were only two apples for a penny; I wanted three and she called her father.
Was there any more coats hanging up
I went there to sell pens.
A boy came into the yard to me, and said I should have the coat for 3 s. When the prosecutor came up, and said it was his, I said \Take it then, here is 1 s. for you;\" but he pulled at me, and I gave him a rap with my stick."
I am very sorry that I took them away.
Was not my hat in my hand when you took me
I was passing along, he ran out and took me - my hat laid on the floor when the officer came, and a young woman picked up the waistcoat behind a screen.
I was walking along, and ran my arm against the lady's basket, which was broken - the pocket-book rolled out; she asked what I had of her's, I said, \Nothing,\" and walked on, heard the cry of Stop thief! and ran."
I was out at the time, the door and box were broken open. Different things which have been said are wrong. I am innocent.
I was at work for a bricklayer, who is employed by the Sun-fire-office. He was not there that morning, so I begun clearing away the rubbish, and was bringing the lead round to where the firemen threw it, and was stopped, but did not intend to steal it.
Was any body with me
I had sold some beads in Air-street-hill, for 7 s.; a young man came up, and asked me to carry the flannel.
I did not touch his pocket.
I heard a cry of Stop thief! stood still, and the watchman stopped me. I was never near him.
The prosecutor brought me from my home, promising to send me home at any time. I requested him several times to send me home; he appeared vexed with me, and said, I should go about my business, and I took this opportunity of returning to my native country.
I met a sailor in Nightingale-lane, who put down the roll of cloth and other things - he said he had come from his lodgings, and had wandered about all night, and would I buy them - he asked 3 s. for the cloth, I offered him a shilling; he said, if I gave him 1 s. 3 d. he would give me some joiner's tools, which he did.
I was five years in Mr. Lewis's service as porter - he then placed me in this situation, which was rather a dangerous one, without advancing my salary, and being told I must move my lodgings, and make myself more respectable. I was told if I gave and account of what I had received it would be better for me. I delivered one, but it has proved contrary to my expectations.
I delivered them to the man as Clark was not in the way.
I never said the child belonged to me.
I was quite tipsey.
I heard an alarm, ran over and was seized.
I am a poor unfortunate lad, my father-in-law and I, had some words, I came out, and heard an alarm, and crossed over, thinking I might be suspected, and saw a youth throw something away, but did not know what.
I got intoxicated, went to a public-house with a man, fell asleep, and lost the money,
I bought them in Fleet-market.
I told him I was going to send two into the country; I did not get the money till nine o'clock, then I went to the public-house for the girl, and she was gone; I had left her in the tap-room.
I heard an alarm; a man threw the handkerchief down, and I picked it up and put it in my bosom.
I had had this pipe three months, and having no money, was going to sell it.
I saw it in Petticoat-lane, and picked it up. I said I was going to ask my father whether I had better advertise it.
Distress drove me to it.
I had not left the lodging; but being distressed, I pawned the things, and promised her I would redeem them. I received a parcel from the country, at their house; she sent for me to come, and upon opening it, I found there was 12 s.; she said if they were sovereigns, it would be all right. I offered her 7 s. of it - and said, I would redeem the things with the other 5 s.; but she gave me in charge.
You said I had better let them be in pawn till the distress was out of your house
It was mere distress.
I believe in July you met me, and requested me to make up your books
Have I not frequently pawned diamonds with you
I was placed in a very critical situation by the prosecutors trusting the business to my care - he found my services useful to him in his embarrasments. He has frequently desired me to do the best I could to carry on the business in his absence, and I have pawned goods to pay the workmen on Saturdays, and when the ear-rings were pawned part of the money was appropriated to his use. There was an account between us, and if the ear-rings were brought into the account there would be little difference between us. There was no intention ultimately to injure him.
It was given me to pawn.
I wish you would transport me, for my life is a burthen to me.
I was going to give them to the pot-boy.
Why did he not take me with it.
I had my supper off it, and therefore how can he swear to it.
I found them laying on some timber, at the wharf.
On looking for my own tools behind the prosecutor's chest, I found these tools, and took them home to return them to him when I saw him; but as we lived five miles apart, I could not take them directly.
At the first examination, Lewis said he did not know the number of the notes, nor on what night it happened, till he was taken to the Bank, and then he saw the note.
I leave my case to my Counsel.
The money belongs to myself. I received the watches from a person. Cousins said if the money was mine, I should not have it.
I was on the road, and saw a man who overhauled my bundle, and said I was not the man, I might go on - then they followed me, and said I had robbed the house.
A man stood by the cart with a whip in his hand, and his knee, bound up as if lame - he said if I would take that box, and deliver it in Bishopsgate-street he would pay me - this gentleman came and laid hold of me. I was so frightened I had not power to shew him the man.
Can you swear I was the person who was in the house
I feel too sensible of my situation. I had been spending the day with friends at Islington, and on returning home, in Paternoster-row, I found a parcel on the pavement, and picked it up - I enquired of a man if he had dropped it, and going along the witness stopped me.
I was coming along, and saw the handkerchief laying down, went to pick it up, and this gentleman took me.
I beg for mercy.
You have lodgers
I left my place, it being a very low neighbourhood. I did not like to work there, on account of my character. I never saw the money, I always had money of my own; the prosecutrix was always pressing me to drink gin - she drinks four or five glasses a day. I never saw twenty shillings in the house.
I was extremely intoxicated on the night in question, but am wholly innocent of the robbery - as to the matches, they are only pieces of wood, which I use to light my pipe; the shoes do not belong to me. I live down in a kitchen at Battle-bridge, and suppose, in my intoxicated state, I must have got into this cellar.
It is true, I have been sentenced to transportation by the same prosecutor - I was sent to the Penitentiary, and after four years restored to society; since which I have been employed as writer, to Messrs. Marshall and Co., of Carey-street, and had on this day got into the service of Mr. Russell, of Long-acre, and was about his business at the time. Is it likely I should again go to the shop, when I had been imprisoned so long for a former transaction? Without giving himself time to think whether I was the person, he concluded that I was. Any one dressed the same as me might be taken.
I picked the file up. I wish to express my sorrow for the offence.
I did take them.
I was crossing the road - the prosecutor was about twenty yards off; he crossed, and said, \I suppose you have my pocket-book\" - I said I had nothing of his, and would go where he liked. He stopped half an hour talking to me. I went with him to the constable."
My master left on Saturday, without paying my wages, and having no money, I took this to get victuals.
I lodged with him for a week, being out of place. On the morning in question, I took what things I could, and left the others to pay the rent. I told the officer, I did not know Queen-street - that I lodged near Golden-square, but did not know the name of the street. I met a man going up stairs as I came out.
I never had it in my possession.
I left my knife in the room, and got a job at Edmonton. I returned for it on the Tuesday.
I was in Langley-street, Long-acre, I went up a dark place for a necessary purpose, and found it.
Are you sure I did not give it to you
Did I not tell you they were all of consequence
I found the parcel at the Brick-layers' Arms, very much smeared with mud, picked it up, and found these articles, and offered to sell them at the Cross Keys, and Bricklayers' Arms.
You said I had a blue coat and white apron on
I was coming on the road from Hornsby, and picked this parcel up in a field.
Six or seven persons lodge in the room. I did not break the box open, but found it open; and, on lifting it up, took the money and watch.
I fell asleep on the form, and when I awoke the bundle was gone.
She took my property to her friends, and then led me such a life, I could not live with her
My first wife was a prostitute in the streets. I had just returned from the East Indies, and picked her up, and through her friends persuasions, I married her.
The horse was knocked up, and I put up at the Bull, was going home next morning with the money, got drunk and lost it.
I understood that she paid it on my own account, as I was told to leave no bread without the money. I used to leave it with her, and pay for it myself, and afterwards receive it from her.
I hardly know what to say. I am a poor man, and throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
The gentleman took me into a shop, and marked it with ink.
I was about six yards behind the gentleman, and two young men before me; as I crossed over, the gentleman turned round and took me, and said I had the handkerchief, searched me, but could not find it - he afterwards found it on the ground, and said he saw me drop it.
I have but one remark to make, that is to assure you I had no kind of direction in the gold part of my business, and however painful it is to remove the blame to my brother, I must say he had the whole direction of that department, and for the last eighteen months, I never manufactured a gold case.
I beg for mercy.
I was coming up Ludgate-hill, and picked up this handkerchief, and in Cheapside I was stopped.
I came down in about an hour and a half, and he was gone.
We were all in liquor. This lad's brother-in-law took him on his back, then asked me to carry him, which I did, and we both fell down. I know nothing of taking the watch, but found it in my possession next morning.
It was all a lark. The boy was saucy, and I knocked his hat off.
I sold two whips to a man in Bishopsgate-street; he paid me in copper - my wife keeps a shop - I thought it would be useful to her, and kept it - I did not know the shilling was bad.
I received the money as good, for two horses I had sold the day before in Blackfriar's-road.
I did it from want. I have a wife and three children, and this is my first offence.
I did not take the basket. Is it likely, if I took it, and they saw me throw it away, that they would not have gone and picked it up, instead of following me to the watch-house.
I met Brown, a carpenter, in St. Martin's-lane - he asked me if I was willing to earn 1 s.; he took me to a public-house, and gave me several glasses of liquor - he then took me to this yard, pointed to the boards, and said, \Carry them to Drury-lane.\" I was going to take them up - he said, \"Not just yet, we will come for them presently?\" and, in about an hour, he held the gate open, while I got them - I turned round into New-street, and missing him, turned back, and was taken."
I was in liquor, and she persuaded me to go home with her; she let me out at five o'clock.
I lately came home from sea, and received eleven sovereigns from my captain. This was the last I changed, on the Sunday morning.
Did you not say at Guildhall that you thought I was not the man, because I was taller
I went to the shop of Mr. Wicks to buy some leather; he asked me if I did not come there to buy some last week? I said No. He said I did, and brought a woman with me, and that we stole some leather, and I was given in custody and taken to Guildhall, where the boy ( Thomas Wicks ) saw me, and came forward and charged me with robbing his shop. I deny most solemnly having ever been at the shop, nor had I been in Golden-lane for weeks before.
I picked it up near Spital-fields church.
About two months before I was taken up I was driving a cart down Whitechapel, when I met Mr. Griffiths. He accused me of the robbery. I told him I did receive it, and would pay him the money. He said he would see me again, and I waited for him, but he did not come.
As I was coming along my apron-string untied, and I stopped to tie it. I never saw the unfortunate man until I saw him under the wheel.
I know nothing of the robbery. I was going to my sister's.
Prisoner's Defence I throw myself on the mercy of the Court. I admit I did it, but it was through misfortune.
I went to lay down in this barn, but did not know that anything was there.
She was well aware of my being married before we went to church; she said she would look over all that as I was steady. When I lodged with her she took unbecoming liberties with me. I was completely drawn into her snare.
I was crossing the road, and ran to avoid a coach - a man ran from the cart, and dropped the coat; I picked it up.
I kicked against them, and picked them up.
When I was in the house I did not see a watch - I wished Mrs. Sunman good afternoon, and she did so to me - she said nothing about a watch then.
I hope mercy will be extended to me - I did it from necessity, after a long trial for work; I came from Lancashire.
I was coming home from Westminster - I heard a cry of Stop thief! and a man came and took hold of me - he said there was something stolen, but he could not stop with me as he had left some fruit - then the witness came and took hold of me.
I was full twenty yards from the handkerchiefs; I was running down a turning, which is no thoroughfare, and was stopped.
I was coming down the lane, and heard the alarm given; the things were thrown over the pales - I took them up, put them under my arm, and was going round to the place where the alarm was given - I was stopped.
I was returning home from the Coburg Theatre, and got into conversation with the other two boys; the gentleman took hold of me, and said I had robbed him, but I had not.
A person came to me, and asked me to carry it to the Four Awls, public-house, Four Awls-court, and the man took my hat - the witness then stopped me, and asked me who I was carrying it for; I pointed to the man, but he took me to the Compter directly - Witness. I do not recollect his pointing to any man: there were five or six persons round him. He used to drive the Woodford coach.
I am a chimney sweeper - there was a chimney on fire, I was running to it, and saw a man throw the cask down.
I was going to fetch a pot of beer, I met a man whom I never saw before, nor since - he said,
\Can I get you to carry a copper for me, to Leigh-street, and I will give you sixpence;\" we went to the door of the shop, and he went in, and came out, and gave me sixpence, and the copper to carry to No. 6, Leigh-street."
As I was going along I heard a cry of Stop thief! I ran to the place, and the witness laid hold of me.
I had been to Scotland with my master, and had taken 27 l. I had received this 5 l. note in Scotland, and changed it with a coachman who was going to the North.
I ran down Fann-street; took his cap off in a joke, and threw it into Fothergill's shop.
If he saw the other man give it
to me, why not stop me with it. I picked it up in the middle of the road; no one was with me - I heard a cry in Falcon-square, and threw it down; I ran, being frightened.
Did you see me there; will you swear it?
The first witness said he never lost sight of me; how could he open the door without losing sight of me?
The prosecutrix lent me the money to buy my discharge.
Did I at any time in the course of the night, or in the morning, tell you, I was not your brother?
I had been at work at Mr. Oliver's, and the day before he discharged me - I went out to speak with another man, and had this spade with me, which is not Mr. Oliver's.
I was going to my master for some work - I ran against Templeman, and threw him down. I got up, and the officer stopped me; Templeman came, and said I had committed a robbery.
Another boy took the umbrella. and laid it down; I took it up, and was going to the shop with it when the officer took me.
I was walking down High-street, and took notice of the two boys. I saw the handkerchief lying on the pavement; I took it up, and put it in my bosom.
I had been to the Woodman, public-house, and got a pint of beer. I afterwards saw a young man place this box against a plumber's-shop - I took it up, and went down Sloane-street.
Can you swear the other young man was along with me?
I had 6 d. in my pocket. I had looked at the handkerchief, and was about to leave the 6 d. for it: I laid it down for a moment, and then it was taken from the counter. I could have ran away if I had been disposed.
On Wednesday, the 29th of December, I was coming towards the New Church, in the Strand, inquiring for a person named Gordon, a person ran up against me with the kerseymere in his hand - he dropped it; I took it up, and was looking at it, when I was taken.
On the morning of Wednesday two shopmates called on me, and I got tipsy, or I should not have thought of taking the tools.
I have been a hard working boy all my life. I was going to see after a ship, and in Whitechapel I met a man, who asked me where I was going - I said home to Bow-lane; he said he would give me 1 s. to carry a parcel; I said I could not carry both, and so he carried one - and when he saw this gentleman, he said,
On the day you lost your notes, did you not bring a small table to the alms-house gate; and were you not so intoxicated you could not carry it?
I certainly have acted very indiscreet; but solemnly deny the charge of robbery; the prosecutor is addicted to drink, which was the case when I assisted him with the table, about an hour before I found these notes - I seriously deplore having appropriated them to my necessities.
The prosecutor bought a bedstead, at my master's - I carried it home, and fixed it up; there was no carpet in the room.
Two men came up - one asked which way I was going, and asked me to take that basket to St. Paul's church-yard; he took it off the cart, and put it on my shoulder, and when I had got five yards he said,
Mr. Williamson, my master, sent me there, and as I came out a gentleman in a smock-frock asked me to carry that parcel.
I deny all knowledge of the robbery; the prosecutor made me drink two glasses of gin, and then I did not know what I said; he then offered me five sovereigns if I would lay it to Aby Collins.
I belong to the Swiftsure. I left her about five o'clock to meet a young man of the name of Wray, in Cash-street. I saw a young man pass the shop, and he asked me to take the planes in and pawn for him, in the name of Bellinger. When the officer came I told him this story - we went out, and the man was not there.
The things were partly my own - two pairs of the shoes were mine, which I had had for sixteen weeks - the others I bought of a poor man, and got them mended.
Did you see me throw the spoon away?
I was sent on an errand to Somers Town. I staid to hear the organ a little; I was then going on, and turned down a street, which I thought was a thoroughfare; the witness came up and said
I said
I picked it up in the chapel.
How did you know me in the dark, when you had never seen me before?
I said it was the prosecutor's money at the time he took me. I thought I had more money about me when I was taken, which made me say I had 25 s.
I did send that young man to pawn the bridle. The collar was throwing about the harness room, and I considered it useless. Mr. Hart's man had the collar some time, and I believe Mr. Hart gave me 2 s. 6 d. for it.
I was minding the gig for near half an hour; I was walking about as it was a cold morning, and an ostler came up and told me to go about my business; he asked me if I knew the little boys - I said No; he said,
I went away. That is all I know.
I hired this carriage of the prosecutor for a fortnight, and if I kept it longer I was to remit the money for it, (2 l. a week.) I hired it for a person of the name of Page, at Eltham; when I got down he was not there; I came to town and then saw him, and he said he did not want the carriage, I must go and get him some money upon it. I then spoke to a friend, who took me to Mr. Sadler's, and they would not take it - I then went to Mr. Dixon's - they told me to come again in about an hour - I called again and then the clerk said he could not advance the money till he had seen Mr. Dixon - I went again. and then they wished to know whose carriage it was - I shewed the note, and they agreed to allow 34 l. for six weeks, and if not redeemed then, it was to be sold.
I found the purse.
It is a malicious prosecution, carried on by my father-in-law. My wife has not only committed bigamy, but has been guilty of very bad conduct - a gentleman offered me a situation, and this is the reason the charge was brought against me.
I have no doubt but the entry was made in the day-book on the 8th of December: if I received the money I have forgotten to enter it - but a petty cash-book account has been running from the 10th of February: I repeatedly requested Mr. Lewis to settle it, but he always put it off. Ever since the books have been removed I have had no opportunity of seeing whether my accounts are correct or not - I am therefore unable to meet the charge, as I otherwise should.
This case resembles the former. I have had a great deal of business to transact, with very little assistance; it is possible for mistakes to occur. I certainly have no recollection of the circumstance; the witness says he did not give me the money in the counting-house - I was very likely to forget to enter it. There is an entry to Harper in the day-book,
I picked them up.
It is the first time I was ever before a Court.
The room on the first floor was often open.
I had ten puncheons of rum in charge, and the night being very cold, I went into a constable's box, near the side of the basin, till about half-past four, and then on walking round the basin, toward my charge, I found a gimblet, and saw a small bladder, containing liquor; I went to my charge and found all right. My only motive for concealing it was because I thought some of my fellow servants would lose their places.
I was driven to it by starvation - my wife and family were starving.
When I married Lady Cockburn she deceived me - I met her in great distress, and gave her a few shillings. I then lent her 20 l. or 30 l.; and then she contrived to drive me to marriage; a day or two afterwards Mrs. Bartlett came to my house to buy an instrument - I was not at home - she and Lady Cockburn were in the parlour some time, trying instruments; and then she came again, and met me at home, and begged me to play and sing. She has often been with Lady Cockburn and her brother to play. I then went to Kensington to give her some lessons, and they gave me some Spanish cake to take home to Lady Cockburn. In about two years I found that Lady Cockburn had been married to Sir James Cockburn; I received information that Sir James Cockburn was in Scotland, and desired her to se- separate from me directly. After a year or two Sir James Cockburn came to London, and I went to him - I told him all the particulars. I parted with Lady Cockburn, and met with Mrs. Bartlett, she knew the whole of these particulars.
I was at work at the time of the robbery, and am innocent of it.
It is my first offence, and I did it through distress.
I found it in the street - I thought it had fallen from some cart.
He said he believed had he lost four, and then he said five.
It was impossible for me to reach a tea-board at that height.
The door was open in the morning.
It was given to me.
Can you swear to these lamps?
I bought the glass of a man who came to me while I was\\ light\\ ing the lamps, and was going to sell it again. I was timid when the officer came, and do not know what I said to him.
Prisoner's Defence, I was going to my brother's. I saw these fowls in the lane - I picked them up, and at the top of the lane the gentleman and two patrols came and collared me.
Did you tell Mr. Rice you had been for some tobacco?
I had been at the Three Nuns in Whitechapel, and had been drinking, and as I came down the gateway, I met a man with the harness on his shoulder; it hit met and I said
he said
I said I would give him 2 l. for it; we went on together, and finally it was agreed that I should give him 3 l.; I had but 2 l. 14 s. about me, but I told him if he would give me credit for 6 s. I would have it; I gave him my address, and was to see him the next morning.
I know nothing about it - I never went to the drawer.
I was drinking there - I picked up this bundle in the street.
Did you not lose sight of me?
I am quite innocent.
I was starving, and in a dying state, and had nothing to eat for several days.
I was never in Mr. Burgess's shop.
I applied to the master for the wages due by Act of Parliament - he said I was to get an order made out, which I presented, and received the money, which was spent among us all.
My father had one about two years - I bought another one, but did not know which was stolen; I do not know which of them I told Mr. Cook I had had about two years - I thought it was the one we had had the longest.
I do not know the person.
When I was transported it was merely for a petty thing, taking a bit of meat for my children; I was in great distress. I had left a wife and five children, and having opportunities and offers made to me to escape, I at last did escape, and came to see my family. The meat only cost 2s. 7d., - it was a hard thing to send a man out of the country.
I know nothing of the robbery. The two officers came to the watch-house in the morning, and said, \Teasdale, did you see that man with a white coat on?\" he said, No, and then he said, \"He has changed his dress\" - I never had a dress besides what I have now since I came from sea. The officer brought in the prosecutrix, and asked if the man was there - she said, No; he said, \"Are you sure of that?\" she said, Yes; he pointed to me in the middle, and then she said, \"That is the man - I will swear to him.\" I was called out and searched, to see if I had a knife, but I had not. Three prisoners in this gaol can prove it."
Did not another person give them into your hands?
Several people ran, I ran as well, and when I came back, she stood at her own door and said, \That is the man;\" I had no boots in my hand."
The lady paid me four half-crowns, a shilling, a sixpence, and 6d. in copper - I lost 5d., and put the rest in my stocking till I could see my father, to make it up - I was afraid to tell my master.
I was playing at top in a court; he came up and said, \Halloo, was not you the boy who stole 27 ozs. of silver?\" I said, No; - he said, \"I think you are;\" - I was going away; he hallooed out, Stop thief! I ran, and they stopped me."
I certainly have bought goods, which can be proved by their books.
I went to the house to see if they wanted lemons - I knocked at the door, and received no answere; the gentleman then came and collared me - he shook me violently, and said he suspected I had been to his parlour - I said not; he gave me to the gardener, then fetched a cutlass, and said if I offered to move he would cut me down - I said I had done nothing; he sent the servant to see if all was safe - she returned, and every thing was safe; a child came to him with the watch in his hand - the gentleman took it from the child. I declare I was never in the house, and never saw the watch till I saw it in the child's hand. Previous to that the child had been missing from the house fifteen weeks.
I beg for mercy.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I bought it for 3s.
About half-past two o'clock, on Sunday, I was in White Conduit-fields, and found this tool in a handkerchief by some bricks.
I never had the shoes on till eleven o'clock on Sunday - I always wear boots.
I was returning from drinking tea with my sister, and am innocent.
When I have sorted up the wrappers, have you not allowed me a few odd ones?
I had the care of all his property, and could have robbed him if I had chosen; most porters think these things their perquisites; I sorted up some when I had been with him three weeks, and he gave me some small bits.
I have dealt in clothes for three years, and bought these in the way of trade; I really be
lieve Pitcher is the man who sold them me - his key fits Winn's door - the officer has tried it.
John Clark is errand-boy to Mr. Fergues: as I stood at the door one morning, he said,\Bill, we can get 2l. or 3l. very easy: master was out last night, and I went on the roof and saw a window open; I went in and looked about, and saw a great coat and two pairs of boots, and in the window-seat a pair of bracelets, which I sold, and if you like to go on the top of the house, you will see the window open, you can go in and take the boots and coat;\" and after work he came and said, \"Will you go now? Master is out.\" I went with him up to the top of Fergues' house; I went in, took the boots and coat, and laid them under the window; I returned and found Fergues' window fastened. I walked along the roof, and seeing a light in Mrs. Galloway's room,"
I asked her to let me through. If it had not been for Clark, I should not have thought of it.
How long was I in your sight?
Was I the first man who ran up the alley?
How far was I off?
I was in New-court, Goswell-street, going into a house with a female; I heard the cry Stop thief! turned to the right to pursue the thief, and went into a court on the right-hand; I could not catch him, but the watchman seized me; up came the thief, struck him, and ran away directly.
He never saw me drop it.
I know nothing of it; if I had, I should not have stood in the street looking for work as I did.
I was looking for the shoe; the man wanted me to give him one coat, and said then I might go; I said, I had bought the coat and would not.
When I got up in the morning I found they were moving out; I asked where the landlord was - one of the women said she did not know: he was gone away, and owed three-quarters' rent. A person came in with a new bedstead, six chairs, and a chest of drawers; I would not take them in, for I did not know who was then the landlord; I asked them for the key, to move my goods out - they went out, and when they came back moved the rest of their things, except the stoves, which they said I might have for my trouble; people said that if I did not take them I should leave them for somebody else, and I thought I might as well have them as anybody - when I was in prison she signed a stamped agreement to make it up, and received 5s. in part.
Did I not tell you I had been robbed, and wounded in my breast?
Did not you knock me down?
Do not you know I am nearly blind; and ran against the woman?
Did I not tell you I had been robbed?
After complaining to an officer, who is not here, I was going home - they knocked me down, and knocked the knife out of my hand - I could not see where I was going, I am so blind - I was all over dirt - I cannot now see any body before me - I had been left in care of a house; four men came in, and threw me on the floor.
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, in commencing my defence against the accusation you have heard, I solicit your indulgence, for my natural defect of an imperfect utterance, the disadvantage of which I now most painfully feel. In the evidence, which has been brought forward, you cannot fail to remark the total absence of every thing like positive proof, and that my conviction is sought only upon one or two circumstances feeble in themselves and requiring the aid of strong inference to connect them. I will recall the facts briefly, and first draw your attention to those upon which my prosecutors rely. In the night, between Friday and Saturday, the 4th and 5th of August last, and when eight persons were in my house, it was set on fire clearly by design, and the instrument made use of was a link. It is in evidence that the day before two links had been purchased at an oil-shop, about half a mile distant, by a person habited in a dress similar to one I frequently used to wear, and resembling me in person; the prosecutors assert this person to have been me, and thence infer that I was the author of that fire. Their real evidence does not go beyond this, nothing else applies to me, but I am not the man who purchased those links, and I shall be able to prove this to you. On the night of the fire, a friend had been spending the evening with me, and did not leave me till past eleven o'clock, and I and my wife retired about twelve, leaving our servant to follow. My house was then occupied by myself, my wife, and servant, and my lodger's (who was a Jew) family of four persons, and their servant. On that night the Jew's servant, his sister, and grandmother, slept upon the first-floor, my wife and myself on the second-floor, and my own servant in the back attic. Between one and two o'clock in the morning, a fire broke out in the basement-story, in a closet under the kitchen-stairs, and belonging to the Jews; this fire was discovered, before it had made any progress, by Lazarus, who slept in that part of the house, the very furthest removed from the fire - he alarmed my servant, who awoke my wife and me; the whole house was presently alarmed, and we went down stairs - the fire was extinquished without any difficulty, and was discovered to be occasioned by a link placed in the closet and lighted; Furzeman, the officer, affirmed that he could trace droppings of the link along the passage, from the fire-place, in the Jew's kitchen, to the closet; the Jew's servant had come down-stairs nearly dressed, and had been, a few months ago, suspected of setting on fire a table in the kitchen; this drew suspicion on her; her master, not I, therefore gave her in charge on suspicion of having committed the fire; and she was taken to the watch-house. My wife and servant had sought refuge at the George and Blue Boar inn, and remained there; the rest of the night passed over quietly. - On Saturday morning, Lazarus and myself, and, I believe, most of the persons in the house, attended at Marlborough-street Police-office, on the examination of the Jew's servant. Her master stated his suspicion that she had set fire to the house, and she was remanded for further examination on the following Wednesday, when there did not appear sufficient evidence to warrant her committal on that charge, as the fire had been discovered in time to prevent any serious damage. I did not attach any great weight to it; and certainly thought, with reluctance, of taking the life of an ignorant girl for the crime. I call your attention to the fact that immediately afterwards I wrote to the British Fire-office, in which I am insured, acquainting them with the fire, and the day appointed for the re-examination of the servant of Lazarus, that their solicitor might attend and inquire into the matter. Between the committal of the servant, on the Saturday, and her re-examination, on the following Wednesday, not the least extraordinary circumstance of this mysterious affair was the receipt of two anonymous threatening letters, one by Lazarus and another by myself, apparently by some friend of the girl, accusing Lazarus of knowing all about the fire; the girl has since strongly denied all knowledge of these letters or the writer; they were placed in Furzeman's hand, I believe he still has them; the discovery of the place where the links were bought, by which the fire is said to be communicated, had been an object to all; and on the following Thursday, Lazarus and another Jew, his friend, one Davis, called at my house, and told me they had discovered where the links were bought, and that they were purchased by a man in a grey coat, and with a blue bag. I was glad to hear of the discovery, and they wished me to call with them on Furzeman to consult what was to be done - I was too busy then, but told them I would go on the following day; the next day I went with them to Furzeman's; we saw him, but he was going to Marlborough-street, and said he would go with us to the oilman, at four o'clock. I asked him who the oilman was, who had sold the links, for I did not then know. Furzeman and Davis said. Bradford. I then returned home; the same day a friend, who called upon me, advised me to go and see Bradford - I went with him - he happened to be out - when we got there, we saw his shop-boy, Thomas Dodwell; I told him, who I was, and inquired if he knew the sort of person to whom he sold the links, and the day; the boy said it was a tall young man, about my stature, as far as he could recollect, and dressed in a pepper-and-salt morning-coat, and had a blue bag with him, into which he put the links; but his master had cut down the links, and would know better about them - I and my friend then left. On the following day, Saturday, before four o'clock in the afternoon, the Jew, Davis, called upon me to go to Bradford's - I and my wife went with Davis, and presently we met Lazarus and another Jew - we proceeded towards Bradford's, and I, having my wife with me, objected to go to Furzeman's, but agreed to meet him at Bradford's, which I did in five minutes afterwards - Bradford was questioned, and said he sold two links to a man between eleven and twelve o'clock the preceding day, Friday, and being asked whether he could recollect the person to whom he sold the links, he said, he could not exactly tell, he was more like me than Lazarus, but that he had his face towards the door, and he (Bradford) had only a side view of him - I told them then, I was not out the whole of the day, and could prove it - I was asked by one of the Jews to go home and put on my grey coat, and bring my blue bag with me; I refused, and said, I would not make a puppet-show of myself - we then left - and by the advice of my solicitor, I offered first, two, and afterwards five guineas, to the person who purchased the links of Bradford to come forward, but no one ever appeared; and I afterwards, time after time, pressed at Marlborough-street-office for inquiry and examination; repeated my communication to the Fire-office, and also to that in which the house was insured, and gave to the parish board all the information they asked for. But even without this, mark how every thing tells against my having purchased the links, and how completely I refute the charge - Bradford's, although above half a mile from my house, is within a hundred yards of the house where I was born, and had passed the greater part of my life, and not three hundred yards from the house where I was apprenticed, where I was known to almost every one - and it is singular, that I was not known to Bradford himself - and where my being seen buying these links, would have called forth half a dozen questions at once; but leaving out these improbabilities, it happened I was not out of my own house on the day the links were bought - and particular circumstances make both my servant and shop-boy recollect this, and enable them to be quite positive of my not having been out long after the time the links were hought. - Besides all this, you are to add the absence of all motives on my part; the only one alleged by my prosecutors, is the\\ amountof my insurance - but this motive has been very much misrepresented - the actual value of all my property on the premises, considerably exceeded 2,000l., although that is not equal to the\\ amountof my insurance, and I could not have proved a greater loss, even if I had ventured to claim it - I wish also to draw your attention to this, that it is now three months ago since this fire took place - the purchase of the links was known within a week afterwards, and every fact now urged against me was then known - not the slightest charge, however, was made against me, and a Session at which I might have been tried, has passed. - I do not know the author of the fire - my suspicions I confine in my own breast - but I hope I have proved to you my innocence of the crime I am charged with, and the consciousness of this enables me to wait your verdict without fear - I have been brief in my defence - but I look forward with humble confidence to the result.
He owed me a trifle; I went to ask him for it, and he said he could not pay - I thought the shirts worth about what he owed me, and I took them.
It is a spiteful business - all they have said is false - the sweep is a well - known bad character; he has been tried here for robbing a public-house in Skinner-street.
I was going out in the street, and heard the cry of Stop thief! a man said I had thrown the boots down, but I had never seen them. I had only been in town three days, and have no friends.
I picked up the handkerchief, and when the officer came I threw it down.
I am innocent, and was so astonished at being charged with the crime, that I could not speak. On the day stated I was passing through Long-lane - forty or fifty people were stopping in this court, looking at a man with a pig; the prosecutor seized and accused me of the robbery - it was easy for him to be mistaken as to the hand that robbed him, among so many people huddled together in a court. I neither robbed him, nor did I see the thief.
The young man asked if I was going through Richmond, and asked me to give him a ride, as he was going to a doctor, and wished to make haste, his wife being dangerously ill.
I saw one of the witnesses and a young man showing some clothes; he asked what I would give for the coat, I said, \6s. and my own.\""
The man, whom the officer saw with me, hired me to carry the parcel - he bears a notorious character, and I was led away by him - I met him on the Wednesday, and he said, \My man, will you go to No. 102, Hatton-garden, and fetch a parcel to go to Finchley;\" I went, and they asked if I was the Finchley carrier - I said, No, the carrier stood at the corner - I took the parcel, and delivered it to him - he gave it back to me, and said he would return directly; but he did not - I took it to the Cock public-house, and booked it for Finchley; the next day I met this man - he asked what I had done with the parcel - I said I left it at the Cock - he went there with me, and got it - he put it in a coach, and when we got out at the public-house door, I was taken - I have driven a Greenwich coach seven years, and never was in trouble."
Pearce was the occasion of it - he knew where I got them.
He called his wife, and asked if I was the man who paid the first shilling - she shook her head, and said, No - she then said, \Yes, but wait till my son comes, and if he knows you, you shall be detained;\" the son said I was not the man."
When he was at Guildhall he said they were all safe at four o'clock on Friday, and now he speaks of Thursday.
I carried a parcel for a gentleman from Wood-street to Snow-hill, and as I returned this man charged me with picking a gentleman's pocket in Newgate-street, and then with stealing the box.
Can you swear I am the person?
I have known Jonas for seven years. The day I was taken, I accosted him; he asked if I was not afraid to walk about - I said, \What for?\" and he said, if I would pay him for the ear-rings, it would be all right. I had heard of the robbery before that - I saw it was his view to get money, and I did not deny it, but kept him in conversation, and when we had been some distance, I said I would go to Mr. Cohen's, which I did - I believe Jonas's character is not very honourable."
My hat was on the table, and this handkerchief was in it; the prosecutor said, \I am surprised - I thought he took the ring, and put it into his pocket;\" I then took my handkerchief, to wipe my face, and this ring fell out of it."
On the Friday, May, the foreman, came to me, and said he wanted to take the clock, as Mr. Johnson would not pay his wages; we were then drinking together, and he wanted me to take it; I said I did not like to do so; he then said he would go and shove the door open, but I did not like to go in - May then said,\Go stand at the post,\" and I did; some person brought me the clock - May tried to sell it, but could not. I then took it to my own room."
I took the house of Burge, but I have not slept in it, for the lock was broken, and it was not fit to live in; the door was open, and any one could have put the pump in - I did not put it there, and do not know who did - I had been in lodgings, and that night I was locked out.
When I was before Sir Richard Birnie, neither the prosecutor nor his lad could say who it was - the boy said he could not say, nor could he tell how many he had lost; I said I was sorry I had given him the trouble; he then called his master down, and whispered something to him; I sat down, and took a pinch of snuff; I wished Mr. Mather good night; he returned the compliment, and I went away; the next day the officer came, and said he wanted me; he said he believed it was for an assault, and I went.
When I went to your shop, I asked to look at a pair of trousers, and you asked me to go into the parlour.
Why did not you detect me in taking them, and putting them into my hat?
I was returning from Westminster, - a young lad, who lives near me, was waiting near the shop, and he told me to take this desk, which I did; he told me to run home with it.
He had lost sight of me for a quarter of an hour.
I had been to the Coburg Theatre, and I went to try to get some beef for supper; there were four or five gentlemen there, and this gentleman said I had picked his pocket.
I found them in a dust-hole in the Commercial-road.
I was very much intoxicated, and two other persons agreed with me to have something to eat; I did not know what I did.
He gave me three or four pairs to look at; there was no place to lay them down, and I laid a pair across my hat - they were not in it; I took it up, not knowing they were in it.
I had a drop too much; the boy called to me to stop, and said I had taken a leg of pork; but I never saw it.
I met a young man in the Harrow-road, who asked me to buy the sheet, which I did for 3s.
I picked up this bag at the corner of the street; I was going to take it home.
He was not there at all?
Those two knives I got of Bryan, at a public-house, in Aylesbury-street - he asked me if I knew where he could sell such things; I was going to take him to a man who would buy them, and I was stopped by Mr. and Mrs. Smith.
I went to buy a halfpenny-worth of apples; I saw the money lay on a board, I took it up, and put it into my pocket; the woman came in and said, she had lost some money; I gave it her, and said, I was very sorry.
The horse-cloth I picked up in the street, all over dirt, four years ago - there was a hackney-coach there, and I offered it to the man; he said he would not have it - I washed it several times, and saw the sign of a name on it, but as to whose it was, I could not tell. I gave a hard brush to Morgan, Mr. Shepherd's hostler, for this clothes-brush - I picked up the shovel in the street, and as I had met two dung-carts, I thought they had dropped it - there were several pails about, and I took this one home.
It was given to me by one of the servants, who said it was Edward's - I took it to him; he said it was his, but I might keep it.
I was inebriated, and did not know what I did.
I did not take it; I heard a cry, and went to see what was the matter.
I did it through distress.
I asked the price, and said my wife was at the door, and I would show it to her - I went to the door - there was a disturbance, and she had gone into the next shop but one - I was going to her when he seized me - it was not under my coat.
I picked up a piece of paper with this bacon in it.
A gentleman gave it me to hold.
A respectable man asked me to carry this for 1s.
I thought they were tailor's cuttings, or I would not have taken them.
I met some friends, and drank too much; I did not know where I was going; I was taken ill, and went into this house for a necessary purpose, the door being open, and I was taken.
My wife and three women gave Hall 7s. 6d.; if he has perjured himself in one thing, he will in another.
I saw this bag near the Woolpack public-house, and picked it up.
Did he not say he would make it up?
I never had it.
I was going through the place on the 18th; there were some pieces of wood there - my door was open, and persons might have taken what they liked there.
I saw it tied with a piece of string, about a yard from the curbstone. I saw no one coming; I took it up and walked away.
I saw them at a door - I knocked, and nobody answered.
I did not know whose it was.
Some boys desired me to go and ask for a bladder, and to take the money out of the till.
I was intoxicated, and went into her room by mistake, but took nothing.
I was going along, and saw the pigs; I only threw a stone at them, and then went to work.
I have been in that woman's house several times since - she was asked if it was me - she said, No.
She gave me that basket in exchange for another - I bought the handkerchief.
I know nothing of the saw - I bought the plane in the street.
I did not know I had them, as I had not opened my trunk - the book was not locked up.
What time was it?
Did you ever see me before?
Will you swear to the sovereign?
Gentlemen, can you believe such a man - he says he can swear to the sovereign - if I had robbed him, would I have given him the goods - the truth is, I had just come from Bristol; I met a man, who sold me these things for 18s., and, having no money, I sold them to this man.
I was going towards Bishopsgate - I was running at the head of some people, and was stopped.
I did not say they were mine, but that a young man gave me them to mind.
A countryman promised me two bottles of gin - I went on board to get it - I was pursued by an officer, and escaped across the tier, and in a quarter of an hour, they came and said I had robbed them - my hat had fallen into the water.
I never took a candle; the officer let me remain at home all night, on promising to come in the morning, which I did - all the candles I had, these men gave me - Bain has called me up twice to work after the Excise officer came round.
A box of fat stood in the yard; the carpenter sent me for a box lid - I went for it in the dark; the doors were open. Bain called out, \Who is there?\" I said, \"Me;\" the soap had been there for months - Mr. Birke said he had lost none."
A man asked if I could row - I said, Yes, and he fetched the oars, but where from I do not know.
I did not know they were stolen.
I had not had the carpet.
I am compelled to state that Pearce never was my wife, nor was I in London till about five years ago; I never acknowledged to Finlayson that Pearce was my wife - all our conversation was about my running away. She was married to a man named Jarvis, but that was not me; I had a cousin named Jarvis - he came to town, and he was Pearce's husband; he went to America - she was visiting in Kent - we became acquainted, and we cohabited - I have a son and daughter, but I am not her husband. Whitehurst was my first wife, and I am proud to own it.
Did I not pay you 8s., and was to pay 3s. a week for them?
I bought it.
When I was placed in the counting-house. I found the books much confused - there was no making out the accounts - I told Mr. Cooke it was necessary to have more clerks; he said, I must get through them as well as I could; I have stated to him the possibility of errors - he said, the customers, would point them out; our accounts were about 400,000l. a year - I was alone, except a boy to examine invoices; we at times found money due to persons; and Mr. Cook has directed me to make the account balanced, as it was more likely they were correct than us - as to this cheque, it appears to have been mislaid, and when found, was applied to their own account.
The Bible and Prayer-book lay on the mantel-piece, and inadvertently I put the Bible on the basket, but not into it. I have Bibles and Prayer-books enough.
Was the person standing with his back or his face towards you?
Was the person standing at the corner?
Did not you swear at the office that your sister was stopped directly she crossed the road?
Where were you?
Did you see the ladies coming up George-street?
Where were you when you heard the cry?
On the 12th of June I was walking down George-street - a man laid hold of me, and said he wanted me, and his brother officer had been insulted in St. Giles'; I said I knew nothing about it: he took me to Bow-street; a gentleman came and looked at me in a little time, and Duke said, \You know what is the matter now?\" I said No, and about eight o'clock I was taken before the Magistrate, and remanded till Monday. The first witness came to the House of Correction, with Mr. Beeby, a young gentleman, and another; every body in the yard was told to stand round - the young lady looked round, and said she believed a young man named Anderson was the person; Beeby said, \"Put on your hat, and turn round; he did so, and she said she believed he was the person. At my examination on Monday the lady and two or three more witnesses came against me, but none of them swore to me; I was remanded for another week; then Adams and the lady's sister swore I was the person. Now the first witness says she saw me standing at the corner of Phoenix-street, with my head down, that I snatched her watch and ran, and she lost me in turning the third street; the next witness swears she saw me at the corner, holding my head up, that any body might see my face, and when her sister screamed she followed, and in turning the third street she saw a person lay hold of me, and yet the sister did not see that. One witness swears I ran up George-street and the ladies swear I ran down Church-street; I could not run both ways at once. The next witness swears that as I was coming through Ivy-street, the ladies came round and met me, but they say they followed me. God knows I am innocent."
As I came down stairs I met a Life Guardsman, and stood aside to let him pass. I never said there was a man behind the door in the room - I had a job in the country, and went to it.
A young woman asked me to go down the area and enquire for Mr. Johnson. I found the gate and the door open. I knocked at two rooms beside the pantry several times, but nobody answered. I did not take the watch - the gentleman said there were two
robberies done there before, and he should make me a thief, and he put it into my breast - it was not found on me, he had it in his own hand.
I was going down Wild-street - a man asked me to go up to the second-floor back room and inquire for a man named Wood. which I did; and in the passage I took up this bundle - the prosecutrix opened the street door, and said \Go up stairs;\" I went up by her order, and she had me taken."
My master sent me to the banking-house, to assist the bricklayer; I laid my own coat in the passage, and in the evening, it being dark, I took this instead of it; I went back for my own on Saturday evening, and on Sunday I was going to take this back.
I have nothing to say.
I did not put it into the hat.
It is altogether false; if you will search his character he has a brother in Newgate now, and I do not think he is any better himself. A man ran up the alley, and dropped the shawl; I picked it up, and went to show it to the man.
I used to work with a young man, who said he would get me a place; he told me to take this plank, and said if I did not he would half kill me.
Mr. Tucker took the book from me, and being deprived of that I could not make up my accounts.
I was walking in the fields and was suddenly taken ill - I went into an empty house by this place, for a necessary purpose, and in about five minutes this man came in, and said \Here he is, come out,\" and charged me with the robbery."
I loved my wife, and if I had one fault, it was having too strong an affection for her - my whole soul was devoted to make her happy; I was never happy out of her company, and never spent an evening from her, except when business called me; had I contemplated murder, should I have fetched the sister to give
evidence against me - it is contrary to nature, which dictates self-preservation; I should have quitted home instead of going for assistance - it was the furthest thing from my thoughts; I would have given my soul to have called her back to life. You will find by reference to the medical evidence there was not sufficient to cause death; therefore, reflect - weigh well - consider, and if any doubt arises, I trust you will give an unfortunate prisoner the benefit of it.
I came by it as I stated to the officer.
I was going up Grub-street, on my way to the New London Bridge, and just as I passed the shop door, a young man threw something down at my feet; the person collared me, and charged me with this robbery, of which I am entirely innocent.
It is a general rule to allow 1s. or 6d. for taking a cask home, and having nothing to do, I was going to take it home.
I am upwards of seventy years old, and have worked hard to support my family. I never got a penny dishonestly in all my days - I have worked for every factory in London. I hate the very thoughts of a thief and of a receiver - it is very well known that I have brought several things forward concerning government. I can prove it by a solicitor, at Somerset House, and by several officers, who have known me upwards of forty years that I never robbed a man of a single farthing - I have been ill upwards of three years, and cannot get out of bed without my wife or daughter putting my stockings on - having had a hurt across my loins; and is it possible I could break open a house with violence? I do not know where the house is - I declare by my Maker, that I do not know that I was ever in the street - this Vann, when I saw him, said \Solomon, where are you going?\" I said, to the Circus; he said, \"Come, treat us, before you go in;\" I gave him a glass of gin. I treated him twenty times in Whitechapel - he said, \"Solomon, have you got any blunt in your pocket?\" I was at large every day, and can point out twenty people who saw me daily about Bishopsgate-street and Whitechapel. I was in-doors till between ten and eleven o'clock in the morning, and when I came home I knew nothing about the box - it is hard I should be put here for things I am innocent of."
I have been five years in his Majesty's service, and received several contusions in my head, which, when I drink, render me incapable of knowing what I am about; I had been drinking all the afternoon with Summers, who lodges at the prosecutor's; he left me to get his tea, and desired me to wait till he returned; he did not return, and I went after him - I suppose I went into his room, and put on the coat, thinking it was his. I was unconscious of any thing till I found myself in the watch-house.
I am nearly sixty years old, and have been ill for twelve months, and was never in prison, as to the bottles, I leave that entirely to my Counsel.
I am innocent - if I had been guilty I should not have gone, and laid down within a hundred yards of the house; I made no resistance.
That I delivered the parcel, I acknowledge - but I believe there are a thousand cases in London similar to that in which I was placed; it is nothing uncommon for parcels to be delivered by strangers; it was delivered to me by a stranger, who had all the appearance of a guard (belonging, as he told me, to the Edinburgh coach) he offered me 6d. to deliver it to the lady; distress would not have caused me to do it, had I known I was doing wrong; I have been made the dupe of another man.
I offered to sell Moon the watch itself the evening before; I gave a person the duplicate, who gave me this one, and 1s. 6d., saying he had pawned it in the vicinity of his own lodging.
When was I apprehended.
Did you not say if I would return the 2s. you would let me go?
He followed me up Fleet-street, called me into the passage, shut the door on me, and sent for an officer.
I am prevented from having legal advice, having assigned all my property to my wife.
I just wish to ask if it was a gig?
I saw the boots lay, and took them up; the witness came up to me, and I told him where I found them.
I was out of work, and a person came and told me to carry this up to the Yorkshire Stingo, and he would give me 6d.
I was coming up Cheshunt-street, and a man offered me this property for 16s., which I gave him.
I had been out of work, and had but 2d. on the Saturday, which I bought a loaf with; and then I took the old coat and sold it for 6d. - as I did not know what use it was to my father.
I was engaged by the other man to take them to Mr. McPherson, and he told me the very words which I used.
My employer engaged me to do some writing at the prosecutor's. I asked for money to get the gold, he said I must get the money to get it. I had no money - I did not pawn the watch.
I am a jobbing porter. I was going by, and a young man asked me to carry these things for 6d.
I do not deny being with him - he said he was a stranger; I sat on the opposite side of the table to him, and the drunken man at his side; I got the farthings at Mrs. Seely's, where I live; I am innocent.
I was in Holborn; a person gave me 3d. to carry it.
I saw it laying on the ground, and took it up.
I was coming from the play, I never had it.
I never had it; I did not own the handkerchief - he got up in the night, and went backwards.
I did it from want.
A decent man offered me 6d. to take it to No. 8, North-street.
I paid this man for my lodging, and he took every thing I had, and pawned it; I took the shirt and handkerchief to get something to eat.
It was not me.
The lady said it was a red one.
I have a witness who picked it up.
When I had my back to him, how
could I take the watch from him. I am no relation to Ikey Solomon and trust my name will not prejudice me.
I picked it up.
This lady came up with two children, and asked them if I was the boy, they said Yes.
I had been to my sister's - a mob gathered; the gentleman had lost his seals, and was going to take me, as he said he thought I was the person.
He was very tipsy, and asked me to come and keep him company; he had several glasses of gin and porter, and went out several times - he came in, and said he would take a nap, told me to take his money out of his pocket, and take care of it for him, which I did; this was at four - I sat at his side till seven o'clock; I then awoke him - he said he was robbed; I said, \No, you gave me your money.\" Witness. I never gave him the money, nor did he say so."
A man passed me, and dropped it - I took it up.
I took them to do a little work for myself.
I took the aloes as medicine for the horse. GUILTY . Aged 25.
Did I bring it to you?
A young lad told me to take them.
I did not take it.
He said he picked this woman up, and she robbed him.
Were you not taking up for passing bad money once?
I bought a good many of them; I meant to have restored them as soon as I could.
Have I not borrowed a coat of yours?
Having borrowed them before, I took them this morning when he was out, and meant to return them in the evening; I was asked for some money and pawned them, intending to redeem them in the evening.
I did not run away - I said if she could prove she had lost one I would give her one, if Davis would be answerable for it - as I could prove it was mine.
I was not out of the shop at all. I only opened the door for light.
I met a man at Stepney, who asked me to carry them to Cable-street.
I picked it up; and only went to ask him if it was silver.
I had been to market, to carry some fruit for a person, and was coming home, when he took me.
I never had a blue coat on; I did not take them, and was not in company with any body.
I was coming from Billingsgate,
and met this woman - I went to a wine-vaults with her; soon after she came into my room, and sent my child for liquor, nine or ten times, and was quite intoxicated; she said she had spent all her husband's pension money, and desired me to pawn her shawl to get him a dinner.
The basket was in the yard - I did not go into the house for it.
I picked them up.
I am a licenced-hawker, and went out with a man who carries goods for me; I met my brother and a friend; we went to the Rodney's Head, in Robert-street, and left my bundle with the landlord; I sent my man to get some steaks - we dined, and about half-past four o'clock the prosecutor and another person came and went into the parlour; a man named Bond then came in, took up my goods, and carried them into the parlour, to this gentleman. The other person came into the tap-room, and said he hoped I should not be offended, but he had left a piece of linen and a shawl with the gentleman; they had cost me above 4l. - I said he had no business with my goods. I went into the parlour - my goods were on the table; I went to pack them up - the prosecutor said, \These goods are to go with me, as I have paid a sovereign for some gloves,\" and pointed to the man who had spoken to him in the street; I said he was a stranger, and unless he paid for them I would not let them go; he went away, returned at half-past five o'clock, and inquired if the person who was to sell him the gloves had returned- they said he had not, but he would be there - he then asked if I would give him the sovereign which he had paid; I said I had had no sovereign, and would give nothing - he went away, returned about six o'clock, and said again,\"Will you give me the sovereign?\" I said No - he then said if the gloves were not sent that evening, he would next morning see further about it; I heard no more till I was taken in charge. I knew the man who sold the gloves had been arrested, and sent to the Marshalsea - he said nothing about the bundle when he came back. I never said, would the swell take his money."
I went for the hay, and some person at Fox's took the cart, and put the wood into it- the hay was put on the top.
Did you see me take it?
Could you see me take it, when you were two yards before me?
It was thrown in my face by some person who ran by - I caught it and went to run; that gentleman stopped me.
I picked it off the ground.
Pope gave me them to pawn; the other property from time to time, he gave me to make up at home.
I at first had work from Mr. Borsley, and every night I took work home to do from nine o'clock to twelve; if he had brought my book it would show that I had done work for him.
A man, who looked like a bricklayer, told me to carry the stove to Cursitor-street, and he would give me a job.
Who was down stairs first in the morning?
The watch I raffled my brother had won.
A person gave it me, and asked me to leave it outside.
I met a man, who gave it me to sell for 5s., as he was going into the country - I do not know who he was.
I went into a public-house - a woman treated me with gin, and then asked me to pawn these things.
On Whit Monday I had a holiday, and was going home with two young men, who I had met at a public-house - one of them said, \Here he comes!\" there was a cry of Stop thief! they ran, and somebody pushed me down - but I know nothing of the watch."
I bought the tooth-brushes of Mr. Goodlad, of Hatton-garden - some of the others were booked by Mr. Kent, to one of his men - the others I bought of Mr. Roberts in January.
I found it under a tree.
I received a sovereign from Mr. White, which I changed; I saw the prosecutor laying tipsy in the street, and the watchman poking him about with a stick; I assisted him up - he said he lived in Wild-street - I took him there, and he said he lived in Gate-street - I took him there, and again into Wild-street - he fell down; I thought I could leave him, when the watchman stopped me; the prosecutor was also taken to the watch-house; he said in the morning that he did not know what money he had.
I was laying in the field, and saw this bag on the ground - I took it up - Dow came and said, \Well - we will take this one.\""
I said I had not robbed the man; I gave up the money.
I was found there, but I did not steal the articles.
There were several other boys there - I saw some of them fumbling at his pocket.
Where were you?
I had been on an errand when the gentleman took me.
You took it off the pavement?
I went to the church for some boards, and took it by mistake, for one I had lost.
The handkerchief is not his; if he would look at it, he would see that it is darned, and burnt.
The comb and knife were taken from another man.
I travel the country, and make exchange of goods with other hawkers, and buy them in any part - I can neither read nor write.
I was going to run behind a coach, heard a cry of Stop thief! stopped, and was taken.
I know nothing of the robbery.
I was coming over Blackfriars'-bridge, and saw the box in the kennel - I picked it up, wiped it with my handkerchief, and put it into my breast pocket.
I am a long way from home - I do not belong to London.
Did I go further from the door than opposite it?
He said he would give me a lift, and do every thing for me that lay in his power.
I went to get measured for a pair of shoes, and was informed the person who was to make them lived up there; when I found my mistake, knowing Mr. Snow, and having drank with him at the public-house opposite, I went in, and asked him if he would have something to drink; he gave me a bottle, and as I was going to fetch some liquor, I kicked against the pillows in the passage. I have a wife and family, and nobody can feel more than I do my unfortunate situation.
Dean is the man who brought the horse to my place, which I believe Mr. Blunden knows - he came to my house on the 29th of July, with a horse, and I gave information of it to his father, and he sent to tell me to take care of the horse and his son, for he had a friend arranging the matter with Mr. Peck, which was the cause I kept the horse; I never offered to sell it. I took a cob down to show a friend of Mr. Barber's, and I rode this gelding myself; I never intended to sell the gelding. I never showed it for sale to any individual - it was seen publicly in plenty of places.
When I was taken the prosecutor was intoxicated.
I was walking alongside my horse, saw the man lying, and stopped my horse in a moment.
I had a sailor's chest to carry to the Pelican-stairs, for 1s. 9d., and was not near Billingsgate.
I was on the edge of the pavement - a genteel dressed man came up and said, \Carry this to Aldgate-pump, and I will satisfy you.\""
I was hired.
I had no mark about me.
I had been to Cock-lane, on an errand to my sister - the officer came and took me - I said, \What do you want?\" they took me to the Star: the prosecutor was leaning on the counter, quite intoxicated - they asked if I was the person, and he shook his head: they took me to the Compter, and found nothing on me."
I have a witness to call.
I have nothing to say further than that the horse was not mine; I only interfered to take the money, as there was a dispute between them; I carried the money home to him.
On Monday, the 15th of October, Holden, my master, came to my father's house at five o'clock in the morning, and asked me to take two horses to the Red Lion public-house, Enfield-high way, and he would give me half a crown; he told me to come towards the White Hart public-house, and when I got there, these two horses were there, and Hilt; he gave me half a crown to pay the turnpike and my expences, and the rest for myself; he told me to take the horses, wait there till he came, and tell the horse-keeper to feed them, and he would pay. Hilt came with me as far as Lee-bridge-road; the ostler asked me whose they were - I said Holden's, my master, of Hackney. On the same evening, Holden came down with another horse, and told me to stop all night with him; next morning he asked me to go to Royston fair, and he would pay me for it; we went on Tuesday night, and on Wednesday he changed one away for a horse. On Thursday he left these horses at Batten's - he paid for every thing; he bought another horse about a mile and a half from Battens', and rode home; he left me that night, and on Friday night sent to me to go to Batten's, and tell him he should not come for them till Monday night, or Tuesday morning, which I did, and was taken before a Magistrate; he gave me 13s. for what I did for him.
They are swearing false, every one of them - Mr. Emms, that boy's master, can tell what he said about it.
I pawned them through distress. I had promised to pay a week's rent that night, but it was too late before I received the money; I should have got the things out on the Saturday night, and made it good.
I had lived with Mr. Haddon, and had been up to Sloane-square, to see a young man; as I was coming back a young man was walking with this beef, and he asked me to hold it while he went into a house: we walked on, and the prosecutor came and took me - I started when I heard it was stolen. The other man stood talking with them. I had time to get away if I had chosen.
I did not know they were stolen; the prosecutor came, and collared me, and I ran from him, to go after the man I got them from.
I met a man, and went to drink with him - I laid out part of the money, got drunk, and lost most of it. I have been miserable ever since.
I was not near the gentleman; he said he would not give charge of me, not knowing me.
I am sorry for it.
I did not take his money from him - I picked it off the ground.
I was standing there - a lad came up, and asked me to sell the fowl for him; I went to try: he said, \There are two persons following us, and I stole that;\" he went away."
I was coming up Holborn, and fell in company with Frederick Bentley and James Rush; I asked where they lived - they said they had nothing to do; that they had been out two nights, and had a good mind to steal something to get a lodging; Rush took the shawl - they ran, and I followed, fearing I should be taken; he was showing it to Bentley, by the gateway.
Did not the other man ask the price?
I did not take it.
I am innocent. I never saw Smith till to-night, and never wrote a letter to extort money from Mr. Salisbury, or for any other purpose. Smith is a false witness.
My mother washed for his man; he said he had no means of paying her, but on Saturday night he said, if she would send on Sunday, he would give her some vegetables; at the watch-house the prosecutor asked if he could punish me and not him, and he sent him away.
As you took me to the office, did not you say, \You had better plead guilty, and it will be more in your favour?"
The officer came into the public-house, shook hands with me, and said, \I want to speak to you;\" I came out, and he said he thought I had stolen some flannel. He took me to the shop, and said I had better confess; I said I knew nothing about it."
I found it under the mashes, and was tempted to take it.
Did I not say I had bought it?
Can you swear I stole it?
I bought it of a shipmate who lodged in the house, a quarter of an hour before I came away.   Witness. There were two lads lodged in the house; one of them came home drunk that night, and said, \Bill is off with the watch.\" The prisoner had not seen me use it; his shipmate could get to the room."
I saw it at the door, and took it up.
What they have stated is all false; a man ran on before me; the coachman could not swear I took it.
Did you not say, if I gave up the ticket, you would not proceed?
I can prove I was in bed and asleep at the time.
I took them, but they were a little bit down from the door, and I had not a bit of shoe on my foot.
A young man gave it me to carry to Whitecross-street, and said he would give me something for it.
My master sent me with a pair of shoes to Ivy-lane; I was returning home; a lad accosted me, and asked me to hold the desks, which I did; the gentleman came up in a minute, and took me; I put them down to run after the lad, but I was taken.
I was in Holborn, at the end of a street near the prosecutor's shop; a man came to me, and asked if I would buy a book; I said, \No, I have no money to spare, and I am out of work;\" he pressed it upon me; I at last gave him 2s. 6d. for it; he said, \"There is a piece of paper on the back, I wish you could take it off\" - I then suspected all was not right - I had come from Shrewsbury but a few weeks before, to find work."
I received the stockings from my mother, nine months ago - her name is Mary Peterson.
Another boy took it out of the basket.
I was coming from my work, and saw this book laying down - I took it up.
Two bigger boys told me to go in, and take it.
I had been up many nights with a child, who was dying, and I had pawned the shirt off my back; seeing this door open, I was tempted to take the coat; the child died on the Sunday.
I was going after a drove of beast, and saw a man hide this bundle in a hedge. I went and took it.
Did you not offer a boy 5s. to say I was in it?
I ran to get a ride, and saw the handkerchief lay where the gentleman put their feet.
I saw the man intoxicated, and assisted him a little way; the money was my own.
I went to have a pint of beer; several of these Germans were fighting; I stood there with the rest, and presently this man said I must know something about his 3s.
Joseph Pearson and Philip Allen gave them to me as water-cresses.
He looked in my face, and said \It was not him.\" Witness. I had not lost sight of him - I did look in his face; I picked up the tongue."
I was eight weeks in the hospital at Oxford, and could not work.
He said at Hatton-garden that he and his brother officer were on the other side of the way, and then that he was behind us. I think he was in liquor.
I turned down a court for a private purpose - Cadby came and took me; there was a lad about my size in a brown coat and a cap - he threw the handkerchief down at my feet; the officer let me go, and took hold of him; he got away, and the officer took me.
I met a lad, who asked me to carry it; he seemed fatigued, and said I should have 6d. to carry it to Globe-road.
I was on the premises that day, as I knew a bricklayer there; I went again, and they gave me in charge.
A man said he would give me 6d. to pawn them.
I said I knew nothing of the coats; I did not say I had sold them. Witness. He said he could not find the man he had sold them to.
The place was open - any body might take them; I had to attend a trial at the King's Bench, for which I have not been paid - I could have taken plate or any thing.
The shoes laid in the street - I took them up, and gave them to the young man.
On the Thursday after the robbery a gentleman, named Smith, sold me a watch for 3l. 5s. and I sold it to Levi for 3l. 6s.; I had sold him several in a fair way of trade, but the watch produced is not the one I sold him: I would not sell one for 3l. 6s. which he could sell for 4l. 15s.
I brought these saws from Birmingham.
I was crossing from Hanway-yard to Great Russel-street, and was taken.
I heard the cry Stop thief! and ran to see what was the matter.
A groom gave me the harness to sell. I went to the shop about selling it - he had been there two or three days before, and I asked if a person had not been there about selling harness.
I left my master's at a quarter to nine o'clock, went to a public-house, and met one Wilson, who gave me some brandy and rum, which took away my senses; how I came into the house I cannot tell.
He said three young lads came to buy a pair of shoes - I bought them of a young man, who said his father had sent him out to sell them.
I did not take them - I had them in my possession.
Master said he would let me go, if I told where they were.
It was extreme distress drove me to do it; my father knows that.
I have a family, which I hope you will consider.
I was going along with a knot - a gentleman took me to the house, opened the door, and told me to take the copper to his dwelling-house - he could not open the door, and gave me 2 1/2d. to get a pint of beer, and return in half an hour, as he could get in at the back of the premises - I went in half an hour, and he let me in.
I met a woman, who asked me to go to order the sweeps; there was nobody there; I went in, and this young lad came.
I was coming down Fleet-street, and saw this board in the carraige way - it was all muddy, and I saw no mark on it; but when the officers took it they mopped it over, and found the brand-mark.
I was in Fleet-market; a boy ran before me; the officer called Stop thief! I ran - the officer pushed against me, and took hold of me; two or three gentleman said, I was not the person, for they saw him run up Fleet-lane, with the handkerchief in his hand.
I saw the shoes near the door; I took hold of one pair, and said \I don't suppose they are more then 9s. 6d.\" I had no thought of stealing them."
A man in a fustian coat stood at the street; a man crossed over, and gave him two combs- he dropped one, and I took it up; he came and said it belonged to him; he ran away, and the officer came and took me.
A man came to me about six o'clock, and asked me to buy a pair of shoes for 3s. 6d. - I gave him 2s. 6d. for them, and put them on. I saw this man sitting at the door, and went to him to take him home- the woman came and asked if I knew him.
I cannot tell how I came there, nor how I came to town - I can give no account of it.
I am not guilty of the charge - the words were put into the child's month at the office.
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury - Overwhelmed as I am at the deplorable situation in which I now stand before you, will, I am fearful, preclude the possibility of my revealing to you what I have suffered, both in body and mind, in consequence of the treatment I have experienced from the prosecutor, whose conduct towards me, I trust I shall be able to convince you, has been most infamous. Gentlemen, I have invariably had the most ardent affection for my wife, to whom I have been married twelve years and upwards; we have always lived most happily together, until the month of September last, when the prosecutor, by some means or other, began to cultivate her acquaintance; of which I received, from time to time, the most decisive and undoubted proofs; when, of course, that happiness which I had so many years enjoyed in her society, I was deprived of, which affected my spirits to that degree, that I have at times been in a state of distraction; I have, on many occasions, remonstrated with the prosecutor, in consequence of the improper behaviour towards me - indeed, I even found him with my wife, in my own house, which confirmed the reports of my neighbours, as to the criminal intercourse which had been going on for three months between them, - and I feel assured there are several persons in Court who will hear testimony to what I have asserted, and, above all, satisfy you that I have always been considered an honest, sober, diligent, and humane man. I am aware, Gentlemen, I cautioned the prosecutor on one occasion, never to presume to make any overtures to my wife, as he had done before, for the purpose of inducing her to elope with him - otherwise, I held out threats of inflicting that punishment upon him which he richly deserved; but I most solemnly deny that I had any other object in view at the time than that of intimidating or deterring him from visiting my house, and thereby preventing him taking the advantage of my absence from home. At the time, or a few minutes before I was accused of having struck at the prosecutor, I had been taking some refreshment, and the knife I used on the occasion, I could not have been aware I had in my hand, owing to the aggravating conduct of the prosecutor, which so much irritated my feelings as to cause me to strike him, when I must have been in a state of irritation, which was caused by the prosecutor placing himself in my way, laughing and jeering at me, or I could not have committed such a henious offence as that for which I now stand at this bar to answer, and which, should the prosecutor's expectations be realized, will banish me from my native country, or consign me to an ignominious death. Gentlemen, I can only add, that, upon your taking all the previous circumstances to which I have adverted, into your serious consideration, coupled with the evidence which you will hear in support of it, I feel confident that you will say that the injury which the prosecutor has received was not premeditated.
The order was given to me - I do not know who wrote it.
Did you see a man give it to me?
I saw a man take it; I followed, and took it from him; he said to the coachman, \Is this your coat.\""
I found it in the Kent-road.
I was coming from my sister's; I heard a cry, and saw two persons running; I saw two persons run against the prosecutor; I went down the street - there were three or four different turnings, and the thief must have run up there.
How long before had you seen the cloth?
In passing the corner of the court, a man came to me, and said, \Take this to the second shop, and tell them it comes from Mr. Hume, and he wants to sell it\" - I was not certain whether that was the shop, and came back to look if Mr. Bennett's name was on the door; the woman said, it was hers - I said,\"A young man at the corner gave it me to sell\" - I told her to go to the door, to look at him, which she did."
At my first examination that paper was opened, and both the Magistrate and Mr. Imeson took a pinch of it - it is very strange Mr. Imeson should not have looked at the paper - it was never observed, and Mr. Imeson said there was nothing by which it could be identified.
I heard a call of Stop thief! and came up; a young man ran past me, and in half a minute this young lady seized me.
My Lord, and Gentlemen, I beg your attention to the following statement: - I am a painter by trade, and found it very prejudicial to me, and I found I must get another employ; I then opened a shed in the coal and green-grocery line, which my wife is carrying on. On the night in question, I had occasion to go to Oxford-street to purchase some coals; I went to Lower Berkeley-street, and saw two men, whom I knew well, on the steps of the door; I passed on, and they came down and passed me, and met a third person coming towards me, and I heard the two men say to the third, that it would be of no use, they could not get the door open; I went on to the corner of the street, and stood there eight or ten minutes; that might be twenty minutes after eight o'clock; the men came to the corner, went back, and walked the street two or three times; one of them got over the area-gate, and went down the kitchen steps; he came up in a minute, and I should not then have had time to get to the house; a woman came past, and asked what I was waiting for - I said, \Watching three men;\" she said she saw, while she was there, a man come out of the area, and that she was going by them, and hoped they would not touch her; we walked by them, and she, as well as I, saw two of their faces, and could swear to them; we walked on to the corner of the square - she said her husband was in the country, and had a six months' job, and she was going down to him, which is the reason I cannot bring her - if I could have got bail I could have gone to the shop her husband works for, and heard where she was - the persons then came from the door and walked entirely away - I watched a few minutes, and then the watchman came up - I waited still, and found they did not return - I then went on to Duke-street, met the three men coming round again, and going towards the house - I followed them, and when they got to the house, two of them ran up the steps - they had not been up three minutes before they came down, walked a few steps, and then ran off - I crossed and rang the bell to tell what I had seen - I then saw the handle of a bright key in the door - I ran up the steps, rang the bell hard, and put my hand on the key - whether I opened it or not I do not know, but I found the door going from me - whether it was open, or I was the occasion of opening it, I do not know, but I thought the persons inside might have pulled the lock back; but I appeal to that Judge, who alone can judge the heart, that my foot was not in the house - the witnesses rushed out - one had a poker - there were repeated blows levelled at me - they broke my hat, and the poker fell - I then told Irish it was of no use, and to desist - the watchman was called, and I given in charge, and at the office made the same defence I have now, and said I had a friend who would give bail for 200l. or 300l. - that I knew the two men, and could leave their description there, and if an officer was granted me, I could find them - the Magistrate said he thought it a fit case to go before a Jury, but if I had friends who would do what I had said, surely they would come forward on my trial, and prove my innocence - I said if I had bail I could produce the woman who knew the two men - I afterwards sent the officer to ask the Magistrate, to grant me bail, which was denied me."
Directly the door was open about eight inches, I felt it suddenly pulled away from me - I had no time to speak to him - I showed no resistance, but to protect myself from his attack - the house had been attempted three Saturdays before; I could have proved I was at home on those occasions.
I went to look after a ship, and on Thursday my father came and took me.
Weedon brought the sheep to my house; he came to me, and I let him a room, and next day took my cart to get his goods - I went into a public-house; Weedon and his brother came in, and sat there from four to ten o'clock; we then got into my cart, and Weedon drove it home, and when we got within a quarter of a mile, he hoisted me out of the cart, as I was tipsy, and asked if I knew what was in it - I said No; he then said, \It is a woolley bird;\" I felt in the cart, and said it was a sheep; he said he had picked it up, and it would do for his dogs - I said, next day, \"We shall have a piece of work about it;\" he said No; he skinned it next day."
I was going down Tottenhamcourt-road, and heard the cry of Stop thief! I instantly ran across into Tavistock-street, and was taken by the patrol - knowing myself innocent, I would not go without having a coach, as I did not like to be disgraced; I have lately come from Ireland, and have nobody to my character.
On the morning I was apprehended I pawned my child's frock for 1s. to buy provisions, the duplicate of which was found on me; it is not likely if I committed the robbery I should have been in want of 1s.
I was in the boat by myself for two hours, while he was gone for an officer.
I bought it nine weeks ago, at Charing-cross, and gave 1s. and a pot of beer for it; I left it while I went to look for some lime - they came, and took me for nothing; I never was served so by any one, By the blessing of God, I shall tell the King's brother how I have been served.
I was very much in liquor.
This bundle laid on the stairs -I went up to see my sister; the woman came and took hold of it; this lad then came and took hold of me - I passed him, went out, and he called Stop thief!
I bought it of a man for 12s., thinking to get a few shillings.
Did not the prosecutor say he would do every thing for me, as I was going to get a ship?
I never had the coats - the boots the prosecutor lent me the evening before.
I picked it up just as I was going in at the door.
I picked these things up just behind two waggons.
What dress had I on when I came up to you?
Did you not say you were not certain whether it was that day fortnight or that day week?
I was working that day from five o'clock in the morning till twelve at night, at my landlady's request, but she is not here.
The things were close to the door, and the door was not fastened.
I heard the alarm, and saw a boy run across Compton-street; he dropped this bag, and I took it up - I put it into my hat, was running after him, and was taken.
I am quite innocent - there were two dozen seals put on the counter.
I gave my address, \No. 4, Edward-street, Wardour-street.\" Witness. He said King-street, Holborn - I repeated it after him, and wrote it down immediately."
I never saw the watch, and I never called at Emanuel's at all.
I was rather tipsy, and went into the parlour to have a bit of sleep there, as there was a noise in the tap-room.
Had you any reason to suspect my honesty?
What did I tell you I had lost?
Did I not ask you to go down with me to find it, and you beat me away?
Did you not ask me the first time to treat you in the watch-house with something to drink?
Oxley saw me the first time at a quarter to two o'clock; I had been down where he was three times - he beat me away; I must have broken open the house, gone there three times, took the property, and got to the watch-house in less than an hour, which is a thing impossible for any body to do - I had the property put on me at the place I lost my handkerchief in; I could say so if I stood before a higher tribunal than this - if I had been guilty, should I have staid two hours near the place to be taken? Smith has been to the house, and found the flute which I lost.
I was asked to carry it for a man as far as Finsbury-square for sixpence.
The gentleman said he had lost his watch, but did not see who took it, and he thought it was me, but after a bit he was so intoxicated that he swore to me.
That thing in the basket is an umbrella stretcher - I did not think I was committing any offence - I kicked the jacket before me, and picked it up at the impulse of the moment - I was going to the Post-office, and have no doubt as I came back I should have given it to the street-keeper, to find the owner; I question whether I have committed any offence, for it laid on the pavement, and the law does not allow any person to take advantage of his own wrong.
The officer took a man to the watch-house, and he got away, and on the 12th of June he took me for the other man. 
Witness. There was no other man with him; when I took him I left him with a watchman named Colley, who walked out, and the prisoner escaped; I took him again afterwards, and am certain he is the man, by the scar on his face - I went to look for him at Crouch-end; he was found at Tottenham, and brought to us.
When I was in the public-house next the office, he sat along side of me, and said if I would give him a sovereign he would not swear to me - I said, \I am innocent, and have no sovereign.\" Witness. That is not true, upon my oath."
I know nothing of the coals; there are lads in the canal who belong to barges, frequently out of births; they are glad to get into barges to make a fire and sleep there - I have gone often and seen a fire on board the barges, when I have not been there for twelve hours; whether they put the coals there or not I do not know.
I went to have a pint of porter, there were three or four in the box sky-larking - a pipe was thrown at me, and I got up to see who it was; the prosecutor awoke up and treated me - it was near twelve o'clock; we were turned out there and went to Mr. Kingsbury's, and had two pots of ale and half a pint of gin.
Did you see me move my hands at all?
I had been to see my uncle; I was tired, and got behind the coach - I got down again, and crossed the road; this young man came, and accused me of cutting his sisters pocket; I said I had not, and I would go to the coach; a young man came running up, and said it was me.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Were not we playing at four corners, and you were my partner?
Were we not playing at four corners?
Did I not tell you 1s. 9 1/2d. at first - I had 2s. in my pocket when I first went in; I paid for a pint of beer, and had 1s. 9 1/2d. in my pocket?
Does it stand to reason if I were guilty, and had an opportunity to go, I should not have gone.
e The watchman called after me when I was half way up the court, and this box came right past my feet; the watchman said I took it from the gentleman - I had just left my work; I was in a hurry, and turned into the court.
I was going down Marylebone-lane; a gentleman came and said I was the boy who took the print; I have no parents, but live with my grandmother.
A boy came and said if I would earn 18d. I might get the cart out of the field; he went and got the horse.
That hat never was mine.
It was entirely a mistake; I should have returned it in a moment. I have been in the habit of attending Courts for seven or eight years; I was intended for a very different character to this.
On the 3d of July I was in the City the whole day, and not near his place; and on the Saturday I went to see what sales they had for the next week.
Had you seen me with the boys?
The day I went to the Magistrate he said if my sister and my master could bring matters to bear, before eleven o'clock the next morning, he would not commit me.
Was there any stranger slept in the house?
What dress had I on?
You were down before me, and in the room.
I went out about nine o'clock; I had been out about two hours, and heard my wife was taken; I instantly ran home to see what she was taken for, and does it stand to reason, if I could be concerned in the robbery, I should have run home to get myself into danger?
How long is it since you were in the house?
I had the care of my master's property, which was not filled in his schedule. I was tried for this last Session, but was so conscious of my innocence, that hearing I was wanted again, I gave myself up.
A woman offered me the fender for sale for 2s. 6d.; I gave her 1s. 6d. for it: I said I had bought it, but she would not let me go to see where the woman was.
I am innocent, and I hope you will be satisfied of it; why did not this man take me, if he saw what he says - I was apprehended in about five minutes; I said, \Take me back to the lady, she will be convinced I am not the person.\""
Where did I take it from?
I did not take it.
I went down a lane and found this cloth in the road, and thought there would be some reward for it.
I was in liquor.
I was passing Billingsgate, and saw a number of men hitting one another with baskets - as soon as I got into the place I got a hit on the head; I made off, and kicked my foot against this handkerchief; I took it up, looked at it, and threw it away again.
Was the turbot the officer gave you the one you lost?
Were they standing is a position to see me take the fish?
Did you see Benn and Hamilton?
What was the conversation that took place between you and Mr. Goludham?
You say I was on the stairs, and one of the witnesses says I walked away?
What conversation took place between you and Mr. Fox, the landlord, when he delivered up the fish?
Did not you say before the Lord Mayor that Benn saw the fish fly?
Do you think a person in my circumstances could afford to make you a present of a turbot?
I can assure you I was at this time, in a state of intoxication - these men made a tool of me: I had no occasion to do such a thing - my friends could afford to keep me, if I had no situation; I did not attempt to conceal it - I ran about the market like a drunken fool; there were a hundred persons in the public-house, and if they had acted like friends, they would have returned it to the man, and there would have been an end of it; but they kept it till they were obliged to give it up, and then come against me - if I am detained in prison, I shall be obliged to resort to what I have now done in a drunken frolic, to get a living.
I have been without victuals two days; I met a young fellow, who said he could get me some work - he gave me two or three glasses of liquor, and as I was going along the coat fell from the back of the chaise on my shoulder; the officer took hold of me - I pushed him off, and two gentlemen took me.
I went to the docks for them; I stopped at the King's Arms, had my dinner, and gave my horse a bait; they were in the same state as when I received them.
I came out of my house without a halfpenny - I went into a house to beg charity, and some Englishman gave me a few halfpence; he told me to go and get the great-coat - I thought he was the master of the house; I was a little in liquor, and do not know whether the gentleman gave it me or not.
I was walking up Budge-row towards home, and saw the paper laying in the kennel -I picked it up, and put it into my hat, not knowing the value of it; in two or three minutes I heard a cry of Stop thief! I turned down the street by the side of an elderly lady - two officers walked by with the boy; the boy looked about, and seeing none but me, said \That is the man.\""
My Lord and Gentlemen. I am fully sensible of the situation I am now placed in - I have nothing to say.[Monday, Feb. 22.]
I have not a friend in the world.
The two hats were on the seat, you do not know whether that was mine or Wood's?
I have nothing to say, more than that I am quite innocent of the charge - I know nothing of the robbery whatever; I have no witnesses, only my indentures to prove I served seven years to an engineer or millwright - I have been in the habit of working in the country, not in town [Friday, Feb. 19.] GUILTY - DEATH . Aged 27.
The time has been so short, not being before a Magistrate, I was not aware of this indictment till the night before last, and yesterday I was down here nearly all day - I have not had an opportunity of defending myself, and on these considerations throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I am innocent of the robbery.
When the officer came to my mother's, he said I had better tell the truth how I came by the money, as my wife was in custody, or else it would be worse for me, and I told him Chitty came to me, gave it to me, and said if any thing happened I was to say I knew nothing about it.
He said he wondered how I came by the money, as I had but 2s. 5d. before.
I went up to Catling, hearing of this robbery, and understanding it was said William Mecham had done it I asked Catling if it was so, and he immediately put me in the watch-house.
I know no more of it than a child unborn - I never committed any misdemeanor whatever.
I was walking up Skinner-street; the handkerchief was taken out of the gentleman's pocket, and thrown at my feet - I took it up, and put it into my pocket - he turned round, and charged me with it; I gave it to him.
You said at the Mansion-house that the person had a detriment in his eye?
I could have got away, could not I?
How far was you from the person?
I had been to the west-end of the town, looking for work; in my way home I ran up this court, being cold, and that caused a crowd.
Did you not say you had lost a pair of reins?
The gentleman did not know what he had lost; being cold I was running - he called Stop thief! and I was stopped; he charged me with stealing a pair of reins off his horse; I was taken to the watch-house, and kept there a quarter of an hour - I said I had stolen nothing. The constable of the night told the prosecutor to go and see what he had lost; when he came back he brought this with him to the watch-house.
I went to look for a situation, and met a person in Gracechurch-street; she asked me to go and see the funeral of Sir Thomas Lawrence - I was standing at the corner of Ludgate-hill; she called out.
\William, there is a man picking a gentleman's pocket;\" the man threw the handkerchief down, and ran away; I took it up, and ran after the man with it - I tapped the gentleman on the shoulder, and told him that was the man that was running, but he collared me."
I was walking through Smithfield; several boys were behind me - one ran by me, and threw the handkerchief on the sheep pens; I picked it up, and was putting it into my pocket when the gentleman collared me.
Did you not give me the watch to get a new ribbon?
She gave me the money and the watch - I had carried the watch about a fortnight, and the night before we were to be married, she counted the nine sovereigns into my hand, and asked if I would have any more - I went out in the morning to get my clothes, and got drinking from one house to another; I got intoxicated, fell asleep, and lost the watch and great part of the money - I had lived with Admiral Digby and Mr. Dodswell.
I was coming down the street; a man, who looked like a porter, asked me to assist him to carry this down to Queen-square - I did not know it was stolen.
I intended to replace them as soon as I got work.
I have been out of work a great part of the winter - I have a wife and two children, and had not a morsel of bread.
What part of the shop did I take them from?
I was returning home from Mr. Laing's, where I had been for work - I saw nothing of this till the officer came with these two boys, and took me; they said they lost the brushes on the Thursday, and it was Tuesday I was taken; they said they were taken from the door - I was walking quietly along; it is a very crowded neighbourhood.
I had taken a pair of shoes home to Mrs. Manclark - her husband had not received his wages, and I took a walk just to kill the time; I was going down Marchmont-street, and heard Stop thief! called; I ran, like most other people, and the young man took me.
I was in great distress, and had been out of work a long time.
I got into the coach at the Yorkshire Stingo, and the box was in it.
Other persons played with the balls after the prosecutrix saw them; what she said was my opening the board, was a pint pot which I sat down - I was an hour and a half there; there were six gentlemen there when I went in.
About nine o'clock at night on the 10th of February, I returned home with a young man, and bade him good night at the door; I was standing at the Red Lion public-house the following evening - the prosecutor and officer came there and took me.
He was desired to return and fetch the ham, but he said it was impossible to fetch that one, as he had mixed it with several others which were more or less dirty - he was told the constable would be bound to prosecute, he went back and fetched the ham.
He said he was not sure whether he put them on the cart before he put his horses in, or not. Witness. No, but I put them on the straw.
I picked them up in the road, and went along with them a quarter of a mile, and then took them down to the house - he came in the morning, knocked me up, and said he wanted the coats; I said I had two, but I had not stolen them.
I was standing at the top of Petticoat-lane, and a man came and asked me to take this meat to Sam Shagger in Love-court; I inquired at about twenty houses, and could not find him - the watchman then saw me, he asked what I had got, and found the breasts of mutton and the piece of beef.
Do not you think it was possible for me to make a mistake in the hats?
My friends are out of town; I have not let them know, as I am afraid it would injure their feelings, and perhaps be the death of them.
I used that house almost every day; I am not the man who took the sovereign from that place - I had just come into the house to have a pint of beer, I took my change, and put it into my pocket; I might have gone out of the house at once if I had chosen.
Where did these tools lay?
Were they given to you?
They swore at the office that they were taken from a basket, and now they say from a cistern - he swore at the office that part of them did not belong to him.
While I lodged with you did you find any thing wrong in me?
I am quite innocent. I was robbed of 15s. in the house a few hours before, by a person who owed me 15s.; I went to ask her for it - I had some drink, fell asleep, and was robbed; they took me down stairs, left me at the door, and got me into this trouble.
When I sat the lady down at the corner of Norfolk-street, she paid me 3s. for my fare - she was very tipsy, and fell down on the snow; I picked her up once and put her against the railing, where I left her - I got on the box, turned round, and came away; I did not drive fast.
When the prosecutor stopped me he said he should have me whipped up and down the street at the cart's tail - I told him I woul! rather he would do any thing than that.
I had rang the bell before he took hold of me.
I can only say I picked them up. and took them up the passage - I saw a person take them out of the warehouse, and turn down Walbrook with them- he put them down; I went and rang the bell to take them into the house.
You said there was none missing?
I heard the cry of Stop thief! and ran - no umbrella was found on me; the duplicates were of my own property.
I bought it in the Borough.
On the 1st of February I had been to Islington, to take a parcel and a great coat for a young man who was going by the Boston coach - I then went down James-street, and heard a cry of Stop thief! I stood against the wall for two or three minutes - the officer came and took hold of my collar; they did not see me drop any cheese - I said, \Go to the stand and ask the wateringman if I did not leave him within five minutes;\" they would not go, but said he was as bad as me; I said,\"Look at my coat - if I had had the cheese under it there would be marks of it;\" I never had it in my possession, nor saw it - I had not time to get to the shop."
Was I not intoxicated?
I had a flat-iron, which was my own property, and a piece of bacon, which I came honestly by. and some other articles, to take home to my poor wife- I was rather in liquor; I have been unfortunate in business, but never was guilty of a rascally thing in my life.
Starvation and hunger drove me to it.
I was coming down Holborn, and just as I passed the George and Blue Boar a gentleman alighted with this cloak and a trunk - he asked me to carry the cloak for him: he turned down Turnstile, and said he would leave the trunk and follow me - I was going on, and the officer came and took me; when I was taken to the shop they were not certain whether they had lost one or not; it was eleven o'clock, and the shop was closed.
I did not take it.
I was playing, and a boy went and took it - he asked me to sell it for him, and I did; he took my hat and put on when he took it.
I am very sorry for it - if my master will forgive me this time I will not do it again.
James has been placed as I am now for some linen; if I had allowed him to go halves in the property this would not have happened.
It was not my intention to steal it- I expected money from Holland, and I would have brought it to my master's; I was starving, with my wife and children - I asked my master and the foreman to advance me 1l.; I had no bread and no work for a fortnight -I could have sent for friends if I had known it had been necessary.
Where was the woman?
I had been out selling fish - I met a young man, and we were going to have a pint of beer; he went into the shop to get 1d. worth of tobacco, and this young woman said I took the brushes - I had not been near the door; if the woman had them it was unknown to me.
What was the cause of our first interview?
What money did you give me?
Did you not, on your examination, deny giving me any thing but the 6s. 6d. at the theatre, and the 1l. 1s. 6d. in the street?
When the play was over he gave me 10s. in a paper. Witness. I cannot say what it was - I do not recollect putting it in paper; I believe it was in paper.
When he gave me the 6s. 6d. he said, \Take this, I will give you more after the performance is over, but do not expose me. Witness. I did not say such a word; I said I would see him when it was over, when he was at the pay door."
On the examination I asked him what money he gave me when the performance was over, and he said none. Witness. I believe I said I could not recollect.
I believe I said I could not recollect; the push was quite accidental, and not in any indecent manner.
How long have you known him?
Have you ever been alone with him?
Did you not see him shake hands with me?
That was the time the 10s. was put into my hand.
How long have you known Oram?
This gentleman, when on his oath at his examination, said he had known him eight or nine years.
Where you present at the examination?
On the night in question, I was at the theatre door, and was insulted by Oram; he gave me this money not to expose him; there was 6s. 6d., which was just sufficient for him and the two boys; he told me when the performance was over he would see me again; I brought the boy out, and he handed me the paper with 10s. in it; he put out his hand, and shook hands with me, and in a low tone of voice he said, \Here is 10s., don't expose me;\" I saw no more of him till the day he gave me the 1l. 1s. 6d.; on his examination he denied giving me the 10s., and therefore must be allowed to be a perjured man, which I hope your Lordship will allow me to have the benefit of."
I got a little intoxicated, and was returning from Dalston. A poor man asked me to give him some halfpence; I gave him 6d., and he gave me these pots.
I had been to Highgate to see a gentleman, and was returning home; I was running, I heard Stop thief! called, and the gentleman caught me.
I am innocent.
He says he saw me take it. I saw a person come from the shop and drop it - I picked it up; he said,\What have you there?\" I said a handkerchief; he said,\"What shop have you been robbing?\" I said None - he took me to two or three shops, and asked if they had lost the property. Witness. A gentleman stood at his door, next door but one to Mr. Middleton, and as I went by I asked him if he had lost any thing, as I had seen him go to several shops; the other two had separated from him, when I disturbed them from another shop."
He did not know which shop it came from, and at the office he brought a man who had been convicted of perjury to swear the same thing.
I was coming from work about half-past six o'clock; a man over in the Waterloo-road, dressed in a blue coat and white apron, had three umbrel las under his arm - I wanted to buy one, and asked him the price; he showed me this, and asked 9s. - I bid him 5s.; he said he could not take it - I walked on, and he called me back; I gave him 6s. for it, and in half an hour, as I came down Long-acre, the officer stopped me, and asked how I got it - I told him I gave 6s. for it, and he took me.
It was given to me, by a man named Wells, who asked if I could sell it for him - I told him I would try - I went along Whitechapel, into Beachem's shop; I told him I had it from a man named Wells, who asked me to sell it for him - I never saw the harness till I turned it out of the bag in his shop - Beachem showed me a bill, which he had in his window, and said \This is the very harness I have been looking for\" - he called the street-keeper, and gave me in charge."
Did you see me near the gentleman's pocket?
I had been on an errand for my master to Knightsbridge; I came Piccadilly way home - there was a crowd assembled at the coach office; I was passing through, a gentleman laid hold of me, and said I had stolen his handkerchief - I said I had not seen one; he gave me in charge - the gentleman then said, \I cannot swear I saw him near my pocket, nor did I feel any thing, but I have lost my handkerchief;\" he had it then in his hand - the gentleman who took me laid hold of another lad, and let him go; as we went to the watch-house the Police-man told the lad he would get more by prosecuting me than if he was sweeping the crossing - I ask the prosecutor if he did not say so."
If the Magistrate was brought forward, he could prove the same; you may be assured it is true - the Magistrate asked the lad the meaning of an oath; he said he did not know - then he said, \You would not take a false oath?\" \"No, (said he,) unless I could get any thing by it\" - the Magistrate said, \"Oh then, you would, would you, if you could get any thing by it?\" the lad said,\"No, I would not.\""
The Magistrate heard it, and said I could put forth any thing of the kind here.
I belong to Mr. Perry's farm-house - I had leave to go to see my mother; I came by the shop, and the lad laid hold of me - I denied the charge; several people stood by; he asked them to lay hold of me, but they would not - I had no beef; he laid hold of me, and I shoved him away, but did not strike him.
The clock never was fit to go home till I repaired it at home. Witness. It had gone well for a fortnight - he was only my journeyman , and earned 15s. or 20s; a week with me, but I understood he worked for other people.
Mr. Carter did not request me to take the clock home that day - it was not in a proper state to take to the owner till properly repaired; I took it home for that purpose - Mr. Carter was holding my wages in his hands, and only paid me yesterday; as to my earning 15s. a week, I was in his employ from August, and all I have received from him was 5l. - I received the principal part of that yesterday at the Police-office; I desired his man to ask him for a sovereign, and he would not give it to me.
Did you not say at the office, that I was only twenty yards from the hay-stack when you took me?
Did you see two men stand talking at the watch-house, about half-past seven o'clock, as you went out?
I walked behind you all the way. Witness. Then you were watching me.
My wife sold the axe; it was not in my possession; it is not likely I should go by the witness, when I saw him turn up the road, and go right to where the property was concealed - I went right up Black Lion-lane; it was eight o'clock.
I went to the shop to buy a pair of pantaloons; another Spaniard came in with this coat on, he said he had had it given to him, and asked if the man would buy it - I said he did not understand him, and he had better speak to him by signs; I afterwards went out, leaving the man there - the Spaniard called me back, saying they would not give him the coat back - I said, \Why, that coat has been given you out of charity, and I think they should give it you;\" then he said a gentleman made him a present of it - I said the man could not stop it; Simmons told me to come nearer, for he wanted to speak to me- I went, and he asked if I or the other wanted to sell the coat; I said I had nothing to do with it - I never had it on - it was the other man; I do not know where Mr. Blundell lives; I went away to tell the gentleman who had made him a present of it."
I had been with a friend in the London Docks - he was a mate of a ship; we drank freely together - these things laid there, and he told me to take them if I liked, but had I been in my senses, I should not have done it.
The prosecutor knows I work hard for my living; I went to Petticoat-lane, and saw a man with these on his arm; I asked the price of them - he said 2s.; I offered him 1s. 6d. - he would not take it; I was coming out of the fair, and he said I should have them - I returned home; my wife was dying, and I was obliged to send them to pawn for 1s. 6d. to buy doctor's stuff.
I saw a coachman, who told me to take the coach to the stand.
I was walking down the street; two young men came behind me, and threw the ham down in the street - the two officers came up, and one said I was not the man; the other said I was.
I was only committed last Wednesday, and had not time to get friends.
I was passing through Sweeting's-alley, and the officer accosted me by name; I turned - he seized me, and said, \You shall not escape if the rest have;\" this bundle was laying at his feet; I did resist, knowing I was innocent."
I did it through distress.
I was in the country at the time.
On Monday evening I was forced to go for relief, and while I was there a person brought the officer to take me; I said the things were at my place, and my brother had left them to take to a person in St. John's-square - I took the officer to the place.
I could not direct the letter right; I did not know Mr. Wynn's address - I leave my case entirely to your consideration.
It is the first time.
The lad said he bought the handkerchief for 2s.
The other handkerchief my mother will swear I have had three years; and this was two yards from me; there was a great crowd of people, and I was trying to get through to go home, when I was seized and accused of this.
Why did you not take me instead of going for your hat?
My Lord and Gentlemen of the Jury, - My father was a respectable attorney, residing at Ludlow, Shropshire - I was committed to this prison last Thursday, with but a shilling and a few halfpence; my friends, if I have any, live at that distance from town - I have not had it in my power to send to them to come forward; I lived with Mr. Porter, No. 23, Lancaster-place, Burton-crescent, as clerk, and served him faithfully till nearly the time of his decease in 1829, and gave him 50l. security for the money he might have in my hands - I got none of that back; but when my father died he left me 300l., and his wife, who was not my mother, left me 400l.; I have had many expences to pay out of the money, and money was paid to me during my minority: my father died eight years ago - since I left Mr. Porter I lived with Mr. T. Burgess, of Curzon-street, May-fair, and had not left him more than six weeks, since that I had money from different friends in town, and have been in expectation of another situation. As to the charge of breaking the window, the prosecutor says quite wrong; I never had a green coat on, and never was seen at the oyster-stall opposite his shop in my life; if I had had money and time to bring witnesses to character, I could prove it is the first time I was ever arraigned at a bar of justice; I hope you will take it into your merciful consideration, that though the witness swears I pawned the watch, he says I had a brown coat or some such colour, but if I could have brought witnesses forward, they could prove what dress I have worn for twelve months; as to my pawning the watch, he must be quite under a mistake, and I am convinced Levy is totally wrong in his charge against me - I never, to my knowledge, was near his shop: knowing the consequence of such a crime, do you think I should commit myself in such a manner, for so trifling a thing? I have had watches of my own, but being reduced, have been compelled to sell them, and should have waited a little longer before I took to such means as this, having been brought up in quite a different manner.
Where did you take me?
Did you spend any money with the female?
I am quite innocent. I lived with my father and mother for upwards of ten or eleven years, and have been in service at a butcher's; I work very hard for my living; and how could a man who knew himself rob such a man as that of so little as 5s.? I worked from morning till night to earn money for my father and mother.
Smith knows that on Sunday evening there was a door between the wash-house and the vault, and she knows the fire will not burn unless that door is shut.
I wish Baker called, to prove that Davis said he would ruin me.
In consequence of his troubel, and the quantity of water he wanted up stairs, he was refused attention, and told to go about his business - he said if he did not have what he required he would ruin me about the unstamped paper.
There were two closets in Miss Twamley's room and three grates of mine; all the fixtures in the house were mine - there were two pier-tables.
The mother did not take the rooms; it was her and her sister - there was another lady, whom I do not see, and who I understand is the one that was burnt; a more amiable creature never lived in the world, and I told her, to induce them to come to lodge with me, that I would insure for them as I was about insuring.
Did I ask you on Saturday to call on Field?
Was not the distress you put in for half a year's rent, which was hanging back, and which all the row thought we ought not to pay, as the premises were not finished in proper time?
When you first came in with the distress, did I not take you up to the first floor?
Was there not in the back room a reclining-chair, that I told you was worth 200l., and that I was applying to get a patent for it?
Do you think there were six chests of drawers in the house?
Was not every room full of furniture, so that you could hardly get into them?
I shall not ask him any more questions -I do not think him old enough to be a judge of his business; Baker can prove I was never about the house without an apron on.
Was it not almost impossible to tell from the area wheather a man had an apron on; the bars are so narrow I could not get my hand between them.
For me to be in the area I must be crumpled up, and was it possible to be seen in the area whether I had an apron on - it is only sixteen inches wide; I had nothing to fear from a distress, I had a 30l. bill in my pocket, and Curtis not getting it discounted at the market as he thought he should have done; my wife gave me two 10l. notes on the Sunday, and said, \Take this and pay a quarter;\" I said, \"It is of no use to-day, I will see Field to-morrow;\" the copper was loaded up with wood and boxes, and the boxes came out too far for me to set the shavings apart - one bag laid flat on the other, not standing upright; they laid down, and the ends came halfway over the copper, and it was there I drew the shavings out at the end next the fire-place."
I consider myself entirely innocent of the charge - I have nothing more to say, but leave it to the Jury.
I do not know any thing about it.
I had been living with Lady Compton at Notting-hill; I went to Eaton-school, as mistress had turned me away, to beg his Lordship's pardon, and get myself back to my place again - I saw the pony in the road, and it being very late, I had a bit of string, and thought I would tie it round its neck and ride a little way - I never meant to make a property of it.
Here is a book with an account where I have been selling for him these five years for him - when he started me with these sheep he ordered me not to return till I had sold them; I gave him at Grantham what money I had received; he never confined me to any price, as some of them were dying every day, and they were getting worse, he said I must go, and not return till I sold them; if I could not sell them at London to sell them at Romford, or any market I could; I sold them, and was returning home the cheapest way. to give him the money - I could get from Hull to within four miles of where he was for 6d., and if I had gone by coach it would have cost 2l. and more.
I had two more witnesses, but have not seen them since they were seen talking to the prosecutor at the corn fair - Taylor never received a shilling of the money: I have worked for the prosecutor two years, and though he knew I was starving, he would not give me money to subpoena witnesses and get counsel.
I sent to him time after time; he never would pay my wages; I wanted 29l., but not a farthing would he let me have to get victuals - he said he would pay me one day and then another; he never sent Taylor nor Welburn to take a farthing of money - I would not swear as he has done for the world.
I was in liquor, and may have said what the Policeman says - I have worked at some stables ever since Christmas; when I was discharged Mr. Roe said I was to tell them where I lived, and when the Policeman came to take me again, he found me in the yard.
I can prove I was at my stables at the time they have sworn to me.
I went up the court for a necessary purpose; two young men went up before me - the young man at first said he saw the handkerchief thrown into a door, and when they could not find it somebody brought it from the area; he then said he saw me throw it down there.
Did not you come in very drunk, rolling about the bed at night?
When they asked me about the purse, I said I had not seen it, which I had not; the luggage was taken out - I took off the cushion, and asked the prosecutor to look in, but he said he would not till he had me taken to the station - I then pushed in the nose-bags again, and put in the cushions, but I had not seen the purse.
I told him I should receive my money in a short time, and I would release it; I had not seen my prosecutor for some days. Witness. He did not say that till he was in custody.
I intended to take them out, and I wrote to my prosecutor to come and take me out of custody, which he did; I had not seen him for three weeks - I intended to release them in a day or two.
He gave me orders to take the saddle to him to Bayswater.
I did it through distress.
When you paid me my first quarter's wages, were not some articles entered in the book, and deducted from the wages?
Before I came to live with him, I used to travel for myself - these are mostly the remains of my own packages; these two frock-bodies had been sold to a customer on the Monday before, and they were to be returned if not approved of; they were returned, and as they had been entered and paid for, I put them into my box - I had an accident with some of these handkerchiefs, and Mr. Church said I was to pay for them.
He sent me to get his coat as he was tipsy - I got it, and gave it to him; I never saw it again.
I have been very ill these last eight months, which drove me to distress - I have a wife and family somewhere in London - I wished to go to prison to get something to eat.
I fastened up his gate, and went home - I saw no door.
I was running home from my cousin's.
I was invited to the prosecutor's, and while my friend was preparing for dinner, I assisted the prosecutor in the stable - I told a young man there, named Laye, how I was situated, and that I must pawn my coat the next day - I said it went against me, as I never pawned any thing in my life; he said \I have a watch, and money is of more service to me - if you will pawn it, and let me have half the money and the duplicate, and redeem it as soon as you can;\" we then went up to dinner; when we came down he went and got the watch; he then asked me to go with him for the evening, but I went home first, and put the watch into the box, intending to make use of it the next day - in the morning the prosecutor accused me of stealing the watch; I denied all knowledge of it, as I deny it now."
I was going along, and a man said \There is a pair of shoes for you\" - they laid in the middle of the pavement, and I took them up."
The other man hired me, and took me to the prosecutor's; he asked me where this gentleman lived, and said he would pay me for selling the rods.
The prosecutor asked me to go to London; in going along he asked if I had any money - I said No; he said no more had he, and he would give me his daughter's watch to pawn, which I did, and we spent the money together - in going home, we had a few words, and he said, \I will fix you for it;\" he then went and stopped it - he has been convicted here himself."
You was convicted of stealing a bag of nails, and had six months in the House of Correction, and your son is there now.
I was in liquor; I did not know where I was till the next morning - I asked the officer if he had my money, and he said he had not - I had 7s. or 8s. about me.
I went to buy a quarter of a pound of butter; I saw this bit of pork lay by a person's foot, close by the window - I took it up.
Can you swear I took it from you.
Can you positively swear I took it?
I was going down Piccadilly on the 28th of May, which was the illumination night; I turned down St. James'-street, as there was some disturbance with a drunken man, and I saw this handkerchief on the ground - I took it up.
There was another man taken the same night, and she said he was the man.
I met two friends, who took me into a public-house; I fell asleep, and did not awake till ten o'clock.
I was going along Liverpool-road, and picked them up under the window.
I had been out of employ; this piece of timber laid at some distance from any house - I thought it might have dropped from some cart; I had no felonious intention.
The officer accused me of getting over the wall; I was going over with him, and he said he heard something drop - I would make him go back and look, which we did, but could not find it: I was then taken to the watch-house; and on the Saturday he told the Magistrate he did not find it for three-quarters of an hour after.
I paid for the gin.
I was going up the street, and the gentleman accused me of picking his pocket; I said I knew nothing of it - I was taken to the watch-house, and the next morning he said his father picked it up three or four yards from him.
Did I not stop half an hour in the room, and have some bread and cheese?
Did you not say, at Queen-square, that you believed me to be the man by the description given of me?
She gave me the snuff-box to take a pinch of snuff, and, being in liquor, I put it into my pocket - the prosecutor came to me, and I gave it him.
I pointed out the man who employed me to carry it.
I was in distress.
I had nothing to do with it - there were three or four boys there.
This gentleman looked at another young man, and then at me; there was a handkerchief in the road, and he accused me of throwing it there - I never had it.
Speer says he only lost sight of me for one minute, but he lost sight of me for five minutes- there were many persons running; I went up to the crowd, and they came and said, \Pick him out - he is the thief.\""
He is quite in an error; there are more persons than one alike.
I did not write it; I was merely given it as a porter, by a man, to go and receive the goods- I was not aware of the crime; it was not my intention to defraud the party - I did not know whether it was right or wrong; I gave the goods to the man - I know nothing of him.
I was employed to sell them by a young man as I was passing St. George's-church; the gentleman said they were stolen - I said the person I had them from was outside, and I would show him to him. Witness. He said he got them of a young man who lived in that street, but I did not go to him, as I knew it was of no use: my premises are three miles from Leadenhall-market 
- I do not know how the prisoner gets his living, but I think not by selling poultry; he said several times he would show me the person he had them of, but I could not leave him.
What sort of a handkerchief was it?
I had another handkerchief in my hand, and she said that was it.
I never had the handkerchief, nor saw it till it was before the Alderman - I was returning from Ratcliff-highway, and saw a mob; I went up, and this woman laid hold of my collar - she accused me of picking the pocket - she then saw a man run up a street; the prosecutor pursued him - he dropped the handkerchief, and the prosecutor brought it back; I stood at the corner till he returned - I know nothing of the robbery.
I was robbed of the money, on the 11th of May, at the corner of Cutler-street and Petticoat-lane.
The door was left open; it was a temptation to any body to go in to lodge for the night, and I found the house full of goods.
Was not I away from the desk when you came into the shop?
I was looking for a situation, and went into this shop to make inquiry; the boy came in - the box stood on the block, but I took no notice of it; the boy said I had stolen it, and his master collared me - I had not touched it.
On the 6th of June I was at Rose's house; Rose said Child had consented for me to go, in his name, and while I was there, Child came - Rose said \This is the person who is going in your name;\" he said, \"Well, that is right, let him not be too late.\"   Witness. Rose never told me any thing about it till after it was done; it is untrue - I did not see him for six months before he was in custody; Rose told me it cost him 4l. to procure the prisoner to swear this."
Child came to Rose's that morning, and gave his consent for me to go in his name, which was the only thing that induced me - I went tothe Consistory Court and was sworn after a long examination, and being asked questions; and when I went out to go home I was an hour after my time to meet a gentleman - Mr. Bayford then asked me to stop and be sworn; I said, \I had rather not, as I thought I was sold by the attorney:\" when I went out I met Child with two officers - I said,\"Child is it you; you are a base man:\" he said, \"I will make a base man of you, for personating me\" - I did not receive any thing for it, though Rose said he would pay me for the time I had lost."
I put his chest and hammock in the carman's care, and as I had some other things to mind, the cart went on without me; I stopped with the prosecutor, and told him to go to a gentleman about getting his cigars back - I then went out, and told a young man to go to the prosecutor, and tell him I was gone on to the Bell, in the Highway; I ran there, and got there before the cart - when it came up, it unloaded some things; the prosecutor came up, and we went on, and delivered the chest at his house - he has seen the carman, and took 1l. 14s. from him.
A gentleman asked me to pawn the glass, and said he would give me 3d., which I did.
I saw them under the window, and took them up.
I left my wife there that evening, and went to meet a party in Oxford-street, who owed me some money; I waited for them till past eleven o'clock, and they did not come - I went home, and saw no light in my room; I thought my wife was out - the prosecutor then asked me what I had done with the bed; I was surprised, as the things were all there when I went out.
I was playing near my own door, and Burgess asked me to pawn a pair of shoes, and said he would give me half the money.
I was sitting in the house at six o'clock in the evening, when the prosecutor came in - he knew me well, and had drank in my company; he said he came to get change - he went out, and came in again; he then said he had to meet a friend he had borrowed a few shillings of, and he would be back directly - he told me to wait till he came; I stopped till my father came in, and then I went away with him - I went to the same house again the next morning, and I should not have done so if I had robbed the man so near to it; when he accused me of it, I said I would wait till the officer came -I refused to go because I knew I was innocent.
I heard the alarm - two or three young men ran down Gutter-lane: I ran after them, but I am innocent.
I went to a public-house at seven o'clock that evening, and sat there till eleven; as soon as it was light, I went out to look for a shilling which I had dropped in the sewer - if I had been guilty they should have taken me at the time.
Another boy took them, and put them into my apron.
I was going down Sun-street, and met a gentleman, who asked me if I wanted a job; he took me down the yard, and placed the veneers on my shoulder - I said they were too heavy; he said he only wanted me to carry them to Long-alley; I crossed, and went down Dunning's alley - I then stopped to ask a person to help me up with them - the gentleman came up, and told me to carry them back, which I did.
Did you lose sight of me?
I saw this handkerchief on the pavement; I turned down Bread-street, and was coming back again, when the prosecutor took me - I told him I had found it.
Where was I taken?
Where were you walking at the time?
Could this boy see me at the time?
I heard a cry of Stop thief! near Mitre-street, and I met a man running, who knocked me down; ten or twelve men then ran up the street, and while I was on the ground, the prosecutor gave me in charge - it was half-past eleven o'clock at night.
I feel convinced you will plainly see I have been led innocently into this; I had not the slightest knowledge the cheque was bad; having a wife and two children, I was anxious to procure a situation of about 20s. a week, having but 15s. at the gas-works - I was looking for a situation, when a gentleman accosted me at the Post-office, and asked me to take the cheque, and bring him three 20l. notes for it, and he would give me a sovereign; I said I was looking for a situation, that I would make inquiries as I went along, and return in an hour; I admit a sovereign was a large sum, but I suppose it was thought I should go directly, before the fraud was discovered.
If I had thought it had been wrong I had no occasion to have let the officer see the skins, for my skinman called the day before, and I might have let him had them.
I only went to see if my wife was at home, which she was not; I then went out again -I had taken home some work that morning, and received 2l. 5s. for it; I never saw the caddy.
I met two lads, who asked where I was going - I said birds'-nesting; they asked me to wait, and they would go with me - I waited, and the officer took me.
Was you not going out of the house when your friend called you back?
The watch laid under his feet, and if I had meant to rob him, I might have gone away with it.
I met a man who said he had a duplicate of a pair of boots, and if I would go and sell these other boots, he would give me the duplicate.
Can you remember what I said when I came back?
Did I not offer to leave the note, and go and see if they had change?
Mr. Pitt stated before the Magistrate that I had offered to leave the note, and I considered that a superior point in my favour; as to my making the statement the officer represents, I deny it altogether - I know I received it, but without any intention to steal; I met a man to whom I owed a sum of money, for which he demanded payment; I requested him to take a part of the money, which he did, but I told Mr. Pitt that there was a person or two coming from Manchester who would be of service to me, and I should he able to repay it - after I had paid the money I went to Knightsbridge, feeling conscious that I should be able to make up the money on Sunday.
Did I not say I might possibly do it by making use of their names?
Was she drunk?
Will you swear I had the coat on my back?
The officer opened the bundle, and took the coat out of it, and now he says I had it on -I met a man, who asked if I would earn a shilling or two; he said if I would go with him up the yard he would give me something to carry, and at ten o'clock in the morning he would pay me - he gave me the bundle.
I was going to get cresses, and met the ducks half a mile from the farm.
I never went out of the parish of Limehouse - I was commonly past Mr. Dixon's two or three times a week; I could only earn 4s. or 5s. a week with him, and he said if I could get a job I might go and do it.
He swears false, it was on the ground.
The prosecutor sent to my mother, and said he had a job to do; I went to him, and he sent me to Shepherd's-bush - they said I was the boy, but I am innocent.
Do you authorize any persons to write orders for you?
I have been made the dupe of a party I cannot find, and must throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Could you take out the seats without seeing it?
I bought it just as it is now, in Petticoat-lane, and have had it in my pocket ever since.
The woman who claims me as her husband, I never went to church with; she always slept with her mother; I went to the chapel door when the child was christened - that is all; my name is William - I never went by any other; there is a law-suit in which I am engaged, that they want to get me out of.
Did not you come into the house at three o'clock in the morning with some other men, and sit drinking till six in the morning?
I was at the house at three o'clock in the morning: the prosecutor and two other men came there - they drank brandy-and-water; the prosecutor asked me to have some and sing them a song, which I did- we then went to the Unicorn, and got very tipsy; the prosecutor then pulled out his watch - he wanted 9s., and said he would let me have 10s. for it in the evening; I took the watch to the Feathers, and left it there.
The prosecutor asked me to go and have some beer; I had 10s. in my pocket, and was going to buy some clothes.
A well dressed man asked me to earn 1s. - he went and got the coats, and put them on my arm; soon after this gentleman came and took me - as soon as I recovered myself I saw the man who gave them to me, running off.
If any things was found in the ruins I mentioned it; sovereigns and other things were found, and a 50l. note was picked up. Mr. Burgess gave us no order to take care of them - the place was all cleared, and I went to the square where the rubbish was, turned some of it over with my shovel, and found these things there.
I met a shipmate, who told me of a free-trader in the docks - I went to inquire about it, but she had got her hands; I then walked through the dock, and being warm I pulled off my jacket - I saw a lad on board this ship, and asked him for some water; I laid down my jacket, and got the water, and while doing that my jacket was taken, and another put in its place.
I sold it for a man, and gave him the money; he treated me with two pints of beer - I lived at the Star and Garter.
On the Saturday night I had no money to pay my rent; I met several young men, who gave me liquor - I got intoxicated; I strolled about till early in the morning, when I met three young men, one of whom I knew; we walked on to Moor-street; they there said they had a pair of trousers they wanted me to take care of - I put them into the house I lodged at; I put the handkerchief into my hat, and went on to the Seven-dials, where I met the prosecutor, who said the handkerchief was his - he then said he had lost a pair of trousers; I said I knew nothing about them, but when the officer came I said I would produce the trousers.
A young man pushed the handkerchief into my hands, and said,\Will you buy it?\" I was looking where he ran, and the officer took me - I did not know it was stolen."
I bought it of a man who travels with articles.
I saw it at the corner of Magpie-alley - I took it up; a woman said it belonged to a boy she saw running, and I ran on.
I had been to Connaught-square, and saw the handkerchief by a lamp-post in Seymour-street - I took it.
I was going along - the officer came up, and said,\Which is he?\" there was a crowd, and a man gave him the handkerchief."
I saw the prosecutor on the step of a door, with three girls, and one of them had this watch in her hand; I said, \That is not your watch;\" she gave it to me, and they ran down a court - I was ten minutes trying to arouse the prosecutor, and then the officer came; the prosecutor said he had lost his watch; I pulled it from my trousers pocket, and said, \"Here it is.\""
I was in the market looking for work - I wanted bread for my wife and four children; a man asked if I wanted a job, and said he would give me 6d. to take the meat to the Nagg's Head, Whitechapel, and he would be there, as soon as me.
I never had them.
Did you not take the bridle and pad, and put them on my arm?
Did I not lodge in the same house as you?
I hope you will have mercy upon me.
Another boy gave them to me.
He was playing at buttons, and put his bag on the step of a door - he then missed the shoes, and he knew no one but me to charge with it.
He was intoxicated: he asked me to have something to drink; we went to a public-house, and had three glasses of liquor - we then went to another public-house, and drank there till half-past one o'clock in the morning; we then went to a person's house, where he laid down, and was ill.
The money was marked after he found it on me.
I was ten yards from the gentleman when he took me, and I was ill-used by the Policeman.
I was five or six hundred yards off when I was taken.
I should have had some money in a short time, and should have replaced the things on Saturday night.
I was out of work, and I took these gowns to get some tools, thinking they were my mother's.
I bought the things in Clothfair, and intended to make myself an apron.
I sat down on the door side, and being tipsy, I got into the house, but did not take any thing away, nor see it, till I was at the office.
I picked it up.
She said she gave the money to Flicker, and he gave it to me, because he had holes in his pocket.
I found the bundle in White's-alley.
The other boy gave it to me.
Did you not take a hand-bill in Oxford-street?
What time did I leave your house?
I was suddenly thrown into prison, without the means of letting my friends know, or I should have been able to contradict a great part of the evidence against me; if the prosecutor had been here, I could have asked him a few questions, which would have been of great consequence - I was not in the house after seven o'clock that evening.
A woman came up, and said, she saw me take it off the grass, which I did.
They do know me, and her brother has been tried here. Witness. He may say so, but I never saw him in my life before.
My mother is dead, and my father has three of us to keep; these people buy things, and I went there to sell it.
I had been drinking very hard, and did not know what I did, until the next morning.
I ran with the mob , and was taken; the officer struck me.
Francis has slept with me ever since I have been in prison, and he says the policeman gave him three or four glasses of gin at the public-house; and told him he would have to say that, and he would be a witness against me.
It was at the public-house he said so.
I was in distress  on Saturday night I went over to my friends to get a few shillings for my wife, and five children  one of my friend's children was dead  I stopped at the wake and got so much liquor, I did not know where I was going  I went to this room, and know no more about it  if I had had my understanding, I had no occasion to pull the staple out  I beg for mercy.
He said at the station-house, there was another person with me at the time the handkerchief was thrown down  several persons ran down the buildings with me.
It was not me that had it  another person was going down the buildings who worked in the same shop as I did  the prosecutor's friend has inquired into my character.
I was walking down Hackney-road, and another boy was close by me  this gentleman turned and caught hold of me and the other, and said I had picked his pocket.
I was in liquor, and in going along, I saw the cask in the road, and picked it up, as I supposed it had fallen from some waggon.
He stated at Guildhall that he never saw me at all  he had a large box on his head.
He says he saw me throw the parcel down, and I was running, and the policeman knows that I was walking  I was going along the same as other people.
I was going to market to buy something for my Sunday dinner  I was walking through the alley, and they cried out, \Stop that man in the blue coat\"  I walked on till I came to the policeman  he said to me, \"You seem to be the man\"  I said I had done nothing  this boy then ran up, and said he saw me throw down the parcel  I had left work at half-past six o'clock  the officer knows he saw the boy come running up; he said he saw me drop it, and he was behind me."
What is the mark?
I found the rope.
I am entirely innocent.
I was walking down Oxford-street; and going by the prosecutor's house, a boy came up and asked me to bold it while he went away for a necessary purpose  he then told me to come on  I heard a man halloo \Stop thief,\" and ran, being frightened."
I picked it up.
I was passing through Bishopsgate-street, looking for work, and saw the handkerchief on the ground  I took it up, not knowing who it belonged to  Henry Gilbert, of No. 7, Globe-road, was here yesterday to give me a character, with several others.
I left work at a quarter to five o'clock, which is the regular time  I had the keys to lock up the timber and every thing safe  after tea I pulled the keys out of my pocket, and laid them on the drawer  I then went to meet my wife, who was coming from Battle-Bridge  I was there about ten minutes, and came straight home  I went up stairs to my room, and found my door open, though I had locked it, and put the key where my wife could find it  I found this gentleman there and master's clerk  he said, \I suppose you know what we have come for\"  I said, \"I do not, except it is the batten in the yard which I brought there to secure it, at I had not the keys in my pocket at the time I found it\"  I had been to Three-Kings-court to see if any thing was lying about, it being a bad neighbourhood, and I found it, and as he had been robbed before, I brought it home."
The trial was to come on last Sessions, but the prosecutor did not appear  a bill was filed against me for 4s. 9 1/4 d. Witness. The charge last Sessions did not refer to this payment, although it was to the\\ amountof 4s. 9 1/4 d., but paid on a different date.
I was acquitted last Sessions on account of the prosecutor not appearing  I went to ask him for 15s. 7d. wages  he said he would not pay me  I summoned him to the Court of Requests, and he brought an officer with him, and took me out of the Court  he had me remanded till Monday, and I was allowed bail.
I have received various sums for you?
I was quite in liquor.
He cannot say I was sober when I had a shawl on me, which I could not account for, and I was remanded one week on account of it.
I was coming down Crawford-street  a man asked me to carry it to sell, and said he would give me sixpence.
How far was the cook from you?
Did you know it was mine?
Were they all lost after I left your employ?
I have a wife and four small children in great distress  I was driven to do what I did  the officer has been to my house, and knows what I say is true.
He said, \No doubt he is innocent, and I will not take him,\" but the prosecutor said, \"Take him, and I will pay you for your trouble.\""
I did not put them into my box with the intention of stealing them.
I had not had the handkerchief in my hand.
Last Saturday night, when my sister went to the prosecutor's to take her money, he told her he had a doubt whether the shoes were not still in his shop.
If you saw me go in, why did not you give charge of me?
I had not money to pay my landlord, and I went away  I left the man, who had the boots to repair, in the room.
I did not take it  I had some tea and sugar in my apron.
I had been at work all day for my father, and he sent me for tea-and sugar, and other things  I went into this man's shop for some butter  I touched this bacon, and it fell down.
I have known the prosecutor five or six years  he drank tea with me at Kensington, and I have drank tea with him in the kitchen, where he now lives, where the mangle is  his wife was out  he had one child then, and now he has three.
I found the black handkerchief before they came to the house  I had it washed, and wore it  the other I found in my room  I found the pin in the passage  I had a pair of trowsers to brush  I found 80 in them, and, I took it down to my master.
I had been sitting on the timber with a lad  he told me to wait while he went on board a ship  I then went towards these machines, and as I came back I met the witness  he asked where I had been  I told him  he took me round the place, and saw these things  he then had me searched, and gave me in charge.
He said at the office that the basket was in the shop, and the stool outside.
The' prosecutor gave me the clothes to do what I liked with, on account of 90l. I had advanced him.
He is not married to that woman.
He says the waggon was waiting for me in Covent-garden  when I went down there was no waggon there  they often did not come when expected.
I had to take the fork to Covent-garden, but the waggon not being there, I returned with it  I took the fork down several times, but the owner was not there  I returned and put it in the passage  the street door of the house was never closed  they used to allow such company, it was a disgrace to society  men and women reeling about  as to the property, I know nothing of it.
He said at the office that he saw me lurking about the shop window.
I did not drop them; he knocked them out of my hand.
I met a young chap, a shoemaker; he said he was going to sell some shoes  I said I would go with him; and crossing Stepney-fields I was waiting for him, just by a broker's shop, when the policeman collared me, and asked what I had got  I said, \Shoes.\""
I know nothing of them.
A gentleman tapped me on the shoulder, and said he would give me 6d. to pawn the sheet  I said, \What name shall I say?'  he said, \"Tell them it is your mother's\"  I told the pawnbroker so, and then I told him who gave it me."
I never offered it at all.
A person gave it me to hold  I did not offer it for sale.
I was not there on the Sunday evening  nor outside my own door; on the Tuesday I met a man who asked me to carry a box to Holborn, and he gave me that shilling; and as I was coming back I called for the penny-worth of ointment for my eyes, and offered the shilling.
I did not come from over the water till half-past eight o'clock  I did not go to the house till I went for three-halfpenny-worth of gin.
You cannot swear it was the same you took of me  you put it into your pocket, and took out four or five more.
I was not near the house till about ten o'clock  I then gave that crown-piece, and had the other in my pocket  I had changed a sovereign, but spent the rest of the money.
I was in the public-house drinking, when this boy came in with the policeman, and said I had given him a bad five-shilling-piece.
I came by the door, and picked it up  this woman came and said it was hers.
I was discharged, and the magistrate told me to come on the Saturday for the box  I was going, and was taken.
I was not near the shop.
You never saw me take the books.
Did not you meet me in the street in the evening, and we have a drop of drink together?
She opened the door, took we in, and asked if I had any money to pay for gin  I said, \No\"  she said, \"Take your shirt off your back, and you can have it pawned.\""
I met her in the street  she told me to follow her to the court, and to stand at the end till she went and opened the door  she went in first herself  I followed her in  she said,\ Will you have a drop of gin?\"  I said I had no money but a few half-pence  she said, \"Take your shirt off, and pawn it\"  I gave her my shirt  she got somebody at the door to go and pawn it  I have the ticket to prove it  when the gin was drank, she gave me the things to take out, saying she would meet me in the street with them  I stood in the street with them, open in my hand, for an hour and a half, expecting her to come to me  I should have concealed, or made away with them, if I had stolen them  I went along the street, exposed as they were, and had got just towards home, when this gentleman met me, and asked where I got them  I said I had them from a young woman to keep till she came  he took me to the watchhouse  the inspector asked where I had been drinking all day, as I was tipsy  I said in St. Giles's  the gentleman went next morning, and inquired about the place  he found out the court, and the prosecutrix claimed the things, for fear of being caught herself."
I have pawned with you in the name of Robert?
I live close to Boston-street, close to the coach-stand, and am in the habit of standing round there, as my brother-in-law drives a cab  I often went and stood by his side till he got a job  a man came up with a light drab coat and white buttons  I have seen him several times by the coach-stand  he asked if I wanted to buy a pair of boots  I said I wanted some, but had no money to pay to-night  I had a sovereign, and could not break into it  he said it would be a bargain for me, and he had had them from a gentleman's servant, a friend of his  he pulled out three pairs, and said I should have them for 30s.  I said I could not, as I wanted the money  having a sovereign, he urged me to buy them  he said, \You can buy them, I will let you have them for 25s.\"  as I was very much in distress, I thought I could make a few shillings by them  I said, \"I will give you 25s., I have only got a sovereign, if you will put them into the pawnbroker's\"  he went with me, and I asked 1l. of Porter's man for two pairs  he said he could lend me 18s., and knowing me before. he lent me 1l.  I came out, gave the man the 5s., and hare never seen him from that hour to this  I know him very well by sight, having often seen him in the coach rank  at night, when the officer took me for some velvet, which I took from where I work, he found the 25s. on me, which I had made by the boots  I took one pair round, trying to sell them, but they would not give more for them than I could pawn them for  I was in great distress, which caused me to buy them  my family had nothing to eat scarcely  the sovereign was the produce of the velvet."
Did not you know the property was stolen?
I deny breaking open the drawers  they were opened by a key procured by the chief witness, Hunt  I deny stealing the yellow silk shawl, blue handkerchief, pair of brown kid gloves, and gold ring  that property she stole herself from Mrs. Woodgate's bed-room, and the gold ring from Mr. Rance's bed-room  I did not see them till she showed them to me in the evening  I asked where she got them from  she told me, and I asked her to let me take them back  she told me to go and be hanged, and unless I brought something more, she would do all she could to send me out of the country. A gentleman, named Parker, gave information about it to the policeman  I wish to know why he is not at the bar  he was the chief receiver of the property  he sold the plate to a smelter in Wilderness-row  one lot for 18s., another for 12s., and another for 8s.
The accounts of the Company had got into such an intricate state for some years past, that I must throw myself on the mercy of the Jury.
I met two men at the top of the City-road, who asked me to carry this, and the officer took me.
Did not you open the bag with the poker?
You found nothing on me  you ran back, and found the rabbits.
That is the one I had in my hand.
We were both drinking, and went to bed between ten and eleven o'clock  I got a chaw of tobacco, and turned in again  I then went down into the back yard, jumped over the fence, and came up to London  he met me between twelve and one o'clock, and asked me what I had done with the money, but I had not seen it.
I bought it in Rosemary-lane, five months ago.
I told him I was not to mark them till I got to Smithfield; and the salesman would do it himself  I do not know the names of some places he has mentioned  two or three people asked me if I came through this and that place.
I was standing in the road between Penshurst and Tunbridge Wells  John Porter came and asked me how much I would take four sheep to London for  I agreed to take them, and I asked him to let me take them that night; and he said if I started by eleven or twelve o'clock, it would be sufficient  I went, and this person stopped me  my horse was very tired  I met Porter about eleven o'clock in the morning, and I went to Blackham Common to get the sheep the same evening  I have been in the habit of working with a horse and cart for nine years  I am innocent of knowing they were stolen  I have a wife and five small children.
Was it not standing on the ground at the corner of the street, when you took me?
My employer gave me leave to go to the Strand  I was passing the shop, a man put the carpet on my shoulder, and asked me to carry it  he gave me 2d., which the policeman has  I pointed the man out to the policeman, but he would not go and take him.
I went to the mill, and saw Young  I told him I wanted a sack of flour  he said I could not have it without Mr. Frost, who was at the Red House  I went there  he gave me the keys, and said, \Give them to the old man,\" but he was not there  I gave them to Young, who went into the counting-house to get the book  I put the money on the board, as my horse was standing in an awkward situation  if he had gone back, the cart would have gone into the ditch  I said, \"There is the money for the sack of flour;\" and I ran off."
I left home about half-past five o'clock  I had been to Mr. Freeman's, in Zion-square  when I got to Plumbers'-row, there was a mob of about twenty persons round  I got nearly down there, when the policeman came and said, \I want you\"  he took me to the gentleman, and said, \"Is this him?\"  he said, \"I don't think it is him;\" and his wife said the same  at the station-house I heard the policeman say to the old gentleman, \"You will swear to him, then;\" and then he came and swore to me very hard."
I told the gentleman to take that lad, and three or four people saw him throw the handkerchief down  I pointed him out to the gentleman, and he saw him run.
The handkerchief was muddy where it was thrown down by the boy, who was not five yards behind him  there was a gentleman came up, who saw him throw it down  I asked him to go to the station-house, but he said his time was valuable, and he could not.
I pawned them for Mr. Scott  they were given me by him to pawn.
He gave me the spoons to paws when I dined over the water, and said they had been lost for some time.
He says it was five handkerchiefs, that is not correct  they were five opera ties, which I never saw  when I left him he took stock, and all was right  he knows nothing about his own warehouse  he comes at nine o'clock in the morning, and sits down drinking ale and brandy, and does not know what he is doing  he employed me to pawn these spoons.
This witness was measuring a yard and a half of ribbon?
Did you speak to me in your yard, or was it your clerk?
Did I mention Mr. Beeson's name to you?
 He did not ask bow I came by it or any thing.
He said he would give me 9d. and the old pair for them.
I was in Long-lane, and saw the handkercheif lying down  I saw a boy run  I being close to the gentleman, he turned round, and took me.
I was a yard or two from the wall  a number of people were round me  I was driven against the wall by the prosecutor, and used in a shameful manner by him.
I was going over the bridge  the gentleman came to a waggon which had broken down  I just stopped  he turned round in a great passion, and collared me  I put up my arm, and said, \Don't collar me, I have done nothing\"  the handkerchief laid about two yards from me  I never touched his pocket  I had witnesses to prove it, but they would not let me get at them."
I was out of his sight once.
I was coming by the lady's house; a drunken man coming by, gave me a push, and I went into the garden  the officer came in  the shirts laid on the grass plot further on.
I was in great distress at the time.
I picked it up, but did not know whose it was.
I can only say I bought it, and did not know it was stolen.
I know nothing about this coat  I had an old black coat on my arm  I was going down to Northampton.
I was coming in a direction towards St. Mary's-hill, not going from it  I was not in the market that morning.
Being nearly deprived of my sight, I was obliged to leave a situation at Messrs. Hall and Beck's, Piccadilly, where I had been nearly fourteen years  I was under the care of Mr. Alexander, the oculist, and was obliged to part with every thing for my support  on the afternoon in question, Mr. Alexander informed me the sight of one eye was entirely lost, and nothing but the greatest care would restore the other  being in a state of destitution, and fearing I should never get my living, I adopted this course, to be in prison for the remainder of my life, in order to be supported  I have friends well off, but they are not in England  my real-name is Charles Budlow.
I know no more about the concern than a child unborn  I never saw the watch.
It was through my losing half-a-sovereign, as I returned from Mr. Dobbs's  I told my master I had lost it about half-past five o'clock, and then he told me to go to my work  he asked me if I had 1l.  I said I had 30s. at home  he gave me in charge at half-past nine o'clock.
I had no box.
I bought the two bags of a man for 1s. 6d.
I had a job to do, and did not know where to procure a truck  I saw this one, and waited half an hour, and not seeing any one there, I thought I might be back before they came for it  I was working for Mr. Bradbrook, a publican.
I was sitting at work, and a young man brought this fowl, and asked me to buy it  I gave him 1s. 6d. for it  I did not know what to do with it, and sold it.
I took the boots in mistake  I know nothing of the stockings.
I was intoxicated.
I lost 5s., and could not find it  I was not going fast.
I picked it up.
I was going down the street, and a man asked me to carry it.
I have witnesses to prove that I was at home at the time this was lost.
I always got my living in an upright, honest sort of way  I never had any thing brought to my charge, and never brought my friends to disgrace  I have got my living under the magistrate who committed me, for seven years  the prosecutor has dealt with me for seven years.
We had been to three public-houses before.
I told him that Lyons gave me the snuff-box.
I was going to look for a situation  I never had the bag in my hand  I went into the public-house for half-a-pint of beer, when that gentleman came in and asked me if I knew the bag  I said no.
Mr. Boards took a string out of his pocket, and began to measure the wheels of the cart  he said he had suspicion that I had stolen his hay  when I threw off the dung, I threw the four trusses of hay first, and then the corn, and he says I threw the corn first.
How far do you think the gentleman had got?
Have you any mark to show, on your toes, where I threw the lead?
The pot-boy had an umbrage against me for complaining to his mistress that he was saucy to a man, and he said he would do me an injury  I took the pot out to give some beer to a man  I was bringing it back, when he met me  I was going to get a pot of beer at another house for threepence.
I was coming out of Mr. Saunders's play  some young man ran past me, and put these scales into my hand.
I was crossing Bloomsbury-square, and was knocked down by two men  there were twenty or thirty people  I ran, and saw nobody  I saw these things thrown down by a man, who turned to the left  I went on, up Southampton-place  the policeman stopped me, and said, \Where are you going?\"  I said, \"Up here\"  he said, \"What are you running for?\"  I said, \"Like other people\"  I was two minutes and a half in his custody before I saw any body  I was taken to the house, and charged with the theft  I have been fifteen months at sea, and before that worked for Mr. Sergeant Arabin."
I was in Southampton-street, Westminster, and saw the cab in Parliament-street and nobody with it, and the reins under the horse's feet  I went to the side of it  there was nobody in it  I took it back to the stand in York-road, opposite Astley's Theatre, and asked the waterman if there was an owner to the cab  he said \No\"  a lady and gentleman came up as a fare  I stood a quarter of an hour  nobody came  I took it to a stand in Holborn  I then drove to the stand opposite the Star in the City-road, and stopped there a quarter of an hour  nobody came  two gentlemen in the public-house said they knew the cab, that it belonged to a gentleman in the Edgeware-road, and they would go with me  they got into the cab, and as we drove up Holborn, the prosecutor stopped me and gave me in charge  I was never in the Edgeware-road  Fincher told the Magistrate he left the cab and horse with a boy, and when he came out of the public-house the cab and boy were gone  when I first saw it, it was going over the bridge with the reins under the horse's feet  the gentlemen were quite strangers  they jumped out immediately I was stopped  I had been in London about three days."
You followed me to a distance, did you not?
Did I not come back and give up the article I had purchased?
Where did you first see me?
Will you allow the statement to be read that I made to Mr. Powell?
I had not been there on the Sunday  if I had, it is not likely I should have gone again  I only came to London on Monday to receive some money due to me.
I bought the three books in the street  I know nothing of the others.
I saw the handkerchief on the ground, and picked it up  when the gentleman came to me I gave it to him.
I am guilty.
You said, at the office, the articles hung at the prosecutor's door-post.
Did not I tell you they came down into my hand, and I was going to bring them into the boxes?
I know no more about being tried before than a man I never saw.
I was coming down Brick-lane  in Church-street the gentleman collared me, and said I had got his handkerchief  I never saw him or the handkerchief at all.
I am so embarrassed, I scarcely know what to say; but my intentions were never to appropriate the money to my own use; and I should have repaid it, as I have done other sums; such as Lucock's and Morley's, which have been mentioned.
I was going down Holborn  a boy asked me to buy these books, and said he wanted some money to buy bread  I said I had no money, but I would give him some bread, which I had just got, and I did so  I was going down Hand-court with the books, and the officer took me  the baker came to the prosecutor's shop, and said I had had two pounds of bread of him.
The other boy went in, and came out and dropped the sugar on the edge of the door  it rolled down to the kennel  I did not have it at all  I hardly know what dress the other boy had on.
When you saw me in the Square did you not say you thought that was the man from his hat and boots?
At the station-house, when they asked you whether you could not swear to my voice, did you not say, \No, the person was so muffled up when he spoke?\""
This is the hat I had on
That was in the square  when you took hold of me, I said I would walk without your holding me.
I know nothing of the circumstance, any more than being on the spot in the square  I seem confounded  I can only say I do not know any thing of it  I have nothing to say particularly.
She went out at half-past two o'clock for some beer for me.
I went to Charlton fair, and was taken, but I never saw the money.
I have no doubt this case would not have been urged against me, but for my being as evidence against other parties  he has sworn he was not aware that the ale was in old bottles, and he knows that old bottles were used; and in consequence of that, I have no doubt, this indictment is laid against me, which I was not aware of till last night  the whole sum of money was spent in a supper; as he had promised to give a leg of mutton supper, and to stand a few bottles of wine, provided the job was hushed up  he came home that night in a great passion, and accused Clancey of laying an indictment; and I took the officer to the ticket-porters' public-house to have a glass of brandy-and-water; Clancey and Thomas came to us, and we had ale and porter, and three glasses of brandy-and-water, to prevent any thing going forward against him  the officers then wanted supper, and we went to Shoreditch, and bought 8lbs. of tripe at Mr. Bennett's, and some onions; and we went to a house to have them  I was in liquor, and west to bed; and they had the tripe and the onions cooked  I had the whole money taken from me; sad since then, Clancey has said he would pay the money by instalments, rather than I should be indicted  Mr. Bowring has more than once pressed me to join him in partnership, knowing that my friends were respectable and would support him  I can produce an sight-years' character, and never was in any difficulty before; and it is, no doubt, to prevent my appearing against him that he has instituted this.
You are aware that Mr. Bowring told us to settle it as well as we could.
I saw some yellow handkerchiefs hanging up, and went in and looked at than  I saw some more hanging near the counter  I went to look at those, and they came down in my hand  I said, \Here is one of your handkerchiefs come down\"  he said, \"I know all about it, you wanted to steal it\"  I said, \"I have not stolen it, and am not going to run away\"  he said, \"I will take good care you shall not,\" and he gave me in charge."
I was hired to carry them by a man in the Borough, who had a large basket full of them  I was to meet him at the Bricklayer's Arms  I did not know where they came from.
There was 3s. due to me.
What time did I come into your shop?
Would you have given me into custody if you had met me in Tooley-street in the dress I have on now?
I was apprehended on the 7th of February, and taken to the station-house, and while there, the prosecutor was brought there, and said I was the person who robbed him  I assure you I am quite innocent of the charge.
When you saw me in the bar-parlour, why not take me?
It was never my orders to fasten up the front of the house  the parlour shutters were never more than put to, and the window had no catch to it.
The cellar door was left open from the first thing in the morning until dark  any body might throw any thing down.
Between two and three o'clock on Sunday morning I and two more young men were walking along Drury-lane  we stood on the pavement two or three minutes, speaking about what had happened in the week at different fairs  the prosecutor came up, looked us all three full in the face, for two or three minutes, then said to me, \Can you fight?\"  I said, \"You had better go on about your business while you are well off\"  we crossed the road to avoid him  he followed us across Drury-lane, and going down Charles-street we did not like to be followed by him, and turned back again to the top of Charles-street  the prosecutor was in Drury-lane  he cried, \"Stop thief\" after us, and we all ran away."
The two handkerchiefs were rolled up at the watch-house together  the cotton one is mine, and had been taken out of my pocket with one shilling and two sixpences  I claimed the cotton one, but not the white one, that does not belong to me  about eight o'clock that evening, I went to my brother-in-law at Hackney, to be measured for a pair of trowsers  we went into a public-house in Gray's-inn-lane  we stopped there from half-past eight till half-past ten o'clock  returning home, it began to rain  I went into this public-house, into the parlour, up stairs  there were three men at supper  I rung the bell, but it was not answered  the three men went out  I came down stairs to the bar, and asked for four pennyworth of gin-and-water  I was taken into custody immediately  in the mean time my hat was lost or stolen  I said the hat did not belong to me, mine is a silk hat  I was in mourning for my mother.
I am innocent of it  I was coming by and heard the rattle spring  I went to see what was the matter, and on looking over the wall, I saw the policeman there and made towards him  he took me into custody.
Another young man came into the room at the same time, and asked her to pawn it, and gave her 6d.
A young man asked me to pawn the pistol for him, and I asked her to pawn it.
I picked the coat up in White Lion-street.
I had been drinking there three times that day.
I know nothing about it.
Which way was I going when you saw me?
I was in the court, and felt something come down by my feet  I saw this handkerchief sound my feet  I stooped down and took it up.
I was going over Stepney-fields, and found these things  I was hungry, and sold them.
Was this missing the first or second time I was left in the boat?
I had been left in charge of the boat three quarters of an hour before, and, had I an inclination to steal, I could have taken them all  when I left the boat last, I had no jacket at all  I could bring two witnesses to prove this man is a convicted felon  I went on shore to see for my prize money, and when I came hack, the boat was gone.
That is not the umbrella.
It was partly out of the hat  I thought some one had dropped it  I certainly took it up.
I bought the duplicate of it of a young man, and pawned it again at Mr. Moss's.
Are you positive it was a person you saw?
Was that found on the spot where I was?
Do you think I was intoxicated?
It is evident I was found in the house  how I came there I know not  I can remember I was led by three persons, but where, I do not know  I was led into a place, or I was taken out of a place as I have since heard, but I do not know  three young men, very respectably attired, met me, and seeing me intoxicated, they led me, but where, I cannot say  I think I can remember their leading me through a door, which was open, and I supposed it was their house; but, after that, I know nothing that occurred till I found myself awoke by the officer.
I came up by the packet to see my friends, and could not find them  I was wandering about the street in great distress, and was glad to get any where  I live at Gainsborough  I have friends in London, but could not find them  I had lost the direction.
I am sorry for what has happened  I was never in any quarrel before on board the vessel  it was a very aggravated case  I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
A gentleman took the watch up, and asked who owned it  it never dropped from me.
I know nothing about it  I was out of work  I had 6d. in my pocket, and had some bread and cheese at a house on the road  I had no dealings with the pony at all.
I had no knife to cut the string.
I bought the wheat of Mr. Hoggart  I paid him 5s. a week for four weeks, and the last week 4s. which was 6s. a bushel  the potatoes I found about the ground after they bad got their crop off.
As I had done business for Mr. Wood for the time I had, he had no right to suspect me of any dishonesty  these ruling machines I made at home with stuff which I went and bought myself; and as I knew it would be my ruin to confine myself to his business, I made up my mind to complete these articles on my own premises, and I never had any other intention  I removed these things openly when the men were all about in the warehouse, and had been so for two hours  the carman speaks of a hurried manner; certainly I did not wish him to waste his time, but I made no secret of it  he asked me for a pint of beer, and I gave it him  if you look at the book, you will be convinced that Mr. Wood cannot prove any thing against me.
I picked it up in the street.
It is all false about the trowsers  I bought them second-hand in Petticoat-lane, with the mark on the lining as it is now  I took the pistol home to fire it on Sunday  I fired it twice, and my father would not let me fire it again.
The officer took me  I told him I knew nothing about it.
I was never asked where I came from till the second time I went there  then Mr. Pontifex took me into a side-room, and asked if I came from Clark, of Hammersmith  I said, \No\"  he said, \"How came you to come here?\"  I said, \"The note was given me\"  he said, \"Do you know it is forged?\"  I said no, and if he would send a policeman with me I would show him the person; but I was detained so long, I dare say the person saw me and went away."
He said I was a very delicate-looking man: and I was told before I went into the Court that the inspector had got him there to identify me  I never saw him before.
I had been to see Mr. Jarman, who was in prison for debt  he authorised me to get as much property away as I could, to sell, as he expected his creditors would come and seize it  I went and got as much as I could out  Mrs. Wood came down and saw me  I was afraid my character would be blemished, and I certainly walked away  I have been in the country with some gentlemen  on Friday I came to town  I found I was indicted, and surrendered.
I protest against having written the letters.
I said it had been mine.
Had you the seal in your hand to observe it?
Had the handkerchief any picture in the middle of it?
If I had been guilty of the robbery, should not I have absconded  I went with the policeman without resistance, and I was struck dumb when I was told the charge  I deny it  I have been in the Navy nine years  I got liquor, and parted with my clothes, which obliged me to remain in London  I did not cohabit with the woman  I had been to sea with her son  he died, and she frequently asked me to go there  I used to sleep at night on the floor, which the boy knows  I used to go out and beg my bread.
Mr. Burge authorised me to sell bricks any where I could, and he was to settle with me on Tuesday, when he paid for my horse and cart.
A great deal of the property was found on Stratford's premises, particularly the seat and straps  several people searched the house  the property found does not belong to me, it belongs to my son.
I took them in change for a crown-piece that afternoon, and did not know that they were bad.
It was said at the first examination, that I came and asked for blacking.
I never knew it was a bad shilling  directly she told me it was bad, I offered to give her another  I never was in the shop before.
I did not take the cloak.
I solemnly declare that I picked up the box from the ground near the prosecutor  and my only motive for not giving it to him was his having charged me with robbing him  I felt indignant at it, and put the box into my pocket  I would not let him have it because be accused me of robbing him  I hope, for the sake of my wife and family, you will look over this, and enable me to maintain the good character I have borne, to my life's end.
When I took them, I meant to return them again.
My Lord and Gentlemen  of this charge I am altogether and entirely innocent  I certainly had taken some liquor in the course of the day, which being with me not a customary thing, and not having taken dinner, it deprived me of that lewon which I possessed  I leave my case in your hands.
On my way to my lodgings, I heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran across the square, and was stopped  that is all I know."
The place in White's-row I let to a man named Mitchell, who said he kept a cab, and was a horse-dealer  I did not go to the premises after I let them to him  I took the premises in Brown-lane, and this property was there  I kept a stable, to take horses, carts, and such things, to stand; and this pony was brought to stand there.
A young man dropped this flageolet under a cab, I took it up and put it into my side-pocket, and this man took me.
I stopt to look at some wax-work  several boys shoved me about, and I took this boy's cap off, and threw it to another boy  he threw it to another, who threw it into the road, and another boy ran off with it.
I gave him warning, as I found my wages were not sufficient  this is done to prevent my going to his opponents.
I was going along, and a man asked me to buy a basket of apples  he wanted 10s. for them  I said I had not so much as that  I had only 6s., which he took; and I left him my handkerchief till the next market morning as security for the basket.
Rogers followed me home the same night  he and I were drinking in Kingsland-road, just through the turnpike, and he asked me to take a load for him on the Saturday, which would outset the money  I had had the pig of him.
I wish it to be understood that the name is \Still,\" and not \"Stiull.\""
I lost a cap, and did not know but that was mine  I picked up two caps, and thought this was my own, till next day  I did not want it, and sold it.
I was going down Paddington-street  a boy came and said, \Will you have a drum of figs?\"  he gave them to me."
The accusation is false against me  Sarah Murrells can make it all clear if she likes  the shawl she lent me  I met her at Mrs. Barnes's with Miss Freeman  my mother was not there  the proseutrix was there, and I got into conversation with her  some time afterwards my mother came, and they all went up stairs to the other apartment, and she made an appointment with me to call and see her  she told me the number, but I forgot it; I went to the saddler's, and asked the number, and I went there  she was dressing herself  she never opened the door  she told me to come to the back parlour door, and tap, and call Sarah  she was dressing  she had not her gown on  she appointed me to meet her in Coventry-court  there was a shop next door, and every thing  I was accused of slamming the door  I walked quietly out  the street was full of people.
When I came home, I used to give the money to my mistress, and she used to put it down the next morning  she used to ask me if it was paid  I said, \Yes; I gave you the money;\" and she used to stop me in the shop, and say I never gave her the money."
How was it you did not pick up the handkerchief with the weight?
I went to purchase two eggs  I left the shop, and as I expected a gentleman to take coffee with me, I hastened on  I heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" but I went on, and the officer took me  the probability of innocence far outweighs the suspicion of guilt."
I was going down the street, and a dog took the meat  I drove him away.
I was very much intoxicated, and seeing the coat in the road, I thought it had fallen from some cart  I put it on.
When I was in the shop, I took the ribbon out, and gave it you.
I was sent to the office, and was discharged  I then went for the 1s. 6d. that the officer took from me  he gave me that, and took me again.
I said, \There is the 6d.\"  you was looking at the ribbons, and would not look at me at all  I was going to work the same night, at Mr. Jameson's, a hair-dresser, to carry a board out."
I was not near the place.
The half-crown the prosecutor gave me on the Saturday night before.
Who sent you to the market?
I passed her, I will swear, a thousand times that morning, before the party came who pointed me out  it is all wrong  I have no brother, nor brother's wife.
I was never in your shop.
Mr. Compton knows that it was not me that had the chaise; he looked at the other lad very hard, and then said the other one took it  I was never in the shop in my life  the other young man was working with me  he went round and brought the chaise to me at Maida-hill, and we went into the country together.
I was walking through Sydney-alley, and a man threw them against my face  I did not know what they were.
I told you a man gave it me, and you asked me his address.
I was with two or three more boys  one of them took this gentleman's handkerchief  he gave it to another, who put it under my jacket.
I did not mention Mr. Cook's name at all.
The gentleman flew out and took me  I had that moment stepped up to the window.
I had been to Thames-street that evening, and as I was going up Fish-street I saw a truck standing in the street, and a young man with it  there were two gentlemen with great-coats on, who said to me, \If you will lend our man a hand to take this truck, we will pay you\"  I assisted him; and when we got to Finsbury-square the truck broke down  they said, \"What shall we do?\" said I  I knew Mr. Pinner, the cooper, who, perhaps, could lend one  I went to him, and he sent his boy to Finsbury-market, where we got one  we then loaded that truck with the hogshead which was in the broken truck, and they told me to go on to New-inn-yard, which we did, and there the officer stopped us."
I met a carpenter, who told me he would give me two or three halfpence to pawn it, which I did  I should know the man again  I think his name is Williams  my father knows him, and I told him to go after him  I do not live with my father  I should like to learn a business.
A man asked me to do a iavour for him, and I said \Yes\"  he said, \"Go along on this side the way, and you will see some umbrellas, bring them to me\"  I went and got them."
The shed door was open  I went there for a necessary purpose  I never touched the hay  he said, \What do you do here?\"  I told him what I had come for  I never touched the hay  they said, \"Give it up to us\"  I lifted it up to them in the loft."
Mr. Gee's sheep knocked the boards down  I never touched them.
The door was open  they locked the shed after I was taken.
I was not there at all  I was at the bottom of East-lane at the time.
I picked them up, and took them to Miller to ask if she had lost them  she said, \No\"  the officer came in and took me."
I took it by mistake  I was drunk.
Did you see me in the shop?
I always brought the things as I had them.
Did you not first push against me coming along  I believe you was in liquor?
When he was examined at the office, he swore he was one hundred yards distance, and he saw me struggling with the prosecutor.
I was going home about half-past eleven o'clock  the prosecutor and his wife came along  I was in company with three or four whom I had been drinking with  I consider the prosecutor was in liquor  he made a stumble against me  I said, \You have assaulted me\"  he made some apology and gave me his hand  after shaking hands with him, I was walking home, and heard the cry of \"Stop thief\"  I instantly stopped till the policeman came up, and was taken."
I did not occupy the room alone  another person occupied it as well as me.
What particular mark do you know me by?
On Sunday evening I was along with two or three friends  I got in liquor and went to bed  my bed-fellow was in bed too  I got up in the morning and went to get a job  when I came back the witness said he wanted me, and said, \Where is yoox hat?\"  I said, \"I have cut it up three weeks ago\"  I gave him the key  I did not know the property was there  he searched my room, and brought the property to Mr. Woodward's  I have a bed-fellow  I cannot be sure of what he brings to the room  I can bring witnesses to prove I was with them on Sunday night."
I was charged with stealing ten handkerchiefs at Bow-gtreet, now there is only nine  when the policeman took me, a gentleman in the crowd said cabman knew all about it  they took me to the cabman, who said it was not me  the magistrate asked for the cabman  the policeman went out and said he could not find him.
I was coming on business from Epping, and picked up the bundle on the road  I never lived in Mr. Morgan's service is my life.
Did you see me throw it away?
You say Kelly picked it up?
I wish to know if you were sober?
It is not a feasible thing  I had some friends yesterday  I do not know whether they are here  it is not feasible he would go that distance with a man, along Long-acre to Queen-street, for a paltry pint of ale, if he had been sober  I am as innocent as the child unborn  I was coming up St. Andrew's-street at the time it happened  he acknowledged he had been drinking.
I was very much excited at being reported as drunk, as I should be discharged  it was throwing my wife and family in great distress at the time.
I was walking along, and this gentleman accused me of taking his handkerchief.
I was going on an errand  I kicked the handkerchief with my foot, and then took it up  this gentleman came and took it out of my hand  that was full a quarter of an hour before he gave me into custody.
I went out to seek for employment, but could not get any  my mother was in great distress, without food or firing  I saw the trowsers, and it was a great temptation.
I was in Wood-street, and stopped with the stoppage  there were five or six people round  I asked them if they had seen me do any thing  they said, \No\"  I declare solemnly I am innocent."
Mr. Price said he did not see me drop the coffee, at the office.
He said he saw me on Monday only, but he had seen me everyday previous.
Did not I say that the lead did not belong to that place, but to the ginger-beer house, and it bad been left there?
When I asked you to fit them on, did not you say they did not belong to there?
You say my father bad no agreement for the house, (he had lived fourteen years in the place) how long have you been solicitor to, the freeholder?
My father told you to take care of the premises.
The lead found in my possession is the lead from the ginger-beer factory, which was pulled down three days before  it was not carried away, but being attached to the dwelling-house, it was placed on the roof, until we could fetch it away  I told Palmer, it was the lead from the ginger-beer house, and not from the dwelling-house  Mr. Dempsey has inspected the place, and to pull any lead from the gutters, I must have taken the whole of the tiles off the roof  they are small pieces of lead, which Dempsey himself put on when he built it for my father two years before  my father had a seven years' lease, which was out, and he had been four years in the house before Mr. Clark applied for rent; afterwards Mr. Bromekear said he was the owner.
Did you see me with the basket?
I was returning home, up the street  another man was passing by  there was a stoppage of coaches and carts  the man hallooed \Stop thief\"  a man dropped the basket just behind me, and ran by me  I walked on, and this man took hand of me."
I proposed to him to give me the direction, (and I would pay the postage,) to write into the country to know whether they had been received.
I was going round the Dock  a man asked me to put the jacket on, and take it out, which I did  he followed me till I was stopped; he then went away.
I never had it in my hand.
I saw a young mall drop them. I picked them up, and was walking on, looking for the person, when this gentleman came and took me  my friends live upwards of sixty miles off.
I saw a boy go to the chaise, and take out the coat  he dropped it, I took it up, and the gentleman took me.
I met a man who asked me to buy this coat  he asked 12s. for it  I said I had but 5s., besides a bad crown-piece, but I would give him 9s. if he would wait while I went and pawned the coat, and gave him the 9s.
I asked her what she meant by accusing me  the officer took out the money I had in my bag, and showed it her  she then said she believed there were two half-crowns  when I left home I had 10s. 8 1/4 d.  I met a young man, and we had a pot of beer  I then left him and went to their shop  I asked for a pipe  she opened the till, and accused me of robbing the till  I asked what she meant  she reached out her fist to me  I ran out, and my hat dropped off  I was going for any father to swear what money I had on me when I went out  I went into a public-house to get a pint of beer, and the officer came in and took me  I told him what money I had got in my pocket, and it was my own  my father had paid me 12s. for my week's work  there was one battered sixpence among my money, on which my father used to sharpen his needls.
Are you the man that spoke to me first?
You swore that the evidence you gave before the Magistrate was true?
I went in the yard, and saw him near the gate  I said, \Let me look at the horse, have you given him any corn?\"  he said, \"Yes\"  I said, \"Did he eat any hay?\"  he said, \"Yes, I filled the rack,\" and in course of conversation he said, \"I will give you 5l. for the horse\"  I said it was worth 15l. if it was in any condition, but he was not in condition, but he was worth 10l.  I said it did not belong to me."
I did not pretend to be in distress, when I met the prosecutor, he treated me with bread and cheese, and said he would give me a night's lodging, and a good supper, and I should stop all Sunday  as we were going along he gave me a shilling, and said he kept a jerry shop, and what I had I should pay for  when became home he wms drunk, and he gave me no lodging but in the stable  he did not tell me on the Sunday that he would give me another night's lodging  but the man put me into the stable  I do not deny taking the horse and cart, and bringing is to London; at I had left the barge, how was I to get to London? but I had no intention of stealing it; and when I got here, I wrote a letter, which the policeman found on me, to tell the prosecutor when his horse and cart were  I had not power to walk to London.
I was the worse for liquor  I was in company with a carpenter  we went to the London Apprentice  I left my own goods outside the door, and it appears I had the steps  I do not know whether they are his or not.
When you came up, you asked the prosecutor what he had lost?
When I was at the station-house, he said he felt something in my hand  he did not know what it was.
I told him it was not mine.
I went into a coffee-shop, I met these two boys, who asked where I was going  I told them I was going to the Commercial-road about some mats  they said they were going that way  as they went along, one of them went up the street, and brought down this thing  I asked what it was  he said they weighed with it, and he had fetched it from his brother-in-law's  he asked me to hold it while he went over to knock at a door on the other side of the way  the policeman came and caught hold of me, and they ran away.
I was coming down Charing-cross  a gentleman asked me if I had any thing to do, and asked me to go with him  he took me against a lamp, and told me to take the cloak to the park and wait at the first tree I came to, until he came to me  the policeman went with me  we went round the park  there was nobody there.
It is so long ago, it quite slips my memory where I was at the time, or I could prove where I was; as to this dress, I have not had it three months. I never wore a black frock-coat  the last I left off was a green one, and that I had for two years.
I was coming up Farringdon-street, and a man asked me to mind this lead.
The tools were brought to me by a man I know very well, with whom I had worked in Liverpool  I pawned some, and gave him the duplicates  I walked with him towards Highgate, and I asked him to give me the duplicate of the jacket, which he did  he told me I must be careful of selling these tools, for he had taken them out of a shop in Oxford-street.
There was a person lodged with me named George Lloyd  he said he was going to work in a carpenter's shop, in Eagle-street  I went into the prosecutor's and asked for him  I took up this sash merely to look at the workmanship, being a glazier.
I went on board the barge at twelve o'clock at night  I was going to see whether it wanted pumping  this officer came on board, and asked what was in it  I said I did not know  he saw the coals in it; but how they came there I do not know.
I bought the handkerchief two years ago, in Tottenham-court-road; and this hammer I bought in Northampton, seven years ago.
I am guilty of the robbery, but I did not break any thing.
I had been drinking all day, and was come out of a public-house at twelve o'clock at night  I met a gentleman on the road, who gave me 3s. to take the mare to High Wycombe  when Brown overtook me, he knocked me down, made me all over blood; and gave me two black eyes.
When I was apprehended, the reason I gave the name of Palmer was, that I was respected by a numerous circle of friends, and did not wish my name to go forth in the papers to disgrace myself and friends; but I declare I never denied my name to Smithers or Jefferson  Jefferson is not the man who put the handcufs on; it was Smithers  I never offered any violence whatever, nor did I give him a word amiss; but when he upbraided me for being taken in charge for the other thing, which I knew I was innocent of  when I chopped for the horse it was on Saturday the 14th of June, I saw a man named Green  I gave him another mare for it, and 9l. 10s. in money  the mare was worth about 12l.  I asked him how long he had had him  he told me about three weeks  I asked what he had been used to  he said he chopped for him out of a calf-cart, and since he had had him he had been to work at Moulsley  there were several people present; one or two I believe are here  in fact, I borrowed 5l. towards paying for the horse of one Ross  I received the money for him, on the 19th of June, from Mr. Bird.
I was going along, and a man came by with a pitch-fork on his shoulder: he said, \Here, my boy, is a coat for you,\" and threw this coat to me."
I did not steal them  my mistress ordered me to take the things.
I was walking past the house  I saw two young men at the rails, one of whom I thought I knew  I crossed over to them  two men, who seemed to be coal-heavers, crossed at the same time  the two young men went away, and one of the coal-heavers caught my cap of, and threw it over the rails, into the area  I got over to get my cap, and saw the safe door wide open  I was coming back again, and saw the policeman  I ran into the cellar, as I thought they would take me for being in the area.
I had it given to me.
Did I take the lead?
I did not take it down and I never received any benefit from it.
I bought the boots is London, while I was walking with my horse.
I have been out of work three months.
I went to take a walk with some girls, who my sister goes to the Sunday-school with  we were playing in Galway-place  we were running about, and knocked against the girl  she hit my sister and made her cry  I just touched her, and she said I wanted to steal the watch-cases.
We were in the field together playing  the boy wanted to do something, and told me to take his pinafore off  I took it off, and put it on again  he wanted to do a job for himself, and crossed the field  I pulled off his pinafore and coat  he did what he wanted  I was then dressing him  the things lay alongside of him  the man came and took the things from me, and put them in the bag.
I met a friend, who gave me some liquor  I cannot remember what happened afterwards, till I was taken by the collar to this shop  I cannot remember about the lamp.
I was not on my hands and knees  I went in and knocked several times  a woman came out, and I said I wanted a pair of shoes.
I went to the coffee-house, and found the things wrapped up in the handkerchief.
Are you sure I am the person?
I was in liquor.
You went to my box that morning to examine a handkerchief.
I am sure she gave me the same sovereign as I gave to my mistress  I desired them to search Field, but they would not  I am sure if they had they would have found the sovereign.
I was going along the square, and a man put the handkerchief into my hand.
That handkerchief is my own property, there is no mark upon it.
How was it that you was with the policeman when I was taken into custody?
Was I running?
I was walking  I heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" and the policeman took me  he took this handkerchief out of my pocket, but I had bought it of Mr. Sowerby, the pawnbroker."
I heard somebody sing out \Stop thief,\" I ran, and they took me."
How long was I in the shop?
Did you see it in my hand?
I had the misfortune to be very poor  I met a young fellow who told me he could get me some work  we went and took a gentleman's handkerchief, and we had six months  since that I have been taken into employ  I drove a cab, and on the 30th of March I was on the cab, and heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I went with the rest, and came back with them  no one stopped me  the woman then came out and said, \"That is him.\""
I was leaning on the counter  I did not take the money  she cannot say she saw me.
We have always been brought up together  I came home in liquor, and by mistake I pawned these things, thinking they were mine  I have pawned his goods before.
I believe it is the result of an error in posting the accounts in the ledger, and not taking in all the items composing it  one entry I might easily have overlooked, as the sum was not due at the time paid  that such an error was most likely to have occurred, can be proved by a gentleman who has overlooked Mr. Cash's books  Mr. Cash had security from me, and will not sustain any loss  there is more than that due to me as salary  I solemnly declare I do not know where the cash-book is.
Did I not come into your office to solicit orders for Mr. Bloodsworth's pottery?
Did I go further when I saw you?
On the 24th, J was not out of Vauxhall from ten o'clock in the morning, till four o'clock in the afternoon, which Mr. Bloodworth, my employer, will prove  I was posting and making up my books  I kept the Horns stables, at Kennington, a few months ago, and lost some thousands of pounds  when I got from my employer's house, it was not with the intent to run away  I went into every house I could think of, to find the person who gave me the order  he said Mr. Carruthers sent his compliments to me  it could be proved, if witnesses were here, that the man came up to me, and asked me to leave the note at Mr. Fearon's  I went into the City  after I had done business, Harrison wanted me to go to Hoxton with him, which I declined, because I had to go to Fearon's; and thinking Fearon was a customer of Hill's, I thought I would go and solicit orders for Mr. Bloodworth.
I was going into the City with my fellow-trayeller, Mr. Harrison, and as I passed Mr. Hill's pottery, I was accosted by person who said, \Mr. Carruthers sent his compliments, and would thank me to leave a note at Mr. Fearon's, for Hill, and get a porter to carry the articles;\" which I did  the clerk told me the order was forged  I did not know the person who gave it to me, and when I got to Vauxhall I was running to a public-house to see if I could find the man  I met a person who was waiting for me  I said I should go to Hill's  he said, \"They will take you, if you do; you had better come with me and wait;\" and when I got on the road, he gave me in charge  Harrison knows the man who gave me the note  I have seen the same man drinking with Hill's. men."
We were all tipsy  the lodgers were leaving the house, for the landlord had put in a broker  I went to clear out part of the goods with them, and they gave us some drink  I could not tell what time I left the house  I saw nothing of the articles that I recollect.
I bought them under the idea that they were bought publicly at a sale-room, as I knew of Wood's being in the service of Mr. Valentine, and he had a catalogue to remove some small stationery.
I met a man, dressed as a lighterman, who said he would give me part of a pot of ale to carry this to the corner of Bedford-street  he told me to wait while he got a cab  the policeman came up, and asked what I had got  I told him a beam I was going to take to Jemmy M'Fell, and took him to Lloyd's, as I heard the man mention his name.
A man asked me to buy the fowls  I took him to this wit-ness to sell them.
I met the same man again; he gave me 4d. for selling this.
I know nothing about it.
I picked them up in the road  he called to them to stop me, and I let them fall.
I was ordered to finish the work at my leisure time  the agreement was that it should all be redeemed in a fortnight, which expired on the Thursday I was taken  he agreed to that with my mother while I was away.
Martin and the prosecutor were there, and nobody heard those expressions but the witness  I never said any such thing as that I would serve Martin out.
I never took the box.
I am the victim of a set of perjured villains who take it off their own shoulders and throw it on me  I know nothing of the transaction.
I declare that I never saw the prosecutrix's shop at all  I went to Mr. Williams, the soap-maker  I came along Wellington-street home, and never went out again till the policeman came and took me  I always wore a blue coat.
When I was taken back to the house, there was a shilling produced, but I had not been in the house on the 23rd  the witness said she shut the till, and then opened it again, and gave the shilling to her sister.
I said I got the shilling for carrying a gentleman's trunk from the Flower-pot to the corner of Hamp stead-road, where the gentleman was waiting for the coach or omnibus to come by.
I never was in Mr. Mayo's shop before.
I was walking by the place; they caught me; and said I had been passing bad money, which I had not.
I am innocent.
As I was going home, a lad came up to me and said, \Do you want to buy a waistcoat?\" I said, \"No; but I know a young man who wore one very much like it\"  I went to show it to the man at the Feathers  I asked him if he wanted one  he said no  the landlord said, \"Do not bring things here for sale\"  I came out directly, and the policeman took me  he shook me, and would not give me leave to speak a word  the boy ran away then, and he was seen the same night offering it for sale."
This wall is twelve feet high, and has glass bottles on the top  I could not get over it  I did not rent the room he went to.
I expected it was Sarah Nichols's.
I went to Mr. Berry's, to inquire if he had got the piece of baize.
I leave it to yourselves to say whether it stands to reason that I should go to his shop and offer two half-crowns within five minutes.
As soon as they asked for it, I gave it up directly.
The other boy took the jacket, and gave it to me.
At the Magistrate's house the prosecutor said if I would give him 6l. he would not appear against me.
I am very sorry to be placed at this bar for such a case  I have certainly been lodging with the prosecutrix some time, and she has stated to me over and over again, that she was in real distress, and could scarcely make both ends meet  I expected daily and hourly to be turned out of my lodging  I have had a few pounds from my friends, as I sent to them for a little assistance  it was mostly with the intent to pay the prosecutrix, as she pleaded poverty, and being very hardly done by her lodgers, who had been hardly put to it  she behaved as a mother to me  I sent into the country for 5l., which I had from a friend of mine to pay her, and recruit myself with a few clothes, and get my tools ready to go to work again  I know very well she has been receiving money from the poor-house, which made me believe her very poor  as to the box, I never knew any thing of it  I never saw it till I was apprehended  as to the key, in my business it is a very useful thing, to use to graze off the glass when the fingers will not touch it  I went to Sadler's Wells on the evening previous  I fell in with a friend or two, and spent a few shillings  I went and had something to drink  on my way home I laid down, having had too much  I went to sleep  I awoke about five in the morning, and fell in with a young girl in Great Suffolk-street  we had a cup of coffee together, and went from there, near St. George's Church  I there found I was robbed  I turned my pockets inside out before the landlord, who said, \Give her into custody\"  I did so, and 3s. were found upon her  when I got to the station-house, whether the policeman put it into my pocket, I cannot swear; but I am positive when I turned my pockets out, I had only fourpence."
On the 2nd of March I had no work to do, and I heard that brick-making was stirring down at Erith  I went down, and returned on the 7th of March, and then was accused of this.
Did you see me take the beads?
I had been out of work a fortnight  I was walking down the street with two or three young men  I turned up a court, and when I had got about two hundred yards further, the prosecutor came and accused me of this. I am quite innocent.
You put the crown down on the counter after you had weighed it, as I thought I had got halfpence enough, and when I found I had not, you took up the crown-piece and weighed it again  what made you do that?
The prosecutor was there, and he must have heard if that was said.
I went into the prosecutor's shop for an ounce of salts and half-an-ounce of senna  I gave him a five-shilling-piece, and, as he was giving me change, I said I thought I had halfpence enough, but I had not, and I said, \I must change now\"  he then took the crown off the counter, and put it into the scale again, and said it was bad, and he would swear that I gave it to him  the crown I gave him was good, and he must have changed it in his till, where he put it before he put it on his counter."
When you came into the Britannia you called for a pint of ale?
Between seven and eight o'clock you were asleep, and awoke and called for more ale  you felt in your pocket and had no money to pay for it.
Where were you when I pulled the basket?
Who were you in company with?
Are you sure it was me?
When I pushed you against the pales, which way did I run?
I was drinking in the Britannia, with a man who told me I could get work at Drayton  between two and three o'clock the prosecutor came in and called for a pint of ale  he asked a young woman to drink with him  he then had bread and cheese and more ale, then a pot of ale  he changed half a sovereign  the landlord brought him in the change  he sat there, having pot after pot, till between seven and eight o'clock, and then called for another pot  he was stupidly drunk  he sat on the seat, and then on the ground  he had not money to pay for the last ale, and it was taken back  I went home to get some clean things, and then returned to the Britannia  I was running towards Drayton, and he was reeling about  he reeled against me as I was going by, and went back against the pales  I went into the road, and kept on my journey  when I got about twenty yards, I heard him call, \Stop thief,\" and, \"Murder,\" but I went on, and got to Drayton  I found I was too late  I stopped there a week, and took lodgings at Hounslow; and there the policeman took me."
I know nothing of the robbery, further than I met a young woman as I was going along  she gave me the things to pawn, and I pawned them.
A young man asked me to carry it to Moorgate.
I asked him for 6d. and he gave it to me; after he was gone I found the handkerchief  he came back and asked me if I had found a handkerchief  I said I had, and gave it to him.
I was going to see for my brother  the other lad took the handkerchief and gave it me  I was rather frightened, and took it  I ran down a turning which was no thoroughfare, and was taken  I was in good work at a wharf in Earl-street, with my father.
The things were my own.
Miller says he never saw that book before; you will find the particulars of that account, and the order in it, which I took from Mr. Miller; it is my order-book and I must have had it at the time; I said I had paid every amount I had received, and could prove I had received them  I said I had received them, and was ready to swear I had, quite contrary to what the prosecutor says  I said I was ready to swear I paid every thing over  I am quite clear in my conscience I paid every farthing I received  it is well known the order-book is not a private book  it was purchased with the prosecutor's money, and laid on my desk every evening when I returned  it is not my property, nor in it a private book.
Seeing my book on me desk, I have said to the prosecutor, \It is no secret, look at it.\""
I never denied having received the money from the witnesses; I paid him every farthing I received; the first intimation I received from the prosecutor was on Tuesday the 21st, he charged me with receiving money and not accounting for it; my reply was, I had received monies that day and a very few days previously, and had not accounted for them, which I intended to have done that evening if he had been at home  his clerks heard me say, I had money to the amount in the paper, and should be glad to see the prosecutor if he returned that evenings that I might pay it to him; and if not, the money was as safe in my pocket as in his desk  he says he never received more money on one day than I had collected that day; my object is to show I received the amounts during the week, and the prosecutor received them all on Saturday; on which day I generally paid them in  he never intimated that I should pay them every night  he knew I did not collect on Saturdays.
I declare I never received any amount without paying it over to the prosecutor, on the Saturday, or the day I received it  on the Tuesday evening when I was accused, the prosecutor, after my producing what money I had in my pocket, charged me with having received other money, and not accounting for it  I said, \If you will mention any amount, I am ready to prove having paid it;\" he mentioned Paternoster's  I said, \"Certainly I have; he paid me his account at Christmas, I think, and I presume it was entered in your cash-book in the regular way\"  he said, \"It was not\"  I said, \"I can only say it is in my order-book, and I can shew you the entry, and will swear I have paid you every farthing I received\"  I went with the clerk to my apartment, turned to the entry, and shewed it to him  how it did not get into his cash-book I cannot tell  I said, \"It is too late this evening to make out the account\"  he said, \"I will have it this evening\"  I said, \"To-morrow morning I will commence making up the cash account,\"which I did on Wednesday  on Thursday morning I went to him, and said, I had made up a statement of the accounts, and wished to enter into the particulars of it  he said, \"I am engaged now\"  I said, \"Will you let me know when you will be disengaged?\" he said, \"I shall be engaged the whole of this day\"  now Thursday was the drug sale-day, and I considered that was the reason he was engaged  to shew my statement was correct, I said, \"I have no objection to remain with you till you can suit yourself with somebody to fill my situation\"  his reply was, \"I will think of it\"  I remained there that Thursday and Friday, and on Saturday morning he called me to him and said, \"You have not let me have the accounts\"  I said, \"They are in my desk, I handed them to you on Thursday\"  I went and brought them to him  I said, \"Here is every particular, will you enter into them now?\" he said, \"I cannot enter into them; give me the money received, and not accounted for\"  I said, \"I have paid you all I have received\"  he said, \"Give me the money; \"I said, \"I have already done it, and shall not do it again  I consider my character at stake, and shall certainly resort to measures if you give me in charge\"  I said, \"Here are my cash accounts, I am ready to see what you call a deflacation; and if any thing appears in the cash-book, there must be some error if you will look into it\"  He said, \"I shall not; give me the money\"  I said, \"I shall not give it you again, do your worst\"  He said, \"You have not paid me; you arc a liar and a rogue\"  he said he had discovered a great many other amounts  I defied him to prove it."
The policeman told me I should be transported, and told the witness he would get his expenses at the Old Bailer.
Am I the person?
I was going along Pall-mall, about two yards behind the gentleman  a lad, about a yard and a half before me, made a start, and threw the purse down  I picked it up, and the gentleman charged me with stealing it.
I was coming along Giltspur-strcet  I saw people running, and heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I followed them down Cock-lane, and was standing there, the prosecutor came up and said, \"I think that is the man\"  Price came and asked what was the matter  I said, \"I believe somebody has stolen a saddle.\""
Can you swear positively that I stole it?
The other person who slept there was his grandson  he has been in trouble two or three times.
I put the stockings on while my own were washed  I am innocent of the money.
The wall was eight or ten feet high, it would have broken the firkin all to pieces, had I got it over there.
Did you see me running?
I deny that I said I had had a sharp run  I deny stealing the coats, or being in the street  I was going down Castle-street and heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I saw a man drop the coats  I pursued him, and was taken."
A man I did not know told me to carry it to Charing-cross.
It was only 1l. 5s. he gave me; 14s. that night, and 11s. in the morning.
I am not the person who married Ann Norbron  I married the second person.
I was sitting on a stool  I saw the handkerchief under the shed  I took it up and walked through Billingsgate with it in my hand to see if any body owned it.
The silver was my own property; and if I had obtained it wrong, I should not have kept Ruel's card in my possession  I was taken and discharged  I went into the country for two months; and on returning, found I was indicted, with Downes and others  I met the officer, who said I should be wanted at the Sessions  I agreed to meet him at Downes's house, at two o'clock on Monday  I went there, but he did not come  he said, if I was with him before the Sessions it would do  I was taken and brought here on Thursday.
How large was the hole?
I was rather in liquor, and know nothing about the shoes.
A man took the shoes down, and gave them to me, I walked on about five yards  a young man came and took them out of my hand  I gave them to him directly and walked on one hundred yards, when he sung out, and the policeman came and took me.
I was tipsy, and recollected nothing about it till next morning  I had been drinking there from three o'clock in the afternoon, till after one o'clock in the morning  a man was in the house at the time it was taken from me, who is here  I do apt know how the glass came there.
I had purchased the boots.
I bought them of a Jew at the end of Northampton-street, for 5s.
A man named Stevens called on me, and took me out; he stole the handkerchief, and gave it to me.
The gate was wide open, and I saw them lying at the door.
The officer said he heard every word that the gentleman said to me, and when he took it out of my breast, he said, \I think this is mine.\""
I was going to sell the shoes to get a night's lodging.
This gentleman laid hold of me, and said I had robbed him  the officer took me to the station-house; and in going along, he said, \I know the one who took the handkerchief, and I will have him\"  I have been in work ever since I left the Compter."
I was passing Holborn, and saw two young men  one of them dropped the handkerchief which I picked up  the gentleman collared me, ana I said I picked it up.
I delivered the letter to the boy in the usual way  he is the only person who takes the letters  I met him, and asked him for the name of Strong  he said that was all right  I gave him the letter, and told him I would call next time on my delivery; and next morning he came over to me, at No. 11, and gave me the receipt and 4s.
I was in Souton's shop  there was a dispute between the prosecutor and Souton  I said to Souton, \Don't let the man rob you as he has me\"  he made no more to do but crossed the shop, came up to me, and said, \"What do you mean?\" he caught hold of my collar, and said, \"You b  , I will shake you out of your shoes\"  I said, \"Keep off \"  he caught hold of my collar, and shook me four or five times, and I hit him with the hook  he pushed roe several times with his hand before he collared me."
I know nothing about the things.
He ran past me.
He said I cut them down, but I never had a knife about me  I saw them picked up, but I was a great way off  there was no man with me.
A young man asked me to carry it; he said he would give me 3d., and I being out of work, carried it  I heard the alarm, and he told me to throw it down, and run away, which I did.
It was a dark street; he could not see who took it.
I know no more about it than a child unborn.
I was going out on Palm Sunday  I found a bundle in the Liverpool-road, containing this shirt, shawl, and a towel.
I was directed by a person to go to the house.
It is my first offence  I was labouring under intoxication when I did it  I have a distressed family, and beg for mercy.
I was coming across the fields  I saw the box lie there, broken open, and the things lying about  the policeman came np and saw me there  I did not like to tell my right direction, because if my master heard it, I should not get employ again.
I was crossing the road up Shoe-lane  the policeman came and pulled off my hat, and said, he thought I had the property there.
He said it had come off his trowsers; and he showed an iron shank, and said it had come off there the same day.
I went and called for half-and-half  I tossed for a pot of beer, which I lost and paid a shilling for  I went into the yard, and in about ten minutes his brother came in and struck me, and said I had picked his pocket  I denied it; he had charged the witness with it at first  we had two or three blows a-piece  a policeman was sent for  I gave up the money and button  he swore to the button as soon as he saw it put down, and I saw the place where it had broken off my brace-button  he pretended to show where it belonged to his trowsers  there was an iron shank left there, and he said it had been on there.
When I came out I had 2s.  I met my sweetheart, she gave me 10s., that made 12s.  when they asked me what money I had I said 12s. when I came out; but I had been to several other houses  I had 12s. when I came out of the barracks  if we lose a button we have to make it good.
He gave me an order the same day to go to Evans, in Queen-square, for coffee, and I took it to him at a public-house in Farringdon-street  he told me to go up the yard, I did so, and afterwards went to Threadneedle-street with a box, but never had these goods.
When I went to him to ask if they were ready, he said, not  I said I was going further, and would call again  he said, \You had better sign your name to the book,\" and I did  I never went back again."
I was ten or twelve yards past the shop, and saw this hat  I took it up, and was looking at it  this boy came and said I stole it  I said \I did not,\" and threw it down, and was going on  some man came and said, \"Is this him?\"  I went back with him without difficulty."
The coat was picked up in the road; he said before the Magistrate, that he left it on the copse.
I picked it up in the road, and went on.
I never sold you any.
The time he states I was up at Islington; but I have no witness to prove it.
I was out of work  I was going tip the street, this brass was loose, and I took it off.
I was walking by this gentleman, and a boy stole his handkerchief  I was running after the boy, and he said it was me.
I picked up this box  the gentleman came after me, and I gave it him.
I went to sleep on board, and when I awoke, about five o'clock, a man was buttoning up my clothes  I felt these things inside  he said \It is all right, go and get some beer\"  I was going, and the gate-keeper stopped me."
Mr. Brown's men served me a trick six years ago when I went for leather; they put two stones in, which weighed twenty-eight pounds; I took them back, and with a deal to do I got some leather for them; instead of putting in the stones, why might not they put this leather in?
A Mrs. Rose, who lodged there, and is now in prison, gave a man leave to put these tools there, when I was not at home.
I delivered the wateb up directly  it was given to me by a young man, and then this person seized me  I gave it to the prosecutor.
It was not me.
He had got my 2d. in his pocket.
I was coming to get a ship at Chatham  I met an old ship-mate, and went with him  we had eleven pots of beer and two-pennyworth of tobacco  he had nothing left but 2d.  he said, \Jack, there is a gentleman over the way in a gig, he will give you 2d., to make up a pot for a round dozen\"  I went over to him, and the gentleman knocked my hat off with the whip, as he was getting into the gig, and knocked the 2d. out of my hat  the prosecutor took it up, put it into his pocket, and said he had only picked up the bread."
It was not my intent to rob the man, or I should not have attacked him in the presence of twenty men; but a sailor said, \I would have my 2d., Jack, \"and I said I would."
After I asked him for 2d., he would not give it to me  he went over to the Berkeley Arms, then came out, and sat on the seat; a sailor said, \I would have my 2d. If I were you\"  I went over again and said, \"Do you mean to give me my 2d.\"  he said, \"I will take up this piece of bread and give you\"  he would not give it to me, and I struck him, but not a third time, for he fell down without a blow  when he came over the bridge, he said he would send for a constable, and I should have a month's imprisonment  I came round and met him, and the coach came up  he fell down directly on his back, the passengers got off, and asked what was the matter  I said he had robbed me of 2d.  he said, \"No, I did not; he took away some bread from me\"  he went away on the coach  there are eight or ten small houses there  I could not intend to rob him  I had a right to have my 2d.  it fell in the road it was not his."
Did not I ask you to lend me a few shillings  you said your husband had been out drinking for three weeks, and you had not a farthing; I asked you to lend me the things off the bed, and you said I was welcome to them if I would return them on Saturday, which is to-night?
I was at home the same day.
I know nothing about it  I was at home that day.
I did it through distress.
I took the tools to pawn to get some victuals, as I was in great distress, work being slack.
I have not received my money, I took this money to pay some debts which I owed  there were some expenses attending my employ.
It is false; the property was thrown at me when I went along.
There may be some error in the dates; if it shall appear so I shall be happy for it  I lost my purse the very day the prosecutor gave me into custody  I had not any opportunity of making the balance up, which was due to him  there was no intention on my part of embezzlement.
I saw the watch on the mantel-piece, and being in great distress, was tempted to take it.
I paid you two separate half-crowns, as part of the bill.
I had been out of place for some months  I put this money into my pocket, and when I got home, half a sovereign was missing  I intended to pay him half-a-crown a week, which was as much as I could spare out of my wages, which were only 15s. a week  he discharged me without notice.
I never had any thing of the kind in my possession, to my knowledge.
I am innocent  when the woman came to the watch-house, she said she could not swear it was me who was outside the door.
I picked it up.
I was merely pencilling outside the house; he came out without speaking a word to me, and struck me over the eye  I went and asked him what provocation I had given him  he caught hold of me, shook me, and turned me out, and I kicked him, which I am very sorry for, for he was the best of friends to me.
Did you state before the Magistrate that they cost you 4s. a yard  it will appear by the invoices, that they cost 2s. 8 1/2 d. and 2s. 9 1/2 d. a-yard?
We jointly took the premises at No. 12, Diana-place, New-road, in October, 1833.
Do you deny that your agreement and mine was to take that house, and if the officers of the Excise should come and find the illicit still, I should stand forward, and you would keep back, and supply me with money?
Did not you and I take a public-house in John-street?
There was a partnerhip between the prosecutor and myself, and the profits were to be equally divided between him, and Lynch, and me  with the money we got for these silks, we took the house.
He always knew me and Mr. Taylor to be in partnership.
I was coming home over Blackfriars-bridge, and I saw one of the men with a basket  I put my hand to it and said, \What have you got here?\"  he said, a bit of lead, and did I know any place where it could be sold  I said, I would have nothing to do with it  we came on to Red Lion-street, and he said, \"Is there any old iron shop here?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  we went into a shop; the gentleman came out and said, \"What have you got?\"  we both said \"A bit of lead\"  the man took it out of the basket, and put it into the scale."
Who spoke the first word?
Did you ask me if there was any more there?
Was I to enter them if they were sold for ready money?
I am entirely innocent  I borrowed the apprentice's box to take my own things to my mother's, and I brought it back  I know nothing about these things  I gave myself up to Mr. Lilley directly Mr. Wiltshire told me of the charge  my not meeting him at three o'clock that day, was my not seeing Mr. Enever; and the next morning I heard my mother was in custody  I went to a solicitor, who advised me to stay out of the way, which I did; but I did not hide myself  West knows he put the things into the box.
I picked it off the ground  the policeman called out, \Has any gentleman lost a handkerchief?\"  the gentleman turned round, and said, he had  he could not exactly swear it was his at first."
Did you see me knock his hat off?
I and another young man went to the fair to sell four hundred oranges  I took a walk through the fair to have a look at it  I saw two Young lads, one of them had a handkerchief in hit hand; the other said, \D  n that old thing, go and fetch us a tanner\"  he threw it down; I took it up  the policeman said, \"Give us that handkerchief\"  I said, \"I shall not\"  I did not know he was a policeman; he was in plain clothes  if I had given it to him, he would have said nothing about it."
I heard that Mr. Shillibeer wanted an omnibus-man, and went to Greenwich  I wat at the fair, but was never in custody before.
I have no recollection how I got them  I had been drinking  I came up from Manchester, where I used to work in a stable, but the rail-road has destroyed our work so much, that I could get no employ.
When my master found the coats, I told him there were more things, and I gave up the duplicates.
When did I pawn them?
I intended to take them out again, at I expected some money from my father, but before I got it, the Major put me in the guard-house.
What he says is false.
I was coming by a street, and picked up a paper with some cigars in it; I put them into my pocket  a man came and took me.
I went to the fair to try and get work  I was getting through a crowd when the officer took me.
I did not have it in my hand  I was pushing through a crowd after my father  I saw it on the ground, and the officer took me.
I had not the handkerchief  it was at my feet  I had been in a booth  this man came and took me, and took the handkerchief up from my feet.
I was going from the fair between nine and ten o'clock, and saw two boys drop the handkerchief; I took it up, and before I had got two yards, the policeman came and said I had stolen it.
On the day the ham was lost, I was passing the shop, and picked it up nearly opposite the window  I tied it up in this handkerchief, and was going towards Charlton, when the watchman took me; it was through distress that I kept it, or else I would have taken it into the shop.
About six o'clock I went to the public-house to have a pint of beer; one of the persons there said, \Come, and have a game of skittles;\" we played  I then came in again, and had another pint or two of beer  I left there about half-past eight, and went to another public-house, and had some more  the place where these things were found is a thoroughfare."
Whilst we were playing at skittles one of the boys threw the ball into the prosecutor's ground, and I got over the gates to get it  at two o'clock in the morning they took me out of bed  they searched the same place, and did not find these articles.
There were no shoes in the parcel  I received it from a comrade of mine, who was discharged the same day  I did not take the parcel from her.
I had been in the hospital three months  and when I got out, a little liquor which I took had an effect upon me, and I cannot tell where I slept, but I found myself in a passage, and these things, were there  I took them up, and this man took me with them.
I had received this bundle from a comrade who had been discharged the day before, and gone off in the steamer.
While I was in a crowd looking at a show, I felt the handkerchief at my feet  I took it up, looked at it, and put it into my pocket  the officer then came up in plain clothes, and I thought it was his  he took me to the gentleman, who was ten or twelve yards off  he said it was his  but he would not prosecute as I had not done him any injury.
I know nothing about the charge.
I asked for the loan of five sovereigns, and wished to see her father  she asked if I was a relation of Mrs. Butler's.
Did you not ask me if I had a cheque?
I certainly went and asked if Mr. Wood was at home  she said he was not  she asked if I was related to Mr. Butler; which I am, as Mr. Butler in Cheapside married my sister  I said, \Can you oblige me with five sovereigns?\" and she produced a bag in Which were forty or fifty sovereigns  I said, \"Can you oblige me with five more?\"  she said \"Yes\"  I took the money, and did not return."
I had occasion to turn up the archway, and some gentleman came and took me to the shop; and as we were going in, this witness came out of the shop, and said, \That is one.\""
As I was going along I saw a young man with a white handkerchief I his hand  he chucked it down  I picked it up and went across the street with it.
I am a poor man  I have lived in service but was out of employ at the time, and was glad to earn 6d.  I am entirely innocent of the charge, as it respects any knowledge that the instrument was forged, or it is not probable I should go to a person I sop well knew as Mr. Dill  he is mistaken in supposing I said I was in Mr. Cotton's service  It was the man who gave it to me  of course I am unable to bring the man forward from whom I got it, as he must be the man by whom it was forged or who knew it was so  I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Did you not let the half-crown go into another person's hand to show it to them?
Did you not say a man in a velvet coat threw the handkerchief down, and it went on my breast.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Jury.
What did you say?
The fact is I did pledge them  when I took that dozen I asked three shillings on them  he said he supposed I would take fourpence a piece for them  I said \No; they are worth a great\\ deal\\ more;\" but it was under the impression of getting them out again."
I had not had it in my hand.
I did not take the gentleman's handkerchief.
I was walking along  I saw the waistcoat hang down  I took it up, and put it under my jacket.
I went there at three o'clock. I asked that young man to let me write a letter  he did  he went up with me, and went out to take a jug of water up.
I have no knowledge of receiving this money  I have been in the habit of receiving large sums for years.
I was not at the Red Lion after nine o'clock that night.
He pulled off his shoes before he went to sleep, and said he had no money, but he wanted somebody to make money on his shoes  he gave me his box to take a bit of tobacco, and as he was gone to sleep I put the box into my pocket.
Do you think I stole them?
Had you not been drinking with the prosecutor that morning?
I am quite innocent; it was Mary Eagle that stole the property  Mrs. Rogers is a woman that would buy any thing  I was going to a brother of mine; but he was not at home  I went to this house, meaning to lead an honest life  Mary Eagle walks the streets for her living.
Did not you say you saw the policeman take the bonnet out of my hand in the yard?
Did you take that out of my hands?
Are there not bed people live up the court?
I was going down there, and came by the house  I saw the door open  I stopped talking to a person there for about ten minutes, and Buckley came down, my back was against the door  he said, \Is that you Polly?\"  I said, \"No, it is not\"  he said, \"Oh, is it you Jack Barrett?\"  I said, \"Yes it is\"  he kicked the bonnet before him, and took hold of me, and the policeman came up  a parcel of girls came up; he told them I had taken the bonnet, and the girls gave me some slaps in the face, and tore my waistcoat; the policeman came up and told them not to hit me  I never saw the property."
I picked up the handkerchief on the curb, and I was going to give it to the gentleman  It is very odd to me how the officer could see through the cart.
I took some nails out of the box  I did not touth the bristles.
I went in there for a halfpenny-worth of nails  this man then said I had taken something, but I had not  I went out, and went up Moor-lane, and was then brought back.
He asked me to mind them.
He gave me the clothes to mind, and then Gritton went away, and I was looking after him  I did not see this boy in the water.
I am innocent  there was no one but him and me in the skittle-ground.
I was better than half drunk  I went and turned in with this gentleman  I got up, put the clothes on me, and walked away.
The prosecutor had got the clothes on his arm, before the policeman took me.
I did not drop the purse at all.
I told you I had the ticket of a watch, and if you would go and get it, we would share the profits  we went and got it  I put it into my pocket  when we got to the rail-road you asked to look at it, and I let you  we came on, and tried several pawnbrokers to get the money on it again  when we got to Brown's-lane, I said, \If you will wait here a quarter of an hour or twenty minutes, if I do not come back you may call me in the morning; you know where I live, \"and if you had called you would have had the watch  I should suppose I was part owner of the watch, as we were to share the profits  the watch was given to me, as I understood most about it  he told me to put it into my pocket carefully, and mind it did not fall  he told me to do what I could with it."
We have been in one anothers company frequently, and drank together on the stand, but now he denies all knowledge of me  we went and redeemed the watch  the pawnbroker said he would lend the same money on it again  Crook gave it to me look at  I said it would do very well  when we got to the rail-road he asked me to let him look it, I did so he gave it to me again when we got to Brown's lane I took it and said, \If I do not come back in a quarter of an hour or twenty minutes, come to me in the morning\"  I am a whip-maker by trade, and drive a cab occasionally."
I saw him put a piece of money into the witness's hand,
Did you not say you did not recollect my face, but you thought it was me?
I went into the house with a young woman. I asked her to wait while I went to the privy  the officer then came and took me  I know nothing about it.
He lent me half-a-crown, and he lent me his knife when he went to get him money  as we were going up the Strand, he called for some drink, and the cabman went and got it for him.
He has paid the rent of the room, and supported his wife since  she employed two men to take away the things  I neither advised it to be done, not took them away  he turned me out of doors.
Did I employ any body?
I lodged with this man for four months instead of one  I paid him or his wife from eight to ten shillings a week, for board, lodging, and washing  he quarrelled with her at different times  he threatened her life  he threstened to stab her, and I stopped him at different times  on the Wednesday night he got out of bed, and struck her three times  I got out, and said, \Do not ill-use the woman\"  the next morning he left her; she sold some things, and asked me to hire a room for her  the things were brought there by two men  I stood in the passage, and one of the men said, \"Give me a hand to shove this bed up, \"Which I did  I never sold the goods, nor had any benefit from them."
I came for half a pint of porter  I went up stairs again, intending to lay down an hour longer.
I am quite innocent  I was merely lying down in the field.
I have been allowed to plead \Not Guilty,\" to afford myself a chance of escaping the rigour of the law. I am encouraged to hope the Court will, listen to a brief narrative of circumstances whcih led me to the commission of the crime  I not only knowledge, but I deeply feel the enormity of the crime; but some circumstances connected with my melanchloy case you may not deem unworthy of your notice  very early in life I lost my father  I was placed in a situation, when quite a child, and lived with Mr. Atkinson, a respectable bill-broker, about two years  I gave him such satisfaction that he obtained a situation with the prosecutors for me  I was their junior clerk upwards of seven years, and endeavoured to merit their approbation  this my long stay in their service will sufflciently prove I had earned their confidence  my name was entered in the books of the Stock Exchange, and I became acquainted with many persons, which led me into extravagant habits, which so oppressed my mind, I sought to obtain another situation, but without effect, in order to avoid the temptations I was continually exposed to  my resolution was so week that all my attempts to disengage myself from my gay acquaintances were fruitless  with a view to remedy this evil I got married, (but rashly and unadvisedly,) and having but 1l. a year, I could not maintain a wife  I became embarrassed and almost distracted; and, with hopes of being able to repay the amount, was tempted to commit the crime, it being my first offence, and I assure you it shall be my last  I am the roughest of eight children, of a respectable family  I had no father to take charge of me when young, and was exposed in the midst of temptations, which I thought to stop, but the means I adopted involved me tenfold more  I had just entered life, and all the hopes of myself and wife will be by your decision blasted, and the feelings of a fond mother deeply wounded  I entreat your Lordship to take this statement into your kind consideration, and whatever may be my sentence, (should I ever be able,) my conscience will compel me to repay every farthing of the money obtained by means of the forged cheque."
I went to the horse's head  I saw the prosecutor was very much intoxicated  he went into the house, and I heard my mistress say, \Take care of your money\"  I found this note about an hour afterwards  I put it into my pocket. but I did not know what it was  the next morning the ostler said, \"Have you found any thing?\"  I said, \"Why?\"  he said a gentleman made a rare noise last night, and said he had lost a parcel, and if any one would find it he would give 20l. I said I had found that note."
I had occasion to got to Camberwell, and was returning'home abut a quarter Past t eight o'clock  the gentleman came over, changed em with breaking the window, and took me to the station-house  he said he had lost a watch, and about a week afterwards he said he had lost two; a at the next hearing said he said he bad lost three.
I was in distress, and the door was open.
I hope you will have a little mercy on me this I will not do so again.
A little while after I went there the girl pulled the drawer out by the side of the till, and told me to get the money out.
When you came to me in St. Martin's-le-Grand was I not walking?
A gentleman came to me at the corner of St. Paul's Church-yard, and asked me to take that as far as Jewin-street  I was to wait at the corner till he came, and he would give me one shilling  I told the porter so when he took me.
I met the young lad in going home  I was turning to look at a carriage  the threw the handkerchief in my face, and told me to mind it  he said he had picked it up  I got about twenty yards from the prosecutor, and he took hold of me  the other boy ran away, and I after him  as soon as the prosecutor cried \Stop thief,\" I stopped and walked."
I was in great distress,
I took the box because the prosecutor had got 1l. of mine, and I could not get it of him.
She does not know what was in the room.
I had no money, and was in want.
I went to the Red Lion, with another young man  I went in by myself, as he was going further  I saw the prosecutor sitting there with two or three young men  I know nothing about the coat  I never saw it.
I was met by a man who took me into a public-house, and gave me some gin beer, and I was intoxicated  he took my boots and shoes off my back, and gave me 10s. for them  I was ashamed to go home.
I know nothing of the charge.
On Monday morning, the 30th of November, I was at a lady's house in Union-place, Carta in-road, at seven o'clock, and never left until nine o'clock  I then accompanied the lady to Bartholomew's Hospital to see her daughter, and never left her till half-past ten o'clock.
The corn I had on my premises, Tarling and Maides sent me  I am a carman, and find horses for carriers for different wharfs.
I did not steal any waistcoats  when they took me, they ill-used me very improperly  they took my money from me, and next morning said I only had 2s., but I had a half-crown, sixpence, two shillings, and some halfpence  every thing was taken out of my pocket  the policeman had hold of me, searching me, and knocking me about.
I did not go into that public-house  I got a quartern of gin with the halfpence I had, but I changed no silver  I laid the half-crown and sixpence on the counter, and took it up again, and put it in my pocket  I had two shillings besides, and a had sovereign about me.
I came from Deptford on board a ship  I came ashore, and had no dinner, nor did I buy any thing for supper  I asked him to be so good as to give me a bit of bread, us it was late, and he did  any thing else I know nothing about.
I was looking at the prints  a boy chucked the handkerchief on a railing, and ran away  I took it up, and put it into my pocket  the gentleman immediately collared me  I will take my with I never look it out of his pocket  It is very false to say so.
I had not been down so far as Bond-street  I came from the Middlesex Hospital.
, I was very tipsy, and did not know what I was doing.
It is a spite she has against me  she called me \sore eyes\" one day, and I threatened I would slap her head."
He could not see me from where he lives.
Did I say I was not the only one?
You said, \Don't you come on the dock\"."
With regard to this piece of indigo which I put into my pocket, it was on the desk; as to the dust in that coat pocket, it has been there two or three months  I have been in the habit, when I have had chests brought, to put bits in my pocket, and put it in a paper  I have my way of working, and each man has his own way.
Last year there were thirty-three chests, and 500 and pounds were lost, and now, this year, about 87lbs. out of these chests  they were on the floor, open, two or three weeks  there are twenty or thirty men employed, labourers and seamen, and custom-house-officers  the chests they are all open.
I am guilty.
I saw the handkerchief lying in the kennel, and picked it up.
I leave it to the merely of the Court  It is my first offence.
. I know nothing about it.
I did not say so.
On the 15th of November, I worked for him  he would not allow me two hours to go out  he gave me notice to leave on the week following  I came to work as usual, and left on Friday  I did not return till the Sunday  I got up at half=-past six o'clock, and found both the doors open  I put my things on, and left my box there, intending to fetch it when I got a a situation  two men stopped me in St. John-street, and asked me to pledge the watch for them  they gave me 5s.  I afterwards heard that the prosecutor had been robbed, and I sent that night to him.
I would wish to observe, that I have always attended these lectures at the Rotunda, in consequence of a book, called \The Devil's Pulpit,\" which Mr. Godby put into my hands; it carried away my opinion, and I went to her Mr. Gale Jones, and others there  I saw my employer there repeatedly  I should say, my employer has the whole works of the Rev. Robert Taylor, and \"The Age of Reason,\" and a great many of Carlisle's works; and I have heard him declare that he believed in the Bible, but believes it to d  d lies.  I stand here to be convicted or acquitted on his oath, which I consider is not binding on his conscience; because he does not believe in Holy Writ  as regards the account in question  I feel convicted that I paid it to him or Mrs. Godby  he sent me to apply for an account at castles and Co., and they showed me the receipt for it, in his own hand-writing."
I have either paid it to Mr. or Mrs. Godby  the book was frequently in the other house  I had not always free access to it  I did not like to go in sometimes, and sometimes when I got to the book, I might have a customer come in.
About six o'clock in the evening, I was going through Shad well  I saw something lying in a passage  I kicked it  I found the shoes, and picked them up  this gentleman came up, and asked what I had got  I said a pair of shoes, which I found in the passage.
The handkerchief was at my feet, and I picket it up  four or five persons behind me saw me do it.
On the day the broker was there, I came about ten or eleven o'clock  I saw the broker give a portion to Mitchell for fire-wood, and Mitchell asked if I had a mind to have some  I said, \Very well\"  he then said, \"I have got some more rubbish given me, if you like to have it\"  I said I would, and he sent it to me  this iron was given to another man, and he left it with me."
From the price I gave for the books I had no ides that they were stolen  had he told me that he was in the prosecutor's employ, I should not have bought them  I sold them at a very moderate profit to other booksellers  some gentlemen are in court who purchased some of them.
On the very day Mr. Ridgway called on me, I went to his house, and stated what I knew.
Will he produce the list I gave him?
I deny part of the evidence of Holland  I certainly went one Sunday morning expressly at his own wish, to oblige him  I declined buying them at my shop  I was shown into a back room, not badly furnished. but in a way that gave me a sufficient idea that he was respectable  the books were produced, and I offered 25l. 16s. for them  the house of Messrs. Ridgway is respectable, but not so night as many are in the trade  I have an Encyclopaedia which I bought for 3s. 10s. of a gentelman, and I have another book published at 6l. 6s., which I have for sale for 2l. 2s.  I did not consider that this was a great reduction in the price of these books  I left a sovereign, and submitted them to Mason; and in my letter I put down 34l.  he would not give me more than 31l., and when I found they would suit him, and not before, I went and got them  I consider I gave Holland a fair price, and Mason gave me as much as any person would have done, and Mr. Cooper will state that he gave 5l. too much, unless it were to complete his series  the dearest book I had was the botanical book  that very book, three or four days prior, was sold compete, the whole twenty volumes, part of it beautifully bound, and the rest as good as new, for 25l.; and for the eight volumes not complete, I gave 8l.  the moment I hared of it, I went to Mr. Ridgway, and said I heard that he had lost some books, and I thought I had bought some  I left my card, and said they might see my stock-book, and I would explain very thing  I do to feel ashamed of what I have done  Ridgways are higher in the trade, but not more respectable than I am  I never had a charge brought againstme  I paid Holland the money, thought I borrowed part of it  he stated that I dined with them  I did not, and they ought to have proved what I had for dinner, and what time I left  he says that I solicited him to bring me the books, and not let Mudie have all of them  I said so little to him, that I did not know him again, when he came.
I have very little to say  I am molested by a parcel of foreign snakes and consipirators who laid a plan to take me  I can only say, my Lord and Gentlemen, I am as innocent as a new-born child, of any knoweledge of doing wrong  I say, as I said before, I never knew any thing, or had any knowledge that I was guilty of doing any thing wrong  the witness presented himself as a banker, and the first merchant in the country he came from  he now turns out to be a desperate character  I leave it entirely to your good sense and judgment.
The carter gave me the fowl to sell, and he gave me 6d. for selling it.
I knew nothing about it till Hogg apprehended me  he asked me to come with him, I said, \What for?\"  he said, \"You know young Hebden,\" I said, \"What about that lead\"  he said, \"Yes\"  the Inspector said he could not lock me up till he took me to the other officer's house, and he said to him\" Do you know any thing of this young lad?\"  he said, \"No\"  there was a light on the table, and then Hogg said, \"It is young Dance about that lead concern in Knacker's lane\"  he then said, \"He is the person.\""
I pledged the saw and a copper glue-pot  on the 6th I went to get it out, and I had not got sufficient money  this is the ticket he gave me  he put a wrong name on my ticket  I had not sufficient money to get the things out, and left some articles for them  this is the hand-writing on the ticket.
A man came and asked if I had any thing to do  I said, \No\"  he said would I go to the baker's, and get him a loaf  I went and they said it was a bad sixpence  I went back and told him, he said, \"Never mind here is a good one  go to that other shop\"  I went and the officer took me there."
. I am not guilty  I was in company with no one.
I was walking up Lombard-street along wit my father  the prosecutor said you picked pocket witness There was nobody old enough to be his father with him.
I was holding a horse  the gentleman gave me 2d.  I was coming away ay and the gentleman swore I had picked his picked  three boys before me chucked down the handkerchief and I picked it up  a woman coming by said it was a shame to take me for nothing all.
I am coming down Sun-street, and saw the handkerchief lying on the ground  I picked it up and walked across the road with it  the gentleman came to me and asked for it  I gave it him.
I was five or six yards away from the gentleman when the officer took me  I know nothing about the handkerchief.
I was not near that gentleman a tall  I picked the glove up in Coleman-street.
he never had hold of me at all
I plead GUILTY.
On what day was the lead stolen?
. I never took any lead in my live  I had been drinking that morning, and thought if I could get inside the house to lie down a little while it would sober me  it is very probable the witness may be mistaken in me in, looking through a window.
. One of the men overtook me and said, \You have got a ham with you\"  I said, \"I have not; I have two bladders of lard. which I bought at the Swan\"  I asked him to go with me to find the man  he said, \"No, you must come down the wharf\"  I went with and produced the two bladders  I was not in the upper floor of the wharf at all, till I was ordered up there afterwards  master has worked two years for the prosecutor  I shewed the lard, and asked the policeman to go with me to the Swan; and I asked the landlord if I had not dined there that day  he said yes  the policeman asked him if I had made a purchase there  he said did not notice it  there was a man, at the Mansion-house to say I had paid 5s. for the two bladders of lard. but his evidence was not taken."
. I saw two boys going, On, they threw the handkercheif down  I went to pick it up, and saw people running, who stopped me, and said I stole it.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
. Some of these things I bought of his brother, and some of a young man who serves behind the counter  both coral. and every description of things that he sells, his warehouse, are sold in Cutler-street, and I have frequently purchased there at a reduced price, cheaper than I could at his warehouse  it is a regular market for things of this sort  his brother said before the magistrate that he had sold me some of the things he produced, and then he said he had not sold them  the jewellery boxes I never had access to, and I never but three times served behind the counter  the coral and jewellery I had nothing to do with.
I did not ask him for them in my father's name,
I went for the razors, but deny having asked for them in my father's name.
I saw two boys dropt it, I took it up.
I did not offer move  I picked up the handkerchief at his feet, and he took me directly.
. It is with feelings of no ordinary kind I now appear before you; and was it no for the satisfaction arising from the consciousness that no moral guilt, whatever attaches itself tome I should be weighed down from being placed in his situation; but being satisfied of at feel no dismay knowing that as the determined advocate of unpopular, (because unknown an uninvestigated medical truths,) I must suffer from that prejudice which very naturally exists against is new discovery, however useful; and especially when that discovery is opposed to the apparent interest of others and the spread of intelligence en a subject which mystery has hitherto enveloped, namely, the preservation of health and the cure of disease  I would first wish to draw your attention to the position in which I stand as a non medical man  the law, I freely allow is against my attending in a medical capacity provided I received dandy fee for so ding; but in he absence of that, I believe the law is clear on the point that it does not signify whether a man be a licensed or an unlicensed practitioner.; but it requires, and justly so, that a man bring to the work he undertakes to perform, a sufficient degree of intelligence experience and ability I trust, therefore, gentlemen, you will not allow your minds to be swayed against me because I am not a licensed practitioner, but rather let he evidence of those persons whom I have attended, and who will prove the benefit they have derived from my advice determine the point whether I have acted either with gross ignorance or negligence e  it will be necessary for me, as an Hygeist to account you with what are the fundamental principles of Hygeism; which is a peculiar characteristic appellation and which is nothing more than a revival or he ancient system of human pathology and is therefore opposed to what the majority of the medical men of the present day advocate, which is technically called organic pathology or solidism  the former doctrine tracing all diseases to the fluids, and the latter as origionating in the solids; that the blood, if not life itself is the great agent of life, and possess a prominent influence over every part of the body to which it conveys and in which it preserves vitality; and that is the existence of disease must originate injury to a geater or less degree to that vitality, so it must of necessity originate in the corruption or alteration from a healthy state of that blood which is the grand substantiation of he vital principle; the corruption, or disease of the blood, is produced by certain humour which hums are either or both matermine, contagious and person, a that is to say hereditary acquired and original  these humours, which are sometimes more or less local are always when in existence so intimately combined with the blood, as to require the most powerful and searching purgatives in order to effect their expulsion from the blood; but purgative is may be transcendently powerful an yet be composed of such ingredients is to be transcendently pernicious the employment of them with a view to the eradication of one disease, may afford them an opportunity for the creation of another  composed frequently of conflicting materials, these materials may, separating in the body, lose those qualities which they possessed in combination, and retain and expert those evil influences which they individually possess; but purgatives, composed of innocuous or nourishing constituents, are capable of producing (and alone are capable of producing,) those beneficial effects on the blood and consequently on the health, which only purgatives can produce on the former, and therefore on the latter  it is by the use of such purgatives, formed only of vegetable compounds possessing within themselves no deleterious agencies, which decomposition, combination, or alteration, can develop or bring into action (and therefore capable of producing no effect, save that which is desired, and for the production of which they are intended  (that those who practice the healing art accord to the doctrines of Hygienism, successfully endeavour to relive the suffering of their fellow-cretaures  is there anything in these doctrines, or assertions incompatible with reason or propriety?  is there anything incomprehensible to the meanest capacity?  is there any argument or deduction that does not bear on its every feature the impress of truth implicitly and certainly?  I feel that to these important interrogatives every unprejudiced, disinterested mind must respond in the negative  I will now compare the consistent practice and sound principles of Hygeanism with the practice pursued by medical men in general  the Hygerists acting on conviction derived from experience apply one remedy composed of innoeuous ingredients for the removal of all diseases, which, as arising in one body, they consider must originally arise from one cause existing in that body  those opposed to the practice of the Hygeist apply innumerable remedies many of them containing poison in a state of temporary naturalization to the cure of all diseases and of one and the same disease  they also treat local diseases by local remidies, either by internal medicines, which they suppose and are taught to belive, will act particularly on the part effected; or, by external remedies drawing to the surface of the skin by blisters, or diverting the humours from their only, natural course through the bowels by local bleeding  the Hygeists, therefore, practising I unison with their doctrine apply one remedy and believe but one cause to exit; because they find by experience observation and inquiry, that all natural effects flow from some natural cause; and that the removal of that cause it the destruction of those effects which remedy is a harmles vegetable compound la as a purgative to he utter expulsion of all mieals of sufficient strength and searching properties to penetrate and draw out, from the various localities of the human system, all the acrid and corrupt humours which the Hygeists and which their practice abundantly confirms is the only cause of the multifarious forms of disease which afflict humanity-the practice of medical men in applying innumerable and opposing remedies to various diseases afflicting one body, and to one and the same diseases can only be defended on the supposition that the human body unlike all natural productions is no governed by one grand and general agent tor principle; but that although intimately and inseparably connected in al its parts and organs it is wholly distinct, different and unconnected with regard to the pains and infirmities afflicting and impairing the various parts an organs  comparing the principles and practice of both doctrines, it is scarcely necessary to remark that the Hygeists proceed on positive reasoning funded on natural deductions, while those opposed to hem can only account to their practice by negative hypotheses all and totally opposed equally to nature and to reason  thus by a plan of treatment so opposite in its nature, so uncertain in its effects an so injurious in its tendency the lives of hall persons who are suddenly passe from the treatment of the Hygeists to that of the doctors are placed in the greatest jeopardy  and to this mode of treatment pursued in this case, I do most solemnly attribute the melancholy death in this instance  in confirmation of this, look at the thousands and tens of thousands who employ the medicine recommended by the Hygeists in their various aliments; and in no case has an inquest been held, where medical men have not interfered with the beneficial administration of this medicine  in the case before you, I strongly protested, both to the deceased as well as to his friends against their Proceedings fearing at once the evil consequences before stated, an now so lamentably rue  in this nohing can show the absurdity of their practice more than the fact that a man under the influence of an active purgative and his bowel suddenly stopped; and that followed which all reflecting persons must naturally expect, namely infammation  on the contrary had his bowels been kept in a state of solution by the continued exhibiton of purgatives the cause of the inflammation which ensued would have been removed and a return to health he would have been the consequence  this is no chimera  you will ave an opportunity of hearing positive testimony in confirmation there f  I will now shorty state the particular of this case and my connexion with it  I visited Captain M'Kenzie on the 22nd of January by his express desire for the first time after he had the affection of his knee, which was an old complaint of his and which had existed in this instance about ten our twelve days pervious to his\\ send\\ ing for, me and which he state had been brought on by a cold, through getting wet  it consisted of a contraction of the muscles of the knee joint with some degree of swelling and considerable paid  in fact an acute rheumatic affection  I found he had been taking Moraon's pills of his won accord; but now knowing how to proceed with them he sen for me, a and I advised him to the best of my ability and experience  by gradually increasing the doses he got up to twenty of No.1 at night, and thirty of No. 2 in the morning which were the largest doses I ever ordered and never in any shorter time than twelve hocus between, did I order them to be administered the contraction of the knee joint soon gave way to this treatment, and he was sealed to put his leg straight in bed which before could only be in a bent position  so far the case was proceeding satisfactorily with the exception or and increase of pain, but confined wholly to knee  here it will be necessary to mention an important fact, elucidated from the widow, and which was wholly unknown to me before  she stated she did not give the doses I prescribed  so that while I was calculating upon the effect of thirty pills, and judged from the supposed operation of that number, she had only administered twenty and in like manner lessened the various does I have prescribed  hence my administering forty pills to the deceased which was the dose mixed by me illiquid was grounded on the supposed want of power of a much larger quantity than was actually given  therefore, the species of deception coupled with the application of of a blister to the knee unknown to me, all tended to thwart my proceedings  what would he said in the case of a regular medical man\\ send\\ ing his mixture or draught labelled to be give to his patient in a certain way, if the attendant chose to alter the quantity according to their whim and fancy?  would it not be monstrous to charge the doctor with the consequences that minds rise in such a case?  in all probability such dose as forty pills would have been thought necessary had the patient had the number given to him that had been prescribed  Gentleman you must not let your minds be led astray but the apparent astounding number of pills given in this case e  calculating a number of small pills is very erroneous way of arriving at any just conclusion  suppose, for instance, it was worded in this way, \About a table spoonful of this moisture to be given, \"would it in that case strike your mind as so preposterous?  and yet the same power of medicine would exist  I now beg leave to hand you a powder, which is forty of No. 2 pills pulverised; and I am sure, from the quantity there appears when in powder, and which ha been stated to be two tablespoonsful (but I have no hesitation in saying it would take beyond six hundred or seven hundred pills to fill, when powdered,) it would have a different effect on your minds to forty pills in the whole state  therefore, the only way in which you can arrive at a proper conclusion on the subject, is by paying particular, attention to the evidence of the witnesses which will be examined in my defence  remember that experience is the only test of all knowledge  you will have it in evidence that persons have not only taken the number which was given to the deceased but three times, and even fur times that quantity in one day an the invariable result has been cure  how therefor can it he said that in this case I acted either rashly or negligently, looking a the experience which I have had  it has been argued that if a beneficial effect can be produced by a small number such large doses must of course be injurious  this argument, although plausible, is fallacious for experience(our only safe guide in such matters) aburrdantly teaches us that very large dose of the same medicine does not always produce a more violent effect a smaller one; and that the operation of a drug depends not always on its own intrinsic properties but on the particular circumstances under which it is administered  it will be necessary he to mention the fact acknowledged to me by the deceased, that so far from his being that robust hearty man some of the witnesses would instate, he had repeatedly been laid up with serious illness when abroad  not a very long time back, he was in the hospital, in Jamaica, for three months, with fever and never was able to do without taking immense doses of calomel, above 100 grains at a dose which he acknowledged if he was obliged to continue, would undermine his constitution; in fact, he was a bloated and a very bilious subject  the apothecary states, that he ordered him chicken broth instead of medicine e  of what use could such things be to a man in he state he was while the inflammatory action was allowed to go on unchecked? and that which before was entirely local being only in the knee, gradually extended itself up to he stomach, which was aided by the application of leeches depriving the knee of a part of its resting  it cannot he pretended for a moment that I attended him for again having never received or expected to receive any fee whatever, it being contrary to the terms of publicly offer; nor was the medicine even purchased of me; therefore, nothing but a desire to do him good could influence me in attending him. I will now just draw you attention to what has been sworn against time as as to my representing myself as a regular medical man  when I was informed on the Friday evening that they had called in a doctor I expressed a wish at al events to se the deceased, which the wire refused to allow me to do; and on my still urging the mater she fetched from the next room a person whom I did not then know, but whom I have since learnt, was Captain Allen; he in a very abrupt and unceremonious manner se asked me who I was and by whose authority I had been attending his friend, and if I had my diploma in my pocket; all of which was aid I breath and with great has t  I looked at him with surprise and sarcastically said, \"Do you expect media men are in the habit of carrying this diplomas in their pockets? and as to my authority, I have a grater than any diploma could give me\"(meaning thereby, that I considered my experience in this medicine superior to a diploma and which I am sorry to see, they have misconstrued to my prejudice)  and then I said, \"I have attended here by the express wish or Captain M'Kenzie \"Gentlemen I have never held myself out to the world as a medical practitioner; and it must have been perfectly well known to the family and friends to the deceased, that I was only what I ave always represented myself to be an agent for Morison's pills  I then repeated my wish to see the deceased; but he in an authoritative tone, me I should not, unless I liked to wait the arrival of the physician whom he expected very shortly  I replied, I would wait and did a considerable time but no physician made his appearance; and at last, on my urging injustice of preventing my seeing he deceased, who I knew in the morning of that day had every confidence in me, they last consented, and the wife accompanied me to his room when I was informed by the deceased, that it was contrary to his his wish that medical man had been called i, that his friends had insisted on it; and also observed that Mr. Cumming on hearing he had been taking Morison's pills, said he was a poisoned man  knowing the bad effects which usually result from the doctor's treatment following the Hygean, I pointed out to him the folly of allowing his friends to interfere in a matter which so much concerned himself and of their pretending to judge of medicine which they confessedly knew nothing about  his answer was he was obliged to yield there being so many against him; and after taking me by the hand, and expressing in the warmest terms his thanks for my attention, requested that I would see him the following day. You will bear in mind this all took place when, according to the evidence of Mr. Cumming, he was in a state of collapse  I afterwards shortly protested to his friends against the course they were pursuing, and warned them of the probable consequences; at the same time adding the was in perfect safety if left to my treatment, of which I felt full convection  on the following day I went accompanied by Dr. Lynch, but we were positively refused admittance to his room by Mr. Gray and Captain Allen  we then went to Mr. Cumming, and asked him several questions  in reply to which, he said he thought the deceased would do well; but in his opinion, he had been over-purged, and he was endeavouring to give tone to the stomach; and now after bent there days under the doctor's hands his death is attributed tome, gentlemen I have now ben practising with this medicine nearly seven days, and within the last two or three years, the number of persons seeking my advice have increased considerably owing to the success which has attended my labours and in every instance my advice an attendance ha been perfectly gratuitous, Gentlemen, I would ask you, as fathers of families, whether you would not consider it tyranny in the extreme, if the law prevented your giving to your wives or your children, when ill, that which you would have every confidence is, and which you think would restore them to health  and recollect, the same law that would operate to prevent my administering to my fellow-creatmen that which I know will do them good, would also prevent you. Gentlemen I am so thoroughly convinced to the utter harmlsesseness of this medicine, as well as of its power in subding disease in all its shades and bearings that had I a thousand lives wold trust them all to this medicine  and I have reason for such confidence, having received immense benefit from it in my own person; therefore, personal experience is the basis on which I have ventured to administer it to others  I have had occasion severe attack of influenza, to take eighty pills per day; namely forty at nigh, and forty in the morning, an with the happiest results  I have had four of my own children ill of the scarlet fever, al cured by this medicine as well as whooping cough and measles with a variety of there complaints and is no instance has any other medicine been administered; and the result has invariably been successes  this is unlike the medical me, who very sparingly take themselves, or administer to their families, the drugs they send in such plenitude to their patients. Gentleman I call on you well to consider what may be the effect of your verdict in this case  you may, by a just verdict this day establish on a firm footing the medical liberty of the subject or by upholding prescriptive rights, for no other reason than because they have been hitherto upheld, support and perpetuate the most injurious domestic tyranny that can exist in society  give reason and free inquiry on this subject full scope an they will uphold the truth, by bringng false opinions and all the offspring of ignorance, prejudice, and selfinterest before their severe tribunal and subjecting them to the test of close investigation. Gentlemen I ask of you justice  strict an unbending justice  it is not my cause alone, it is as much your own cause  if a monopoly in medical practice be upheld, no improvement can tae place, except from one of their own body  the only verdict which the evidence brought before you will warrant that of \" NOT GUILTY.\" and which verdict, I am confident, will alone bear reflecting on by you  in fact any other verdict would be monstrous in the extreme, actuated as I have been by the very best feelings that ca possibly influence the human mid  that of doing my afflicted fellow creatures good  and the experience I have had, both on myself another, fully Justices me in advising the use of this medicine. Gentlemen, recollect that if medical gentlemen were successful in curing their patients there would be no room of the practice I am engaged in, as every on has a prejudice in favour of them, until they are taught by painful experience the truth, that their practices not based on those sound principles which insure success  this system of medicine is now become entirely a party afair  look a the immense power arrayed against it; namely, the entire medical body, which but few honourable exception  look at the influence this body of men have in society  the power the law has put into their hands)  a dangerous power, and one which however right items gone by is not fit to exist now  in many instances have I known in a country town a tradesman persecuted and deprived of his business, by the secret influence of the medical man of he place, merely because he was guilty of the crime to selling Morison's pills while his own medicines might sold with impunity  I merely rmention this to show that if it were not for the intrinsic worth of Morison's medicines in themselves. the opposition arrayed against them by the whole bodily of apothecaries and druggists would be more than sufficient to crush them; and should not the testimony of such men against this medicine of which they confessedly know nothing be at all events received with great caution? The doctors of the present day designate Harvey the great discoverer of of the circulation of the blood, immortal but they know that their medical forefathere considered him quack, and persecuted him because he had been hold enough to declare a great truth which truth was opposed to their preconceived notions  the public are now beginning to see that they are the greatest quacks who cannot cure heir patents; and they the best physicians who can cure them, whether licensed or unlicensed. Gentlemen I leave my case in your hands trusting you with do your duty in the first place to your own consciences, by an unprejudiced review of all the evidence brought before you; by which alone you can do your to that society for which form a part and of which you are hare as delegates. It appears to me there are two points of importance for your consideration in this case; first, was it or was it not a proper medicine to administer in this case? an the next point is was it administered in proper quantities?  a satisfactory answer to this question can only he had from the testimony of of those who have had practical experience in the mater, an snot from he speculative opinions of medical men, who confess they know nothing whatever of this medicine, having never analyse the pills, no have they ever used them  and cannot therefore be acquainted with their effects whether taken in less or in greater quantities, or, indeed, in any quantity at all  and beer in mind, it is not the supposed component parts of this medicine, and which are stated to be different by different chemists but the compound, as a whole, that determines its character."
. My head was had, bad I had a piece of my skull taken off  I was going into the hospital  I had been days without food.
He stated before the Magistrate that at half past eleven o'clock he saw me knock or ring and during the time he was passing he saw me talking to a female and while se was gone I went in  and now he dose not say that.
Did you see me talking to a female at Mr. Parry's door?
You swear than I was sin company with the man that threw the bag away?
. This lad ha sworn falsely  he said he saw me knock or ring at the door of Mr. Parry, and now he says he did not.
The handkerchief was put on my arm by a young man.
I had nobody with me  a man took it and threw it on my arm  I told the gentleman that was the man, and he said he would not go after him.
I got behind a coach and the sovereign was lost  I spent the 7s. 10d.
. I was showing boxes, and said I had got a good set I did not want to take home with me  I was going to leave them for 6d. less than I generally charge them, because I would not take them home  I put my par up, and put this little paper on than top of them  I did not know I had got it; and when I went back, I said I was very sorry I bad taken it  I did not know it contained  I could refer to Rundle and Bridge, on Ludgate hill, and all over town.
He is quite in error  I opened one to show him, because they were larger than what he had before  when I went back, the master said he did not think I meant to steal it, but the policeman insisted upon taking me  he said it was no use my speaking to the prosecutor.
When the policeman came in, he said there could be no more talk then.
I was not near window  another boy drew the pipe out of the window  he gave it me in the Haymarket.
That man swears false  he nerve lived in the house with me in his life  there are two children who belong to me, she has had a child during my absence  I went away in May, 1830, and she as the child in July following, and she owned herself that she had it by it my first cousin, in East Smithfield.
I was going through Fleet street  I was going after that gentleman-two boys followed him and took his handkerchief as he said, and then ran away  I ran after them, and then he followed me, and did not sight of me.
He and three more watchmen took me  I don to see how I could throw anything down without their seeing me.
I went to get half a pint of beer  as I going up the public-house steps, the gentleman caught hold of me, and said, \Yes have robbed me\"  I said I had not touched him."
. I am not guilty of it  I bought it of a men on Sunday morning, in the lane  as I was moving my goods  he had large drab coat on  I never saw him before in my life  he asked me to give him 15s. for it  he said he had an accident, and run over a sheep the dry before, had had I got a family  I said \Yes, five children\"  I said I had not got 15s  he wet to my cottage with me, and my wife was gone over the meadows  I give him 12s. for it  Taplin was coming up the lane, and met my wife, and took her before the Magistrate."
Did any body sleep with us that night? Witness.
. I hope you will consider my case  I never did any thing of the kind before.
. A little while before this, I was in the hospital with a broken leg  this was the first day I left off crutches  I happened to meet a few friends, and got intoxicated, and this occurred through playing and larking along the street  I had no idea of felony.
I took a little tea from a waste chest which was lying about  I did not think it was of any use or value.
I was going to work, and he came out before I had the sack  I had not taken up at all.
I was going to the water-closet, and saw the sack of onions  I did not take them in my arms at all.
I saw persons running, and I ran myself, and this man came and took me  I asked not the cheese.
Did you keep your eye on me all the time?
I found the candlesticks in the kitchen.
Did not the man at the bar lay hold of my shoulder and say, \This way?\""
Gibbs wanted to take the pots, and I ran out to the bar with them  I took them up, and went down the court, which is not the way to my house  I took two with me first, and then these two pints were outside the door  the bar was full of people, and then Gibbs was coming after me.
. At half-past twelve o'clock on Saturday night, I saw Tool, as I was going home  he said to me, \Tom, you are not in liquor to-night\"  I said \"Good night\"  I went to my aunt's and they were gone to bed  I laid down and slept till half-past one o'clock  then this officer came and said, \"Do you know anything about a soldier's clothes?\"  I said I did not."
. I was in great distress  he promised me work, and did not perform his word, and I was out of work  I had nothing to apply to  I went two or three days to ask him to give me work, and he said \No.\""
. This prosecutor came home about twelve o'clock  he came to my door, and knocked as if he was going to burst the door in, and kicked it, calling me and my wife all the gravy-eyed b  he could think of  for nearly half an hour that lasted; and at last I opened the door, and asked him what he meant by calling me and my wife such names  he came into my house when I opened the door, and attempted to strike me two or three times, but I escaped from him; and in the house he laid hold of me by the collar, and attempted to strike me on the back, just as I was by the fire-place  I stooped down by the fire-place, and got a little bit of a poker  I told him, if he did not let go of me, and get out of my house, that I should strike him  he would not leave go of me, but dragged me nearly to the door, and told me to come out  I said I would not and if he did not leave go of me I would hit him with the bit of poker I had in my hand  that is all.
He did not ask me where I got it  I put it on the counter, and asked 3s. on it from the shopman  it was taken away from me, and I saw no more of it till it was brought to the station-house, and there he said I was in the shop  the inspector asked how I came by it, and I said a man outside asked me to pawn it, but he never asked me about it in the shop.
I said nothing in the shop about a man\\ send\\ ing me to pawn it.
Nothing was said to me about it till I got to Lambeth-street.
. I was that evening passing by a public-house, the sign of the two Bells, by the church  a man came from towards Brick-lane, and said, \Young man, are you willing to take a jacket in to pawn, and I will give you the price of a pot of beer?\"  he seemed in liquor  I said, \"Can't you take it yourself?\"  he said, \"I have a person I do not wish to leave; will you take it to pawn, and ask 3s. on it?\"  the shopman took it to the gas-light, and I never saw it afterwards  is it likely, if I stole it, I should take it only forty doors off to pawn it?"
It is false  my hand was down by my side.
I have got a witness to prove I was at home and in bed at the time they accuse me of the robbery.
A young man asked me to carry it  I did not know him before.
. I went there to sleep, because I could not get into my mother's house.
. The articles they found were my own  I have had that door in my possession for the last two years  there are many dresses of that pattern  I should him that glass tumbler on the floor  he then swore to it, and he swore to a picture that was found there on the first examination, and then denied it.
I am not guilty of stealing, if I am guilty of picking it up.
I had been without victuals two days, and was in distress.
He said the cloths were marked, and they are not. Witness. I have several other cloths exactly of the same kind  I have not the smallest doubt of these.
Are you sure I did not bring an umbrella in?
When you came to me, you said, \You have taken a gentleman's umbrella\"  I said, \"My God! have I? I beg your pardon.\""
We drank together, and you solicited me to sing a song  you were drunk, decidedly drunk, and I accommodated you to the best of my power with two songs.
I met a friend in the Haymarket  we walked together under an umbrella very much like this  I was going to Conduit-street  stopped at several places, and had a pint of ale probably in each place  I was not intoxicated, but might be perhaps a little elevated  wear called at this house, and I think we had only one pint of half-and-half  we stopped there perhaps an hour, certainly not an hour and a half  I stopped outside perhaps a minute after my friend left  as to whether I took my umbrella into the house, I cannot say  as to stealing a thing from any person, I never had such a thought in my head.
I had some chalk rubbish from the next wharf to his.
I did not have the fowls.
. A tipsy man came along, and said, \Will you lead me home?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he began to may at me  I said, \"I will leave you, if you are not steady\"  he knocked my hat off, and my handkerchief went down the area  I went to get it, and Mr. Varney caught hold of me at the bottom of the steps, without any thing in my hand at all  the policeman asked him where the fowls were, and he said, \"Down in the area, and I must go and get them\"  he brought a cock to the station-house, and next morning brought two hens against me."
. I was a stranger about that part  I was looking for work  I met two or three of my trade, and they made me intoxicated at the Castle  I am a native of Gloucester.
. I trust, my Lord and Gentlemen, that any diffidence I may feel in addressing a public court will be excused; and therefore, embarrassed as I am in this situation, as you will readily conceive I must be, I do take comfort at the kind and patient manner in which you have been pleased to conduct this inquiry  Gentlemen, were this an investigation before a Board of Commissioners, the usual and proper tribunal for such an inquiry, I should have felt no hesitation, but should have looked at it with perfect confidence as a prelude to my immediate exoneration; but summoned here before you, arraigned at the bar of a criminal. court, to be called upon to explain acts of official negligence, or other official acts, whether of omission or commission, has excited very sensibly my feelings, and I hope to be pardoned if I say my indignation  Gentlemen, at the outset I must remind you, that I held the responsible situation of President of the Foreign Post-office, a situation which necessarily gave me the control of every act of duty on the part of the officers of that department  in every case I was authorized to use discretionary power, and to detain letters if there was any doubt as to the accuracy of their direction of the mode of forwarding them  I am accused of having embezzled small sums of money, and not forwarding the same to the Inland Office  all that I can say to this, is that if any such monies came into my hands for any such purpose, they were, with the letters, forwarded to the Inland Office  I say, \If they ever came into my hands. \"for the first charge bears the date of Wednesday, the 2nd of March, which you have not now before you  on that very evening the Malta, the Buenos Ayres, the Brazils, and the Indian Mails, in addition to the ordinary mails, were made up; and it was with considerable difficulty that they could be prepared for dispatch  I believe the\\ amountof postage received that evening, between five and seven o'clock, equalled, if it did not exceed what is taken on grand post nights, which are Tuesdays and Fridays  but, gentlemen, I am unable to state the exact amount, as an extract from what we term the night charge-book, in which the sums the window-man receives are entered, has been denied me, although I applied by letter to the President for it  my exertions, in addition to the confusion of the evening, may be estimated; for though I was President, and had no obligation to stoop to so menial an officer, I delayed settling the window charges, that I might assist at the sorting table; in fact my presence was constantly required in every part of the office  if I had any letters or money for the Inland Office, I should have sent them there directly, just as I received them, to have kept my table clear  I say, that, not only on post nights, but on every evening, there is an immense pressure of business, and a variety and multiplicity of things to attend to, which it is next to an impossibility that I or any one else can remember, as it relates to every transaction  Gentlemen, it is notorious that Mr. Young, who has been before you, is a very had reckoner; and I, as President, have had very frequent occasions to reprimand him on that account  no account of the transactions of the kind of which I have been speaking are ever kept  many letters going from the Foreign Office to the Inland Office, are completed at the moment out of hand  there is no account kept or taken, likewise, I should mention to you, on the otherwise of the tunnel, the Inland side, of what monies or letters are received  therefore that sum for letters and newspapers, which Young says he believes he gave me (8s. 10d.) on' if you bear in mind, according to his deposition, he had not previously seen those letters  that some letters were found in my drawer is certain, but it is a circumstance that happens to every public officer, and has happened to myself after twenty-seven years of service  can an act; call it negligence if you will, or rather by its true term, call it accident  is it possible that these letters, from among hundreds, nay thousands, were mislaid, and I neglected them purposely?  is it to be concluded that I intended to steal them?  is it intended to say I intended to steal the postage on them?  as to receiving from Arrowsmith or Young the sums of 7s. 8d., (or as I think in my agitation I may be incorrect as to the amount,) I can only say I have no recollection on the subject  Gentlemen, my house was searched, the peaceful abode of my wife and family, and were letters and newspapers found? No  does it not rather prove as strong as proof can be, that the suspicion attached to me is false?  Mr. Young has said that I asked him for 3s. 10d. for letters from the Inland Office; and he stated that he did not give it to me at the time, but he did give it to me about a quarter of an hour afterwards, Now this is important, because there is no proof that he gave it to me at all; and this brings me from half past four o'clock to half past five o'clock, when he tells you I was asleep before the fire, and the letters were in my that  he has admitted to you, that he had not given me the 8s. 10d. before he saw the letters in my hat  has he satisfied you, Gentlemen, how it happened, that he, a public officer like myself, should see, what must have appeared to him a neglect of duty  should see me asleep before the fire with fatigue, (and those letters, which he must admit, if I had the money for them at that time, ought to have gone down the tunnel)  has he explained to you his neglect of duty, in not awakening me and reminding me of mine? But my Lord and Gentlemen, there is the messenger Craddock, a very respectable and steady officer, for what I know to the contrary, and he says he was on duty on Monday evening from five to eight o'clock, and no such letters came through the tunnel  suppose, as might be the case, that I overlooked them at the moment for the night, and that I put them into the tunnel next morning  I do not say that this was the case  I do not, I cannot, pretend to have any recollection of it; but can you believe me guilty of purloining such sums?  is not the smallness of their amount a proof of my innocence instead of my guilt? Gentlemen, need I further trespass on you concerning the present charge  I am convinced I need not  I almost think I hear you saying to each other, \"Can it be possible that this man, who is in the receipt of 500 a year  can it be possible that such an individual could have hazarded his situation for the paltry sum with which he is charged?\" At all times, if I was in want of money, I could readily procure it from my friends  can you think that, I who have filled in society the station of a gentleman, a man of education; and estimating at no mean rate the blessings which attend those advantages, with a wife and five children  having the approbation of my constant friend, Mr. Henry Freeling, the assistant secretary to the Post-office  I ask of you  I request  I desire  I implore you, Gentlemen, to look at these facts, and then, can you conceive it possible?  can you conceive it credible, (even put it is a lower grade of words)  that such a man as I now stand before you, after twenty-seven years of service, during which I trust I have been an honest servant of his Majesty  that I could be mad enough  that I could be such a fool as to put my myself  my character  my family  my existence, all in stake for the value of 9s. 4d.?"
I took from distress  my father would not give me a farthing.
I am quite innocent  I had been drinking the whole of the morning in this witness's beer shop, with three or four more  the place was quite open for any body to go there.
My master was in the country  I was going to see if he was come home, and was running to make haste  there were three boys behind him; but I did not see the handkerchief,  Witness. I did not see the handkerchief in his hand, but he dropped it behind him  I chose rather to take the actual thief, and not the others  they were two or three yards from him  I am able to swear that the prisoner dropped it, and no one else  the other boys were bigger  they were not near enough to take it.
Did you I ask you for the paper? Witness.
You heard me first knock at the door? Witness.
I could not get a situation, as I could not get a character  I went to the prosecutor to ask him to go to my brother, to ask him to give me a character  he said he would, and we left the house together  I know nothing about the watch  the servant says, that after she had heard the door open and shut once she came down, and saw the door half open  the prosecutor says he did not return for ten minutes, and he cannot say that in that time some one had not been into the room and taken the watch.
He asked me to tell him the truth, where the watch came from  I said, \A young man, a sailor, stands at the door, who asked me to pawn it, and he said, \"If they ask any questions, tell them they have had it before.' \""
. I was drawn into the foolishly  the young man appeared to me be a sailor  he was 16 or 17 years of age  I was on a sick bed for several days before  I have lived in that neighbourhood for twenty years.
. I picked it up as I was going along.
. I was quite in distress  I really did not know what to do  I had been out of a situation for some time.
Three or four boys ran across the road  the gentleman came and collared me directly.
. A boy came running by me, and threw the bacon into the road, and ran off  Mr. Russell laid hold of me  a gentleman said, \It is not him, the boy is gone on\"  he immediately said he would make me pay for it."
. I am in the habit of working in the shop, where there are seven or eight men  sometimes I am sent out without my bag, and sometimes with it  when I was stopped by the policeman, I was not aware there was any copper in the bag  I have no doubt some of the men put it there  I think some of them had some spite against me.
I was standing there, and a lad came and shoved the decanter down by the side of me  I stepped across the way with it, and put it in the window, and ran away  I do not know who the lad was  I saw a label on it, and put it down directly.
Am I the person who came into the room?
I have witness in my defence.
I can account for having the poker in my hand  I was going to bed  there was a knocking and kicking at the street-door  I was stirring the fire to go the bed, and went to the door, but not with the intent to do the man any mischief  I opened the door, and said, \What are you doing at the door\"  he directly said to the policeman, \"I have been robbed of 2s\"  I did not take the poker with a view of burning him  I was not up the stairs, nor near the stairs  I work for Mr. Mason, of Newgate-market."
. On the 9th of March, I went into Mr. Piper's at the Six Bells, to take a pint of beer with a man  a travelling woman, with brushes and lines, and other things, came in there  she offered this for sale for 5s.  I at last gave her 3s. 6d.  I took it home, any my daughter acolded me for buying such a little thing  I said, \I will sell it again,\" and in going up the Ham, I saw Mrs. Wigmore, and she gave me 3s. 6d. for it."
I went to work for a man in Bristol-street at half-past nine o'clock  I received 1s. 6d  I was walking along the Minories, and a man asked me if I wanted a job  I said, \Yes\"  he took me down a yard, and lifted these things a job  I said I had better take his cap, as I could carry them better  and in my agitation I might take these things and throw them off my shoulder, but I don's recollect it."
I went for a person of the name of Church on the first floor  the tools on the counter  I never touched them.
All the duplicates, with the exception of one are in the name of Thomas Moore, 2, Baker's-rents  respecting what I said at the station  home to the policeman, I never was in custody before, and was irritated, not knowing they were come by in a clandestine manner  I do not deny pledging the things, I had them of a person I have known some time  he is in the same branch of business as myself  he asked me to pledge them for him  I told him I would  he made that excess as his wife ill, or something  I first went to Mr. Cassell's, pawned one there, and gave him the money  he said, \You may as well pledge them in the name of Moore;\" and knowing his father to be a respectable man, who lives independently I pledged them for him, and gave him the money; I afterwards purchased the duplicates of him, and gave him 4s. 6d. for them  I believe the amount I pledged the things for was 1l.4s.  I left the man after that, and went to Mr. Board's with one  I should say he refused it, saying it might lie by him for a length of time  I then took it to Mr. Cassell's, where I was first apprehended  the policeman asked how I came by those tickets  I told him I bought them  from there he took me to Mr. Boards, and from there to the station-house  I pulled them out of my pocket, though he says he took them from me  I have been in the habit of purchasing things which I have disposed of  I have bought cards of master weavers, and sold them down the lane  Jews only buy them to make caps of  i should never have purchased them if I had known they had come through a dishonest channel  I was taken to the office and locked up  neither my wife nor any one knew where I was  I had a slight hearing and was sent back to prison  I was then brought back again to Worship-street  while I was in the lock-up-house. I said to Mr. Brown, \"You had better go and apprehend this man,\" giving a description of the man  I was then sent again to Clerkenwell  I was again examined at Worship-street  I asked Brown if he had apprehended the person  he said \"No\" and I was committed  I had a friend came to see me here  I said, \"Have you heard about the apprehension of this man Elderfield\"  he said, \"No\"  I told him to go to the office and inform the magistrate of the person, giving him a description of the man  Graves the officer from Worship-street, came down to me  I was called to Mr. Cope's office  he brought a little note with him with the name of the person on it  he said, \"Is this the person you want?\"  I said, \"Yes, it is\"  he said' \"Perhaps I can find the man; I do not know whether I can or not\"  he went away, and I never heard any thing more of him, till my wife came down and told me that the man had been apprehended and examined at Worship-street, and they let him go again  as to my knowing the things came through a dishonest channel  I knew it no more than an infant unborn  I understand the man has since absconded  he was apprehended and I could do not more than I did, as an individual locked up in jail."
He is swearing false, to say I took them  I they were handed to me by a person who stood by.
I never was in any trouble before.
It was my intention to have paid it all back.
. I am very sorry for what has occurred, but I am innocent of it  I knew nothing of it at all till I was stopped and what back  I did not refuse to go back. but went quietly, and made every recompense that I could.
. I was at Henley fair on the 7th of March, and bought a horse for 8l. 10s  a man came to to the public-house I was at with the horse  I said, \Are you going to sell it?\"  he said, \"Yes; I was showing it to this gentlemen, but he did not like it, as it was a roarer\"  he said he wanted 22l. for it  I said that was too much money; and after some conversation, agreed to give him 10l. and the horse I bought the day before for it  I have sent for witnesses from the country; but I have not been able to send them the money down to pay their expenses, and they said they could not come without their expenses being paid  I said all I wanted was time to find the man  we walked a little way  I was locked up, and had no opportunity of finding the man  I have no doubt but that he was in the market that same day  I told Mr. Drinkwater that it was my horse, not that it was a gentlemen's; but the person I had it of said it belonged to a gentleman, and used to run in a four-wheeled chaise  the reason I gave the name of John Brown was, we are frequently liable to have informations laid against us  he said he did not know me before, but I bought two or three horses of him before  the only reason I had for giving a false name was the fear of an information for selling without a license."
The man read in the newspaper I was in trouble, and he happened to sat to somebody that he was in the house with me that night  he came in and said, \How do you do?\" but the other people ought to have been here in preference to him  the man is confused."
How do you know that the other got away with it?
. I had been to Greenwich fair, and got intoxicated. I was about to leave a friend, when the officer came and charged me with picking a gentleman's pocket.
. When I left him at the Duke's Head, I went home, and never saw him till I saw him at the Cock.
Did you see me take it?
. It was lying blowing about  it was a windy day  I did not know who it belonged to.
I was standing with two more boys  I had not been near the shop.
I was going out of the fair. I saw the handkerchief at my feet  some man told the gentleman, and he said it was his.
. It was done from forgetfulness  I had put it under my own  I was called to go on shore sooner than I expected, and it quite slipped my memory.
I was in the fair and picked it up  I was putting it into my pocket, when the officer came and took me.
I was looking at a show, and two gentleman came, and said I took the handkerchief.
. I saw it at my feet, and two gentlemen laid hold of me, and took me.
I was standing by a show, and this woman came and said I had cut her pocket  I was just going up in one of the penny shows  she seemed as if she was in liquor  she bit me with an umbrella.
. I was coming out of the king's Arms door, and saw this woman lying in the road  she got up and gave the officer charge of me.
Were there not two young standing before the bar?
. It is no use saying any thing  I am in innocent as a new-burn infant of it  that man is half-cracked  he does not know what he says at times  I went into the house having used it for five years, to have a pint of beer, and saw this man sitting down  two young women stood before the bar, and he seemed as if he had been drinking with them  I drank my beer, and came out  many people might have gone in for what I know  at the time I came out there was a man came in.
. I belong to a vessel, and had liberty to go to the fair  I ran up Rose-alley, to get to it easier  I was stopped by two policeman, who took hold of me, and brought me to the shop.
I knew nothing at all about the case till the men came, and told me that a woman was in my cab  it was half-past twelve o'clock before I got on the stand  I took a gentleman to Peckham from the same stand at a quarter past ten, and did not return till half-past twelve  I then went to the cook-shop to get my supper.
You say you saw nobody standing by the cab.
This man was drunk, and the prosecutrix was intoxicated  if not drunk, I have witnesses to prove all this  I was in the gentleman's company, (Mr. Phelps,) and never left the Red Cow, at Peckham, till a quarter past twelve o'clock.
Did any body drive the cab down to the station-house?
The woman was asked at the station-house if I was the person  she was a good while before she would say, and she held out her hand, and said to the inspector, \Will you allow me you hand\"  he gave her his hand, and she turned round and said I was the person  it appeared to me that the inspector pressed her  he did not think proper to take the charge  I was discharged  and he gave her a note, and said she could summons me for it."
After I was discharged from the station-house, I returned to the same rank, and heard there from several of the other men that she had been asking several of them whether they would take her down for 5s.  every body refused her  it could not be earlier than half-past twelve o'clock when I returned to the rank, and she states that she paid the money at half-past eleven o'clock  it must be that she paid the money to the last cab that was there then, and then I returning to the stand, she thought it was mine  there is a man in the prison who was at Union-hall at the time this woman came in take a warrant out, and he will state that she said at the office, that the man that drove the cab down to the station-house, was not the man she gave the money to.
Did the policeman sit in the cab along with you?
What she is stating now, happened on the day that I was taken.
I had permission to have a ham at cost price, and was going to weight it in the flour scales on the other side  Mr. Cruso was the person that authorized me to have one of the hams  I had not given up the keys nor taken in the notes of what hams had been delivered that day.
She says I sent for he after my confinement here, and she came to me at the Paviors' Arms  I did not send for her  I came to see for her at her mother's one month after I came from this place.
I have been with her ever since  this took place at No. 4, Union-street  I have been there all the time  I never called there any day in particular, but have been there every meal-time.
She says the place is hers  I gave her every farthing I had in the word, and furnished her a place  all she has said is false  did not you take the jug up yourself to hit me?
I am ignorant of every thing  I never saw or heard a trial before  I am quite lost  she struck me with the jug  she cannot say, with a clear conscience that she did not  they were all tipsy in the house together.
Did not I beg and pray of you to go and lay down, you were so intoxicated?
After having dinner did not I say, being a little elevated with liquor, I would take a walk, and you said will you go and see the boy this afternoon, and buy him a new cap?
Did not you fly at me with both your hands and tear my apron, and tear the strings right off?
I did not cut her  I asked the magistrate to examine the wounds  he said it should be the case  the doctor was sent for, and he said the wound in the arm might be inflicted by a sharp instrument, but that on the forehead might have been done with a blow and bruise, but could not be done by a sharp instrument  that was done after  she cut my head all to pieces.
When you came to take me, did I appear any way obstreperous?
Did I arouse you from your sleep?
She took a jug which stood on the table  I went, previous to this, and after bringing the stockings and apron over to her, I said, \What a foolish girl you must be to drink in this kind of way  you are inebriated worse than I ever saw you before\"  I took the knife off the able, went to the cupboard, and took a piece of bread to eat  while stood at the table, she took the jug up, made use of very awful expressions and went to strike me with the jug  I lifted up my hand with the knife in it, and it grazed her arm, and the jug made an incision in my hand  the jug broke and the bottom of it fell over my left shoulder  I took the bottom of the jug up with my left hand, and flung it at her  it cut her forehead as soon as I saw the blood flow, I took and put a cloth round her head to stop the blood from coming  I told her to rest quiet, and make no noise, it was no harm  she called out, \"Murder!\"  a policeman came, and was taken in charge, and taken to the station-house  she says I was not in the habit of being with her since my confinement, and I believe you will find it very different  I was at work at several public-houses round that corner, and she used to come there three or four times a day, and ask me to give her something to drink, which I at times did  one day she came so often to one house, quite in liquor, that I said I would give her nothing  that in about three weeks ago  she took off a jug from the mantel-piece a the public-house, and made a blow over my head with that, and knocked the crown of my hat in, and I received a wound on my head as big as an egg  I went into the back of the premises, fetched a ladder, and whet to work, leaving her there  I went to her at eight o'clock next morning, which was my breakfast time  I said, \"I will not stop with you any longer; you served me as bad as you did three years back\"  she had then inflicted a wound on my head, which I have got now; it is more than three inches long  I said, \"I shall go down to the Archbishop of York's and go to work there  I will go off to-morrow\"  she said, \"Don't go\"  she went down on her knees, and begged of me not to leave her, and she would never do the like again; and I forgave her  she said, if I would furnish her a place, as she knew I had a trifle by me, she would go to it; and we were, in a short time to be united  I furnished the place; and after I had done this, she had these words with me on Tuesday, the 7th of the month, and gave me in charge at nine o'clock; and at half-past nine, after her wounds were dressed, she came and asked me for the key of the house  I told her where it was  she took it, and went and sold every thing off by ten o'clock that night, and kept he money; so that I was completely destitute, and had not a penny  I was then sent here to take my trial on this capital charge  had I had my goods, I should have been able to sell them myself to procure a solicitor and counsel; but I have not had the means of doing so  a witness, named Mason can prove she has-said, since I was committed, that she would not have said what she did before the Magistrate only to get rid me; and what she said, she could not positively swear to, for she had no doubt she was in liquor, and could not tell whether she hit me, or I hit her  I own partaking of thirteen or fourteen half-pints of liquor that morning among three or four persons  I do not know whether Mason is here."
I did not have it at all, nor see it, till I saw the gentleman pick it up of the grating  he said at the station house that he took it out of my hand.
I am a blacksmith, and worked six months in the London Docks  I was going to Westminster, seeking after another job, but had had a pint or two of beer with my shopmates  I saw the gentleman take this handkerchief up and charge me with taking it: the other three I bought in the morning of a Jew for 11s. 6d.
I saw a lad behind the gentleman and a tall young man with him  I was coming by  this gentleman came and laid hold of me, and said he wanted the handkerchief  I said I had no handkerchief  I did not take it, I work hard for my living.
He asked me to give the handkerchief up.
She said at the Mansion-house she did not see me at all.
I did not hold up my hand at all.
I am not the person, there are many other people of my name. Witness. I am certain of him  I was a witness in the case.
Yesterday, when another man was brought to the bar, he swore he was the man, and now he swears to me.
Another young man was with me  he said he would go towards home with me, and going by the Adelphi he turned round and said, \Here, take this,\" and gave me the handkerchief  the gentleman turned round, and said, \"You have got my handkerchief,\" and the other run away."
Did I offer to run?
I said I picked it up in the middle of the road.
You said you saw my hand go into the window four or five times, and then to my pocket? Witness. A. No, I did not  I saw you take something from the counter.
I did not have the penknives in my pocket.
That is false  the policeman asked me no questions at all.
He asked me if I was not the young man who was with Hutchinson the over night, when he pawned a handkerchief  that was all he said to me.
The gentleman turned and took hold of me  it was not my hand he had hold of.
I never saw the handkerchief till think very moment  there was a great crowd behind me.
He says he never to me before, and when my master sold him a black horse, which he works, we drank with him.
I asked him for a shilling when he bought the horse.
He told he Magistrate he saw a hand take them, but could not swear to me,
Did not the Magistrate say the man who stopped me should be summoned?
I never was convicted here in my life.
I was never at Woolwich in my life  I was very much intoxicated, and did not recollect any thing of this till the next morning
I was not on the wall  I was going home  I had no shoes on  I had thrown them away as I was going to my father's.
I had been drinking, and we were always in the habit of pawning our things on Monday morning, and getting them out on Saturday night.
I never did take it or pawn it.
Had you not that hammer at half-past seven o'clock that morning? Witness. A. No; I never saw it after half-past five on Saturday night.
I never took a halfpenny worth, only the brush and trowel,
I do not know any thing about it  what morning was it I came in?
Who was with me?
The officer came in and asked you for the shilling, and you gave him one  he said, \This is not bad\"  he turned it over, and said, \"Yes it is  it this the one he gave you?\"  you said, \"It must be\"  did you not pull the till out, and put it on the counter?"
Will you take your oath there was no other shilling in the till?
Did not you put it in your pocket?
Did you not at first say you put it into a pocket with some more?
I deny speaking to you.
I had been to Poplar  I saw the handkerchief on the pavement, and took it up  I saw a gentleman coming towards me  I gave it to him, and went away.
I was coming across the fields  the girl asked me which was Mr. Brown's  I said I did not know, but I would go and see whether I could find it  she gave me the shirts out of the basket  I went away, came back and said I could not find Mr. Brown
I was under the influence of liquor  I did not take it with the intention of keeping it  the next morning I was ashamed to take it to Mr. Tyler, and that was the reason.
You was it on the ground?
I saw the two gentlemen walking, and a young man behind them  they turned and the handkerchief laid on the ground  the man that took it ran away  they charged me with stealing it.
I picked it up by the pens, and the officer took me up directly.
I walked in to have a glass of ale and a sandwich  Mr. Magness informed me a match was to be played  he over-persuaded me to stay  I staid in the bar  he went to another house, and the returned  all the parties were in the skittle-ground when I went is  Magness then went into the parlour, called me, and told me to hold the stakes  I took it up, and went to the bar to take my ale  he called me into the skittle-ground  I had been there but a short time, and two man, finding they were losing the game, came across and said they would knock my  eye out if I did not give them the money, they preceding they ere deceived by the landlord, who had called them in for the purpose  I was go intimidated by them that I walked out, and thought they might settle it among themselves, well knowing where they could find me.
He said he had not seen it from five o'clock the day before  I saw it lying against some railings, in King-street, and took it.
I was with the gentleman, and had several glasses of rum and ale  he said if I would come with him he would give me home more  I rode behind the cab to Baker-street, and went into the Globe public-house to get some more  I stopped at the horse's head till they came out  he gave me one shilling to fetch some cigars  I ran off  the milkman came and said I had got the gentleman's watch, and I had not  when they went to the station, the policemen asked me where was the watch  the gentleman said he had got it in his pocket.
I was so intoxicated that I did not know what I was doing.
Did not you tell your master the money was all correct, and I had paid you every shilling?
I met the witness with his straw  I asked him the price  he said 35s.  I bid him 34s., and asked him what he was going to take home  he said, \Fifty bushel of soot\"  I asked what price he would give for soot  he said, \"Sixpence\"  I said I would load the soot at 6 1/2 d., and would give him 35s. a load for his turn, if he would buy his soot of me  I expected the gentleman would have taken the load and a half, and the prosecutor agreed to take the soot of me at 6d. a bushel  when we got to the corn-dealer's. I sold the straw, and said to the carter, \"Come about two hundred yards farther, and I think I know a gentleman who will take the other half load\"  I went to Short's Gardens, and found a customer in about an hour and a quarter; and when I came back for him, he was gone."
I was standing by St. Clement's Church, looking at the clock  the gentleman stepped up and asked me for his handkerchief  I said I had not got it  the witness came up and said he saw me take it, and pass it to another man behind me, who passed it to an other man selling baked potatoes  I asked them to search me  I did not run  I had not walked twenty yards before the witness collared me again, and threw me down  I was taken to the station-house and searched.
I had the coat given to me.
Did I give it to you, or did any other man?
Where did you first see me?
They are both perjuring themselves  I had been out of a situation three years  I had been with the Earl of Plymouth till his death three years ago  I was not in the street five minutes.
It was five minutes to nine o'clock when he took me  he said, \What have you got under your jacket?\"  I said, \"Nothing but my own\"  he unbattoned my jacket, and found the cream-jug  I said, \"I bought it\"  I bought it at nine o'clock the evening before."
. This man and I had been drinking Monday and Tuesday together, all the two days, at different places in Whitechapel  we came to the Cross Keys and had a drink there  he wanted to quarrel with me  I said he had better keep out of my company, I wanted no quarrelling, and not to be hindered from my work  he followed me to my own place, and wanted me to fight  I came out and told him to be off, for I wanted to go to bed, but he would have me fight  so I came out, and he hit me  I hit him in the face, and he fell on the curb  he being so drunk, was not able to stand  he was more drunk than I was  he has been different times in prison for quarrels  he is always kicking up rows with different persons.
How far does your stool stand from your door-way?
. I bought the shoes while I was in liquor, not knowing what I was about at the time  my former charge was the only time I was ever in prison, and that was owing to my being in want of bread.
She said before the Alderman she could swear to me by my flannel jacket.
A man was placed at the bar who was caught asleep in the house some hours afterwards, in a light fustian jacket, and they said I had a dirty white flannel jacket.
The other man was very much like me, and he had a fustian jacket on, and was seen to go into the house.
. They were a long time looking at the shawls  I was in a hurry, and angry, thinking they would not buy a shawl  I threw the shawls aside, and went over to the ribbon  the shawls were put into the shelves before I sold the ribbon, in haste, and not moved afterwards.
. I never had it  the man who took it was let go.
. I picked the handkerchief up, and gave it to the gentleman.
It was not found in my house.
When he came out with the light in his hand he was talking to my brother in the tap-room  I was not in the yard at all  I know nothing of it.
He stated that he accidentally came into the shop where I was  he did not see me with the lead, but they told him at Hatton-gardan, if he did not say so, he would not get his expenses.
You were not there the first day.
The brass-founders were passing and I saw the handkerchief on the pavement, it was chucked behind em.
The handkerchief was put down between me and the wall.
My hand was in my pocket  the brass-founders were going by and there was a great crowd.
I saw three boys  one threw the handkerchief behind him  I took it up and put it in my breast  the gentleman came and asked me if I had a handkerchief  I said, \Yes\"."
I found them in the forecastle.
when you spoke to me, I said I had been hired to take the truck.
I had been drinking a great deal, or I should not have run away  a person offered me 1s. to wheel it.
I did not have them in my possession,
, Welch was there the whole time, he never saw this in the cistern.
I was discharged from the House of Correction  I got into the police, and in consequence of talking a man, the Magistrate reported that I had been taken myself, and I was dismissed.
The gentleman says false  in the first place, the first night when we came up together we came to the Star and Garter and had a pint of beer  I bid him good night and returned home  I had got about half a mile beyond Brentford when I turned round and saw him running after me  he said, \I want you to go to London with me in the morning\"  I turned back to the Star and Garter and had gin and cloves  we then called at the Windmill and stopped there  he had a glass of gin and I had cloves  in the morning we walked on to the house where the woman stop with fruit  we had breakfast and went on to London  we went into a wine-vaults in George-street  I stopped there while he got his lace out of pawn, and went to Red-lion-street  we had a pint of beer, and at another house had two pints of half-and half  we then went to another house in John-street  he gave me a penny to get beer while he went to his son's house  he came back and said, \"John, I have had no luck, I will give you a dinner\"  he then went to a pawnbroker's and bought me a pair of trowsers, and said, \"John, I want to go over the water\"  we went over Westminster-bridge and got lost  we had four or five pints of beer and a quartern of gin  we got to Vaauxhall-bridge and inquired our way to Westminister-bridge  when we got there he said, \"I want to go to Dobree's\"  we lost our way again and went to Chelsea, and returned to Hyde-park-corner  he said, \"I will not go to Dobree's, it is a long way, we will go to the Windmill and sleep to-night\"  when we got there it was shut up  we walked to Brentford-end, and I could not see a house open  he asked the watchman where we could get a bed, and he said at the night-house  I said I will go with you there  when we got nearly opposite the Alcove, I said, \"My house is just hare, you can sit up or go to bed if you like\"  he said, \"I would rather go to the night-house\"  I said, \"I will go with you\"  on the road we had a few words and fell out  I struck him and he sturck me over the nose  he was down and hallooed \"Murder\"  I said, \"You need not call murder, I am not going to do more\"  he struck me again, and said, \"Pray have mercy on me\"  he got up and said, \"Come to the night-house with me and see me safe there, and then you can go home\"  I said, \"I will not go further with you\"  he said, \"D  you, I will do for you tomorrow,\" and then I left him."
I am not, my Lord.
. I left work on Monday evening. Coming through Holborn I changed half-a-crown, and bought two oranges  I had 2s. 4d. change  I spent, with some shopmates, 1s. 4d.  then I went to Mr. Hill, and bad but this shilling  I deny having thrown anything away.
I picked it up against a pastry-cook's shop, and having no place to go to I kept it.
I went to purchase one  an elderly man came out in a waistcoat with green sleeves  I went in and put three horns on the counter, and was asking the price  she called her husband and said I wanted to steal them  I begged her not to disgrace me  this is the handkerchief I took out of my pocket at the time, and the horns were on the counter.
. I live at Whitecross-street. A man had this cask and his hand upon it  he said he would give me 2d. to take it to High-street.
I was flurried, and did not know what to say.
I took these things, as I had on one or two occassions before, though the party might not know it.
I am very sorry, if you will let me go this time, I will not do so any more.
I did not take it  a man was coming out, and he gave it to me.
I said no such thing.
A woman came in, and I served  she gave me a sixpence, and took some bacon and half-a-pound of cheese  she gave me a sixpence  I gave her 1 1/2d.  when I came round my fellow-servant picked a shilling off the pavement, and said I had dropped it, and then he said he saw me take something out of the till, but he did not know what.
I did not see any money of his  we went to a shop and had dinner  I paid for the dinner.
Did not you come into the room and say, \What the d  do you mean by getting into two beds?\""
When I came down to the bottom of the stairs, a person said, \Where are you going, you have been stealing the blankets and sheets?\"  I said, \"What do you mean?\"  he called his brother, and they took me back."
. I do not know anything at all about it.
, The handkerchief never was in my hand.
I disown that I ever saw him in my life. Witness. He is the man and no other  I am quite sure he is.
I know nothing about it.
I hope you will have a little mercy, it being the first offence.
. At the time that the witness stated the watch was pawned I stated I was at my master's house, and I stated the hours I was from my master's; and the next time we came before the Magistrate, he stated it was during these hours  Sergeant Hopper put the question to him, whether he could swear to me  he said he could not, but I saw more like the person than any of the rest  and he stated it was in the forenoon  then again in the dusk, and again between two and four o'clock  and now be states between twelve and two o'clock.
I found it by a wheel-barrow, and had it five minuter and then he came and said, \I understand you have a handkerchief of mine?\"  I said, \"Yes  is this yours?\""
I was coming down the New Cut, and found this handkerchief lying by a wheelbarrow.
. I saw a man in custody of a policeman just before my window  I saw the leather-cutter, who is a neighbour of mine, come up  he had lost the bootleg  I laid my work down to see that it was  Watkins came up and shook the prisoner most violently  I said it was rough usage, or some such word, but not more than that  he instantly left his prisoner, came across to me, and I stepped into my own door  he never touched me till I was within two yards of my own passage  I had my awl in my hand, and whether it went into him, by his trying to snatch at me, or by my trying to push him out, I cannot say, but I believe I did him no injury.
She has taken every thing from me that would fetch 2d  I never hit her, nor nothing  I have done no such thing to her  it is all false what she has been swearing.
I went quietly with him.
This is the way the woman has served me  every thing worth twopence she takes, and sells away from me, and pawns them.
On the evening we had the piece of work I was very much aggravated  I was in liquor at the time I did the deed, and was very much aggravated indeed  I am very sorry for what I have done.
I was going down Queen-street to look for work, walking behind two young men  I saw them drop something  it was the box  I picked it up  the gentleman turned round directly and accused me of having it  I said it was not his, and I would not give it up, because I saw two young men drop it  he knocked me down, and I said, \If this is your snuff-box, here it is, Sir.\""
I came out about a quarter to ten o'clock and as I was running in Broad-street, the policeman came and stopped me, I asked what he wanted  he said, the girl gave me in charge for stealing the necklace, and at Bow-street, she said I took them at ten o'clock, and the policeman said afterwards that she gave me in charge at half-past nine o'clock  she said at the office she did not see my hands on the child's neck.
I never saw the wool, and had nothing to do with it.
I went out to tea at a quarter before four o'clock, and my master came and met me in Long-lane, and laid hold of me  I said, \Don't choak me, I don't know any thing about the watch\"  he said, if I would give him the watch, or tell him where it was, he would not hurt me."
This officer found more of the lead, he says, at a marinestore-shop.
I was taken very bad, I never saw the lead, nor had any thing on my person.
I never had it in my possession  I saw two lads come up a turning, and this gentleman was running after them, with a stick in one hand and a handkerchief in the other  he fell down just as he got close to me  I assisted to take him up.
I had occasion to move some bottles of ginger-beer, and found five shillings  my master always locked the till  he had the key in his pocket  I had no intention of keeping the money.
These two pieces I had on me  I did not know what to do with them  I was in liquor when I took them.
I met a man I had not seen for some time, and he gave me a little to drink  a man was passing, I asked him to carry if for me, and I saw no more of him.
I was going to take the child home.
He was not in the place when I had them.
I purchased a handkerchief of a Jewess for 2s. 9d. and had not had it ten minutes in my possession before the officer came and took me  he asked me If I had any thing about me  I put my hand in my hat, took the handkerchief out, and gave it to him  he asked if there was any mark on it  I said no, but he never asked if there was a mark on the silk handkerchief  the girls never saw me have the handkerchief.
This man has taken a false oath  as he took Newland, I walked up, and asked him what he took him for  he said, \I want you also\"  Newland got away  he took me to the station-house, and said nothing to the Magistrate about me  I was remanded till Thursday  on Saturday, he caught Newland again, and we were remanded again  the Magistrates gave Newland six weeks."
I was coming across Drury-lane, to go after a place in Cutler-street, Houndsditch  I heard the call of \Stop thief\", and was stopped, but no necklace was found on me  the little girl said she did not know whether it was me that look it."
You stated before the Magistrate that I selected the boots and shoes?
In what part of your shop did I go?
I was at a house of call for gentleman's servants, in North Audley-street, and met a butler, who was also out of a situation  we went together to make inquiries for situations  I gave him two duplicates of coats to dispose of for me, and met him by appointment next day, in Tottenham-court-road  he said, \I have a job to valet a gentleman a few mornings, will you do me the favour to go to Bateman's, in Broad-street, and order a few boots and shoes, and bring them to the pastry cooks in Great Russell-street?\"  I ordered them and two pair of pumps, and took the shopman with them to the pastry-cooks  I asked if Mr. Thompson lived there; they said, \"No\"  I left the goods there, expecting he would come for them  I told the shopman to fetch the pumps which he had forgotten, and I would wait till Thompson came  he came in about five minutes and requested me to fetch them out the shop, saying it would appear singular for him to fetch them, as he had not left them  I brought them out to him and walked with him  he left me suddenly in Union-street, and I did not see him again till Monday, July 11  I then asked if he had disposed of my duplicates  he said, \"No; here they are, and three more in this bag; I was coming to ask you to take care of them for me, as I have been drinking\"  on looking at them I found he had pawned the shoes in my name  he said, \"Never mind, I shall have money to-morrow to pay for them\"  I have been made a dupe of by him."
I went to a milk-shop in York-street, where I used to have some curds and whey  there was no one there  I went up-stairs, as I thought they might sell them there  I never touched these things  I saw them there.
I took it up on the stairs and put it into my pocket as I ran down stairs, when the prosecutor hit me.
I had nothing but what I wanted for my horses.
Was not I asleep when you came to bed?
It was half-past twelve o'clock when I went to bed, and the landlord proved that he brought him to bed at one o'clock  I slept there the night before  if there was any knife in the room, it was not mine.
What time did I go to bed?
Did you not have a man taken at Hertford, of the name of William Powell?
Yes; I slept at your house.
Is there any name or mark on that bat, I have had it three years?
He was forsworn himself three times  he says he was not drunk  he was as drunk as a man could be  we won 2s. or 3s. worth of rum and water of the landlord in tossing  I was drinking there all day.
I never was in Leadenhall-market at all  I was coming along Leadenhall-street, about two o'clock, and slipped down, a man passed me and dropped the coat.
I had been to my uncle's, and as I came to Aldgate Church, two young men went past  they threw the handkerchief on the ground  I took it up, and the gentleman came and said, had I seen any body take his handkerchief  I said I had picked one up.
I never had it, I never took it off at all.
What Samson stated about his not having young ladies in the back parlour is not true, I could prove it  they might have been in the shop, and taken that gown-piece  I flung it at Mark's head  I am innocent.
I hope you will have mercy on me, for the sake of my wife and family.
I never had the pork.
I cannot account for the silk being in my coat, unless it was put there to injure me  I am not the only one who has been served so.
I was facing the door the truck belonged to.
I was going by the back of the gentleman's house, in the Tenter-ground  there was a fight there  a young man came up and asked me what I was doing  said I was doing nothing  he said, \Bring that truck round the court\"  I did so  the witness came up and said, \"Who are you looking for?\"  I said, \"A young man in a white apron\"  he went away  I stopped there about ten minutes, and seeing nobody, I thought I would take the truck back: which I did, and the gentelman belonging to it came up, and said, \"What are you going to do with that truck?\"  I said, \"I was hired to take it round the corner, \"and he gave me in charge."
Have you not entered into an arrangement with Mr. Hart to pay him 10s. every fortnight?
On Monday, the 25th of July, 1 went to Mr. Dalton, and requested him, as my friend, to go with me to be answerable for a bill or advance note, and it was on his responsibility and indorsement that Mr. Hart cashed it  two days after Dalton charged me before the police-inspector with forging the note, and the case was dismissed, as he could not make the charge good against me  as soon as I was discharged I offered to arrange the matter with Dalton  he said he did not wish to hurt me, and would do all in his power to serve me; that I had nothing to fear, all should be settled amicably  of the money I received, I gave Dalton 5s. and paid for some refreshment  we met by agreement twice, and it was not till the following Monday that I was taken a second time  I did not tell him I wrote the bill myself, but he tried to obtain the acknowledgement from me  I have since had abundant reasons to believe that his friendly professions were merely to gain time to bring his plans and charges against me to maturity  far from wishing to defraud Hart or Dalton, my intention was, when I discovered the note to be a forgery, to transfer my wages over to Mr. Dalton as soon as I got a ship, which I expected to do in a day or two, and which happened the day I was arrested the second time.
My mother left me the purse when she died  when I was married I gave it to my wife to take care of, and it lay in a box for about twelve months, not used at all, and about three months ago I took it to wear in my own pocket, and put my money into it.
The man says he saw me through the glass window of the box, and yet let me go into the street, why not detain me?
You gave them to me to sell.
I sold the trowsers.
Did not I come into the yard to you, and wash my hands, and you came into the kitchen, and took the wine off the dresser?
It would be foolish to deny my guilt, but I was in an insensible state of intoxication  I went to redeem them, but I heard that she had been there.
I was coming up Smithfield with my master, and hearing the cry, \Let him loose, \"I went up, and asked what was the matter  I heard the others say, \"Let the poor boy go,\" and I said so innocently, not knowing what it was, the same as the rest  the gentleman laid hold of me, and tore my button off  he would not let me go, and I laid hold of his collar  that was all I did  I did not know who stole the handkerchief, what boy it was, or any thing about it, till I saw the crowd, and asked what was the matter."
I deny touching the man at all  he laid hold of my collar, to drag me to the Computer.
I deny saying any thing about the horses at all  I was not near them  I was just by the mob  I heard them, and went as I have stated.
The hatter picked it up fourteen or fifteen yards from the policeman.
I met a man at the corner of Red Lion-street  he told me to go and get them, and he would give me 1d., but he went away when he saw this man coming up.
I went in for a halfpenny worth of milk, and no one was there  I came out, and went on  he came and took me.
I was standing at the bar, drinking with a young woman  the witness turned round, and said, \This young man has picked your pocket\"  he took me, and searched me, and could find nothing  then he said, \"Uncle, I saw him give it to another one\"  there was no one went out."
I am perfectly innocent.
I purchased that cloth three weeks before, for my own use  I ran rather short, and went to pawn it, where I had been to pawn things.
I did not run a step.
I had a whip in my hand, and was at a horse's head.
All that the witness says is not true  it was not me stole the things.
My master's son gave me these things and put them in my box  he told me to keep them till he came back in a fortnight, that his mother might not see them; and the apron the bar-maid gave me.
I did not pawn them.
I did not take them, nor pawn them  I did not know any thing about them till Mr. Heditch called me down into the shop, and told me about them.
Had you not a club supper at your house that night?
On Friday morning, between the hours of four and five, I was passing along the fields leading from Calthorpe-street to Bagwells road, by the wall of the House of Correction; and in a corner where there is a water-course, I saw the watch. I picked it up, and at the time thought I was committing no crime in so doing. I afterwards went to the Cobham's Head, to clean some knives and forks for the pot-boy. I informed him that I had found a seal, he then asked me if I wished to sell it, and what I wanted for it; I said I would leave the price with him: and I solemnly declare at that time, I thought it was only metal  he offered me a shilling for it, saying it was as much as he could afford  I let him have it. At the time I found the watch, I was in the deepest distress, having been out of work for twelve months, and having a wife and seven children entirely dependent on me. I did, I must confess, pledge the watch for 2l. 16s.
I was at that time in a state of insanity.
While I was there they abused me in a most shameful manner  a young fellow of the shop threw the parcels at me, because I refused to leave the book for 1s.  I had witnesses here yesterday to prove I was mad.
Was not your handkerchief laying down by the rails?
I told them the truth. I work at the West India Docks  coming along the road I saw a man who gave me a drop of beer to take the pig down the turning beyond the turnpike  I said I would  I asked him what I was to drive it with  he said, \Pick up a few stones and chuck at it, and she will go along\"."
I was told by my fellow-servants I should be discharged as soon as she came down to breakfast  I wish to know whether she had not a key of the pantry as well as myself?
Was I not told in your presence that I should be discharged as soon as my mistress came down to breakfast?
The lady's maid told me I should be discharged.
I was at home, and in bed at the time, through an accident from a cab wheel, at the bottom of St. James's-street  I broke my ribs, and hurt my spine and leg.
Have not I many times moved books from your shelves, and sold them, and returned you the money three or four days afterwards?
Several days we travelled together, and many days I travelled by myself, till a policeman asked me to look at my license  he said, \Is your name Crippen?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he said, \"Show me your license\"  it had Curtis' name on it  when I said Curtis was not my employer, the policeman said, \"Don't continue to travel under the license; you are liable to a fine;\" and then I gave it up  I was held in degradation by both of them  it is all spite against me  he lent me his license to go out several times by myself, from morning to night."
I had been playing at bowls, and got a good deal of beer  I sat down to rest, and fell asleep on the road side, when I awoke I was very cold, and thought I would go to the house and ask for a bed for the night  the publican was in bed, and as I came back again, the hat was on the road side  I took it up, and met the policeman, who asked what I had there  I said, \I found it on the road side.\""
I did not say I would supply him every week  I was intoxicated at the time, and he told me if I would send my wife out to get a pot of beer, she would not see any thing of it  he said he was a hawker going about the country, and would but any thing, he did not care what is was.
I beg for mercy.
I did not take it  it was the people I was with.
I met the lady ten or fifteen yards from the door  I had picked up the shawl outside, and gave it to her when she stopped me.
I met him going along the road one day with a truck  he said, \You come with me, I will give you something\"  I went, and he said, \"You come to-morrow morning, I will give you some tobacco\"  I did, and he said, \"Come again, and I will give you some more,\" and I went, but I did not take any thing  I stopped in the shop full ten minutes while he went and fetched his master out, a man came in for a gallon of ale, and he told him."
Did you not come and accuse me of picking your pocket?
Did you see me before you felt the beads pulled off?
I was going along the ruins, and a policeman stopped me  I said I was going to my brother..
I took these boots, on purpose to ask my master, on the following Monday morning, to let me have them at so much a-week.
Did you lose sight of me?
I was going to work, and this boy came  I met him with the bundle under his arm  he threw it over a garden  I afterwards went and got it, and brought it along  he met the carman and threw it down, as he was afraid of him  I was going straight on to my work.
I went to rub my leg at the fire in the back room  I never went up-stairs at all.
According to the place where she sat, there is a chimney which projects and hides part of the door, and during my sitting by the fire, rubbing my leg, William the lodger went up-stairs and did not return before I left.
The money found on me was what I worked for, and that was 5s., as Mr. King has stated  sometimes I was at the Export Dock  Mr. King pays at No. 3 and 4  now on the Monday I was working at No. 1 and 2  on Tuesday and Wednesday I was under Mr. King, and on Thursday and Friday I was at No. 9 and 10  that constitutes my money except for the odd Saturday.
I did take the handkerchief, but I gave the duplicate to my mother, and told her I would get it out as soon as I got work.
I went into the shop, and asked to see a diamond pin  I was shown a paper of diamonds  I did not touch them at all  I merely pointed to one with my fingers, and said it was rather too small  it is very easy to mistake a diamond  why should he think I stole one from having one in my possession.
An other boy and me were going by, and he said, \Joe, same and take them,\" and we went."
What distance were you from the shop?
Was it you or your wife who took the shilling from me?
Did you not take the money out of your mother's presence for ten minutes, and come back and say it was bad?
Did you take the shilling out of my clothes or out of the mad?
Can you swear that I did not call twice, while you were talking to another gentleman?
I kept it in my hand, as it was my intention to purchase it,
You say I received Stubbs' on Tuesday, it was on Wednesday, because the round was too long.
When you paid me on the Wednesday morning, I dated it as if received on the Tuesday?
I told you there was an error in the bill of 2s.  I did not know where it was  I put down 2s., but you did not pay me that 2s.
Have not these sums been accounted for an paid in your books?
You know you ill-used me  I can show the marks  the tools were part of them mine.
I was returning from my master's  I went to my mother's and on coming back, I was going to Billingsgate to assist my wife home, and on the road in Wood-street I heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran with the other people  a man in white trowsers was running, and that man let the bundle fall out of his arm  I turned one way, and suppose the man went the other  as soon as I turned the corner I was laid hold of  four or five people came to the station-house, and said I was not the man who dropped it, that it was a person in white trowsers; but they were all pushed away from the door  the door was shut in their faces  they promised to come forward, but I do not know whether they are here."
. I had been to a singing place at a public-house, and was returning home, and as I came along, I turned up the court to ease myself, the policeman laid hold of me, and said I had dropped the chisel  I never had my shoes off, nor ever had any chisel in my possession.
Will you on your oath say it was me that knocked you down?
. I was in at the Griffin public-house, in White-street, Borough  there was a row there, and two men were taken from there  I ran to the station-house to see if they were taken up, and that man came and caught hold of me and said, \You have robbed a man;\" I said, \"I have robbed no man;\" but he took me to the station-house, and gave the policeman a half-crown, a shilling, and a sixpence; and on Monday he brought the purse, and said there was another half crown. I never wore an apron in my life."
When I came by his place, he called me in, and I bought the things of him, and paid for them  I called a few days after, and he had gone away and not paid his rent, as the neighbours informed me. Witness I was there six or eight weeks after, and he never called  I have paid my rent there  I did not tell him if he would give me anything I would not give him into custody  he had a bag with him the day he called.
At Queen-square, he said there were six or seven men on the board at work, and they had their backs towards me, and so he had himself  I paid for the coat and trowsers and went about my business.
There were five or six men on the board.
. The prosecutor swears very falsely  he met me right opposite the Horse-Guards, and accused me of it  I asked him if he was joking, and said, \Do you mean to accuse me of steering the coat?\" he said, \"I do not accuse you of stealing it, but there was nobody in the place but you\"  I said, \"Did you see me steel it\" he said, \"No, but there was nobody to steal it but you.\" I know nothing about it  I stopped in the shop a few minutes after putting the things into the bag  at Queen-square he said he missed it about a quarter of an hour after."
How long was I in your shop alto-gether?
Some years ago I lived with a gentleman who was under the necessity of raising a small sum of money, and I was in the habit of pawnings things at Mr. Attenborough's in his name, and from that period up to the present there was no necessity for me to give any name.
Have not I frequently been to your house with orders from Messrs. Frodsham's?
I do not know how to advance any thing in extenuation of my guilt  had it not been stated that it would deprive me of receiving evidence to character, which I really did expect; I should have pleaded guilty, but the solicitor stated that there was no probability of my trial coming on to-day, and I fear that is the cause of their not being in attendance  I gave information myself where the guard-chains were pawned, in order that they might get them out again, and I was taken.
. I was earning along by the side of the Post-office, and found it in one of the back streets, lying in the road.
I picked up a job at the corner of Smithfield, and saw nothing of any cloak.
I could not have been sober, for I do not recollect saying any thing of the sort to him.
Where were you when I gave you the order?
I worked for Mr. Foster six or nine months, but never went to this shop but once  I took an order for the cloth  I was remanded two or three times, but they could not produce the order fur the Harrington which Mr. Foster had received  I fetched that, and took it to Mr. Foster, and they cannot find that order  it is very probable the one they have produced here may be the one I took then  I was at work at Mr. Foster's at the time they say I brought this order, and Mr. Foster's books will prove it  I was not in their shop at the time.
They do not know what they swear  it is all false I had three or four examinations before the Alderman would commit me  Mr. Foster's books will prove I was at work at the time, and they cannot produce the other order.
Where was the last witness When I gave him the order?
Mr. Bell swore at the office he had sent me for two yards and a half.
Had not I been in your shop since the order was produced, before I was apprehended?
Pray, how came you to think it was me that forged the order?
. I was at home at ten o'clock, the time they say I was at the shop.
Do you recollect whether it was two yards or two yards and a half of rifle-green you gave mean order for?
Do you recollect Ward saying he had a very strong idea at the time I was in the shop, with the cloth under my arm, that it was a forged order?
, You said at the Mansion House you saw the handkerchief on the ground, and the other man picked it up.
. I never was in Houndsditch at all  I was standing there hearing the cry of \Stop thief  the prosecutor did not collar me."
You asked me if I had seen a man with four pigs  I said no, and you wished me a good night  I went on towards home  how far was I off when you took me again?
Did I not ask the ostler if he had stood there before, and he said yes  and I said did not this man bid me good night  and Mr. Hussey laid hold of his arm, and said, \You know nothing about it?\""
Did you not say you saw one man driving a pig round the water-trough?
. I went to the Welsh Harp, Butler was sitting on his horse, and the ostler had something like a pot, handing it up  the patrol asked me whether I saw a man with four pigs  I said, \No\"  he said \"Good night\"  I then made my way on to the path, knowing it was better than the road  I had got threequarters of a mile, and he overtook me, and said he could see no other person that was with the pigs, and if I did not go back be would blow my brains out  I said to the ostler, \"Did you not to hear him ask me about the pigs, and bid me good night?\"  he said \"Yes.\""
Did I not say, \I wish you could catch the rascal, he just knocked me down,\" and you said, \"Come along with me\"  I said, \"Do not collar me, I will go any where,\" and you took me round the corner, and said to Cowburn, \"Is this him?\" he said, \"I think it is.\""
What made you say you thought it was me?
. A lady saw me knocked down  her name is Mary Jones  she was asking me the way to some street, and I was telling her, as a man knocked me down  I showed my coat next day to the officer, with mud on it.
I was in the house from twelve, till the time you said you lost it?
This passage is public, and there are coachmen, and cads, and conductors  your servant swore he saw me go out, and I had nothing in my hand, and the next time you took good care you did not let your servant come again.
. I think it quite impossible for him to go into his cellar and knock this bung out to look through  Why should he suspect the ham was gone any more than any other property?  it appears to me he missed the ham on the Saturday  it is quite as possible any other person might take it as me  I was in the house full an hour after he lost it, and his servant stated he saw me and three others go out, and neither of us had any ham.
I was standing there, and the handkerchief was put into my hand, I put it into my pocket  I did not try the gentleman's pocket.
I showed him the man that picked his pocket.
. There were other people running before and behind me, crying \Stop thief,\" and I ran also  when I was brought back the gentleman had the handkerchief in his pocket."
. The foreman sent me to borrow the hay, as we were out of it  he was at Worship-street, and swore I did borrow it, the first night I was there  and at the second examination Mr. Nicholls would not let him come forward.
What shelf were they taken from?
Did not the prosecutor show you where the books came from, which was outside the window, leaning against the post?
. I saw a man running up John-street throw something away, and run up the court  I picked the books up, and put then into my hat  the prosecutor came up and said, \Where is the large book you took of mine\"  I said I had no large book  he said, \"Give me the Acting Drama,' and I will let you go\"  I said I had some small books which I had picked up, and gave them to him."
I was returning from Enfield  I stooped down  I thought it was a man rolled up, and before I got it up, they took me  I had no intention of stealing it  I never was near the cart.
Was it in my apron, or was it on the ground?
I offered to go out to seek for the man I bought it of, she came back and brought one, and said there was the fellow shoulder  I said, \You will take that to the Magistrate to-morrow,\" they were both off the off-side of the sheep; and in the morning there was only one shoulder brought, and then she said she had taken the other home  I gave 4s. 2 1/2d. for that shoulder, and offered to take her to the man I bought it of in Newgate-market."
I told the officer where I bought it  I should know the man I bought it of, if I were to go to the market  I have been thirty years under the Board of Ordnance, and seventeen yean in the Tower, in the storekeeper's department.
I never had it in my hand  I was coming from my sister's, and was standing hearing the waits  he came up and struck me twice, and knocked me down  I asked him what he did it for  he said, \For picking my packet.\""
I found it in the dust.
I beg for mercy.
There were two boys behind the gentleman  they threw it down  I picked it up  the gentleman turned, and I walked off with it in my hand.
What time of night was it?
The evidence of the boy is different to what he said before the Magistrate  he said that this pair of boots was the pair I gave that man, but he cannot swear to them.
. I was crossing the road, and the boy chucked it out of the cart  they took me, and said I had it on my shoulder, which I had not.
Had I an epaulette on or a side-belt?
I was searched immediately I went into the barracks  the pass of the prosecutor was found on another soldier the next morning; and he stated that this old man lost his pass in the street, and he found it there.
I am an umbrella-maker. I was in Tottenham Court-road, trying to get work  I am innocent of this crime  as to the books, I turned up a yard, and there were the books lying; I took them up, and the officer took me.
She did not come into the room first  her husband broke the door open.
. On Saturday evening I was out with a party in Leicester-square  I was going to Covent-garden, and met this girl who said she would take me to a house where I could stop  I went with her, and asked what they wanted for the room  they charged me 2s.  that woman left the room  I said I could lock the door, and should be safe  I went to bed, and in ten minutes (before the young women came to bed) Mr. Josephs broke the door open, and said 1 most take my things and go out as quick as I could  I said, \Give me time to dress myself,\" and said, \"I won't leave the room till I have my money back \"but he took my things and threw them out of the window  I took the poker and knocked at the window to call the police  he took the poker from me and we struggled for it  his wife came up, and a girl brought some boiling water  I called the policeman, and murder, and whatever I could  the policeman came up at last, and I dressed myself, and went with him to the station-house."
There were three along with us, a boy named Coleman, and Carter  they went before the girl, pulled her clothes up, and she dropped the cheese  I took it up and said, \Here is your cheese,\" but she would not take it."
. I said nothing about being lagged  he asked me if I had put the things away  I said no  he said, \If that is the case, I shall not say any thing about it\"  about two months before, my mother came to live at the prosecutor's house  she got me to move her things there, and from that time told me not to go hungry, but to go there whenever I wanted victuals; and on Thursday, the day before this happened, I met Burrell  I went and knocked at the door, but nobody came  I went again about five o'clock, and the shoemaker's wife next door came out and said my mother was not at home, but was gone down to my sister's  I went away and next morning went with a man named Rutherford to Barnet, and slept there that night, and then to St. Alban's, where I stopped till Wednesday morning; I then came back, and was apprehended."
there is a barn in the middle of a field, about a hundred yards from this one  i was going to sleep there, and saw this open; and as it used to be an empty barn, I went in at eleven o'clock, and about two 0'clock in the morning I heard somebody coming down the yard, and I came out  used often to sleep there when it was an old stable.
. I met a sailor at the bottom of the stairs, who asked me to carry this canvass, and said he would give me twopence  I said, \Where did you get it?\"  he said, \"If any body stops you, say you brought it from on board a ship\"  the policeman saw the sailor ran away."
I was going by, and was a yard or a yard and a half from him be turned and laid hold of me, and let me go, and then he came to me again, and said he had lost his snuff-box, and had seen me give something to a girl  the only female who was passing, was quite a lady?
There was another young man with me. I had received some money the night before, and we staid out all night  when this officer came to me he said, \I thought it was another that took it, but 1 could not get him.\""
. I went to the Pavilion with a young boy on Monday night, and he gave me some liquor, the next day I met him again, and he said He was going to take a ship  I said I had got no money  to  said, could I get any thing out from where I lodged, and he would pawn it  he took the watch to one pawnbroker, and they would not give more than 9s. on it  I went and got 12s.  I went and pawned the cloth  then he took me down to Sheerness, and said he would get a ship for me, and we slept at a public-house  he then took me to Chatham  he could not get a slip, and we came back to London  we saw a thimble-rig  he had got my watch, and put that against a sovereign, and lost the watch, and then be sent the officer for me  his name is close.
How could you see me get out of the window, when I was coming past the house?
I was not near the premises, not within twenty yards.
Was you not tipsy?
Did I not say, \Hare comes a policeman, let him take me\"?'"
. I did not touch any thing of the kind  he did not find it on my person.
Did you notice what two shillings you gave me?
The two shillings found on me was what she gave me  I had but one half-crown and a penny farthing when I went into the house.
How do you know that I was the person who had been in your house?
You took five farthings from me  they beat me about the head, and gave me two black eyes, and loosened all my teeth  they throw me on the floor, and kicked me on the head.
Those arc the two shillings that they gave me in change for the half-crown.
What time did I come there on the 9th?
If I had known it had been a bad half-crown, I could have got away when he sent for the policeman  I thought he suspected I had stolen something, and knowing myself innocent, I waited  I never gave him a bad half-crown, nor had one, to my knowledge  I do not know that I should know one if I saw it.
Had you any suspicion of me?
A person came in shirt-sleeves and gave him a half-crown, and he threw it into the till  when he took my change back he took it into his hand, and turned it over two or three times, and sounded this half-crown  he said, \This is a bad one, if you don't give me another I will give you into custody\"  I said I had not got another  he staid then ten minutes, and I said, \"If you do not give me change I will send for a policeman\"  the policeman came, but nothing was found on me  not a farthing  they said so before the Magistrate,"
Whom did you search first?
You never searched me, you asked the next prisoner, and he pulled out the nine shillings and two sixpences from his pocket  he was I asked by Mr. Powell whether any money was found on me, and he said Do  I should wish to ask Mr. Stowell whether he reminded him of it or not.
When you followed me, what did you do with the crown-piece?
Did not you state at Worship-street that I said, \You have not got the crown-piece?\""
I deny being the person that went into the baker's or the pastry-cook's.
The counterfeit shilling was thrown into the till, with another  but it was afterwards taken out.
You were not in the shop
I deny being the person that went into the shop.
You took five or six shillings out of your pocket, and gave me another, and put the shilling into your pocket  I got to the corner of the street, and was brought back, and you took that shilling out from several others.
Ford gave you the shilling before it was marked?
I deny being the person that went into the two first places, and how am I to be indicted for passing a bad shilling, when they changed the shilling?  if they were not positive that they gave them ma, would they take one which they were sure was bad, and give me a good one back?
I received them for my wages.
Did you not say, \That is a bad one?\""
When I was in the the tap-room, my money was all in my hand  you thought I had it in my mouth, and took hold of my throat, and I put it out of my hand.
It is very hard that she should swear she never gave me another for it  it was the money they gave to me  I went and got another half-crown when I came out of the first shop.
It was a mistake  I did not go into the shop knowing it was bad.
Was it stolen out of your pocket?
On the first night the officer brought me to your place, did you not say you were not certain of me?
He bought seven mats of me for a sovereign, and I suppose he repented of his bargain' my being a stranger, he would not have trusted me with sovereign  heshould have brought the mat. here, and let them have been valued  they are well worth the money.
They are my own  I have had them ever since I was at the lodging.
, I was coming along, and a gentleman gave me this to carry to Tothill-street, Westminster.
At the time he gave me the note in my hand Traynor was it receiving some money, and M'Coy was by at the time.
I was just outside the door, and he called me  I said if I had it, I had put it in by mistake  I had a pound of bread and some other things.
. The day before I left Wisbeach I asked my owner for 2l. to send to my wife  he said, \I will give it you to-morrow morning\"  he did not give it me, but as the tide suited for the vessel to sail, he said, \"I am not going myself, but I have agreed with another man come and see if we can find him, I think he is drinking somewhere\"  we went, and did not find him  the canvass was set on the vessel, and she set off  as we were walking down the town my owner gave me the papers, and two sovereigns  I said, \"Is the bill of lading with them?\"  he said, \"No; go as far as Greenwich, and there wait for orders, and let me know how you get on\"  when we got there I wrote to him, and received as answer, to apply to Mr. Carpenter for orders, at I should most likely find him on the market  I went and saw Mr. Butcher  I told him I had arrived with a cargo of wheat for him  he told me to get it on shore as quickly as possible  I got the vessel into the Creek, and the cargo discharged; and as I had drawn the 10l. before, and the owner not coming at the time, I thought I was justified in settling for the whole of the freight, as I have before drawn money on his account, and drawn bills on him, and never had a word of this sort before  I unfortunately got fresh, and lost 20l. of it  the Sunday morning I heard that a lusty gentleman in brown clothes was looking for me  I knew it was my owner, and I said, \"I must go as fast as I can to Wool Quay,\" and when I got to London-bridge I was taken."
, I bought the wheels and axletree of a man for 6s. coming over Blackfriars'-bridge, and brought them to Smithfield to sell  I left them while I went to have a pint of beer, and, when I came back I was taken.
. I positively deny my guilt  I rely on the improbability of the story told  is it likely I should proclaim my own disagree if I had been convicted; and does it seem probable I should take this woman to Somerset-house to get a letter, when it is notorious that the Post Offices is place to get letters of any kind?  she must labour under the most extraordinary delusion  she never saw me till ray second examination.
Previous to your leaving me were you not sitting with two unfortunate girls?
They have been bribed by the policeman  having no money or friends, I have to beg a patient hearing of an appeal to your mercy  I am placed in a situation of great embarrassment, but in courts of justice the character of witnesses should be considered  I rely on the improbability of having proclaimed that I had been transported  I went to the house to see an inmate, and saw a young man come out with something in his hand  the prosecutrix then came down, and said the person I wanted did not live there  I am innocent.
Did not you tell me, after I had my hearing, that you nor any other man could swear the mutton came out of the skin?
I went across a field called Spratt's field, and observed a dog at the hedge, gnawing this piece of mutton  I picked it up  I took my knife out, and stuck it in it, and it smelt a little, but not much  I thought that we might eat some of it  I looked further, and, in the hedge, found a sack  I took it up, and when I got to the end of the field, I chopped off what the dog had been gnawing, and took the rest home  I cannot say what day it was that I found it.
I intended to pay for them as soon as I could.
Did you ever receive any money from me without my giving You an account in writing?
I left Mr. Coombe's six weeks before he had me taken  I had been frequently to his warehouse, as he sent for me to give him particulars, and I was in hopes I should be able to give him this 20. to settle the business, but he had me taken on the 1st of February when I called here.
My prosecutor has sworn against me in a fictitious name  the name is Solomon Moses  it is a flaw in the indictment.
I intended to pay for them.
A young man called me to go to work on Monday morning  when I was getting up he took the shawl and went out and pawned it  I accused him of it, and he pitched me the ticket and ran awav.
Was the mare lame when you had her?
Did not I ask the man how long he had had her?
When I went to the Eagle, did not the little man say he would not sell her if he was not short of money, and that it was his brother's?
Should you know the receipt again if you saw it?
On the Friday morning Basset and the little man came to me, about nine or ten o'clock  they told me, if I would go to the White Horse Old Ford, they had got a mare they would sell me  I went and looked  they asked 10l. for her  I bid 9l. 10s.  they said they would not take it, and I went away  I thought they would let me have her, and I went to Bush and told him I thought I should buy her, and to clip her for me, as she was very rough  he said he would, and charged me 15s., which I paid him after he clipped her  when I went back, the little man, (who gave his name Simpson, I think,) said, if I liked to give 5s. more I should have her  I said I would not give him more, and after a little while, he said I should have her  I told him if he went home with me I would pay him, if he would give me a receipt  he said he had got a stamp in his pocket  he then wrote it out and went home with me, and I paid him  I have a witness named Pledger, who can prove I was at home on the Friday night it was stolen (receipt read)  \December 30th, 1836  Received of Mr. Bradfield the sum of 9l. 10s., for a chestnut mare, with all her faults  W. Simpson.\""
Did not you examine the chestnut mare?
I was coming by the shop, and saw a young man come out with the roll of cloth under his arm  he asked me to carry it, and had no sooner given it to me than the prosecutor rushed on me, and dragged me into the shop.
The policeman took the change out of my right hand.
The half-crown my little boy gave me  he took it for work  I took the shilling in change in selling things in the street.
A little boy who was going by took it, and threw it Down, and I caught it in my hand.
Did you hear me break the window?
I saw the window broken, and being put of employ, I was tempted to take them.
He must have lost sight of me in turning a corner.
I was passing up Mill-wall, and could not get across the water to go to my lodging  on returning back I saw the door open, and went towards it, and as I came by the shop the policeman called after me and I ran away  I could have got away from him altogether if I had wished, but when I dropped my hat I stopped to pick it up.
I leave it to your mercy.
you were talking to Mrs. Curtis and your brother at the time, and did not give me the receipt.
There was a woman sitting by your side.
I did not pledge it. I am innocent  he has taken a false oath.
I came to town on the Sunday morning for my clean linen, to a young woman I keep company with  I met a few friends, and drank more than I ought  I changed one note, and gave this young woman the remainder of the money, and thought to make up the money and take the bill as I went back  I had no intention to rob my master.
I was taking them to get a shilling or two, to get some medicine for my little one, who was ill.
I am innocent  I was brought back to the shop, but I had not the boots  I was two hundred yards from the shop before any one came after me  I was walking when they took me.
On the Tuesday, up at Hatton-garden, yourefused to swear tome, although persuaded so to Do  You took the book several times, and then would not swear  You were brought up on the Saturday, and then You would not swear till you were persuaded.
As I was going along, I saw the sack with the potatoes lying on the curb  I took it up, put it under my arm, and was walking gently on for the space of four hundred yards when the prosecutor tapped me on the shoulder  he asked what I bad got  I said, \I do not know\"  I went quietly back."
The gentleman came and accused me of stealing it  I am quite innocent  I never had it my hand.
I saw the board lying in the street  it was old and shattered  I thought I had as much right to it as any body, and thought to take it home for fire-wood.
We had a quartern and a half of gin at Mile-end gate, three of us; and then we drank more at another house.
It was done in a state of drunkenness.
I do not know any thing at all about it  he said if I got the watch, he would not hurt me  I said I knew nothing about it, I was not in the house at the time it was reported to have been stolen.
I had been over at a public-house drinking with two men  they handed me the beef, and told me to bring it over to the public-house for dinner.
I had been out of work some time  a person pawned it for me.
Was it light or dark?
That money I had in my shoe  at half-past eleven o'clock I took two duplicates, to get things out at Mr. Nicholls's, in Gray's Inn-lane  the shop was so full I left and went home  my landlord came up, and I put the money in my shoe, and in the morning I put it in the tail of my shirt, and changed a shilling to get some coffee  I gave the shilling to the short policeman  knowing I was going to the station-house I knew they would take my money from me, and I should have do victuals all day  there was 2s. 3d. in my shoe.
The vessel did not sail for three weeks after you went  I applied to your friends, and none could give me any information  I could not go out in the vessel, as it was not going for three weeks  Captain King said he would not take me with the luggage, as it was too much, and if I did not get off the quarter-deck, he would kick me off.
Colonel Kirby said he was going through France, that I must come by the Royal Tar, and I should not want much money  I received no wages, and was in distress  the last time I saw my master the gave me a 5 note, and I said it was not enough, as I had to pay 6l. to the glass-coachman  as soon as he arrived I sent to him; he acknowledged his faults, and gave me 6l., I gave him the duplicates, and he had me taken.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I caught hold of it to stop it from falling.
I was not sober at the time  I hardly knew what I said of what I did.
There were other boys as well as me  I never had them.
I did not see the boots  I was two yards away from them.
It was not me that took it from him, he pulled it off himself, and lent it to the other two boys to pledge.
It was Develin that wore it.
I said to him, \Will you lend me your jacket!\""
He said, \Yes, I will, if you will give me your knife\"  then Develin said \"Never mind, your waistcoat will do better,\" and he pulled off his waistcoat, and said he could lend that better than his jacket."
I was intoxicated, and did not know what I was doing  I was at the battle of Vittoria, and got a wound in my head.
That boy has had a warrant out against me for six weeks, and it is all spite.
The parcels were given to me at the corner of Sun-street by a young man who told me to come to the Flower-pot, in Bishopsgate-street, and he would pay me for my trouble.
What time did it happen?
I can prove I was at home about eight o'clock.
I was going along, another boy came and laid hold of the bacon, and threw it at my feet.
I picked it up, and was going to take it home  the witness ran into the public-house before I got in  I was going right past the house, but I did not know where it was.
The sovereigns were in my hand  it is my first offence  I hope you will forgive me.
Did you see any thing the matter with ray arm?
What dress had I on?
I met a man going up the New Road  he said, did I want to buy a spring and axletree  I said I knew a man who I thought would buy it  I went to this witness, and asked if he would buy it  he said he would; and I told the man if he would take them then they would buy them  he asked me to take them for him, and I did.
I did not take it  she sent for Charles Taylor, and he was pulling her about  she was tipsy.
Did not they ask you to have beer with them?
They are my own.
I am a general dealer. I bought these trowsers in Cutler-street, Houndsditch.
He did not swear to them before.
Where were you when I offered them to you?
you were so drunk you do not know who you bought them of  I saw you when you came to the beer-shop  I never had the knives at all.
I was in a state of intoxication  I do not know whether it was good or bad.
Were you not drinking with me half an hour before?
I did not make any resistance.
I exchanged a sovereign  I fell in company with a jew  we were drinking the whole of the day, and towards night he gave me six or seven shillings, saying, it was his Sabbath, and I was to take care of it, and what I expended out of his money he would give me  we were drinking together for a considerable time  I am perfectly aware that this man does make these things  I know where he lives, and what he is doing at this time, and it is merely malice that has placed me here  I think there is some connivance between them, or else they would not have been drinking at my expense  Barker and I got into conversation  he got quarrelling with me, and attempted to put his hands into my pocket  I thought I should be robbed, and it is generally the custom with me to swallow what money I have when I am in liquor.
I was not in the house that day at all.
I had no coat in my possession at all.
I bought them at Woolwich, for 2s.
When I first went to work for him, he came to me and said, I must make the most of the hay  he said some was worth 5l. a load, and some 4l. 10s. and said, \Perhaps you may get rid of two or three loads for me\"  a few days afterwards Mr. Willoughby asked if it was for sale  I said, \"Yes, at 5l.\"  he offered 4l. 10s., and to fetch it himself, which I agreed to."
I got into a coal wagon, and had my hands in my pocket  and when I got out I found I had lost the money.
I sold the hay openly  I can neither read nor write  I did not know but master would come there.
I met some comrades  we got drinking for some time  I was taken to some lodgings  I do not know where, being stupefied with drink  having been in the habit of pulling off my shirt at night, I, in my hurry next morning, put on one, not knowing whether it was mine or not.
She did not see me receipt it  I gave her the bread and a bill of 4s. 6d., and a bill delivered 2s. 3d.  I did not receive any money that day.
On the 19th of January I was in the employ of Mr. Scudds, at the Joiners' Arms, Camberwell  about half-past nine o'clock in the evening he brought this horse to me, and told me to take it to Mr. Heath, in the New-road, and ask him to let him put it up there for the night, and he dare say he should be there as soon as me  I asked Heath if Scudds had been there, and he said, \No\"  I told him what I had come for, and he told me to put it into the stable."
Did you not take the glass down for me, and help me outside with it, and lend me a hammer?
I took the glass to the Bricklayers' Arm  a lady gave me 18d. for taking it, and I put it on an omnibus, and she gave me 6d., for doing so.
I never said such a word  I went to sweep out the counting-house, and went for a scuttle of coals  and as I turned out, he called me back and said, \Where is that money you have taken?\"  I said, I had taken no money  he called in Mr. Hill, and he asked me  I said, I had not taken any  he told me I had better say it was me, and master would not do any thing to me  several more persons went into the counting-house besides me."
My brother was working there, and he called him to search my jacket, and when he found nothing, Hill pulled the two sovereigns out of his pocket, and showed them to my brother  that is all that I know there was nothing that I know of on the beam  I never said that I had never taken any but these.
Wood was not there.
There was a lad about my own size in the counting-house while I went to get the coals  I have worked for Mr. Woodcock seventeen or eighteen months, and never was accused of such a thing before  I have been entrusted with money and paying of bills.
Did I wrestle with you in the boat?
Three fellows met me and knocked me down in Peckham-fields  I hasted on to see for a policeman, but I did not find one till I got to the Dover-road  there is a public-house there  I met a policeman, but he was not on duty  I met several persons walking, but I thought it was of no use telling them  I was bruised on my side.
Were you aware that your employer had marked money previously?
On what business did I come?
When you returned was I in the shop?
When you left the shop was not I away?
I had them given to me in the street  I had just come out of a public-house when it was given to me  no sooner had I taken them from some young fellow, than the policeman took me  I had them in one lot and they separated them.
. I bought the things.
. I have a wife and four children, and am in the greatest distress, being out of employment seven months  on the day is question I went to the water-side, but could get no work, owing to the severity of the weather  I stood at the Flower Pot to get an honest sixpence  a man came up and asked me to carry the box for sixpence  I think he said to the Dolphin  I walked to the Flower Pot, and the prosecotrix came up and said it was her box  when the gentleman stopped me, I thought it was the gentleman who had employed me  I did not attempt to escape  I requested the policeman to allow me to carry the box further, as I might see the party who employed me  many persons assembled, and I walked deliberately to the watch-house.
I received the box from the man at the corner of Leadenhall street.
He said before the Lord Mayor that he did not sea me take it.
He said he wished he could have caught the man who put the tail-board down, and gave me the sheep.
. I was employed to carry the carcase of mutton to Whitechapel by a man I do not know, and had never seen before  I was in the habit of attending the market, not being able to procure employment at my own business  I had not got far with the mutton before the witness stopped me, and told me to take it back to where I got it from  I pointed to the man, and said, \That is the man I had it of.\""
I was forced to drop the sheep, and run after the man  I old the witness that was the man who had employed me to carry it, but he still held me  I am a total stranger in London, and belong to Liver-pool.
She saw me go out, and I had no cloak with me  I had been there two or three times before.
It is false, he keeps a bad house.
. I did give it to him, but I had it given to me by a young man in Stamford-street, who asked me to go and pawn it  I said no, I would not, but I knew somebody who would, and I took the clock to Vernon's house.
I plead guilty to this charge.
I was at Vernon's house all the day, as the coat was taken in the evening  I asked him to come out with me  I went to a house and bad no success there  I then went to York-road, and he stood outside while I brought the coat out  he afterwards met me and pawned it.
He got 12s. for it, and he bought a goose for his dinner, which he gave 6s. for, and had 1s. for pawning the coat.
You carried the goose and paid for it.
. I have nothing more to say than the note was not stolen by me.
I wish to recall my plea, as the prosecutor has promised to show me as much lenity as he could, if I do.
I hope for the mercy of the Court  I was driven to it by distress, and want of food for my wife and myself.
I left a good apron and cap with him  we live near together.
I have worn his coat to go Home in the evening.
I deny breaking the box open  there are fifty or sixty men sometimes in that room  I have taken a thing from that room to house with him.
I was coming from the pay-table, and had a drop too much  I took this and asked the price; he gave me no answer  I was going into the door, became out and said, \Go along, I don't want your cusdom; that is 8d. a pound\"  I beg for mercy."
No, I did not  Cowell asked me for the pork and I gave it him  I had 10s. coming to me that night, and when I got home I had but if.  I do not know whether I paid for it or not  I have a wife and five Children.
I was going up the street, and turned down the first turning to go to my lodgings  there was a cry of \Stop thief,\" and a boy ran past me, a person came out, and stopped me."
. I went to the prosecutor's shop and asked him about a situation  I had not been out of the shop three minutes, and turned the corner, before I heard the cry of \Stop thief P  a man came running by me, and dropped the cloth  I was running at the same time and a gentleman caught hold of me."
I found the watch which was taken from me up by the Mansion-house in the City  it was not me he saw do it  there were several there, and he picked me out from among them.
I found the watch in the street, and therefore thought it belonged to me.
Did anybody offer to rescue me?
This watch does not belong to the gentleman.
. I picked the watch up.
He was coming up Weller's-court  I had just come from work  I and two or three more were at play there  another shoved me against him, it knocked his cap off, and he ran away without it  I waited for him, and saw him on Sunday, and said to him, \Will you come down and fetch your cap, it is oh the dunghill.\""
He said to me, \You will catch it for it.\""
. I say now the same as I said at the station, house  I was merely playing  I knew the boy, and have often played with him in Ashby-street  I only did it out of a joke  he did not fall at all, and I called him back to have his cap.
Was you not playing with me about three days before?
. I went to the house on Saturday  I had half a pint of beer, and went to the water-closet, and met a person coming from there as I went down.
The only remark I wish to make is, that I should never have been placed in this situation, had it not been for James Duke, of No. 2, Davis-court, Chequer-alley  I was going down Chequer-alley, and me the woman who lives with him  she asked me to go and have some tea with her  when I went up, Duke drank a cup of tea and went our-then the woman asked me to take a walk with her  we went to Old-street, and there she gave me something to mind  not knowing what it was, I had the curiosity to look at it, and up came two policemen, and took me into custody  I was taken to the station-house and searched, and there they said that I went to a grocer's shop, which was false  the woman went that herself, and I do not know what she wanted there  this is the first time I was ever taken on such a charge  I hope you will have mercy on me.
He said he gave the half-crown to the policeman.
I was taken into custody on the 11th, for uttering a counter. feit half-crown, and remanded till the Tuesday  it was uttered at a public-house kept by Mr. Hawkins  I went there and had half a quartern of gin, for which I gave a half-crown  the boy ran out, and I was taken into custody  afterwards, a woman belonging to the green grocer's said that I had paid one bad half-crown to her on the 14th, when I was in custody, but she could not swear to me; but a little boy was standing there, he swore to me; it was a young man of the name of George Williams, and a young woman, and they had two months, and were fined 5l. for uttering  when I was remanded to the lock-up place Williams told me of it. GUILTY . Aged 22.  Confined One Year .
On the first examination she stated that I offered no crown but only the half-sovereign.
He said he was not positive that they came from my mouth  he saw them on the ground.
His back was towards me, he could not see them come from my mouth.
I was going to bite it to try if it was bad  I did not have it in my mouth.
In coming from the White Bear Tap he said to one of the witnesses, \I will make an Old Bailey job of this\"  the other said, \"Will you?\" \"Yes,\" says he  the witness said, \"How can you?\""
The crown-pieces never came from me as I am, here a living sinner  he picked them up while I was putting my boots on  he said, \Look here, what is here?\" and the other man said they came from my month  this witness is capable of swearing anything  if he gets his expenses this sessions, he will have somebody else next time."
. Those two crown-pieces never were about my person at all  the witness must have put them down on the floor, and swore that they came from my mouth  they were never in my possession at all, if I were on my death-bed this minute  my solicitor said the trial would not come on till Thursday, but I heard last night that I was to be tried, and then I could not write  I wanted to write to Mr. Moore, a boot-maker, in Ironmonger-row, near St. Luke's  I was with him eight yean nearly, I have left him nearly three years  I wanted to send for him and another witness  I was in liquor at the time  that made the witnesses take advantage of me, and produce the two crown-pieces.
I was coming up St. Andrew's-street, and this man came and said he saw me steal some pork  that is all I know of it.
I own I took it, and I told the policeman so  I wish to go to the Penitentiary  I have no friends.
You say ten minutes?
I was given to the policeman before I was taken to the shop at all.
I was taken to Portsoken Ward watch-house.
. I reside in \Whitechapel. I was going down the street, and before I got down to Petticoat-lane a boy said, \"I believe that is the man that stole the plates;\" and I was then taken to the watch-house and locked up; after being there half an hour, I was given to the policeman; and when I was taken to the shop the master of the shop said, \"Take him up, the boy shall attend on Monday;\" I was taken before the Magistrate, and remanded till the City officer came forward with the boy."
It was not me  the boy that was with me gave them in, and he gave me 4d. to carry them.
I said the man gave 6d., that I went and had a pint of porter, and then I had 4d.  I know nothing of them.
You say you followed me?
He stated that he went through several streets after me, and I was standing at my own door at seven o'clock.
Do not you think those skeleton-keys might have laid there at the time I lived there without my seeing them?
I did not take the property.
Did I not ask you to go to the butcher to prove that he did give it to me, and want to go and fetch the butcher?
. My mother died in child-bed, and my father died when I was nine years old  I was left to my grandfather  my grandmother died when I was about twelve years old, and my grandfather turned me out of doors  I was transported from here for seven years; but, through good behaviour, after four years I came home, and set up in business here  I lost my money by misfortune, and came to poverty, and had nothing to do but to utter base coin  I was sent to the House of Correction for that, and when I came out I was ill in Bartholomew's Hospital  I then had nothing to do but to utter base coin again  I hope you will have mercy on me.
It did not, it would hardly go on, it pinched me.
Were there three pair of boots?
There were three pairs of ladies' shoes,
. All I have to say is, I did not break into the place  I found the door open.
It was not me he saw run out of the shop.
He did not stop me-a man stopped me, and said I had taken the till  he said, \Here is the boy,\" and then the policeman took me back to the shop, and said, \"Here is the boy that has been taking your till\"  I said \"I don't know anything about it\"-a woman then came is, and said, \"Oh, you naughty boy, what made you do that? there is pleanty of bread about, if you wanted it\"  I said I did not want any thing."
. I was walking along, close by the garden, and picked up the cover just by a rickyard, about twenty yards form where they say it was lost.
It is twenty feet long, and four feet wide.
I asked what he wanted with me  I picked them up, going across the street.
I saw them in the street and picked them up, and was turning down the street, when this boy caught me  I asked him what he wanted me for  he took me and called a policeman  I told him I had picked them up.
I know nothing about the property  I do not know how it got to the place.
I was not near you when you gave your wife the money.
Did I receive any money from you?
I was not there on the day that the robbery was committed, nor after Tuesday at twelve o'clock  I was in liquor when I went from his house, and went home  I had been drinking at his house both Monday and Tuesday till twelve o'clock  the reason I did not finish the job was, the weather set in so bad. NOT GUILTY .
I did not make any observation, but delivered him the ticket and parcel as I had received it  I did not demand 1s. 6d.
I did not say it would have been there sooner  he said it was late in the evening, and I said I supposed it was through the bad state of the roads.
. I am a plumber by trade  in the beginning of last year I worked for Mr. Killett, of Reigate, who was in the habit of\\ send\\ ing parcels by the Brighton coach from there, of which Long Bill was the guard  I left there, and worked for Mr. Shepherd, of Long-acre  I was out of work at the time in question, and was coming down Ludgate-hill  I saw Long Bill standing there  I went and had a pint of ale with him  he said, \I can put a 1s. or so in your way, if you do not mind doing it\"  I said I should be very glad  he said, \"Meet me to-morrow morning, I am now guard to the Bath coach, having left the Brighton; I can give you a parcel to take out now and then, but you must not be seen in the yard, or the porter will know it, and you can take the porterage\"  I met him the following morning, and gave him this money, and he gave me the sixpence for the porterage  I delivered this and three or four more parcels, not knowing there was anything wrong."
Can you swear to me?
. I know nothing at all about it  I am innocent.
Greenwood says it was Smith and Fitzwater passed, and not me.
. I was running down the road to go home to warm myself, being very cold, and a gentleman stopped me  I asked him what he stopped me, for as I had not stolen any thing.
I did not tell you the man promised to meet me in Shoreditch, I said he was going with me to Shoreditch.
The other man walked off, and he never made any alarm after him, and I stopped.
He never attempted to stop him when I called out to him.
I called to him to come back, and said, \What are you going on so fast for?\""
. Last Saturday I came out of my father's house, about half-past nine o'clock in the morning  I went to Spitalfields to buy apples  the market was in a dreadful state, every thing was frozen  I bought nothing, but came out, and in Church-street met John Greenwood  he asked if I had anything to do  I said not  he said, \Will you do a job, to move a few things for me, I will give you a shilling?\"  I said, \"Where is it to go?\"  he said, \"Into Shoreditch: can you go now?\"  I went with him to Mr. Wiltshire's house and got the donkey and cart  Greenwood went with me to Hare-street-fields  he went in at the gate and brought out two iron bars wrapped in a shawl  he said it was only two bits of iron  he brought out the rest and said, \"Come on\"  when I had got about 200 yards this gentleman stopped me, and asked what I had got  I said, \"I believe iron\"  he said, \"I want you to accompany me to the station-house, and give a description of the person who has left you\"  I said, \"Very well,\" and went  the Inspector sent the donkey to the green-yard, and I was to go before the Magistrate  I was remanded, and came up again last Wednesday  the iron was wrapped up in different things."
Did you not say you could not swear to me?
Before the Magistrate she said that the was crying at the time, and hardly spoke to me  she did not know whether I was the person or not
How long were you in the same yard with me?
My duty was on the stage.
When Sym came in it was only a fortnight previous to my discharge, and these letters which have been produced must have been written previous to that, as she had been in London, and called upon him  he did not come till the beginning of November, and I was discharged on the 13th.
I lived with Mr. Parker for eleven years, and had a good character  I did not move this sugar at all  I never touched it  it was not in my apron.
I was coming up and going home, and my master called me into the shop  I had not seen the sugar when he told me of it.
I said I got it from a man of the name of Simms, who asked me to go with it to Shoe-lane, Holborn  I was going by Ball's-pond with my knott  a man called me, and said, \Master, do you want a job?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he said, \"If you take this, I will give you a half crown\"  he helped me up and I was going  I met the policeman, who stopped me."
I had not his jacket on my back
I had not the jacket on.
It is false.
He came and knocked at the door, and told me to open the door.
The man brought it up, and was gone down two or three minutes before you came.
I went up stairs at half-past eleven o'clock.
It was outside the room, on an old table.
It was a man that stopped me, not the policeman  I did not take the bundle.
I never had it in my possession at all.
I was coming home from over the water, where I had been to my uncle's  I went down Dacre-street, when a man stopped me, and gave me to the policeman  I had not these things in my hand at all.
Did you see it in my hand?
It is quite false  I was crossing, and heard the cry of \Stop thief,\" and I turned back directly."
It is quite false  the gentleman said, \Come back with me,\" I came back, and there was no such thing there  there were a lot of tradesmen at work, who said they had not seen it  the foreman was there, and he denied any handkerchief being thrown over."
I said, \Come back, if I threw it over, it must be there now\"  he took me where the workmen were, and they said that no handkerchief had come over there."
I was going down Newman-passage, at half-past twelve o'clock that Sunday night, and these laid against the wall  I took them up, and in going home the officer met me and took me with them.
He said if I gave up the duplicate, he would go and compromise the matter.
I pleaded guilty before the Magistrate  I have declined to bring any one to speak to my character, as it would be hurtful to their feelings  I throw myself on the mercy of the Court  I have been in great distress, and was in liquor at the time.
I did not tell him I came from anybody.
I did not ask for the bottles in Mr. Campbell's name  the servant told me she was glad to get rid of them.
. I was going by, and had occasion to go down the turning  I saw something lying, I took it up, it was this  I walked up the street  I offered no resistance when I was taken  I have not had power to send to my friends.
What time did I hire it?
Was it to move or fetch a bedstead?
How often have you been in custody?
State the precise words.
. An article hired for the purpose of going from one place to another does not amount to felony, if disposed of on the road  the hiring being from Paddington to Grosvenor-place, and the sale being on the road, would be a breach of trust, not a felony.
Where was I?
How was it possible for you to see round the corner?
. I was walking down the street  two men ran past me; and a butcher's man ran and collared me  when the last witness came they took me to the shop and charged me with the meat, which I knew nothing of.
. I was going to look after work, and could get none  I was going along, and heard the cry of \Stop thief,\" and I looked to see who it was  a butcher boy came and caught hold of me, and they said I had stolen the till, but I had not."
Three or four months previous to the time you say you were robbed, did not you lodge some money in the Bank?
Were you not tried about fourteen months ago in this Court, for stealing a handkerchief?
Was I sober?
. On the evening Mrs. Hayward was robbed, she asked me to mind her place  I said I would stop if she was not long; but she stopped longer than I thought she would.
I told her I would stop if she was not long  she did not come, and I fastened up the room door, and the hall door, and put the outside door on the latch, that she might open it  I slept at Hammersmith that night  I get my living by recitations at public houses, and generally go down in the summer into the country.
I was only paying my lodging by the night, and could go away at any time.
What do you know me by?
She said in her deposition that I was the length of one street from her, and that she could not swear to me  I should like to hear it read.
The policeman said I was walking behind him in a narrow street about five or ten minutes before the job was done; and the woman and man say I could not have passed them in the street without their seeing me  the prosecutor was as tipsy as he well could be.
The policeman said I was walking close behind the prosecutor.
I have used the house two or three weeks, ever since I have been out of employment.
. I was coming past, and heard the cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran along, with about twenty or thirty more, and sang out the same as they did, and the policeman stopped me  as for doing the deed, I did not  I came home in the Caroline about two months ago, and have been out of work ever since, but I did not do this  when the prosecutor came to the station-house, he said he could not tell it was me till they pressed him to say it was me."
It was impossible for you to see me take this out of my pocket  it was hanging to my button when I went into the room  I did not want any one to see it, and I was determined to hide it a moment till I got an opportunity of getting to the parcel which it belonged to, and I had no opportunity of doing so  when I went to ray breakfast I thought to get back in time to put it with the silk  I had no occasion to take it out of my trowsers pocket, which I must have undone my apron to do, and put it into my handkerchief, and put it into my coat pocket, when a man was there, who was likely to go to my coat pocket as well as me  I only went to my coat pocket for a bit of tobacco  I would have returned it as soon is I could.
I was coming along, and picked it up  I thought to take it borne and throw it on the bed  the witness and the officer came and took me.
He struck me, and tore my coat.
I told him I bought the handkerchief.
. I know no more about the coat than the inkstand here  I bought the handkerchief three months ago, and wore it at Sheerness, where I came from  I belonged to a twenty-eight gun ship  I had three weeks' leave to visit my parents  I got in liquor, and having got to Deptford, I would not come to town, fearing to be taken up for intoxication  I had some porter, and half an ounce of tobacco  a young man came up to me and said, \Are you going to sea?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he said, \"Here is an article I am going to part with, and have but a shilling to take me on my road to the country, it will be of service to you,\" and I gave the man 16s. for a coat  I lost my way coming out of Deptford, and asked the policeman to show me the way to the Navy Arms, which is near where the coat was taken from  as to the handkerchief round my neck, the man that wove that might weave hundreds  I bought it three months ago  the snuff-box was given me by one of my shipmates, on board the Carlisle, at Sheerness."
. I told him I bought the coat of a man going into the country for employ  I had but 1s. 6d., and that it was not sufficient to pay my lodging  I thought I would leave it in pawn till I came back.
I did not know that they were bad.
Did you see me take the shawl?
I bought the shawl of a cab-man.
Did you ever send me to pledge any type for you?
Did you send me with a boy, with some type, into Drury-lane?
Had I been there before?
. The prosecutor several times employed me to pawn his type and paper  I have pledged a whole work for him  he has said, at different times, \I am short of money, can you tell how I can make some, to sell some paper, or do any thing?\"  on one occasion, when he sent me to pawn type, I told him I could not carry it  he told me to hire a truck, and to pawn his composing stick to pay for the truck, which I did, for 1s.  I then hired the boy and the truck  I was three weeks in his service  one week he gave me 4s., another 8s., and the next week nothing at all  I had the key of the premises, and when I wanted type, I went to fetch it."
Did you not state that you passed me, and then came back and took me?
I went to see a relation of mine who was not at home  I went to the King's Arms, and had two or three pints of beer  I went up the town and met the wagons  when I came back this gentleman met me and charged me with taking the soap, but I had none on me  I knew nothing of it.
I left my mother's to get some twist, and going up Half Moon-alley, I saw the door open, and the lead lying in the back of the passage  I took it up, and thinking it was of no use, I went to go home to my mother, who is a breeches-maker  I have worked for her ever since I was eight years old  I never was in trouble before.
I never was in trouble before in my life  my father was sick of a fever.
A man called me and asked me if I wanted a job  I said \Yes\"  he gave me the sheep to carry to Water-lane  the butcher came and said I stole it  I did not know it was stolen  I could not see the man that gave it me to carry."
On the day in question there were four different sets of men working on the premises at the same time  I was laying 200lbs. weight of new lead on the lower skylight for Mr. Stevens, the builder  the foreman of the plumbers and the female came round, and found this lead in my basket  I swore to the basket, and said to the woman, \If you swear to me, I will serve you out\"  I meant to enter an action against her for false swearing."
I was there from half-past five o'clock to eleven o'clock  I went back to ease myself  I could not bring them through the house with-out their seeing me  I came out, and was going home  I had no pots at all on me.
I deny it  I worked for Mr. Lucas, a chemist and druggist in the Poultry, for two years and a half.
I went into his shop for two sacks for Mr. Ward-two of the women came out and said Mr. Birch was not at home; I went to the Jolly Ostlers, and there Mr. Birch came and took me.
I went to the water-closet, and Mr. Ward did not see me near the dung.
I know nothing about the handkerchief  I went for the sacks, and then they came and took me.
I was passing by, and saw two boys standing there  thebutcher came out, and they threw the chopper down  the butcher followed me as I was running, and went by them  they went another way.
What do you swear to me by?
I was never near the house at all.
All I have to say is, I was coming by at the time there was a cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran as well as other people  I could not see anybody a-head of me, and made a full-stop  the witness immediately collared me, and the prosecutor collared both of us till the police-man came up."
He was present when the coat was taken out of the street, where two boys had thrown it down.
He was in custody the day previous, for pawning two pairs of his master's boots.
On the Monday morning, when I was going to my work, and came to look for some tools, they were missing  I said to him, \Have you been taking my tools again?\" (he had before pawned them for 9d.) I said, \"I cannot go to work\"  he said, \"Well, I will go and get them\"  he went down stairs, and at that time took the duplicate and the papers, and went to the pawnbroker's, to try to get more money on the coat, but could not  he then went to the prosecutor's, to extort money from him, at he said it would be a pity to destroy them  the prosecutor detained him, and found the duplicate of the coat on him, and he now throws it all on my back."
We had two keys to fit one barn, and when I came from one to the other barn I lost one key in among the dung.
You say you put the second shilling into the till?
Did not a person come with a shilling's worth of half-pence?
Will you swear you did not give the one I gave you to the young woman?
You say on the 18th I came to your shop, what day was that?
Will you swear it was the 18th?
Could no one go to that place but yourself?
On the evening of the 31st of July I went to Islington, to see a friend  I changed a five-shilling piece at the Peacock, and two of the shillings I took proved to be bad  the one I offered at the tobacco-shop proved bad  I threw that away  on the 18th I was not near the shop.
What did you do with the shilling?
What did you do with the shilling?
When I came in you were not in the shop.
I asked the young man for the coffee, and threw down the shilling  the man took it up, and said it was bad, and said to Another shopman, \Go, tell Mr. Brodribb to come out\"  he came out, and said, \"Fetch a policeman,\" and the policeman said I was known."
The day I was taken at Woolwich, I had been to Gravesend to sell some penny publications  I was returning home, and asked for a penny bun  the woman said the shilling was a bad one  I said I was sorry, and offered to pay for the bun  I was taken, but being discharged, I went to my father, who gave me a half-crown  I went to Mr. Watchorn's, at the Marsh-gate, and had a pint of porter, and they gave me change for the half-crown  I went to the Hambro'-wharf, and then was going home  I thought I would take home the coffee, and then I was taken, which is all I know about it.
I was going to seek for employment, when the man came and took me in the field.
Was I in your shop?
I was in Worship-street yesterday, and the woman said she did not know me in the station.
The shilling I offered Mr. Russel I took that morning  I never was in the woman's shop at all.
The four loaves were joined together.
My Lord and Gentlemen  I have served seven years with Mr. Andrews  I then went into business, but did not succeed  I have worked at the Docks, and being in a state of starvation, was reduced to do what has brought me here.
I knew the woman where I went in  she asked me to have some breakfast; and when I went there, another boy was in the room; and after I had done breakfast, this boy and the officer came up  the boy said that I took the sacks, but I know nothing of them  they were there before I got there.
I met this gentleman at Mile-end turnpike, and went home with him  he was very much intoxicated  I had very little candle and no fire  when he sat down he said he would have something to drink  I went for a pot of porter, some tobacco and a pipe  he went on the bed, and after he got up he said he should like to have a drop of gin  I said I should like a drop too  I went for some gin and a candle
I never took the weight, nor ever saw it. GUILTY .* Aged 13.  Transported for Seven Years .
What can you swear to me by?
Can you swear that is the same half-crown you received?
You say before you took it up you knew it was bad, because you knew the parties  can you swear that I practised such things?
I know nothing at all of the first piece of money  I am as innocent as yourselves  I offered the other piece, but did not know it was bad  when Mrs. Costin came to Bow-street, she said she could not swear to me.
Which hand did I reach across the counter with?
I am a cripple with my right arm, and wag not able to resell across.
Used anybody else to visit at the house as well as me?
I was employed by Mrs. Devanney to pawn the spoons, and her daughter sent me to do it  Mrs. Devanney has absconded since the last two hearings I have had.
I got them in the same manner as the others, by the girl's mother  about a week before Christmas I went to Mrs. Devanney's house in Monmouth-street, to sell a book, and while there a man came and offered a silver fork for sale, for 10s.  she bid him 7s.  he took the money, and went away  I went the following day to see if the book I sold her was gone, and she employed me to go to the pawnbroker with her daughter, saying if I would go, she would give me what the book sold for my trouble  I went in three or four times at her request, and she paid me for my troubled.
I went up at the side of the buildings  the desk was tied in a handkerchief, underneath a lamp-post, and I picked it up.
I have been laid up under the doctor's hand, and it was poverty brought me to do what I have done  I have no parents.
I was coming across Soho-square, and picked it up  I was going home, and met the officer, who stopped me  I told him that I had a piece of printed cotton, that I picked up.
The pots were in the street  I was going to take them home as soon as I had been to another place.
I bought the saw of Henry Petersham  I gave him 1s. for it  he is dead and buried  being out of work all the winter, I pawned it.
The pawnbroker said it was pawned before dinner, and I pawned it at a quarter before twelve o'clock.
The witness said she only saw me take one, and now she says six or seven.
I do most solemnly declare that I am entirely innocent of the robbery, or any knowledge of it  I was in the road, and saw a lad running with a bundle in the direction of Globe-lane, but I knew nothing of it.
I mean not to deny having the halfpence, but I did not mean to steal them  I went on Saturday night to a butter-atop, and the shopkeeper asked me for 10s. worth of halfpence  I put the 10s. he gave me into the till, and meant to take the halfpence to him on Sunday morning  I went down into the kitchen, and saw this toy among the knives  I took it up, and put it with the halfpence into my box.
My master had a six years' character with me from my last place  if the cheesemonger had been here, he would have proved the truth of what I say.
I and another one were going into a public-house to have a pint of beer, when a man tapped the other one on the shoulder, and asked if he wanted to buy a hat  he made no answer  I said, \Let us look at it; what do you want for it?\"  he asked him 2s. 6d.  he had not sufficient money  I lent him some, and, going along the street, I got this girl to go and pawn it to pay me."
I do not wish to say more than is in that paper.
That is what I told him, and that is the truth.
I said no such thing  I said as the things were lost in my mother's place, she would make them good.
They were my own things-one was a waistcoat, which I have on now  I purchased it back with a jacket.
I bought the hat of a Jew, in Oxford-street.
I have no more to say, but it is my hat  I bought it in South Audley-street, on Saturday evening, after I had been at work at the Earl of Clarendon's, beating carpets.
I did not say I had taken it at all.
I had been in the house on Sunday morning at service time, and drank more than I should; and between the morning and afternoon services, I went out to assist the groom, and went to lay down there  the groom pushed me out of the stable, and if I had had a bottle he would have broken it  I then went to another stable where many people go-the door was always open  I went to lie down there in the stall, and the wine laid there  I laid down on it I did not know whether it was wine or beer  I was in the act of drawing out the cork, but I did not do it.
Did you not come up to me, and accuse me of stealing a waistcoat  I said-\What have I stolen?\"-another young man came up, you looked about, and said, \"There is the waistcoat,\" and left me to the other man-you found the waistcoat on the pavement."
I was going along, the man came and accused me of stealing the waistcoat, and he picked it up off the pavement  there were more persons there beside me.
I was coming down St. John-street-road, looking after some work  I saw two men in the cart, and one at the side of the truck  I was coming by  they asked me to help them to get the bales into the truck  I did so, and got one bale into the truck, and we took it up Rawstorne-place, and put it in there  I went and took the other one in the truck-we went on to the corner of Rawstome-place, and they said, \Stop and have a drop of beer\"  the officer came and took me instead of the rest  they ran off."
I had a bag that night, because a man lent it me to bring home the fowls.
The carpet bag I do not know anything about  but the man Jones, that I bought the ten fowls of, lent it me, at half-past five o'clock in the evening  I gave no such name as Thomas Jones  I said the man I bought the poultry of was Jones  I never denied my name  my name is Griffiths  I have every reason to believe the man gave me a wrong address  I never was a thief.
I never received the money for the bill, and never put the name on the bill, as I cannot write  my master knows I cannot.
I borrowed it for two hours, and before I had it an hour and a half, it was taken from me by the policeman  I refused to give it up, saying I had borrowed it for two hours.
Did I offer it for sale in your presence?
I never beard anything about a sovereign being asked.
I borrowed the truck for a certain time  they should have waited till that time was up.
I took the salt, but received no money for it  I delivered the bill, but tore the receipt off it.
I was going down the street, somebody hallooed \Stop thief,\" and a person laid hold of me till the mob came up. GUILTY .* Aged 20.  Confined Six Months ."
What time was it when you saw me come out?
Did you not say I was not the person?
Did not the witness say I was not the person?
Did he not say it was between four and five o'clock when I went out with the bundle under ray arm?
I was on parade at four o'clock, and I came off about ten minutes or a quarter past four o'clock  I went into the Monmouth Head  there was a soldier and two women  he had this pair of shoes  he said, \Do you want a pair of shoes?\"  I said, \"I don't care, I will give you a pot of beer for them\"  he took it  I put them into my handkerchief, and came out to Leicester-square, and who should meet me there but the policeman and the prosecutor."
The other soldier was at Queen-square, but he is not here  his name was Braham.
I was hired to carry them, and being out of work I was glad to earn a trifle  the man told me if I was stopped to say I had some shavings  when the officer came to me I put them down at his feet  I did not throw them at him  I did not say I got my living by stealing, but by carrying things.
I picked it up in the road.
When I got out of the chair I chucked the cloak across the spoon  and did I not pick it off the ground, and put it on the shelf?  you said, \This is one of Mr. Ball's spoons\"  I said, \"Is it?\"  and did I offer to touch it again  I said, \"You had better put it into your pocket\""
There was every thing moved to the second floor  there was nothing left on the first floor but some broken bottles.
I was employed as watchman at night, and on this Wednesday, about half-past five o'clock in the morning, I went up stairs, where the boy lay, and called him up  he asked me to leave the candle  I did, and came down into the second floor, and sat there with my brother-in-law  we then went to give the horses some water and victuals  in the meantime, this boy washed up the tea-things  we came back, knocked at the door, and this boy let us in  I sat down in the chair  I had got a wood-frock, a pair of trowsers, and an apron on  I lighted my pipe at a quarter to seven o'clock  at a quarter past seven o'clock I got up to go to ray breakfast; and when I got up, I caught hold of the cloak, and then something fell  I thought it was my key  I felt in my pocket, and said, \No, here is my key\"  I then picked up the spoon, and laid it on a bag of halfpence  the boy took it down, held it to the light, and said, \"It is one of Mr. Ball's best silver spoons; I will put it into my pocket and deliver it to his when he comes\"  I said, \"That is the best way\"  I went to breakfast, and when I came back, Mr. Ball charged me with wanting to take some of his property, and said he could not think of employing me, I might go home  I asked him to pay me for what I had done  he said he could not think of that  I said I should get a summons  he said I might if I could  I went and got a summons; and on the 19th Mr. Ball attended, and made his statement  the Magistrate said he must not cheat me out of my money, and told him to pay me  when I got down, he wanted to shuffle me out of 3s.  there was 18s. Coming to me  he wanted to pay me off with 15s., but he paid me 18s.  he then said, \"I shall give you into custody for felony\"  I said, \"Very well\"  I came into the passage, and gave my wife the 18s.  there was one of the G division there  the prosecutor said to him, \"Are you on duty?\"  he said, \"No\"  he said, \"I want to give charge of this man;\" and he took me  they stood waiting about, but did not go to appear against me that day  I suppose on account of not going before the same Magistrate as they had seen that day  I was locked up all night, and on Saturday I had my hearing, and was remanded for a week  then they made up a story against me  the boy has stated three times as much now as he did then  he never said a word about moving my feet at all  I had three hearings, and then the Magistrate did not know what to do about discharging me."
I was walking along the square, and saw these things  I did not know who they belonged to  I took them up, and somebody cried \Stop thief.\""
It was given into my hand by some person  I do not know who.
The box was not covered at all.
Did not I tell you I bought the articles in Petticoat-lane in open market?
When he asked me for the key I could not find it, and asked my wife for it  there was nothing near the box, and I told him to break it open  my wife kept the key  I bought the things in open market where anybody can buy  nobody has a better character than I have  I am as innocent of it as any man in the world  there is a fair held in Petticoat-lane in the afternoon  all strangers go there, and pawnbrokers' goods are brought there for sale.
It is the first time  I hope you will have mercy on me, and I will never come here again.
You gave it to me without any writing.
It is not a cow-yard, but a field of about three acres  I went through that place frequently.
Was I in the house?
I was at work at some houses for my brother, which were going through repair, and from there I got them  we had to pull to pieces some of the old sashes to repair others with.
Another gunner gave me the boots to go and sell them  I had 1d., and he was to have 2s.
I was going along the street, and picked them up in a gateway.
I am sorry for what I have done, and will never do it again  I have been selling pies about, and doing what I could.
When I was examined, I brought two witnesses, to shot where I was, but they would not hear them.
I never was in Mr. Tyrrell's shop at all.
The female is telling a great falsity  she says she had 19s. 6d. and the officer says she had 18s. 6d.
The conviction was five years ago.
It was not me that took it.
A person was walking behind the gentleman, in a smock frock  he threw the handkerchief down  I was picking it up to give to the gentleman, when he caught hold of me, and gave me into custody.
The trowsers laid outside  anybody might pick them up  I had been to Deptford, looking for some work  I saw them on the ground, picked them up, and sent a young man who was with me to tell the prosecutor of it, he ran after me, and said I had taken them.
He is totally mistaken in the man  I was at a public-house in Kent-street at the time.
You went to my mother, and told her, you believed you had put your hand on the person who took the butter.
I gave Daggett-court, where I did live.
I was in a public-house in Kent-street, at the time the man says the butter was stolen  I have sent several times to the witnesses, but they cannot leave  I ought to have Mr. Henderson, of No. 2, Old Bailey, here as a witness to character  I am not the man  the witness had another man at the Town Hall, who wore much the same dress as I had, but he was discharged.
The morning I was taken I went to look for work, and saw a man near a wagon  he said, \Do you want a trouser? will you have a drop of beer?\"  I said, \"I don't know\"  he said, \"Drink it\"  he said, \"Go to Humphrey's tap\"  I went there, and while I was drinking gin, the man came in and gave me in charge."
I was going to Kingston after some work, and found the lead on the common, lying between the furze  I looked at it, threw it down, and went on to Kingston  I came back, took it up, and the officer came and took me with it.
I said I picked it up.
You asked me where I got this shilling, I said I picked it up, and I gave you three shillings more  in going along I told you I picked them all up.
I picked them up in Tooley-street. I then went to this shop to buy a quartern loaf  I gave the girl 1s.  she looked at it, and went to her mother, who came out  I told her I picked it up  I did not say I got it from my master  the policeman came to the door and took me  I told him  I picked it up  I did not know it was bad.
Did not I take it out, and give it to you myself?
I was employed there three weeks, carrying skins from one warehouse to another  I tore this skin from the bundle in passing, carrying a load, and put it into my pocket till I could go and tie it on the bundle again  before I could do so this young man came to me  I was not aware what he meant by having something on me, and said, \Yes, I have got my knife\"  I put my hand into my pocket, and gave him the skin and the knife."
I saw the handkerchief have in the doorway  I came to see who hope it, and the gentleman accused me of it.
I have no friends  I should take it as a particular favour if you would send me out of the country.
I was walking behind the gentleman and two or three more, but never saw the handkerchief.
I had been with my mother, selling blacking, till ten o'clock  there was a mad bull running  I ran after it  two boys dropped the handkerchief, and the gentleman said it was me.
When I was first taken, the prosecutor said he had lost a shilling; but when no shilling was found on me, be said it was sixpences  he said nothing about the knife till it was found.
I went with Courtney, and another young man, to the Robin Hood  he bought the knife of me for 9d. and a pot of beer  we tossed for four or five quarterns of rum, and, in stooping for a halfpenny I broke my thumb nail  I asked him to lend me the knife to cut it  he did, and I put it into my pocket  we tossed for more rum  he put his hand into his pocket, and said, \That is the last shilling I have,\" and paid for it  we laid down to get sober  I fell asleep, and pitched, head foremost, down  the witness came up, hearing me fall, and said, \"Oh, you rogue, you want to pick Courtney's pocket\"  I said I did not, but I had stumbled over the stool  she brought up two or three men, and charged me with robbing Courtney  I asked him if he had lost any thing  he felt, and said he had not lost any thing  the witness said, \"Feel again, for this young man was trying to pick your pocket\"  he felt again, and said, \"Yes, I had a shilling, which is gone,\" and said, \"Give me the shilling\"  I said I had no shilling belonging to him  he said I had, and was going to strip to fight me for it  when I came down stairs, three or four of them pushed me out of the house  the officer said, I had better go, and sit down at the cook's shop, and get sober  I came out of there in a few mintues, and saw Courtney and two policemen at the corner  I went up to speak to them, and he gave me in charge."
Was it not your duty when I took you change for 2l. to give me two sovereigns?
He paid me two sovereigns and a sixpence.
Did you not say on the morning I was brought up for examination, that if I or my friends would pay you the money you would forego the prosecution?
You heard the prosecutor make this proposition?
I saw a boy chuck the handkerchiefs in at the gate, and run across the fields.
Did not one of you try to choke me?
What did you recover in all?
Another boy came by me, and dropped them close by me.
I did not have the bed  there was a mob round me, and the lad came up, but you were two minutes before you came up. Wittness. He kicked at the lad behind, and made a spring forward  I caught him in a minute.
I was coming by the theatre  a lot of ladies and gentlemen were coming out, and this gentleman accused me of stealing his handkerchief  he looked in my hands, and opened my waistcoat, but found nothing  he then looked among the people, and found something, and the officer came and took me.
My father knows I was at home and in bed, and if he had known what time my trial would come on he would have been here.
A boy was running, and dropped them  I took them up, and asked the prosecutor if they were his.
I never touched the till.
The bar-maid was trying to do all she could to injure me, by placing money in different parts of the house, to entrap me  I did not go to the till  the bar-maid came down first  she most have taken it out of the till, and put it on the counter to entrap me.
I said I wanted a piece of silver wire.
I took up the silver wire, and put it on the board, not in my pocket  I suppose it got knocked down.
I was in the shop about five minutes, and asked if you wanted wood  you said, \No\"  I went into the next shop  there was nobody there, and you came and said to me, \"Did you see any young man running by?\"  I said, \"Yes,\" I ran after him, and the gentleman took me."
I had half a sovereign, eight shillings, and two sixpences in my pocket  they did not take that from me  I put this money into my mouth as I was running, because I had got holes in some of my pockets.
I found them on the lobby, and they were in my room three weeks before he came to lodge in the house  he has got no mark on then  they will not fit him.
I work for Mr. Hilliyard, and was out delivering medicines  on coming along the Strand I heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" and the officer picked me out among the crowd  I had not been twenty minutes from Lord Glenelg's when I was taken."
The policeman stopped me, and asked what I had got  I said, \Nothing\"  he said, \"Go about your business;\" and when I was going, he picked up the bundle and ran after me  he asked me where I got it, and I said I did not have it."
How do you know me?
I was at home that evening from seven till tea o'clock with my mother  she was in court to-day, and could prove it.
I met a man of the name of Clark, with whom I am acquainted  we went to a public-house, and he gave me the pistol to pawn, u he said he had to go to a book sale, and wanted to raise some money  I took it to a place where I was well known, and when asked the address I said I believed it was No. 10, Wardour-street.
I did not take them  they were given to me by a strange man in the market.
I had been drinking for four or five hours previously, and was intoxicated.
Did you see me on the 6th of March?
I was returning from over the water  I heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran down the lane, and two men laid hold of me."
I saw two boys go and take the pork  they began to run, and this man took me  I am innocent.
Did you not accompany me to the gate, and say you had no cash in your pocket, or you would go home with me?
When you accompanied me from Blackfriars-road, on the Monday morning, did yon not go to the Spread Eagle, to inquire for the things?
Did I not say I had no money, and you said if I could get the parcel, there were a few things in it that I could get some money on, to go to the Mogul singing-room?
I was out of employ and in distress.
I never went behind the counter  I got the money on the counter.
It was real distress  I had been seeking employ for the last six days.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Is the note in the same state as I delivered it to you?
When Mr. Jarvis took me, coming along I told him how I came by the mutton, who was with me, and every thing  I think it very hard, I am here alone by myself, one man killed it, and he is not taken  I told them where to find the other person  four sheep have been lost since Christmas  it was impossible for me, my wife, and two children to eat them alone  six were taken last winter  I told Jarvis who the parties were  I think they are worse than I am.
When I came in, what did you do?
I only went with one half-crown, and that was for the stockings.
Do you recollect when I had the half-pint of porter on the Saturday evening, that I put a shilling down, and another man put down one?
I called for halff-print of beer, and put down a shilling, a man asked for two sixpences for a shilling, he put down his shilling, and she put them both together.
You took the shilling and put it into the till, and pulled out a sixpence, and then you took a shilling out, and threw down for your son.
I did not know whether the shillings were good or bad.
I gave him the same two shillings he gave me.
I never put my hands near my mouth.
There was only one in the Mansion-house when the waiter first came  I was there an hour by myself  I am taken for another man that there is a reward for the apprehension of  there are plenty of officers who know the party that did wrong this man  I am innocent.
Was there no one else in the yard?
I was taken very bad when I got to the yard  a young man went into the water-closet, and when he came out I went in  it was dark  I did not see any one else  the servant said she saw my hand take the plates  it must have been the hand of some other person.
My mother and myself met the prosecutor that evening  my mother asked him for charity, and he knocked her down  we then walked to the corner of Camden-street  he took out his handkerchief twice, and put into his pocket again, and then he took it out a third time, and said I had had it, and gave me in charge.
I went in for a halfpennyworth of milk  I had 4d. in my hand which I had pawned something to get.
The pawnbroker gave me the half-crown.
I was in distress  I intended to redeem them  Mrs. Lane said she would forgive me if I told her..
I pawned it, being Saturday  I did not think it was particular to go home that night  I did it to make up a sovereign I lost, for fear I should be turned away.
Did you find any house-breaking implements upon me?
On the night in question a party came to my house about half-past one o'clock, and wanted me to take care of some think and to meet them by the Angel at a quarter past three o'clock  ther brought me the articles in question, which I was stopped with  the reason he gave why they did not take them himself, was that they were known to the police about there, and one was in the watch and clock line himself  I did not, I must conscientiously say, ask whether the property was honestly come by, but took it  at the last examination I gave a letter to the Magistrate, and told him the whole truth  he asked if I wished the letter to be brought to the Court, and I said I did wish it to be shown to the Judge  I told the policeman the name of the person who gave me the property.
I found it on the road side.
I was by a public house door  a man came, and said if I would pawn them he would give me some beer.
A footman turned round a corner and fell over this and cut his face  he told me to take it up and carry it home.
I pledged the clothes, but intended to return them  he said he would give me time to get them back.
I was the last person in the room that morning, not being very well  he found his box open in the evening, but I knew nothing about it.
Did not you agree to take it of me as I could pay you?
I received very little wages from him  I forgot what he owed me, and could not summons him for it, and left him  he afterwards came and got me to work for him again, and gave me 1s. of what he owed me  I left him again in about a month  he met me one Saturday morning, and asked if I was out of work  I said yes  he said if I came down on Monday morning he would give me a job, which I did and worked till Wednesday morning  he gave me 10s. 6d. to get iron for him, and I kept it for my back wages.
What time was it?
I left work at seven o'clock, and went to the Hope beer-shop  I remained there till half-past ten o'clock  I then went to the Green Man at Shackelwell, and picked up the ham at the corner of Kingsland-green.
Who did you receive the half-crown from?
Had you a man that worked for you with black whiskers?
That man met me in the morning, and said he would give me 1s. to fetch the coat and waistcoat  I found the leggings on the stairs.
I was in great distress.
Having a wife and family at home, literally starving, I certainly did take them  I am very sorry for it.
I was in great distress, and on Good Friday I met a man who asked me to carry these for sale  I did, and got 6d. for them  I returned with the money, and received only 2d. for my trouble.
I told you I took it from him, and gave it him before I left the house.
I did take it out of his pocket, as I had been drinking with him all day  it was my brother took it from him afterwards.
How do you know the shawl?
Who called you to come up?
Marshall picked me up in the street, and took me home  I was very drunk, and was sick all about the place, and my clothes were all unbuttoned  I missed my money, and said I would give her in charge  she buttoned my clothes up, and what she put there I don't know  I came down stairs, not knowing I had any thing about me, and walked out  this young woman came to me, and I stood talking to her till they brought a policeman, which I should not have done if I had been guilty  I was stupidly drunk, and did not know I had the shawl.
I was running towards my home when the police-man pounced on me, and knocked me down, although I declared, my innocence.
You said at the station-house you lost sight of me?
I went down the yard for a necessary purpose, and the gentleman came to take me  I was actually doing up my things when he took me  I said I would walk willingly wherever he took me.
I picked them up in a lane.
I took the coat as a pattern round to the trade  Green went with me  I stood outside, while he took it into shops, and then he went away with it  the letter I never wrote nor sent  I never pawned the coat.
My brother gave me the jacket  I went into the shop, and the gentleman took me  I said I would get my brother, I went out three yards, and then came back with the jacket under my arm.
I saw a boy and a woman running, calling, \Stop thief\"  I did not throw any coppers away."
Do you state that I took the cloth, tied it in my hand-kerchief, and went to the door?
I said I had a half-sovereign and a half-crown.
I had a little portion of a tunic coat in the bundle, and I wanted to make a pair of towsers to match it for my own child, and to match some waistcoats  he said he had not got it  my little coat was then lying on the pieces of cloth. I took the coat and tied it up in my bundle  he was looking at me all the time  it is not likely I should take any thing else  I had not stepped beyond the threshold of the door  he took me and told a young man to fetch a policeman  I said, \For what?\"  he said. \"If you don't know what is your own, I will tell you\"  I said, \"I have nothing but what I paid for\"  I did not say, \"I will pay you\"  he selected this from a quantity of pieces, and I said, \"If you are so inclined, why not take the first piece that comes to hand?\"  that note was put into my hand one day in the street."
I told you I picked it up in the railway  I found it cut there, and took it.
I went to work, and met with this bit of pipe in the railway, and I took it up.
I was returning home that day, and seeing the coat, I thought I could make a trifle of it, to make up my things, which I had lost  I was half groggy at the time.
I did it from perfect hunger and distress  I had not had a morsel of food for two days  I had been for two nights on the bridges of London.
Have you got any account of the money you paid me?
Did I not accompany you to Kemsden, and to Shoreham, and serve ejectments?
Have you never authorised me to use your name?
You know there is an application about being made to the Court this term, on account of your allowing unqualified men to use your name.
Ought not that to have come on the Friday night?
How far did I take them?
I was engaged by a wine-merchant's porter with a truck  he gave me 1s. 6d. to help him draw it  he stopped near Mr. Bull's house  took a basket off and said, \Go to that house, as I come back I will call for you and take the bottles\"  I went, and he gave me six dozen and four bottles  I rolled them to the door-post  I could not carry them  Mr. Bull then gave me into custody  he acknowledged at the office that his wife told him that two men came with a truck while he was giving me into custody."
I was coming from llford, on the other side of the road  two boys ran by me, nearly knocked me down with the boots, and chucked them inside the public-house.
I picked it off the ground  I did not take it from the gentleman.
I picked the handkerchief up, when he caught hold of my collar, and said, \You are the chap I have been looking for.\""
A lad sent me to sell it out of the market, and said he would give me two pence  I went to Woolfe  I met a boy going there about a coat, and went in with him-Woolfe offered me sixpence for the cap  I did not sell it to him.
Did I not see you at the Marquis of Granby public-house the first thing that morning, having a glass of rum-and-water?
Did I not say he asked me for some of it again?
Did I not tell you I had 18d. of my own?
I went up the gateway, and the gentleman came and said, \Have yon stolen any thing?\" I said, \"No\"  he took me op the gateway and found the boot."
Did you not say at the office you could not swear to me?
The nails in the shoes could not make any Impression  they are so worn.
I was going to my master's house on Saturday evening, to see if I might return to work, as he had discharged me  I passed the Eight Bells, and as I came back, about one o'clock, I met a young sailor chap, with a book and other things in his hand  he asked me to buy it  I gave him 18d. for the book, and 3d. for a snuff-box  we went into a public-house, and had a pint of four penny ale  on the Sunday morning he met me, and said he would sell me the duplicate of a handkerchief  I said I did not wish to have it  I met him again on Monday morning, and bought the ticket of him  I gave him 1s. 3d. to get it out, and wore it, and afterwards he gave me the gloves.
I had only come out of the country on Saturday evening  I had spent the Sunday with a friend  as I came home I saw the smallest box lying down in the middle of Thurlow-street, and about six yards from it was the work-box  I tied them in my handkerchief, and the gentleman came up and took me.
I was out of work and in great distress.
I called for half a pound of boiled beef.
I was almost starved, I was two days without food  I saw the handkerchief hanging out of the pocket, and I was tempted to take it.
I met a man I knew by sight, and told him I was going after a situation  he said there was nothing vacant  we came along together, and in Basinghall-street he said, \There is a hat on the top of a box, if I fetch it, will you take it?\"  I said I would not, and went on, leaving him  he came after me down Fore-street, and put it into my hand."
I was coming along  this gentleman laid hold of me, and said, \Did you see any body at my pocket?\"  I said, \"No.\""
I know nothing at all about them.
I bought them for 3s., of a man who appeared a sailor  I was going to sell them.
I took it off the ground.
I picked it up on the pavement, against a herring shop.
Mr. Manning has taken two pieces of copper off himself, and brought them here  I was coming from work and saw a man looking out of a window  I said, \What do you want here.?\"  he said, \"Come and look here\"  I said, \"What is there to look at?\"  he said, \"Here is some copper, get up and just see where they have been taking it off\"  I had not been up six minutes before he came  I was not lying in the gutter  the houses are all to pieces, and are to be taken down."
I was going up the street, and a person asked if I would buy them.
He took my place at Mr. Aitzell's, in Crawford-place, when I left.
How far did you go before you missed your money?
How far did you go with your friend before you missed your money?
On the night before I met with a groom, he asked if I was a smith or a shoemaker  I said no, I was a wine-cooper  he said he knew of some bottles to sell  he took me to the area and counted them out  he heard a noise  he pushed me over the basket, and told me to run away.
I intended to pay the money  I went to my brother's to get it, and send it by his servant.
I did not throw it down.
I paid my mistress the 1l. 2s. 2 1/2 d.
Was it moonlight?
Did you not state that I took it on my left shoulder?
Another man, who is a noted thief, threw it on my shoulder  I was rather intoxicated  he then turned back, and said he would hold me.
Who had hold of me?
The pawnbroker asked me what I thought it was worth  I said the man I had it of gave twenty-five guineas for it, and he bought the gun, and made the apparatus.
I was going to Barnet, and met a man with these tools, I bought them of him.
I only took them to feed my horses on the road  I never sold any of hit property.
I went on board a ship to see a captain, and was told to come again at three o'clock  I saw this coat laying by the door  I took it up to take it to the gatekeeper  the witness called out  I turned my head and be matched it from my arm.
How many times have you seen me write
Are you confident it was all sovereigns I had in the bag?
Could the door be shut close without locking?
Do you recollect calling at my house the morning before?
During the noise you heard, were the kicks against the door or on the floor?
You state I was leaning over the prosecutor  what was I doing?
Were you present when the policeman examined Mr. Harley's throat?
Were you present when he related what had happened?
On the night in question I went to the prosecutor's house about a quarter before eight o'clock  the door was opened by the prosecutor, who desired me to walk in, and he shut the door after me  I told him I had come to pay three weeks' rent  he asked for the rent-book, which I gave him, and he entered the sum in it  I took a sovereign from my waistcoat pocket, and laid it on the counter  when he had done writing in the book he gave it me back  we then entered into conversation, which was by my requesting him, should he hear of a better situation than I had, to let me know  he said he would, if he heard of anything  I thanked him and said, \If you give me 2s. 6d. it will make it right\"  he put his hand into his pocket, took out 3s. 6d., and laid 2s. 6d. on the counter  before I had time to take the money up I saw him raise one hand to the pit of his stomach and exclaim. \"O my God!\"  he seemed to stagger, as if about to fall  I moved to the end of the counter, and as he was falling caught him in my arms  his weight being too much for me we both fell together  I was well aware his niece was living with him, and called to her, and at the same time stamped on the floor  this I did while I was wiping the spittle from his mouth, as he was foaming  I was raising him up, and at that time the candle went out, the door was burst open, and Etheridge ran up exclaiming, \"What is the matter? who are you?\"  I turned round and replied, \"Why, it's me\"  he said, \"Who are you?\"  I said, \"Why, Jones, you know me very well\"  he said, \"Is that you, Jones? what is the matter?\"  I said, \"Why, Mr. Harley is in a fit\"  the witness took hold of one arm, while I did the other  the prosecutor being raised on his legs, looked wildly round for some seconds  there were not less than twenty or thirty people in the shop  he walked into the side-parlour with assistance  he was not carried in in a state of insensibility  we seated him in a chair, and after the lapse of about ten minutes, to my surprise he accused me of having ill-treated him  among those who came into the shop was the, policeman, who took me into custody  I requested him, in presence of several in the shop, to examine the prosecutor's neck, which he did, but could not perceive the least mark or sign of violence  had I used the force by driving my knuckles into his throat, as he stated, surely some marks would have been left, but there were none  one of the persons in the shop said,\"Here is half-a-crown on the counter,\" and Mr. Newell, who was present, inquired of the prosecutor what had become of the sovereign which he had stated in the presence of several I had laid down on the counter  he replied he had not got the sovereign  he searched his pockets, but could not find any sovereign  a general search was made by a dozen persons in and about the shop, but the sovereign was not to be found  now, full twenty minutes had elapsed before this search, during which time the shop had been full of persons going in and out, any one of whom might easily have taken the sovereign  somebody present insinuated that perhaps I had taken the sovereign up again  I requested the policeman to search me  he said if I wished it he would  he did so, assisted by another policeman who had arrived, but they found no money on me, the sovereign in question being the only coin I had left home with, and that was brought to pay my rent  the prosecutor had called at my house on Monday morning for the rent, and my wife had told him I would call on Tuesday evening and pay him  he was well aware I was coming  the graze on the forehead I can only account for by the fall, but the blood from his lips was occasioned by his biting them, when on the ground  I deny any blood coming from his nose  they also state he was carried in a state of insensibility from where they first saw him to the little room  this is wrong  he walked merely by the assistance of myself and Etheridge, having hold of an arm each  as to the hammer, I solemnly declare I know nothing whatever about it  it does not belong to me, and never was in my possession  had it belonged to me I had the opportunity of putting it away, as I was not given in charge for at least a quarter of an hour or twenty minutes, during which time the door remained open for anybody to enter or go out  I could have gone away entirely if inclined, but relying on my innocence I certainly rendered all die assistance I could to the prosecutor  I solemnly declare I never used the least violence to him  I am utterly at a loss to account for his statement to-day, which is untrue."
Had I any bundle when I went out?
How long is it ago that I gave her the dress?
What quantity of silk is there?
How do you know the coat?
The prosecutrix says I took the lodgings on the 7th of March, but I know nothing of her or her house  I bought the gown at Machin and Debenham's sale rooms, about the 20th of February  the brooch at Solomon's, a jeweller in the Strand for 4s. 6d., on the 27th of February, and the coat at Machin and Debenham's on the 27th of February, for 1l. 7s. 6d.  I took the gown out of pawn thirteen months ago in Great Russell-street  the boots I had on the 3rd of November  I had pawned a pair of boots at Wassell's for 3s., I went to take them out, they could not find them, and gave me that pair by mistake  as to the other property, I know nothing about it.
He did not go away till after eleven o'clock  he staid there to fight a man named Emmett.
He was quarrelling with my father all the week, five of them all together  he got up and offered to fight my father before this occurred, and a man was striking my father  the prosecutor got up to take that man's part, and my father says he struck him.
I was on my knees  I did not make a push at the man.
These men were on my father all the night  Webster came up to fight him, and Hawkins with him, and was taking his part  Hawkins wanted to fight my father, and Webster too  Hawkins struck me on the head, and I hit him in my own defence  whether I struck him with the knife I cannot say.
I would have settled it with my master if he would have taken ten shillings a-week  I was tipsy, and whether I had it stolen or lost it I am not able to say.
I was with three or four other men, we were all tipsy  one of them put something into my pocket  in a quarter of an hour after, I was standing at the corner of the street  the shopman and master came and taxed me with stealing a fowl.
I overtook a man, we walked a short distance together  I heard something squeak in the sack which he had  he said it was an old hen and chickens, and he would sell them  I bought them of him for 3s. 6d.  I had nothing to put them in  he said if I would give him 1s. more he would lend me the sack, and I might leave it at the Greyhound, and he would leave the shilling.
I saw them on the step of the door, took them up, and put them into my apron, but did not know they belonged to the prosecutor.
I was not there at all.
I saw a man and a little boy talking together  the boy had a model of a ship, and when I came up he asked if I wished to purchase it  he said it was his father's  I bought it of him for 1s.
I had orders to call again on my master, and as it was wet, I put on the coat, intending to return it the next morning, which is commonly done.
I lost the sovereign and did not like to go home, so I spent the other five shillings.
I was coming over the wooden bridge, and this policeman came, and said I had stolen some iron  I had not seen it, and had no apron on.
I only took one, the other fell down.
I had nothing to live on.
I had no money in my pocket  the shoes were on the pavement outside the door.
I was passing, and saw this bundle lying down  there was a piece of meat inside the stays  I offered the stays for sale, and was going to take the meat home  I told the officer so.
I was returning home, and a man in a smock-frock gave me this cheese to carry, and said he would give me 5d.
I did not know it was bad  the prosecutrix said that on the 15th somebody had passed a bad half-crown, and on the 17th her husband bad taken another  the one I had I had taken the evening before  I am sorry I have been convicted here, and had twelve months' imprisonment; but since then I have done my best to recover my character.
What the boy states is quite false  I was not in the house the first time.
I could not pull them out of my pocket  if I did, why did not you pick them up.
I know nothing of the money.
You were shoving me along, I was obliged to fall  I asked you to let me walk steady, and you said, if I was restless you would break my b  y head with your staff
I went to look for employment  in coming home I picked them up, and put them into my mouth  I met a man who told me of a job on the Croydon railroad  I asked a young man the way there, and the officers took me.
I left the House of Correction  I was destitute of friends and money  all that night I wandered about, and the next morning I pawned the silk handkerchief off my neck, on that I lived till that day, and then I was forced to do what I did  my character is lost through my own folly undoubtedly.
found the knife, and being out of employ, I went to ask the person to purchase it.
I was intoxicated, and was accused of this  if it is true, they must have been placed there by some girl for a joke.
Mr. Thompson sent me for it.
Two men who lodge where I do, asked me to go to work with them, and lent me the tool.
Could I go into the house without being noticed?
I bought them of a Jew, or a German, and gave 15s. for them  I told the policeman so.
When the girl came to my lodging she told my wife I had a white hat, a blue coat, and blue trowsers, and at the office she said I had a brown coat.
Why not come forward on Saturday before Mr. Hoskins?
Mr. Hoskins let me out on my own bail until Saturday, and when I went to Mr. Priddle's house, I was seized by the policeman, who gave these boys money to come forward.
On Thursday I went out about eight o'clock in the morning  I had no white hat on; I had a green coat, light trowsers, and a black hat, which I have a witness to prove  I never had whiskers  I always shave them off on Sunday morning.
I know nothing at all about it  I saw people running  some man stopped me  I was going to meet a friend.
I had no idea of making away with the money, but a man asked me to come and have something to drink with him, and I got tipsy.
I stopped at a pump to wash my hands  as I stepped away a man ran by me  Gallimore called out, and I stopped to see what he wanted.
I saw the prosecutor looking through the telescope  he said I put my hand into his pocket, and ran away with it  I did not, for he had it in his hand at the time, and it was never out of his hand.
A boy took it and chucked it down at my feet.
He told me to take them to the turnpike, and wait there till he came.
I did not say I had done it  I was passing the dead-wall, where several people were passing  I saw the handkerchief on the curb-stone  I and the gentleman who told the prosecutor both stooped to take it up  I got it first  the prosecutor took me to the station-house, and said his handkerchief was marked, but it is not
He left me and another man together  two women came in  I did not leave till half-past six o'clock, and then went to get a pint of beer.
I went out to get a pint of beer  I met a man, and carried his bed for him  he gave me the money which I had.
the dog brought the shirt, and the officer took it from his mouth.
This is not the iron I sold her  it was some old hoops which I gave 2d. for.
When I work any where we have perquisites.
I can prove that I had the money when I came from home.
Another young lad lodged in the house.
I met him coming along Whitechapel  he had known me eight or ten months  he began sparring, and knocked my hat off, and said, \Will you have a drop of rum?\"  he took me in, and gave me two glasses of rum and two pints of beer  he began sparring, and the landlord said, \"Go out\"  we did, and as we were going up George-yard, he took me by the collar, and gave charge of me  the money was my own."
I have bought left-off things repeatedly of him, and he had this to sell, as he wanted to buy cloth for a great coat  it was to be 2l.  I was to get what I could over for myself  I intended to pay him when I saw him.
What was I to give for the coats?
I purchased them in the way of business  I paid him one sovereign the day I had them, and was to pay for them when I sold them.
Did I receive the money at all?
I am very sorry, I have a wife and family in the workhouse.
Unfortunately I committed the error six months since  when discharged I could obtain no employment, I was starving about the streets  the inspector has known me for years  I have two children.
This man went down the yard to fetch six baskets of wine from St. Katherine Docks  he went round to opposite the Flower-pot, in Bishopsgate-street, and then said he should not want me any more, and I left.
I met a person by the door of the house, who asked me to go in and have some beer  he said, \Lay hold of this basket, and here is a penny, get half-a-pint of beer\"  I went in  he did not come, and as I was going this witness said I had got a pot in my hat  I went back, and said, \"Is not the pot there?\""
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I have had it by me four or five years  I worked for Mr. Oldacre  a man named Rowe bought this crow-bar at his sale, amongst a lot of rubbish  I bought it of him for a gallon of beer, and took it to my father, and had it there some time, we had a few words, and he told me to take my things, and I then sold it to Mr. Sibley.
I had been driving a horse to Romford, and I bought these.
I was going to Seven Oaks the next day  I was going by New Cross, and saw the bundle in the road  there were some other things found the next day in a field.
I was very much in liquor  if I took them, it was unknown to me.
I was going to leave Mr. Morgan that night  I met some persons and got drinking  at the battle of Copenhagen, I got knocked down the main-hold of the Monmouth, and got an injury in my head, and when I have drink I am not conscious of what I do  I never saw these things at all  I left my bundle at the Coburgh public-house, it had not these things in it then, and how they got in I cannot tell.
A boy came up, and said he would give me 2d. if I would go down and get some coals  I went down, and a boy put the bag on my shoulder  he told me to take them to the public-house  I was not on the barge, only alongside.
I took the glass off the box, placed it on the settle, and was replacing the box in the window, when some of them fell out  he came and caught hold of me  he was sitting with his back to me, and says he saw me take the box out of the window  I had merely taken it out to look at them, and was replacing it at the time.
I was going to look for work, and being rather behind-hand, I ran  I stopped when I heard the cry  he took me and another boy back to the shop, and let us go  we went away, and he came and took me again.
You live behind my house, and two doors from it?
The wound in her leg she had had four or five years.
As I was coming along a lad named Mike Coleman called me  be is always living in the prosecutor's house  he asked me to carry that frame for him  I said yes, and coming into George-street he went another way  he was at the house the same night before the girls went to bed  he was always there along with them, and he had a key of the door  he got in and took it  he told me so  that he had a key of the back-door and the room-door, and there were no bolts on the door at all.
I did not have it at all.
I am innocent  I believe there is a prejudice between the witness and me  he wrote to my master at one time, and asked to come back to work, and then I was discharged  I was then sent for again, and he left altogether.
It is the first time I did it.
What was your reason for not asking for a receipt?
Did I keep a disbursement-book in your office?
The prosecutor said at the office, it was five minutes before one  he hit me on the side of the head, and knocked my cap off.
I was walking up Ludgate-hill, and picked it up  a man came out of a shop and swore that I took it out of the prosecutor's pocket.
On the 20th of March I went to Field-lane to buy a handkerchief  I looked out two white ones, one silk and the other cambric; and the name being on the corner of one, he said I should have the two for 3s. it is the third shop from Holborn; I am in the habit of buying in Field-lane.
I picked it up in the road.
I was passing the Thatched-house, and there were a quantity of persons running  I ran and picked this up  the prosecutor came up and said it was his.
I was very much in liquor.
I heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" and was running after the person  the policeman stopped me in turning the corner."
He accused another man first.
Did you mark it yourself?
He could not swear to them at first
My father and mother both told him that I did do it in the house.
My mother knows I was at home the night the robbery was committed, and my brother went with me to purchase the soles to put on the boots.
I should like to know when and where you knew me?
As I was passing from Whitechapel to Gracechurch-street, a young man met me whom I had seen before, but I did not know him  he said, \Are you in want of a job?\"  I said, \"I don't mind doing one\"  he said, \"I am going to a place with this bundle, but I don't wish to go to the house myself, you will very much oblige me by taking it to the house, which I will show you\"  we walked a few yards, he called a cab, I got with him into the cab, and the inspector stopped me in getting out  the man said he would pay me for my trouble  no one can say they saw me near the prosecutor's  my family are respectable, and I did not wish to disgrace them by letting them know of this."
I came up Old-street  a man asked me whether I would carry this for him to Mr. Lufkins's in Aldersgate-street  I came to the prosecutor's shop, which was the first one I came to, and this girl came to the door  I asked her if Mr. Lufkin lived there, she said no  I went out, and asked several persons if they knew the name, they said, no  I came back, passed the shop to go to the person who gave me the bag, and the policeman stopped me.
When you first heard the door open, did you come up?
I did not take them; it was another man.
I did not take it.
What was my general character during the time I was in your employment?
You say all the things I had are entered here, how do you know that?
On the 5th of October, 1839, did you sell me a memorandum book?
Have you been in the Navy?
Did I not say I hoped you would bring them forward here?
Might any thing improper have occurred on those occasions?
Are you quite sure it was my box?
Can you read?
That watch belongs to me  I bought it and paid for it  it was made in Liverpool, as the witness says  I had two watches  if I could put my case back, I could call witnesses to prove it.
I am very sorry  I never thought of doing any such thing  it was not my wish  he was always peeking at me, and calling me bad names  he said he would knock me down  I got up, he struck me, and we knocked one another down.
What door was it at?
I gave you another shilling  I only had 2 shillings  I told you to let me look at that  you said if I was not off, you would give me in charge, and I thought I had better go.
I changed a half-crown for my breakfast in the Vauxhall-road  I gave Mr. Bull a shilling  he said it was bad  I said it was more than I was aware of, and asked him to let me look at it  he said \No, I shall detain it\"  I gave him another shilling  he gave me a sixpence, a fourpenny piece, and a penny."
I was in Thames-street, a man asked me to go and get a piece of cord to tie up come thing, and he would give me half  crown for half a day's work  he gave me the crown piece  I went and asked for a small rope-be said he had not got one  he said he could cat me one  I was considering how long to have it  I told him about twelve yards  he cut it me  I took the halfpence out to give him the crown piece  he said it was a bad one  I said I would go back to the man I had it of.
I did not pawn it, and he said at the office he did not think it was me.
How long is it since the watch has been given up to the policeman?
I was at the Norfolk Arms public-house, on, I think, the 18th of November  there was a young man there named William Black, and another called Deaf Harry, and Lee the waiter with them  Black asked me if I would pawn a watch for him, saying his brother was in trouble, and he wanted 30s., to get a solicitor for him  I said, \They won't lend 30s.\"  he said, \"Get what you can; but if you say Charles Glass sent it by you, as you have pawned things for him before, very likely they will lend it you\"  I said I would go and see what they would lend on it  I went and asked for 1l. on it  they said they could buy them for 18s.  I said it was for Glass, and he lend me 1l.  I went to the Norfolk Arms, and gave the money to Black  they deducted some halfpence for the ticket  about a month after, James said to me, \"You will be in a fine mess; you pawned a watch in Compton-street\"  I said, \"I know who I pawned it for\"  I afterwards met Deaf Harry, and said, \"I understand the watch I pawned for Black, when you and he came to the Norfolk Arms, is stolen property\"  he said, \"I will come forward, and state that Black gave you the watch, at any time\"  I told the officer so, but do not know whether he has been able to find him."
I believe you employed Lee the waiter once?
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
A butcher was standing by the cart, and he told me to carry the mutton to the bottom of the street.
I found the bundle just outside the public-house door, and I brought it in; I showed it to the landlord, and said, \Is this jour candlestick?\" He said, \"No\" I took it into the tap-room, and could not get any body to own it; I then tried to sell it."
How far was you from the door when you saw a person give me the boots?
I met a person who used to work for my father; I asked if he had got any work; he said, \Yes, up here,\" meaning up Lamb's Conduit-street; I went with him; he walked into the shop, came out, and put the boots into my arms, and said, \"Run\"  the prosecutor came out, and said, \"Stop him;\" I threw the boots towards the prosecutor; I had no idea that they were stolen; I did not run away with them."
I was playing at skittles on Monday afternoon  there was rather a queer lot there, who got laughing at us  I was intoxicated, and while my coat was on the form, they put this pot into my pocket.
How do you know me?
A man in Portugal-street gave it me to carry for him, he told me to follow him to Holborn, and wait at a public-house for him.
I was going for my mother's washing, and picked the handkerchief up  I never said any such word as prigged  I saw the other one running across the bridge, but no one stopped him.
I was going down Drury-lane; I did not touch the gentleman's pocket.
I am as innocent as a child unborn; I only saw it on the table in the tap-room.
I had had too much to drink, and as I was going along the street the board projected over the pavement  I ran against it, and knocked it, but as to my hands, I never had them near the bacon.
I took the coat, with a promise to take it back the next day.
How far was I from the shop when you overtook me?
I received the bacon from a woman I lived with in Spain, and who robbed me of my money and all  I accidentally met her in a public-house  she had this basket and the bacon in it  she asked if I had any dinner for Sunday  I said no, and she gave me the basket and bacon  she was intoxicated, and afterwards regretted she had given it me, and said, \Let me have it back again\"  I said, \"No\"  she said, \"If you don't, I will be revenged on you some way or other\"  I said, \"Do your best,\" and went out of the public-house with it, and ran as fast as I could, without the least idea that the bacon was stolen  I believe the very woman that gave me the bacon gave the prosecutor the information."
I have been paralyzed two years, and have not been right in my head, and have been subject to do such things as that.
The gentleman asked me to take his watch, to get some money on it; I did so, and as I was returning to tell him I could not get any thing on it he met me.
When you gave me the stock and bit out of the basket, are you sure they were not in the basket?
When I took them out of the basket, it was all on the same day we were drinking; White had a share of the money in drink.
I went to Greenwich to look for work; I had change for a half-sovereign at a house where I stopped for the evening; I cannot give any account of these sixpences, only I took them at the house where I changed the half-sovereign; I should not have offered them if I had known it.
I purchased it of a person that came to my shop, where I sell carpenters' tools, and other things; I asked what he wanted for it, and he said, 1s.; I gave it him; and, wanting some money, I pawned it at Mr. Beck's, in Blackfriars'-road, for 6d.
I was coming from my aunt's, and met a lad who I asked the nearest way to Cheapside; as we were coming down Fleet-street a horse had fallen, and there was a mob; all at once the lad left me, and I was charged with this; I did not touch the handkerchief.
I took the handkerchief off the ground, and gave it to the gentleman directly he asked me for it.
On the 17th of June I called at the tobacco docks to see a friend. I was taken ill, and had occasion to search for a place  the only place I could find was between some hogsheads  when I was coming from there, a person asked what I was doing  I said I was taken bad  he said that would not do, and tried to collar me  I ran, thinking he could indict me for a nuisance  I know nothing about the tobacco, and never handled any.
I have no recollection, of it.
I was coming from the Docks, where I had been to see if I could get any thing to do; he never saw me take the handkerchief; I did no such thing; I had no man with me..
I had only come from Portsmouth on Friday  after walking about all day I had no where to go to, having no friends in London  I saw a man at the door of a public-house who took me up into this room, and I fell asleep directly  this was about half-past nine o'clock  he told me to stop in the room till became to me.
I was running along, and heard a cry of\ Stop thief,\" and the gentleman caught hold of me  he did not see me take the boots."
How might I be standing at the time I took the handkerchief?
It is false  he did not see me  I was looking for employ, and stopped to see the election  I went to where the prosecutor was standing  when a move was made I came away, and the gentleman laid hold of me  I asked what he wanted  he said, \Never mind\"  he stooped down and picked up the handkerchief."
He asked what I had been doing  I said \Nothing\"  he said, \"Why did you pull them down?\"  I said, \"I never pulled them down.\""
He said at the office I was twelve yards from the shop before he saw me.
Being in want of money I took them on shore, but meant to take them back next morning.
I met a young man, who asked me where I was going; I said, \Home;\" there were two others with him who were strangers to me; when we got opposite the shop a young man brought out the parcel, and gave it to the person I was speaking to."
What time was this?
I was in the place ten minutes waiting for a policeman, and he could not tell what was missed  he said, \Take him down to the station, and I will come and say what is lost\"  and when he came there, he said it was a little box  my father lives close by the prosecutor, and I pass his house twenty times a day."
What do you know the copper by?
You will not take the oaths of such a set as these, they will swear any thing.
I was intoxicated at the time; a man told me to come for the things; he wrapped them up for me; I stood inside the cup-board; he then told me to stand outside the room door; he gave me the things while the man was in bed; he told me to put on the pilot-coat, and to meet him in Covent-garden.
I never had the till on my head.
Were you sober?
Did either of them say what money there was in the purse?
They had then counted what was in the purse and what was on the floor  the officer had told them what was on me, and then they could tell  there was 10s. found on the floor, and 2s. on me  the prosecutor has trusted me in his shop, when no one was there.
I offended my friends by an early marriage, and have been in great distress.
I did not pawn them.
I know nothing about it  I did not put it in  I have come away every Sunday morning, and was never stopped in the street before.
The book is mine; I bought it six months ago.
You put it in the till with a lot more.
I know nothing about them.
When you turned, was not I nine yards from you?
Last Tuesday I saw the prosecutor's brother come out of the house with the saw under his arm  he said he was going to get it sharpened  he asked me to come with him  I said I could not.
I bought them of her for 11s., and was to pay 7s., and the rest on Saturday; I offered her 7s., and she would not take it.
On Wednesday evening last I was drinking at a public-house in Oxford-street; when I came out, a person respectably dressed came out with me. I went towards Marylebone; he was going in that direction. I told him I was going to High-street. He asked if I would pledge the watch for him. I said it was a thing I did not like to do, and asked what he wanted on it; he said, thirty shillings, and I might have the ring if I pledged the watch. I took it to Mr. Walker's. He asked where I got it; I said, \I bought it nine months ago at Savory's, on Cornhill, for four guineas.\""
About twelve o'clock at night I was at my brother's, in the Kingsland-road; my brother came and told roe my wife was very bad; as I came under the railway arch, I kicked against this bundle; the policeman stopped me, and asked me, as I was running home, where I was going; I said I was going home to see my wife, who was very poorly; he asked where I came from; I told him.
I was there at four o'clock in the morning; there was no one in the place.
I was beaten.
I had slept there two nights; I was looking for two chaps; I said, if they would wait, I would open the door, but they kicked the door right at the top of my face; I took up the tongs, and they took them from me; I did not want these things; I have got a ship, and will go to sea.
I informed the officer where I bought the handkerchief  he has not been about it  he said it was my duty, not his.
I was at Mr. Chittenden's on the 18th, and had two half-pints of beer, I was backwards and forwards there between then and the time he gave me in charge  I did not pawn the candlestick.
I acknowledge taking the iron; I have a wife afflicted with blindness, and two small children, and was out of employ, or I should not have done it.
I did not take it.
I had been out of work for five weeks, and distress drove me to do it.
I was not there five minutes  I picked the handkerchief up.
I saw them lying down, and picked them up.
If you saw me, why did not you stop me?
From half-past eight till a quarter after nine o'clock I was with my father and brother, drinking at the Rose public-house, and then I went straight home.
You told me you did not let trucks to strangers, and refused to let me have it unless I left money on it, which I had not got.
I had no money, and walked away without the truck; she said she did not lend them out to strangers without leaving 1s. on it; and I did not have it.
I did not take them.
I never said so, I never opened my mouth.
. I know nothing about it.
. I met a man the previous evening; he said he could often put me in the way of a job to earn 6d.; he told me to meet him next morning in Queen-street; he said he worked at an ironmonger's; I went, and he gave me these irons; I went on with them as he told me; I heard a cry of \Stop thief;\" I looked, and saw the policeman running after me; I dropped the irons, and tried to make my escape."
Do you mean to say you saw me take them?
. On Saturday I was in Fresh Wharf  two gentlemen asked me to take it to the coach-stand in Cheapside, and they would give me 1s.  I took it, and they went off  I do not know who they were, but I have since heard they were regular cart robbers.
. On Thursday morning I met my brother in Threadneedle-street  he asked if I wanted a job  I said I did not care  he took me down Ironmonger-lane way, and said, \Wait here till I come back\"  I waited  he came, and gave me these things, and said, \"Take them home\"  I asked where he lived, as I had not seen him for a good bit before  he said, \"At No. 2,\" or \"No. 16, Old Street-road,\" and as I was going along the policeman stopped me."
I did not tell him I was a housekeeper.
I hope you will pass as light a sentence as possible on me.
. I was coming along Leadenhall-street; there was a mob running; they hallooed out \Stop thief,\" and I ran as well as others; that is all I know about it; the man collared me."
You told me not to come back unless I brought goods or money.
I got into a cart, and broke five or six of them, and was not to come back till I sold the whole; he told me to get goods or money for them; he had no license for selling goods.
I saw a boy pick the gentleman's pocket, and take the handkerchief and chuck it down; he ran directly he threw it down; if the gentleman had not turned round I should have given it him.
. I met a man I knew; he said he was going to purchase a jacket, and asked me to go; I did so; he asked the price of one in the window; we came out, and he gave me the trowsers to hold  I asked where he got them, and the man came and took me with the trowsers; he asked me about the waistcoat; I said I had not got it; I know nothing of the waistcoat.
. I was out of work at the time.
. I pulled my shoes off by the bed-side; when I got up in the morning I could not find them; I put on the others till I returned at night, but with no intention to steal them.
He told me to put the shoes on, and I promptly said I never saw them before, which I never had  I said they hurt my feet, but I dare say I could walk to the station in them, and be took them away from me  I could take my oath they never belonged to me.
. On Friday night I was at the Victoria Theatre, from thence I proceeded straight home, and slept till about eight o'clock next morning  as to the charge now made against me, I deny it  on the following week I met with a person who had these boots to sell  I gave him, I believe, 3s. 6d. for them  the shoes produced by the inspector I can take my oath I never saw before he produced them for me to wear from the station to Queen-square  the box of medals I had given me for a keepsake, by a young man who has gone out of the country, but not as a convict  on Saturday morning last Inspector Barefoot came up to my bed-room, and took me in charge  he searched my clothes, and found 4s. in my trowsers' pocket, and a few halfpence, and in the drawer the duplicate of the hat, which I bought for 1s.  one day I went with a young chap I know to the pawnbroker's, to see whether the hat would fit me  I paid the interest of it, but it would not fit me, so 1 gave the ticket back, and got the 1s. back again  I afterwards bought the ticket of another person, which he was to have back on the Saturday I was taken, but being taken I could not give it him back.
. I went to unscrew the bolts, and saw the till partly open; I went to shut it, and Mr. Smith accused me of robbing it; I saw my master get up from under the counter.
. Two men asked me to sell it for them.
Did not a gentleman say you had no right to take me, that it was a boy who got under the cart, and got away?
I was in liquor.
. I was taking the parcel to George-street, and met the Jew; I had seen him once before; he asked what I had; I said I did not know; he said, \Come, and have something to drink. \"I did so; it made me stupid. I did not sell the lace to the Jew; I did not know what I was doing."
. I was going along Aldgate; a man came by and gave them to me, told me to go to the public-house, and wait, and to ask for Tom Smith.
Did you not see a servant with me?
Was not her arm tied up Before that?
. We were both tipsy  she was very quarrelsome, and used aggravating words  I pushed her away with my open hand, but used no violence whatever  she was drinking night and day  I am innocent of any thing of murder  I never intended to injure her.
. I had it given me to put on Mr. Moore's van; I used to take to Mr. Moore's van every morning; the salesman, said he could not tell whether he sold them or not  a Mr. Miller gave them to me.
I was getting my things washed; I had taken that sovereign out, and wrapped it in a handkerchief, and put it into my pocket.
. I was walking up Drury-lane; I heard a cry of \Stop thief;\"The policeman caught me; I asked what for; he said, \"I don't know;\" and the prosecutor came up to the boy, and said I had picked his pocket; and I said I had not."
. I met a person in Old-street-road; he asked me to take it for him; he turned up Islington-road, and desired me to go on this way; I was to wait for him at the end of Hatton-garden.
Did you see me take them?
. Another boy gave them to me, and ran away.
I borrowed the money on my own account, and gave you an I O U for it?
I said, \If you would walk to my house I would prove that I was not discharged, but that I left of my own accord  I never said that."
Have you any thing to say against my character?
. Before the Magistrate he said, \I heard the prisoner say he owed Mr. Tebbutt 8l., and he was ready to pay him when the time expired\"  and he afterwards said, \"All I heard the prisoner say was, that he would show a document, to prove he was in Mr. Cole's establishment,\"Which are two different statements  is it feasible, that I should take a house of Mr. Tebbutt (and my son in his employ) forty yards from his house, if I had any intention to defraud him of the money?  I should have paid him on the Tuesday following, but he took me to prison  I gave him an acknowledgment in my own name  he said at the Police-court that I had altered the figure from 2 to 3  look at it, and see if there is any alteration at all  he has been keeping a public-house at Kensington, and treating all the police to drink, and that is why the policeman states what he does  I told him the first 3l. I borrowed was to pay my rent with, and the other 2l. to pay for moving my furniture  I asked him if he had been to Mr. Coles, to fetch away the plant-pots  he said, \"No\"  I said there were about fifty empty pots in the area when I was there."
I never said I got the things out of the auction-rooms; he never asked me.
. I had been out of work for a long time, and had no where to go  I had been out all Monday, walking about in the rain  I went up this court for shelter, to see if there was any place where I could lie down  I saw the truck, and got into it  I felt two bags  I pulled them out, opened them, and saw watches and things in them  I went to the truck again and lifted up the coat, and a lot of things fell out  I put them into my own pocket, and got into the truck again  I bad not been there long before the policemen came up and pulled me out of the truck  they asked how I came there  I said I came there to sleep  he asked if I knew any thing of the bags  I said no  he asked if I knew where they came from  I said no, and one of them said, then I had better go about my business  one of them said, \Before you go, let us see whether you have got any thing\"  he put his hand into my pocket, and found the spoons  he then said, \"Oh, you must not go,\" and they took me to the station  while I was in the truck I heard them talking  one of them kicked the bags, and said, \"What have we here?\"  he said he thought they were muscles  the other said, no, they were watches, and he said, \"Ah! we shall not have to wear the coat any longer\"  he said he knew an old woman where he could take them to till they went off duty  when they found me, they asked me where I had got them from  I said I had not got them at all, I wished they would keep them and let me go  he said to the other policeman, \"Go down and see if there is any one at the bottom of the court\"  he went down, returned, and said, \"No\"  one wanted to keep them  the other would not, and would not Jet me go; and as they could not agree to it, they took me to the station  as they went along, they kept singing out to every policeman they met, \"Do you want a watch?\"  at the station the policemen got pulling and hauling me about, so that I would not give up the things I had in my pockets; if they had not done so, I should have given them up  I was taken to the Compter  they did not offer to search me there that night  when I came down in the morning they found the things in my pocket."
I drive a cab; I took the money, and did not know it was bad.
I never was in the house; he is only swearing falsely; the first time he swore to my clothes, which no man can.
A man asked me to go and take a sheet and dispose of it  I took it to the shop, and they seemed suspicious how I came possessed of it  a policeman was passing, and I told her to call him in.
What distance was you from me when you first saw me?
It is false; you was three hundred yards.
I had the brass given to me by a man I did not know.
Did you see me take it?
I went into the yard, and as I was coming out I saw this hanging on a stone, and it being an old ragged thing I took it up.
He paid me 3s. 6d. on the 30th.
Whose sheets were these?
The prosecutor and I agreed' to take the furnished lodging at 3s. a week; I was to pay half of it. I gave him no money, but found him in food. On the day stated he went out between eight and nine o'clock. I went out about four o'clock, and met two persons, who could have proved I bad no property. I staid out all night, and the next morning he called on me, and asked me to walk with him, and he gave me into custody. I know nothing of the sheet. The duplicate was found seven or eight yards from the curb.
Coming home one morning, I saw this by the side of the road; I took it home to make a fire; I showed them where I picked it up.
I had been out of work some months, and my mother was dying of consumption in St. Luke's workhouse.
I went to Drury-lane that morning, and a man asked me to carry this lead for 6d.; I said I did not mind; I looked behind me twice, and the man was behind me; where he went to I do not know.
I was at sea at that time; 1 did not get my discharge till the 28th of May, 1840; I was at sea two years and three months.
I know nothing about the cap and shoes.
Gunter gave it to me, and told me to say I won it at a raffle.
She said I was running down the garden, and she was at dinner.
He called me back, and I went back, and he said they had lost a watch, but I did not steal it; I only delivered a bill.
I delivered the bill there, but never touched the watch.
He has received this money since I have been in custody  my father has paid him 1l. 10l.
I intended to replace the money  Mr. Dobson received 30s. of the\\ amountof my father, and said if that money was replaced, he did not wish to press the charge.
He said he saw it on my head, and now he says it was in my hand  two of us were taken together  I was handing it back to the one who stole it.
I met two boys, the one who was taken had it on his head  he gave it to the other to try on, and he gave it him back  it was not in my hand at all.
Had you seen me at work in the afternoon?
Where did I leave it at?
Did I not bring in the bacon to be weighed?
I picked them up between the two doors of the Two Brewers, I could be on my sacrament oath, if it were the last word I had to speak.
Did you not say that the other got away with the shawl?
I was going home; this man came and stopped me; there was another man running over the way; I had been robbing no man: the shopman came up, and put a pistol to my head, and said I had robbed him; I asked of what; he said he did not know; they took me to the, shop, and showed me a small place over the window, about two inches wide and four or five long.
I found it in the street.
A man gave them me to carry.
I went to the Custom-house, on Saturday, with a young man I was acquainted with, who had some business to transact there  he left me waiting while he went into one of the offices  while standing there (and I believe the last witness stated at the Mansion-house that he saw me standing there ten minutes) I saw two or three persons go to this coal-cellar, which I thought was for the sake of convenience, and I went in there; while I was there the person came and said, \Look, he has gone in there;\" I have been in a most respectable situation up to this last fortnight, and I have not made my friends acquainted with this."
As I was going across the road from his door, a man gave it me to carry; I went along; the prosecutor came and knocked me down and collared me; he would not go after the man.
I did not like to go back, because I had lost the money.
I left the West India Dock; I had no money, I had spent it all; I met a man, who said, \My father can let you have goods till you get your pay;\" we went to Jackson's; he gave me his card; the man measured me for the coat; I went at night and said, \"Lend me a shilling to get a drop of beer?\" he said he would give me half-a-crown, which he did; he gave me a card; he said, \"If you want money come to me, I will let you have money and clothes;\" I had a neck handkerchief and a pocket handkerchief."
I did not give him that paper.
Who gave you soup at the galley?
The woman is right enough; I do not know any thing about the paper nor about Mr. Jackson; the other man tells the truth.
That young man brought the order into the shop.
I was at work at Woolwich that day, seven miles from here.
The half-crown was my own; my mother sent me with it to buy some ham and beef.
The woman called me back to buy a halfpenny-worth of pears; another boy told me to go and steal an old pair of boots, and put them into the basket.
I am not the person.
I am innocent; I have pledged tools frequently for one Clark; he told me had a chest of tools, and seeing the distress he and his mother were in, I pawned them, not knowing I was doing wrong.
I have a wife and three children to support; my wages were but 4s. a week; I thought of making it up, and offered to pay my master.
Where was I?
I put them out of the loft, and he put them up to me.
A young man asked me to hold them  I heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" and he ran off."
I was in liquor. I have a wife and six children; they are starving.
They frightened me; I did not know what I was saying.
I picked it up in Newgate-street.
The wine I had from a person who used to live at Liverpool with a Mr. Hanson, he is now agent for somebody  he owed me 30s., and said he would give me the wine for it  it was never on Mr. Rockley's premises, but the case I took from Mr. Rockley intending to return it  I sealed the cork with Mr. Rockley's seal for my wife to know where I lived.
I went in to ask the lady if she wanted any lemons; the corner of the trowsers hung to my basket, which was on my shoulder, and fell down  I was going to pick them up, when the gentleman came over and gave me in charge. Witness. They did not fall down  he put them into his basket, and they were half out when I got hold of him  he was professing to sell lemons  he had the basket, under his arm hanging by a strap round his neck.
. The prosecutor and the witness are related together, and it is a combined thing between them against me; he does not live six doors from me; it is not likely I should steal it, and sell it to a man that knew me.
I never said such a thing  I took the sack out of my cart, which I had there.
I used to pay him sometimes every other day, and at other times he let it run for a week.
. My brother had it given him to take to Mitchamcommon; I did not touch it.
I did not say they were the property of my master.
I know nothing at all about it.
Did I not ask you what I was given in custody for?
. I had nothing at all to do with the robbery, Mr. Wilson first told me of it. I said I was very sorry to hear it, as Mr. Blackwell had been unwell; I would go down and see him.
. I was going along the highway, and fell in with two shipmates. I did not feel myself satisfied with the schooner I was in, and they told me of a vessel going to Shields  I took the jacket and waistcoat in the room of my own.
I was passing the shop: a gentleman stopped me, and asked if I would carry a few things for him to the railroad; I said I had no objection; he told me to stop a few minutes outside the shop door; I stopped a few minutes; he did not seem to be coming; I looked in at the shop window; he beckoned for me to come in, and I went in; he gave me these things to carry, and as I was going along I was stopped with them.
What did you say to the policeman?
The prosecutor said he could not take his oath.
I was in liquor, I did not know what I was about.
There was no lock on the door.
I was intoxicated.
I was coming home, the officer took me, and I tried to get away.
I was standing at the corner of Southampton-street and picked the handkerchief off the ground; I stood about four minutes, and suddenly some person came up and caught hold of me, unbuttoned my jacket, and took the handkerchief.
I was badly off for work. There was not a bit of bread in the house; my wife was very poorly, and very near her confinement, so I broke into the money, thinking to make it up.
He sent for me, and said he wanted me, he had two sets of chairs for me to sell; I asked what he wanted, he said 5l. 4s.  I took the pattern out, and was four days selling them  I sold them for 5l. 3s.  he gave me 4s. for my trouble; he then said, \I have got four sets for sale.\" he wanted 3l. 10s. the set; he said if I got 14l. he would give me a sovereign for them. I went out for five days; I showed Mr. Goodrich the pattern chairs; he showed me a lot of wood, and said if the party would take part in goods he would give me 14l. 12s. Mr. Owen went with me, looked out the wood, and took it; he said, \"That man is a stranger to me, I should like you to bring me the chairs.\" There was 3l. 15s. left, and I said, \"I will see you have the elbow-chair.\" I took in the chair, and Mr. Goodrich paid me a sovereign, and that I kept, according to the agreement."
I had no work; I came down St. Martin's-court; I saw the handkerchief lying down, took it up, put it into my pocket, and walked to the bottom of the court; the gentleman caught hold of me, asked me for it, and before I had time to take it out, he took it out.
I never saw the spoons, and did not pawn them.
I was in a mob; a young man turned round and threw the mutton right in my breast; I stood looking at it, and the man came and took me.
A boy picked the prosecutor's pocket; the prosecutor turned round, and the boy threw the handkerchief down; the witness took me, and said I was the person.
I am a cripple with both my hands, and it is impossible I could pick the gentleman's pocket.
He was awake when I got up, and he lent me the clothes to go and pledge the canes in.
I know nothing about the other things, only the wagon and omnibus; I bought them for 6d., and sold them next day to Fletcher for 8d.
That is not my figure in the book  there are four porters besides me.
There are four porters, and the books go out with the carts occasionally  sometimes they go out at three or four o'clock in the afternoon, and I receive them the next morning about nine o'clock  they go through various persons' hands, and the till where I keep my money is as open to any one else as for me  the 1s. might have been put down, and the parties who did it might help themselves, as the till was never shut.
Some time since one of Davis's lads was caught, by one of my fellow-servants, taking something out of my till  he was taxed with it, and said he had only taken 1s., and two or three months back I lost a sovereign out of the till  I never knew how it went, and I had to make it good.
I should like to know how he lost it and accused me.
I deny all knowledge of it; I never had it.
I disown all knowledge of them altogether.
I deny all knowledge of it.
I bought three pairs of them at Hawes and Otley's, in the Poultry, six pairs at Mr. Dossitor's, and three pairs of Mr. Waterman.
I know nothing at all about the stockings, only those that were taken upon me on Saturday niaht.
I have lived there these twenty years; I must be mad, or out of my senses to be guilty of such a thing.
My master sent me to get some customers  I got to Nelson-street, and a lady asked me to give her change for half-a-crown  I felt in my pocket, and I had lost three fourpenny pieces  I did not like to go back, thinking my master would be angry  I left the tray in a baker's-shop, and went to the theatre.
Did I ask you to search me?
I was not aware I had it  I was three parts in liquor  I had been drinking all the morning.
Did not you, on a former occasion, swear that I entered the room with a knife in my hand?
The person she was in company with, Mrs. Hudson, is a common street-walker.
She has a certificate in her possession of my good conduct for ten years at sea, and I have a letter in her own hand, which she sent to me in prison  what I said about another day was in reference to taking the child away.
I heard my father say he was going to kill his horse, and there was not much difference between this and his, which was grazing at the same place. I said nothing to my father, but I intended to sell his pony, and make him a present of a better one.
I was never near the yard at that time, and had nothing to do with the things.
A boy said he would give me a pair of shoes if I would go with him  we ran together, and got into the area  I did not know where the boy got them  I did not touch them.
Where were you?
Did you lose sight of me?
There has been a mistake made as regards my identity; it is true I was looking at the books, and no doubt the witnesses saw me on two occasions; I took up a book to look at, which I put down; on returning, I took up another book, read it, and put that down; I then stood at the corner of Holy well-street, and heard a cry of \Stop thief;\" I saw some persons running, and I joined in the chase; in turning into Newcastle-street, I saw two persons, and before I could get to them I was stopped."
It is my cap, I gave 1s. for it; it is impossible to swear to a cap like this; there are thousands of them.
I went to look after a place, and then I went to get blackberries; I found these spoons wrapped up in a paper, against a hedge.
Did I not offer you to search me, and undo my waistcoat, and tell you to call any one in?
Was any one with me?
Was there any shillings and sixpences in the till the evening before I was accused?
Did you find any thing else there?
I put 1s. 6d. in the till, and as I wanted to pay my washerwoman I took out the marked shilling instead of my own  Mrs. Collier acknowledged there was no shilling left in the till, and therefore the one found there must be mine.
A countryman gave me 9d. to take it to Leaden-hall-street; the reason I said it was my father's was, I did not know the officer was going to take me to the station.
It is not all right that he says  some is true, and some is not true.
He was growling every time I told him to work  our law permits us to strike our men.
Was there not a person with me?
I was talking to the other boy, and he went and took the beads off the child's neck.
I went to the shop, and wanted a dozen buttons  I thought these were for me  I put the money down.
I was very much in liquor.
I am quite innocent; the prosecutor has received the money from my friends.
I was in the hold of the ship, and saw the shoes down in the cuddy; I held them up to one of the men; he said, \You have them;\" I said, \"Very well.\""
I was looking in a picture-shop; there were two or three boys round; one was whistling like a blackbird; I turned, and this handkerchief was at my feet; I picked it up, and put it into my trowsers; the policeman could not see me take it from the gentleman's pocket, as I did not do it; he said to the gentleman, \The boy, I think, took something out of your pocket, but I don't know what,\"  then he came and took the handkerchief out of my pocket."
When I came from the palace to receive the wages, my master was getting into the chaise  he gave the clerk a 5l. note to get change to pay the wages.
I got these things from a person on the road, to carry to London; he afterwards went away and left me; I carried them on, till I was stopped by a policeman; knowing I had done wrong, I said I was going to take them to the coffee-shop, and for fear of being detected, I threw them away.
The woman did not knock at the door  she opened it with a key.
It was impossible for him to see me strike the man, for he was at the door, and the door recedes.
He is not to be believed  he is a man of loose character, and lives by the prostitution of a young girl  he and the prosecutor too  he hit me himself.
When I came up he turned round and struck me with his fist.
Have I not paid monies since Christmas to other persons?
I duly accounted to my master for the sums I received; but unless the cash-book was there on the desk, he scarcely ever would get it to enter it.
I had a blackbird, who got out of the cage, and I went after him  I did not touch the rabbits  nobody saw me touch any thing.
Freeman swore to another man at Union Hall, and yet they have never mentioned any thing about that; and his master said, \I will make it all right for you, but we will do it for him.\""
Can you swear I came through your wharf that morning?
This is my own watch; I bought it last Tuesday morning in Thames-street, of a sailor; I was not on the wharf.
Did you see me in the field where you found the clock?
Was I coming out of your father's premises?
I and another man got fighting; I was all over blood; I went to Stevens's house to get some water; I called; no answer was given; I went round; one of the men broke the window, opened it, got in, took the clock, and ran off; I took the coat, hat, and snuff-box, and was coming away; Daniels saw me; I delivered them up; I could have got away, as it was half-an-hour before they came up.
I intended to have taken it out again.
She stated I was not the person.
I was sent by that good lady's son.
I have got a letter her son sent me while I was in Horsemonger-lane  he took my coat and pawned it, and he sent me for the money  the officer saw her son twice.
It is quite a mistake about a false address, I told him No, 6, in the first instance, and I told him I let the middle room, but did not live in it.
Have you ever sold any of that juice?
Did not you agree to give me 10s. per acre for the com?
Did not you come up to me in the king's highway, in a fighting attitude?
He followed me between twenty and thirty yards away from his premises, I walking backwards, trying to get away from him, and he would not let me, but closed me in by my bosom; the reaping-hook was in this hand; we both fell down, I undermost; he gave me two slaps on the cheek, then took and threw me down into the ditch; I was all over mud.
Was the hook bound up, or naked?
Did not you see him strike me?
This man swears falsely; he would swear my life away; he never asked me a question about the reaping-hook or hoe.
You paid Henry Andrews his 11s.?
. Mr. Peto was at me every day because I would not do day-work for him, which I was not obliged to do  he refused me my money, which was the only reason of this; but now he makes excuses that it was because the sheaves were left  he was more in fault than I was  the money was due  we worked seventeen hours and a half per day for it, and it was but 4s. 6d.  a day  when the work was done the money was due  the work was done correctly  all he was angry about, was because we would not do day-work for him  we never worked for him but those three days, and we were not obliged to do day-work for him  he never found fault with our work, but he came back in about a quarter of an hour, and said he would not pay us, because there were two or three sheaves left together, which ought not to be, but it was of no consequence  this would never have happened if he had paid us our wages  we waited seven hours and a half after the work was done, and it was half-past eight when this disturbance took place  I had a wife and child at home, and had only left 2s. at home  I wanted my money to take home  if the two or three sheaves were not right, why not have stopped 1s. it would not have taken any one five minutes to have altered them, but the work was done properly  I never struck him at all, I will be on ray oath  he hit me twice in the jaw, and threw me into the ditch.
. I am innocent of the tea and sugar; the bread I took to give my aunt, who is a poor widow  I only gave it to her once before  I used to find my own tea and sugar.
. I went out to go to my brother-in-law; I never touched the shawl; I was walking along; I never ran.
. I was looking into a picture-shop, and the gentlemen came and spoke to me, and found the handkerchief on my arm  it was not in my pocket  one of them struck me, and knocked me down, and kicked me.
What time did you get them from the Dispatch office?
What did you do when you saw me at the tail?
. I am in the news trade; I bought some papers at the Dispatch office; we cannot get papers early enough ourselves; we get them from such persons as Mr. Edmonds; I bought two quires; and it is common in the paper business to change one for another; I said, \Here is the Dispatch for the Sunday Times;\"  he came to me, and said, \"How many can you do?\" I said, \"Eighteen for sorts;\" that is, for different sorts. I said I bought them in Shoe-lane; he said, \"What did you give?\" I said, \"What do you give for yours?\" He said he would call a policeman, and the policeman would not take me into the City. I took him to Shoe-lane, and Mr. Dyson said he knew me as being in the trade; he went to Mr. Taylor's, and there this boy said I was the man that took the papers out. I took the prosecutor to Fleet-street, and saw a man named Powell, who knew me. I bought two quires, and he lost five quires."
The boy was pulling them out with both his hands; the window was broken, with a card over it; the boy shoved them against me; I did not throw them down.
. It was given me by a man in the New-road to carry to Long-acre.
He swore twice at Lambeth-street that he did not strike me, and he struck me two or three times.
. On the Sunday night, I and my brother came out, and crossed to look at this beer-shop, as another man had taken it, and there were some new things on the counter  the prosecutor was standing at the front talking to some one  he said, \Go on, what do you want there?\"  I said, \"Oh\"  he came out, and was going to shove me away  I had a stick in my hand which I was cutting  I held it up as if going to hit him, but I did not  he hit me across the mouth rather hard  I then called him Flash Tom, and Irish  he ran after me  when I got to the pump, I stooped as he was close to me  he struck me two or three times  I went to clasp my arras round him, and the knife cut him  I did not do it intentionally  I should not have taken out the knife, but I was cutting the piece of stick, and had it in my hand."
. I picked them up in the dock; they dropped on the ground as they were pitching the sacks.
Have you never had another such a piece in your possession?
I have been robbed, and they ought to be placed in the situation I am. I hear this witness has been but three weeks from Ireland, and has had a child by a policeman.
Did you partake of any gin with me?
Did you find any other money on me?
. I had been driving a cab, and received different fares; I had 1l. 15s. 6d. in my different pockets. I left off work about midnight; I met a girl as I was coming home, who asked me to treat her; I took her to two public-houses, and treated her; she then wanted something to eat, and took me to a little shop in St. Giles's; and every body of experience must know the infamy and notoriety of St. Giles's. Well, I went; she had some soup, I had some bread and cheese; I then sent out for gin and beer; the old woman, Kennedy, came in, and had some; I felt a little stupified, and went out; the woman I had been with came after me, embraced me, and put her hand into my pocket; she then ran into a house over the way; I followed her, and there were three or four women in the passage, who pulled me about; I then went out, and thought perhaps I had only lost a shilling or two. I was going on, and these people seized me again. The money in my coat-pocket was my master's, as I can prove: the money in my fob was my own, which I had saved up. I hope you will recollect that this deceiver is worse than one of old: he could read the superscription, but this deceiver cannot. I hope you will \render unto Caesar the things which are Caesar's, and unto God the things which are God's.\""
. It was another boy had it; I did not have it; it was dropped in the road.
They were hanging outside.
The officer came to me in the Strand, he got hold of an old man, and said he was cohabiting with me, he said he saw that man taking up plates, and recommending me to do the jobs, and I had never seen the man  I told this officer there were four or five plates in the cupboard.
The handkerchief was lying down by my feet.
The duplicates are my own  I hope you will look over it  it is the first time I ever was in custody.
I was coming down St. Martin's-lane  I heard a cry of \Stop thief\"  I ran as well as other people; a man stopped me and said I was the man."
If there had been another person there she would have sworn to him, but I was the first, and was sworn to.
He told the Magistrate that it was not marked till the next morning.
. I had earned 1s. 6d. on the 8th, and the shilling happened to be bad; I know nothing about the other; I was not there on tie 7th of December.
I cut up this a day or two before  I put them into my tool-basket, and it was standing in the shop for two days  I took the basket I out when I went to call on a person whom I sold a book to for 2s., and the police stopped me on the way.
. I was drunk; I am very sorry for it.
I gave him the sixpence before I took the bread.
How far were you off?
. I gave him the sixpence, and he gave me the 4d. change  I left him the bread till I came back  I was going out of the town.
. They dragged me several yards; I called, \Murder\" three times, a few cottagers assisted me, or I believe they would have killed me."
I certainly took the watch, but it was my intention to take it back when I returned with my barrow.
Where were you standing when you saw me take the coat out of the gig?
I hoped when I wrote the letters to be able to raise the money.
It is not a regular thing in Romford-market to pay for them in a bank, only among the salesmen.
I bought them at Romford-market, on the Wednesday; they stood nndemeath the trees, nearly opposite the bank  I gave 43l. 5s. for them, and paid the money for them in the Bull public-house; there were four cows, two heifers, and a calf  I saw several salesmen there that I knew; I do not know that there is any one here; there was Mr. Cade, Mr. Mulloch, a pig-jobber, and Mr. Mansell, a pig-jobber: I have not sent for them; there were plenty of people, no doubt, that saw me at the Bull.
They were much distressed, and one was very lame, which was the reason I put them in the field at Kingsland; I turned them into the London-marshes after buying them at Romford; several persons saw them in the London-field; a friend of Mr. Burrell's did, and I think Mr. Lowe heard it said that they were there there.
Did you not give roe in charge for stealing a pair of boots?
I am not the man that took the boots from the door; I was standing before the door, selling Punch's Comic Almanack, and saw a person go by and drop the boots; I picked them up, and being a wet night, I ran across the road with them.
Did not you ask Mrs. Binstead whether the had taken a bad shilling that morning?
Who gave you the counterfeit shilling?
If it was a bad shilling why did you give me the change?
I deny being in the chemist's shop at all; I was at the other shop, and changed the half-crown; the woman gave me the two shillings in change; before she left the counter at all, I took them up, sounded them, and objected to one of them; she took it up, and said she did not think she had such a thing in the till; she called Mrs. Binstead, and asked if she had taken a bad shilling that morning; if she had been certain they were both good she would not have asked that question; she did not examine them, she only saw them lying in the till; the lady who actually took the money over the counter is not brought forward; I never had either of the shillings in my possession; if I had changed one shilling for another I must have bad another about me, and nothing was found on me.
She was fighting with a little girl at the time, and must have dropped the necklace  I picked it up on crossing the road after she had gone  a woman saw me do so.
I was in search of work, heard a cry of \Stop thief,\" ran, and was stopped."
Did I act bad in general for the nine or ten years we have been married?
Were we on bad terms?
Did you see me assault her?
I never had any intention to injure her; I came home from work, there was no, supper ready; I asked her to get out of bed; she said she would not; I pulled her out; she took the chair and struck me; whether I injured her in falling I cannot say, but I have regretted it ever since.
I told the coffee-shop keeper that I found the cigars behind a cart, tied up in the handkerchief; that I did not know what to do with them, and would sell them; he said he would give me a halfpenny each, and I said he should have them.
Can you swear these are your boots?
I have resided in Tottenham Court-road about twelve years, and have known Mr. Simpson nine or ten years, and have dealt with him five or six years, and he has dealt with me; we have had a running account up to the present time; he owes me an account now, and I owe him for things had by my wife and children; he has two pairs of shoes of mine to repair now.
What kind were the other pair?
There is an account standing between Mr. Simpson and me; I served him myself with three pairs of kid gloves eight or nine weeks ago.
I have been in the habit of working for Mr. Stevens; a fellow-workman gave it me to carry, saying it came from Steven's, and was going to Mr. Fogg, to be mended; when the policeman stopped me, the man ran away from me.
I was in Cheapside. A man said he would \give me 6d. to carry it; I carried it about 200 yards, and the officer stopped me."
A boy picked the pocket, and before I could get to the gentleman he threw it on my shoulder. I was taking it off as the gentleman turned and took me.
A man outside the door told me to go and get the coat  I did not like it  he then came and told me to take it  the servant came down, and I was stopped.
Were there other persons in the parlour during that evening?
Did I, during the evening, sit under where the picture hung?
Was the door a little ajar?
About one o'clock that night I was coming from Holloway; I saw the prosecutrix going up the court beastly drunk; she asked where she could get some gin; I said I did not know: I stood talking to a young man, and heard the cry of \Murder:\" the prosecutrix had got into a house, and was breaking the things because they would not serve her with gin; they told me to go and get a policeman; I did, and then she said I took her handkerchief. I found it."
Can you positively swear I am the same person that entered your counting-house?
Were you in the counting-house?
Do you recollect paying me at the time I left; did I ask for a cheque?
On your oath, did I tell you that I had any cheque-book, and give you directions where to find it?
I know nothing whatever of the cheque issued to Messrs. Twining, and I have never seen it; Captain Lindsay is well acquainted with my handwriting, and he cannot say that it is my writing; Mr. Ridgway, my master, knows I was not out of his house on the night of the 10th, as there was company; I fully expected that he would be here; he sent me word that I need not take any trouble, for he would do whatever he could; Captain Lindsay knows my character, and the one he received with me.
I know nothing about stealing the carpet from the house; I was walking along the street, and was accused of stealing it; he let the other man go.
The servant said at Lambeth-street that she found these things, and now this lady says she found the cash box open.
I am innocent; I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
On the night she bought the horse, it was shot down among the dirt of the yard; its inside was torn; the heart and liver got under the horse's head; in the morning I pulled the horse into the shed; she said there was no heart or liver  I was afterwards sweeping the yard, and found them in the mud, I brought them to the stable, and hid them for safety.
Did I speak to you?
Did I say I was the owner?
How far were you from the house when you saw me?
The jacket is mine; I am in default about the quadrants.
I never saw them.
I had the same things I have now; I went to Mr. Clark's, the pawnbroker's, to ask for change; he had none to spare, and when I got to another place I found I had lost the money.
The bill is a flash one, not a forgery; Rose is well aware of the person who wrote the bill, and he did not give him into custody; he was at his bouse the next day; it is drawn on a house which does not exist in London, and from a house which does not exist in Hamburgh; it cannot be called a forged bill; I was compelled to do it from the utmost necessity; I had no home to go to; I had no intention to deceive Mr. Rose.
I am quite a stranger here, and have no person to give me any information; I referred Mr. Rose to a gentleman who knew me well, but I do not know whether he inquired of my character.
I was walking past the place, and two men passed me rather quick, they turned the corner of the road, and dropped the pork on the step of a door at the corner of Bedford-row; I took it up and walked with it in my hand at a regular pace; the policeman overtook me, and found it on me; I went back readily with him, and he said it was stolen.
I was employed by a gentleman to take the letter to Mr. Moseley, aud tell him to get the wine, and send it to the Rose Inn.
There was another boy running; he dropped the spoons, and I ran after him.
One of three young men threw it down, and I took it up; the officer said, \What did you pick up?\" I said, \"A handkerchief;\" he said, \"Where did you get it?\" I said, \"Just picked it up, and two persons had ran across the road.\""
I am a general dealer in Smithfield  about a quarter past two that Friday I bought it, and at half-past three the man said it belonged to him.
I was never near the door  I had it given me at the corner to carry to East Smithfield.
I was going up Holborn and saw a man drop it  I picked it up, and was going across the road after him with it.
My business was to wait on the parlour  I went to look after the fire.
When you saw me with the lead, I believe it was outside a public-house?
I am a journeyman plumber. I was going through Long-lane, and was stopped by a person respectably dressed; he said, \Are you a plumber?\" I said, \"I am;\" he said, \"Come with me, I will give you a job;\" he took me to this house, and said, \"I want this lead removed from the frontispiece; I want some lighter put on; go and get a pair of steps.\" I said, \"Where?\" he said, \"Go down the street and get them.\" I went, and borrowed a pair at a painter's; they were not long enough to reach, and the man went and borrowed a ladder at a public-house. I took the lead down, brought it away on my shoulder, and put it on the outside of the public-house; he told me it was Mr. Walker's premises. I said I had no tools, and he said, \"It is very loose, you won't want tools.\" I had only a plumber's shave."
I saw it in the gutter, and picked it up, being in distress.
I asked the man at the gate for some; he told me to go up the yard, and I could have a few; I was in great distress.
I did not run; I did not know who was behind me; there is a Welshman there has a great spite against me.
He swears a man blinded his eyes, how can can he tell that I took it?
I never saw the boy's cloak, and was not in company with any man.
This man did not pay me for them.
I left the chairs with the broker's wife for 1s. 6d.; I had nothing to eat; I left them to get my lodgings, and something to eat.
When the cap did not fit me; why did you put it on your knee and stretch it?
I was fast asleep when the robbery was committed.
I carried a box for a person, and in coming back I picked up the beef.
I was coming down Southampton-row, and two boys said, \Will you have a pot of honey?\" I said, \"Yes,\" and this gentleman came, collared me, and said he saw me take it out of the shop; he took me to two shops before he could find it."
Were you the first person that took it?
I went in with another man to the Hope and Anchor, but I was not the person who gave the crown-piece, it was the man that went in with me. Three men have since been apprehended at Hatton-garden, and it was given to the daughter, not to her.
If you swear I was there on Saturday night, why did you not bring the piece against me?
I asked him to go with me to the public-house where I received them, and he and the policeman would not go.
I had been drinking, and had two pots of beer; I paid a good half-crown, and got two shillings change; I said I would go, and get a poor-man's plaister for my side, which I had hurt with a stone; I got the salts, and he told me it was a bad shilling; I said, \Perhaps this may be bad too,\" and gave him another."
As I received the chest from the warehouse so I delivered it at St. Katherine's Docks; I am innocent of what I am charged with.
The boots were on the pavement.
You said you could not swear to it at the station?
I had no companion  it would be impossible for me to come out with these, things.
As I was going up stairs last Saturday night, the officer took me.
I was passing down Duke-street; I saw the prosecutor drop his handkerchief from his pocket; I took it up, and was following him, when I was seized by two gentlemen, who said they saw me take it.
I said I bought it of a man named Burns, I did not say a broker.
I do not know where Burns lives, but it is in Poplar.
This lad was here for stealing a quartern loaf, and had three months in the House of Correction.
I removed them from the kitchen up to that room.
The prosecutor was taken ill on the Thursday, and the day after I packed up all his tools and took them up into an upper bed-room, and they laid there all the following week  I had no work to do that week  I sat up with him two nights, and stopped with him two days; I merely took the tools, as I wanted a shilling or two that week, not intending to rob him  I had the duplicates all carefully in my pocket, to get them out; I did not deny the fact when I was taken; I had commenced work again the day I was taken.
A boy asked me to sell it for him.
The man Collins made a pair of bespoke shoes in the name of Wells  he brought them to me while I had a customer in the shop, and wanted to be paid  I said I had nothing less than a half-crown  I put my hand in my pocket and gave him a shilling, and asked if that would do.
He is indebted to me more than this.
I never saw them.
There was some stinking meat brought out, and I could not eat it.
A person met me, and said, \If you will carry this I will give you something.\""
His father was at the Wellington; I went there, and he gave me leave to do the best I could, and told me not to bring it home if it was late, but to take it to Mr. Digby's  the next morning I went to his buildings in the Vauxhall-road, and did not see him; in coming back, I saw him, and spoke to him; he sent my brother to know whether I had told the cart; I told him when I met him that he should not lose a farthing; I would pay 10s. a week; I do not live a stone's throw from him.
I went to buy a shoe-lace, and while I was there, some one must have come in, and got these; there was no one outside; the lady left me at the door, and I did not move.
I was going by, a young man stopped me, and said, \Here is a box, you may have what is in it;\" I was going along, and a gentleman stopped me; this lady said she saw me in the shop; I was never in it in my life."
I got the funnel from him; I was going to take it to the shop; I said I would pay for the gin when the money came; he gave me the bottles.
I saw a pair of boots on the pavement, and the prosecutor running down the street; I took them, and could not see the boy; I ran and put them down again.
I met two boys who I knew; they asked me to sell some books for them; I asked if they stole them; they said no; I went to a shop to sell them; they said they were no good, they were so old.
Did I have it in my hand?
I was coming to Crown-street with a message; I was past the time, ran fast, and struck the gentleman with my left hand; the handkerchief was never found on me; I never touched it; there was nobody in the street, but there were two lads who followed the prosecutor.
It was Mr. Bardon who sold them to this witness  Mr. Bardon and I went and looked out some goods  Mr. Edds asked his name and address, and he gave it him; \Mile-end, near Bow,\" and he gave me 1s. for looking out the goods."
Where did you leave it?
I found it in Mr. Graham's yard  it was taken into my house, and thrown into a basket with some old tools  no one called for it.
I purchased the truss of hay at Mr. Sears'.
There is another horse in the stable, and how that paper came there I do not know.
What did Kelly say to you?
What did you say to Mr. Penn when you took it from me?
It is all false what Kelly says; I never went out till I heard the robbery was committed, and then I went to see what was the matter; the keg was taken before. I got the white on my clothes at the station by sitting against the boards there.
I went into the kitchen to look for some bread; I happened to knock against the tray, the servant came in, and said I had taken the plate; I had not touched it.
I was working up the river, and asked a lighterman if I might have these coals in the barge; he said, \Stop a minute, and lend me a hand to pull this barge in, then you may have them.\" I had other coals in the boat."
I brought a man from Norwood, and put him down at the corner of Westminster-bridge; I bought the boots of him for 4s.
I picked it off the ground to take into the shop.
I never left any shovels at his house.
What particular marks have you of my identity?
Why not call after me?
State what you found on me.
I am not the man; I was walking that way, and suppose I was the unlucky fellow to be given in charge.
I am not the man.
It was not me, it was a boy who ran away.
I deny the boots being his; they were bought at the Cape of Good Hope.
I met a man last Friday, between eleven and twelve, close to Shadwell church, who asked if I wanted a ship, and said he would ship me immediately if 1 would give him 2s. I said, \Yes;\" he produced this note, and said they were made out, he had nothing to do but to put the name in it; I gave him my name and he put it in the note; I asked him about signing the articles; he mentioned the name of the ship, and where it laid; he told me the ship was to sail on Tuesday; he appeared a respectable man; I went to my lodging, told the prosecutrix I had shipped, and gave her the note, intending to go in the ship; I did not know it was a forged note or I would not have given it her."
The landlady knows I have been to sea; I have been on board a ship which her own son has gone out in; he took me to lodge there; I paid her for my lodging honestly.
I have my discharge from my last Captain; the ship is now in the London Docks, it is the Rookers, Captain Barnes; my brother knows the time of my going to sea; I have been at sea for the last fourteen years; on the Monday morning I was accosted in the street by a man in the same way, who asked if I would go to Liverpool; I said no, I had a ship; it is a customary thing in Ratcliff-highway, the Jews have bills in their windows, soliciting men, and by paying 2s. or 3s. they ship you, and give an advance note there.
Was anybody in the house when I left?
I know nothing of the money, more than the 2d. I received from Mr. Wilcox that evening. My mother might keep money in the teapot; she had 11s. there the Sunday before. I had seen the shilling, sixpence, and a fourpenny-piece, in her hand on the Tuesday night. I lodged in Wilcox's house two nights before the robbery, having left my place.
What can you swear to me by?
What dress had I on?
Is it likely, if a person was guilty, they would say such a thing to a policeman? everybody knows that the least thing they discover directly to the inspector; I might as well have told the Magistrate at once.
What was the purport of our going to Captain Murray?
Where did this conversation take place?
Was any inquiry made respecting paying the bounty that day?
Had you not been to Chatham previous to going to Soho-square with me?
I never received the 2l. from her; certainly an application was made to go with me to Soho-square, to ascertain the sum that ought to be paid, and also to write to Sergeant Sullivan about the bounty, and the sum that was wanted to make up the 20l. which she had previously been told was the amount  her uncle and her disagreed  he ordered her to leave the place, and refused to assist her  I never went near the office at second time that day.
On the morning of the 3rd Dec, do you recollect going to a loan society, in Hackney-road?
How many times hare you seen me write?
I have never received any such sum from the party, nor is this my handwriting, nor was it ever given by me to this person.
I worked seven weeks, and only received 8s. out of 21s.; he told me to do any little job; I got on the top and cleaned the gutter out, he came and asked me about a game hen; I said I had not seen it; he then said I might go home, and come on Monday for my money; I went on Monday, and he accused me of this lead; he did not know how to get me off the premises, because he owed me this money; and on the Tuesday I was taken; he told the policeman not to take me unless I ran in his way.
I went into the shop to beg for a few halfpence  the gentleman said he could do nothing for me  I came out, and this young man took me  he said he saw me take the cloth, and I did not take it.
I took these two customers on my own account, and he told me if I trusted them I should be accountable; I often paid it out of my own pocket on Saturday night, because it should not run back; I have been away from him ever since, but I have been in Hammersmith, and I dare say he has seen me about.
I was returning home at night, and a man asked me to buy these things; I bought them of him for 2s.
You told me you had been to see a fight, and then asked me to drink out of a bottle you had in your side-pocket; you had four glasses of brandy-and-milk, and about a quartern of raw brandy.
Why not send for a policeman? why did you let it go so far?
I never gave a thought of that.
Was I not making my way to go back to this house?
I am sorry it happened as it did; I never offered it for sale; I hope you will take it into consideration that I am not so bad as you imagine; it was through drinking; I have lived in Cloth-fair fourteen or fifteen years; if I had not had so much to drink I should have remained in the place, but having a pint of old ale, and a pot of beer, and brandy and milk, I came out and turned quite drunk.
The square of glass was too large; I went out to get it cut, and not having any money, I could not have it done; I did not like to go back.
I was taken out of a crowd of fifteen or sixteen persons; I was there five minutes; I was taken more on suspicion, answering the description of the person, than being the person.
Had you seen me with one of the others?
There are a parcel of men going about teazing boys to rob their masters, and then when they see the boys taken they are off-I was standing, and a young man came and asked me to carry a bundle to a cab  he took me into some passage  he went up stairs, and fetched two bundles down  gave me the biggest, and went on with the carpet-bag to a cab  he put his bag in, and then I put the bag in  the policeman came  he said he was going to Mr. Davis  he went to catch him, and he ran off  I told him the man hired me to take a bundle to the cab.
I met some friends, and was very tipsy. I managed to make a joint in the cellar some how. This would not have happened if I had not been in liquor.
She says it was on the 3rd of Feb. and it was on the 1st  I went in for half an ounce of tobacco.
Did you inspect them at the time you gave them to me?
Did you see any other shilling about me?
Is it a thing impossible for that man to give me two shillings, and one to be bad, and the other good, and he not to know it? he may be misteken as well as anybody else.
I bought them of a young man at the window.
He did not find it on me.
I will never do the like again.
I had them between two and three months.
Two months ago he was drinking with me in a public-house, and he said, \Are those barrows safe\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he said, \"Very well, we are going to begin again\"  I said, \"Very well, when you want them I will send them\"  that was in a public-house in Bathurst-street, and he asked me if I had a sieve  I said, \"No\"  he said they had lost two sieves  another of the men came to me on the Thursday following, and told me to send the barrows home, which I did by a man, and he did not return them."
Did not you tell me that I could come to work with you?
Wiblin got on the work, and he wanted to get me away  it is all malice his coming against me  I was told by two or three of his men to mind what I was about as he would get me off.
A boy asked me to carry it while he tied up his braces  I showed the boy to the policeman.
I travelled to get work and could not  I never did such a thing before.
You stated before that you saw me looking at the clock?
I had been to the docks, and could not get any employment; I met with two men, we went to this house, and played at bagatelle; I had occasion to go into the yard; Beard came before me, and walked through the house, he was talking to the landlady, and I looked up to see what time it was; if I had been guilty there was plenty of time to give me in charge.
Being unemployed I had been round by the Eyre Arms the day before; I came down towards Lowdon's-road, and I saw a man coming out with a basket, which appeared heavy; he shot it at the end of a heap in the street; I saw him cover something over, as if to conceal it; I thought I would wait and see what he had got, and I found these pieces of lead; I put them in my apron and buried them in a heap of sand; in the morning I went and got them.
Did I receive the whole of the materials of you?
Were they completed?
I admit parting with them, but they were not desks.
It was no desk at all, it was only a box.
There were three or four more in the field; he was sixty or seventy yards away.
I went there for a necessary purpose; I never saw the gown.
He says he never lost sight of me, and yet he went into the shop.
I went into the pawnbroker's to buy a jacket; the witness came in and accused me of the ham; I said, \You must be mistaken, I have not been so far as the shop.\""
A man came and said, \Will you carry this pork? \"  I said I could not, as I was going up Bunhill-row, but I would carry it as I came back  I came back and he gave it me."
He came hallooing out \Stop thief\"  I turned and said \"What do you want?\"  he said, \"I will tell you what I want,\" and then he struck me, and I hit him again."
I was passing by, and a young man at Mr. Ramsay's asked me to go for a quartern loaf for Mr. Ramsay; I could not see the man again; I was going towards Mr. Ramsay's house with it.
Had not Mr. Darvill got the copper when you came up?
He said Mr. Darvill had it when he came up; I am innocent of it
It was given to me to pledge; I did not know it was stolen.
See if there is a hole in the middle of the handkerchief?
I was hungry, and took the loaf  I am a silk hatter by trade.
When he came to the house it was about ten minutes to six o'clock. He says I was drying my boots, and it was a dry, frosty morning; he said he thought I was the man.
I was not out at all that morning. There are two more lodgers in the house besides me, and they have the run of the house.
I saw them lying down, took them up, and crossed the road.
I have three teeth out in the same place.
Here is a tooth which I have had taken out this morning in the prison.
I was coming down the lane, and a gentleman took hold of me, but I am as innocent as you are.
He said, \Where did you get that?\" I said, \"A gentleman asked me to carry it; it is bought and paid for.\""
A man asked me to carry it as far as Holborn, and said he would give me 6d.
It is false; I was never convicted in my life.
I was in Oxford-street looking for a job; a man asked me to carry a bag; I did so; he took me to the shop door and said, \Follow me;\" I went to a public-house, and called for a pint of beer; he came in and said, \"Go into the tap-room,\" which I did; the prosecutor came in, and the other man ran away."
I met the other lad at Chatham; he went in, got the plane, and gave it me.
I was so aggravated, I did not know what I did.
I was at work; when I came home in the afternoon my wife was very tipsy; I requested her to get my supper ready; I had not received my money, though my job was finished; she was insolent, and did not attempt to get it, but did nothing but abuse me; she ran out into the passage, and I must have flung this after her, but I was intoxicated.
I did not take the watch or box; a man gave me 6d. to take three books to the pawnbrokers.
Did not you find the bar as you left it at night?
I was in liquor, and as I found the house to, I got in to get out of the policeman's way.
I did not take it out of the cart; I found it in the middle of the road behind the cart.
I was passing over London-bridge about one o'clock, when a respectable looking young man came up to me and asked if I wanted a job; I said, \If you please;\" he said, \"Take this bundle;\" I took it, and walked by the side of him over the bridge; he called a cab; I took the bundle to the door and said, \"I suppose you have done with me now;\" be said, \"You can come in, if you like;\" I got in, and he drove on; when we stopped I got out; he asked the fare; the cab-man said 2s.; he gave him half-a-crown; the cab-man could not give change; the gentleman said to me, \"Take the bundle out of the cab, and go down to No. 18, and stop till I come, and I will give you 1s.;\" I passed the policeman; he hallooed after me, and said, \"What have you here?\" I said, \"I do not know;\" he said, \"Where are you going to take them to?\"I said, \"That gentleman there told me to take them to No. 18, if you ask him he will tell you;\" we went to find No. 18, but could not, and he took me to the station."
What dress had I on?
What do you recognise me by?
Did you recognise me?
Malony said I was not the man; I am innocent of the charge.
My master left me with 5s.; I was obliged to pledge them; I told him I would redeem them, or pay so much per week off; I did not intend to steal them; he said he would do so at first, and then he would not.
I did not put the shovel there, and did not know it was there till I was put into the station-house.
I was in the market  a young man asked me to carry it to Batemans-row, Shoreditch, and he would give me 6d.  I told Richmond so, but he would not go there.
I was in a new house, and in came two young chaps, and said, did I want to buy a shirt; they said, \Give us the price of a gallon of beer, and you shall have it;\" I bought it, thinking it was a bargain: it was too small for me. I met Wade, and asked her to pawn it."
I picked it up under a horse's foot, and had it in my hand five minutes before, and no one owned it.
I was walking along, and the handkerchief fell at my feet.
Where was your property during the three weeks?
Did not I tell you on the Tuesday, that I thought of going into the country to work?
It is an unlikely thing that I should have broken open the prosecutor's box, and taken bis paltry clothes, when the things were hanging on a rail in the room for two days. The front is my own property; there were other lodgers.
I was coming down the street; there was a boy running; I followed him till I got near the corner; he turned, and threw this at me; I followed him, intending to give him in charge; when I got to the corner I missed him; I turned, and saw the prosecutor running, and ran down a court, thinking the thief had taken that road.
I picked them up.
I heard a cry, and went round like other people.
I picked these up on the shore; I should have gone back, and inquired who they belonged to.
I had left my tools on the job, and I asked Mr. Morris's son for the tools; he told me to get out, or he would jump upon me; I went and took these things in mistake.
I know nothing about it; I never saw the handkerchief.
I took a knife and fork, and began to eat my bread and cheese I left a knife and fork on the table.
I met three boys, and they asked how much I could get for the trowsers; I said I did not know. I asked this man, and he said 5s. I gave them to another boy, and he dropped them.
A boy asked me to put it in a bag. I had never seen the boy before.
Your mother said she was going to sell these trowsers, and gave you a pair of lavender ones in the room of these.
I bought the trowsers on the 2nd of May; the handkerchiefs and waistcoat I had about a fortnight before his mother came;  she and my aunt went to Stepney fair, and asked me to go; she said she would sooner go to the bottom of the canal than go home any more.
I did not put the paper down; I picked the half-crown up in Oxford-street.
I did not steal them.
I was going to the West end of the town; I saw a number of persons running; I ran and the officer took me.
I had got very little mixed corn, and was going to mix this when I baited. I was going a long journey; the horses had had green victuals, and did not care to eat corn: but they would eat this when they were out. Mr. Maxwell said, if the horses did not look well he would take the allowance off me.
We were both is liquor; how they came into my possession I cannot say  I was ordered on duty, and found them in my cap.
Can you swear to the comb?
I was on the bridge at eight o'clock.
I picked it up.
A young man gave me the coat to carry; he saw the young man with me.
Did you see me write that agreement?
I did not take it at all, it was somebody before me.
When did I say so?
I picked it up.
I was in the habit of going to the coffee-shop  I went in about five minutes after twelve o'clock, and trod on something screwed up in brown paper  I picked it up, and put it into my pocket. I remained about three-quarters of an hour reading the paper, and then went to work  I did not think at the time that I had committed a robbery, but afterwards I thought I had done wrong in taking it  I did not know how to extricate myself, and denied the charge of stealing it.
I was running after two boys when he took me, he did not find the trowsers on me  he ran after me with them in his hand, and the waistcoat he had afterwards  I do not know how he came by them.
It is the first time  I hope you will forgive me.
I did not know what I was about.
He says I had no money when I was taken  I had 3s. 4 1/2 d.
I am a hard-working country chap; I was working as a labourer at Notting-hill, putting in a bottom for a new road; I have worked on the line five or six years  as to being in Reading gaol, I do not even know where Reading is; I got the sack through getting a drop of drink; I went to seek for work about West Acton, and coming along a bye road I picked up the mould and knife wrapped up together; I went to Hammersmith, and showed it to three or four persons; one man told me what it was; I got drinking and showed it to five or six in the house; I did not know what trouble it would get me into, or I would have thrown it away; I told the policeman I picked it up; if I did say I was in Reading gaol it must have been when I had some beer in me, for I never was there, or in any prison.
She said at Worship-street, that she divulged this an hour before she died; and now she says it was an hour before I came in: she has spoken wrong all throughout. The only one that would speak the truth, a modest girl of sixteen, is kept at home. These girls are prostitutes, and the two men who live with them are supported by their prostitution. She never saw me begging.
Was she sitting down when I kicked her?
How could I kick her there without leaving a mark; nothing of the kind took place; I was too much intoxicated.
It is quite false  he has a malice against me  I took Eliza out of the streets, and they took her away from me, and wanted her to prostitute herself  Mr. Broughton said he could see it was a conspiracy from what this man said.
This man said at Worship-street that I was in Newgate twice, and had six months each time, which I defy any one to prove.
He has been convicted from this bar, and is well known at Cold Bath-fields.
He is afraid to say more for fear he should be turned away, for Black Jack is a lodger in the house.
She says she was only there three weeks before her sister died; she was there three or four months, and Mrs. Fleming, who keeps the house, turned her out, because she was out so late *
On the 4th of July I was at Mr. Sears's beer shop, the Wonderful Man, in Went worth street; I got into a row with an Irishman named Carney; I got the better of him, and black Jack came between us, and we fought; the deceased came between us, and he struck her in the chest; I afterwards went into the back yard, she was in a fit; and terr or twelve persons round her; in about half an hour she came to, and went up stairs; she went out with me next day, and was taken very bad; I brought her home, and asked one of the sisters to go for a doctor; she would not, and Esther went; the doctor said it was inflammation of the bowels, and ordered mustard and saw-dust poultices, and some stuff, for which I paid 18d.; she kept her bed that day, and next day we went out over London-bridge; she was taken ill again; I took her into a doctor's shop; he examined her, and said she bad miscarried; he gave her a draught, and I brought her home; she began to get better till the 19th of July, when she was very bad again, in Finsbury-pavement; I bought a piece of mutton to make her some broth, and a drop of wine; and she went to bed; I went to Mr. Byles's, and Mr. Hart came with me; they did all in their power for her; breath was not out of her body five minutes before the sisters Esther and Sarah began to blackguard me, and said I was a murderer; and if they could they would hang me; Mr. Hart said on Wednesday it was her mother's wish to have her opened; he did not come, so I went out to try and get a subscription to bury her; and when I came back they blew me up, called me a murdering rascal, and said she should be buried by the parish; Mrs. Pedley was there; I got no peace, and left them; it is all malice against me because I would not let her walk the streets; I had bad legs for some time; I would not go thieving, and was forced to beg to get an honest piece of bread; the medical gentlemen can say she was free from any disease when she died; this religious man was not called at the inquest, because they thought they could have it their own way.
It was not me, I was not Stratford at twelve o'clock.
It is false, I was at Stratford at the time.
It is false  I know nothing of the case, and when I was taken I did not know what it was for  I saw the witness about nine o'clock at Poplar  he whistled to me, and asked where I was going  I said to see for work  he walked to Sarah's-place, Brick-lane, with me, left me there, and went up Brick-lane  I went away, opposite the Pavilion  I met Mr. Watson, a plumber, and was with him from half-past nine till three o'clock in the afternoon  I never gave the witness the paper, neither did I know anything of it.
I know nothing of the orders.
It is false, I asked him what order he meant.
Mr. Goulder once gave me an order himself.
I believe I had two orders while I was with Mr. Goulder, one for Venetian red, and the other for red lead and sand paper; I have not been to the shop since; I know nothing of the papers.
It is false; I never was in this or any other court in my life.
How can you swear to the coat?
How do you swear to the coat?
There was only 1s. 6d. copper money.
I found the necklace and purse wrapped up in brown Paper in the New-road.
On Saturday three weeks I was in your cabin having a glass of spirits and water together; you said you were going to pay your mate off when the ship was going away, and if I went with you to the West Indies, times might be better when I got back.
The captain told me he should discharge his mate when the vessel was ready to sail; I called at the ship, and left these two printed forms on the cabin table, to be filled up. On the Monday I called alongside the ship; the mate told me the captain had not been. I went to the dock, and did not come back till half-past two o'clock. I asked the mate if the captain was there; he said no, he had been and had gone; but he said, \Here is something for you,\" and he handed me these two notes."
Either the mate or the captain have perjured themselves. I received these two notes from the mate's hand.
Did I tell you it was mine?
Did I borrow it of you?
I borrowed the tool to do a little job  I had a letter from St. Ives, and was engaged to go to work there, and having no money, I pledged the buzz to enable me to get down  I left word with my father to return it if it was asked for  I was at St. Ives fifteen days, and when I returned, was taken in custody  they never enquired at my father's, or they would have got it  I used the tool to do a small job for my father.
Did not I tell your master that as soon as I had done with it I would return it to him?
I was distressed, and pledged both the tools together I did not borrow them intending to pledge them.
Did not you hear two gentlemen talking to me?
About half-past three o'clock I awoke; my wife was asleep; she was very timid at a fire, and I would not tell her; I got up at day-break, and, when I got to the top of the court, saw two men with the bag; they said, \Do you know where the fire is, young man?\" I said, \"No, I am going to find it out;\" they said, \"So are we, if we knew where there was a public-house open to leave this bag;\" they did not say what was in it; they said, \"If any one would mind it for us we would give them 18d. for their trouble, for two hours;\" I said, \"I live down the court, and will mind it;\" I took it home, and went out to see the fire, thinking I should be back soon enough to give them the bag; when I returned the policemen were there; I thought I was in danger about the bag, and denied my name."
I never had it in my hand.
I was going down the road; the officer said I bad been picking this gentleman's pocket; I had no one with me.
I found the socks in the dust in the cellar  I took them up stairs to show to Mr. Pawson  he was gone to breakfast  I put them back  I was sent out, and had no opportunity of delivering them up  after dinner I was going to give them up  I could not see my master in the ware-house  I was sent out to Shoreditch station, and put the socks in my pocket  the bag I took out every day with goods.
I picked it up.
I saw a young man run out of a court and drop the coat.  I picked it up.
When I asked the time, what did you tell me?
When I took the cart, Mrs. Owen said it was half-past eight o'clock, and when I had done, he said it wanted a quarter to ten; he asked his wife if she had any small change; she said, no  he then said, \Here is half a crown, I consider that that will pay the job;\" his wife said I ought to have something out of that; I said, \"I am afraid not;\" when I got home I found I had been only an hour, and I gave my master 1s. 6d., and kept 1s."
The things were found at my house  I did not carry them there, nor know that they were there  I never had an opportunity of moving them from Mrs. Davidson, and I was never about her rooms.
I stopped and read for some time, and all in a minute there was something the matter next door  I turned round with the book in my hand, and was instantly knocked down by these two policemen, and dragged into the shop  I had not gone away from the stall.
I heard a person hallooing out  I ran, and the policeman stopped me.
I left on the Monday; I was not near the place on Tuesday.
I went out to night-work, and lost the half-crown; I came to work on the Tuesday and on Wednesday I told my master I had received it, and would pay it on Saturday.
I was going to look at the procession, and this man took me.
This man knew I was in the country at that time; I used to send letters to him.
Did I not say, \George, let us see about the plate before I go?\""
On the Monday the beer came in, I had rather more than I ought, which made me rather angry as I could not wait at dinner, and during dinner I broke a bottle of port wine; the next day I got notice to leave, and did not know what I was doing; I had no lock or key to my box; I had no more knowledge of these being there than a child, or I should not have asked the witness to see that the plate was right.
In passing this house, I saw a man run by and drop this handkerchief; I took it up and ran after him.
Was I not allowed to take a sack of chaff?
I saw these oats while I was getting the chaff, and I thought I would take them and give them to my horse, as they had no business there.
What dress had the person on?
Had you ever seen me before?
Fitch states that he gave it to a person that put it in the bag, and the person said he came from Mr. Vanner  how could I find it out  I assure you I am innocent.
How do you know them?
I had been talking to a man near the pump  he said he was going to call at his sister's, and if I would take these coats he would thank me.
I know nothing of it.
In 1832 or 1833 you had a shop at Blackheath Hill?
Mr. Wood paid me 6l. 19s. 6d.; I then called on some other person, and proceeded by the omnibus to Kensington, and was very near giving the conductor a sovereign instead of a shilling; I then took out my money, separated the gold from the silver, folded the gold in a piece of paper, and put it into my waistcoat pocket, and whether I lost it by disturbing my waistcoat or not I am unable to say, but when I got near Temple-bar I discovered the loss; I did not tell the prosecutor, because when I entered his service he held out an intimidation, that in the event of any deficiency I should have no mercy whatever shown me; it was my intention to have asked him for money to cover the loss, but an illness followed, which accounts for my absence from business; I sent him a letter, saying I was ill.
Did you lose sight of me?
Did I not walk down the street with you to meet the officer?
I utterly deny offering the shilling in the Three Tuns; I never was in that house in my life. On the 8th I went to the Grapes; I had a glass of spruce, for which I tendered a shilling, being one of five which I had in my pocket; he asked me a variety of questions, and on my refusing to answer them he threatened me with a policeman, and we went some dis-tance together.
I never had a light coat on.
Are you sure it was me.
I was standing at the corner of a street, that girl came and said, \That is the man;\" I said, \"I never gave you any bad half-crown;\" she said, \"I will get a policeman;\" I walked down the street, and the policeman came and took me; I had bought these bottles about five minutes before."
Why did not you follow me?
You said, \You have been changing your clothes; that is the boy, he has a black eye.\" You said I took the shilling out of your pocket. It is quite false; it is no such a thing."
I had been in three quarters of an hour, and the boy came in with a policeman, and said I had taken one shilling and a penny.
Might not any other person have thrown it down?
I went into a public-house; a man asked if we would buy a pair of trowsers; I bought them, as I wanted a pair.
A man came and asked me if I would earn 1s.  I took the canvas of him  he said, \This was intended for a private theatre near St. John-street, if you will pawn it for me I will reward you.\""
I was in the crowd; a lad chucked the handkerchief down at my feet; I asked the gentleman next to me if it was his; he said no, and I took it up.
Did you find the pork on me?
I had no idea of taking the pork; it was some tea and sugar I had in front of me.
There was another boy went into the shop; I did not see any handkerchief; when I came out I saw the boy again, and he sold it to me for 4d.; I had no money, and asked Cox to pawn it for me; he pawned it for 9d., and I gave him 1 1/2 d.
She is telling a falsehood; they asked if she saw the boy take them; she said, \Yes,\" and then she looked round, and said she could not see him."
A man asked me to carry a box, and as I came back I picked up these shoes; I did not know who they belonged to.
A lad ran past me, and threw them down close by me; a man said it was not me; the witness took me instead of him.
I was right away down at the other end of the mob  you said to the gentleman \Did you lose a handkerchief?\"  he said no at first, and then you said, \"This is the boy that took it.\""
I was not near you when I was accused of this  I never saw it.
I was behind the prosecutor; the lady said, \Have you lost your handkerchief?\" he said, \"Yes;\" I stopped, and they took me."
I was not the person.
I was coming along Shad well about nine o'clock at night, and saw a man chuck them into the road; I picked them up.
He said at the office that he saw me steal it.
A young man asked me to buy a handkerchief, and I bought it  the prosecutor came, and said, \Have you got a black silk handkerchief?\"  I said \"Yes,\" and he gave me in charge  I had had it a quarter of an hour."
I bought it on the road.
The prosecutor came and said he had lost it; I said I knew nothing of it; he said, \Should you come in contact with it, you will know who it belongs to;\" I found it afterwards as I was cleaning the sewer; I had to come to town with my master's horse; he gave me 5s. 1 1/2 d. for that; I came away without any money of my own, and I was obliged to get some refreshment out of my master's money, and having the watch I pawned it to make up the deficiency."
I was coming home, and a gentleman collared me, and said I had stolen the shot.
on took them out of the chest yourself, and laid them on the counter, then said that I did it.
Is there any mark on it?
I told him I bought it at Kennington; I told him the colour before he took it out of my pocket.
I got a severe fall down stairs, and was very much hurt; I asked her for 1s. 6d. to go to the hospital; I said I would take this blanket with me; I intended to bring it back.
A man said, \If you take it on shore, lay it against the wall, I will give you 4d.;\" he took the handkerchief off my neck, and tied it round me."
I was an unpaid servant, and had been working there a long time.
I was crying \Stop thief.\""
I was going up the street; a gentleman turned, and cried \Stop thief;\" I turned, and saw a lad running into the oyster-shop."
I was at the corner of Wilderness-row  the prosecutor turned and asked me for his handkerchief  I said I had not got it  he looked down and found it at his feet  there were several other persons besides me.
I bought it as I was going to work.
I picked them up.
I got up in the morning, and came down; I had no jacket on, no more than I have now.
The master said he did not think it was me  they took me to the station, found the duplicate on me, and then the master swore I was the person, and this witness came the next day and swore I was the man.
I was coming out of Goswell Street-road, and heard the cry of, \Stop thief,\" and ran."
How far was I from you?
I saw it on the ground, took it up, and put it into my pocket.
You have known me for many years.
I took it back at eleven o'clock at night  at Bow-street he said, \You left it in the street,\"  you were drunk, and did not know what became of it."
There were more trucks there; I took the worst.
I got a drop of drink and lost them.
I am very sorry for it.
A boy with me took them, and I ran away.
I was in Whitechapel-road  Jackson called me, and asked me to lend him a hand to shove the truck down to the turnpike, and he would stand two or three pots of beer  I said, \What have you got?\" he said, \"Marble chimney-pieces to pawn, at Mrs. Avila's\"  I lent him a hand, and he pawned them."
I entered his service not on a salary, but to have ten per cent on the profits, which made me consider myself a sort of partner  and he agreed I should take the ten per cent, every week  a few weeks after I said I did not want it every week, and he authorized me, if I wanted money to take it, and put it down in the book.
A lad said did I want to bay a saw? I said I had only 1s. I bought it for 1s.
I went with some paper; there was no one there, so I went out.
I did not have the money that time.
I did not receive it.
I knew nothing of the handkerchief till the constable took hold of me, and said I had robbed a gentleman.
The till was shut  he opened it  went to a woman and asked if she had taken some money  she said, \Yes.\""
I went to get a glass of soda-water  I had my hand on the counter  he said I had robbed him  I told him what I had, and asked him to search me  he would not.
I was formerly in the dragoons, and went to the barracks frequently, to see some comrades. I was very kindly treated, both by officers and men; they subscribed for a suit of clothes for me, and told me on the day in question, that if I went to the tailor, I should get them, and also some money. I was about getting into the police again; and it is not likely I should take these things, after such kindness. As I left the barracks a woman met me, gave me the clothes, and told me to say I had them from my wife, and I was to pass the night with her  she was a stranger to me; she told me to go to this shop.
Do you swear that is the shirt?
I did sell him a shirt, but it was not this one.
I was mending my own shoes, and her husband leat me his to put on; his wife said I had stolen them. I begged her to let me tell her how I came by them; she would not  seeing her in a passion, I picked up my knife and awl, and wax, intending to go up stairs out of her way; when she seized me by the hankerchief, and was in the act of strangling me. My wife ran down stairs, and I gave the knife and things to her. I begged of the prosecutrix to let go of my handkerchief, and she would not: her boy was behind, kicking me. I did not like to hit her, and pushed her against a barrow in the yard  I was obliged to strike her with my first twice in the eye before she would let me go.
I did not take it out of the premises.
I intended going to Tunbridge Wells that day, and thought the van started at seven o'clock, instead of which, it was nine; I sat down in the parlour; two persons came in; I went to the water-closet at the end of the yard; there was a man there; I waited two or three minute, till he came out; I then went in, and found the coat there; I brought it out on my arm, carried it directly to the parlour, and chucked it on the seat; I then came and stood at the door till the watchman came and asked about it; I said, \I have got no coat, there is one on the seat;\" if I intended to steal it I should have taken it away."
They had the half-crown for ten minutes, and might have mixed it with other money.
I never was in the house.
I was by the side of the railway, and I saw the train coming in  I ran to get a job, and was stopped.
I had the handkerchief in my hat when I was taken to the station, and I took it to wash myself with before all the policemen, which I should not have done if I had stolen it.
I had the stuff given me.
I went into one of the warehouses, and saw them loose on the head of a cask; I threw them into my hat, and the witness called me; I put my hat on my head inadvertently, and he asked what I had in my hat; I showed him them; I was going to put them where I generally keep them.
I had four sovereigns first.
I had got a drop of beer, and lost the 12l. out of my pocket and did not like to go back to my master; I was very sorry for it, and sent him a letter to say I would come back and work it out at 4s. a week.
I am very sorry it happened; it was through having a drop of beer; I am willing to go back and work it out.
A boy dropped it, and I picked it up.
Did I interfere with you before you did with me?
Did you observe the long boat?
I did throw him overboard, but it was after being challenged to do it.
It was not taken from my pocket.
I was looking in at the window, and the man came out and put it into my pocket; the prosecutor came out and laid hold of me.
Isaacs followed me home, and would have had me out of doors chaffing at me; directly I came down Davis seized me; they were both upon me at once; I got away from them.
Are you certain it was me?
It is quite false; they asked what I was there for, and I said, \On suspicion of robbing my master of paint and paper;\"it is all through the policeman."
I said master charged me with felony, but gave me the property to take to the house, and I took it there.
I had eight pounds of stone-coloured paint, to paint all the window-sashes down with two coats; it was not possible I could do it for that  he gave me the paint to mix on Monday, and said he should be there on Tuesday, but he did not come  I could not get on, and asked them at the shop to let me have a loaf and things, and when master came I would take the things away.
What number of coins were in the parcel?
What time on Saturday morning did you give me the parcel?
I was intoxicated.
The gentleman said, \You have got my handker-chief;\" I took it out of my pocket, and said, \"Is this your's?\" he said, \"Yes,\" and gave me in charge."
I bought them in Petticoat-lane, of a Jew, for 5s.; I left the stock at the pie-shop, and went to pawn the saw.
I was going down the street; I saw the handkerchief; the gentleman said, \It is mine\", and he said, \"Here, master, take this boy.\""
Did not another man come up and say the handkerchief was up the street?
You was sixty yards from where it was picked up; you told my mother you saw me drop it going along Beech-street.
It is a foot-road; I saw the rope and took it up, and he stopped me; I did not show any fighting; he got hold of my handker-chief, and knocked me down.
I went into the shop; I did not know whether they were playthings or not.
I received the money, and in coming back met two young men, one of whom I knew; he treated me with ale; he asked me to have more, and when he came out he asked what money I had, and I told him; we went into another house; he treated me with a glass of rum and water; one of them went out and returned; they made me drink all the rum and water; when I came out I staggered, and when we came to Bond-street one of them went away, and the other followed him; I put my hand into my pocket, the 3l. 16s., and a little handkerchief, which it was wrapped in, was gone.
I was with a man and woman in Drury-lane the night before; I had about 9s. in my pocket; we were drinking, and the woman asked me to stand some more porter; I took a shilling out of my pocket to pay for it, and gave it them; the woman said, I should not go to the expense of it, and the man came back and gave me the shilling again; in the morning I went to Holborn, and sold a man a pair of braces for 6d.; he gave me half-a-crown, and I gave him 2s.; I then had two half-crowns in my pocket and 1d.; I did not know there was a farthing in my waistcoat-pocket.
I bought the duplicate of a young man, and gave him the money to redeem the articles; he had pledged them.
I took it on the Saturday, with intent of replacing it on the Monday.
Are there not prostitutes living in your house?
On Wednesday, the 15th, I had been working twenty hours for Mr. Underwood, at the General Steam Office; it was half-past one o'clock when I came into Holborn; I went to bed; next morning, on coming down stairs, a middle-aged woman, who I should know again, asked roe to purchase the bellows; she appeared in distress; I gave her 4d. for them, and placed them where they were found; after work in the evening I went to my club, and stopped there drinking till twelve; I met a young woman, who said she lived in this back parlour; I gave her 1s.; I was very drunk; she left me in the yard; I could not find her, and went to the window and shook it.
Did not I tell you I found the ticket of the saw, and sold it to Preddy?
I picked up the ticket of the saw, with another, on the premises, as I was going to work on Friday morning; a man named Regan was with me, and I said to him, \Here are some tickets, I wonder who they belong to;\" I inquired among all the men, and they knew nothing of them; they could not make them out; the prosecutor was in the way when I inquired; I gave one up to the man I am employed for."
I did not steal it, it was picked up eight or ten yards behind me; I had just stopped to look at a man who was selling some things; when the gentleman turned round I had my hands in my pocket.
I have been fifteen years confined in a lunatic asylum, and at this period was labouring under a delusion; the confinement has since brought me to my senses; I did not commit the act with intent to deprive the gentleman of his picture, for I knew no more of what I was doing than a child unborn; I walked across the road and delivered it into the policeman's hands; I have no friend in the world, unless it is Mr. Cope, who knew me when I was in the Bluecoat-school; I had not tasted food for three days and three nights, and bad not a penny in my pocket.
Did not the policeman ask you if I was the man, and did you not say, \No, no?\""
You asked if I was the person and he said, \No, no.\""
I am innocent.
I am innocent of this charge; I was never in custody before.
I was never near the place, and do not know where it is now; I was coming towards them; if I had been guilty, I should have gone away.
I never had them; I should like the boy who saw them taken examined.
Does the shop belong to you?
Did you ever see me before?
How far was the turning from the place?
Did you stop me?
Does it stand likely that I must be the only person behind the prosecutor?
I was beaten very much before I made resistance.
I have not been convicted.
Do you remember, on the 14th of Aug., when you paid me my wages, you said, \Joseph, now we are straight?\""
Do you remember, on the 30th of July, when your brother ordered you to make out a bill for No. 28, Devonshire-street, I brought you the bill and a sovereign, I said the lady said she was not afraid to trust you with the change of the sovereign, and at the same time I gave you two half-crowns, 1s., and two penny-pieces?
I received the money and paid it to Mr. George.
Did you receive any extras during the three weeks?
Did you not give me the waistcoat?
She asked me to assist in unloading the goods, which I did  she asked me to come and lodge with her, as she had left her husband  they could never agree.
I meant to get it out again on the Saturday evening.
I was standing against the butcher's shop, talking to two little boys who sell rings; they went and stood by the picture-shop, and about half-past eight o'clock there was a cry of \Stop thief!\" I ran after them, and this man laid hold of me."
I never saw the man before; I was at work at the West India Dock at the time it happened.
I have witnesses to prove I was at work at the West India Dock at the time.
I asked him whether he would take the money, and I took it back.
This gentleman did not pay me at all.
I took the 5s. back to this gentleman and offered it him; he would not take it.
A man sent me in to sell it.
They were left under the bank; I did not thak it was robbing my master; the horse-cloth I should have put back in the morning.
I am innocent of anything of the kind; it does not stand feasible I could carry 4 1/2cwt. of lead; I was going to Romford that morning; I went there to ease myself.
Was I sober?
You said you were in the back parlour eating your dinner.
I was going home, and on putting my hand on the shelf for my things I found these leathers; I took them down; I thought I would bring them next morning; I did not know who they belonged to, or I should have given them up.
They were damaged potatoes; I was taking a few; I should have let him know of it; I said I believed they belonged to Mr. Mitcham, but I did not know till Mr. Lewis came down.
I was going home, and met the prosecutor, who said he had been robbed; I said I knew nothing of it; I had been drinking with a young man, but would endeavour to find them; I went home, after having a pint of beer, and had been in bed about an hour, when somebody came into the room where I lodge, and asked me to let him leave something there till the morning; I asked what it was; he said, \Two or three articles;\" I said, \"Put them down;\"I heard the pigeons make a noise, and said, \"Why you have got pigeons;\" he said, \"Yes, I will take them away about seven o'clock;\" I told the constable they were brought there after I was in bed; I had no pigeon-dung in my pocket."
It is false; he has a spite against me, and told the people he would transport me if he could, and would knock my brains out with his truncheon.
That is false; my wife has been and tried it, and the prosecutor knows it will not open it without forcing it
Did not the policeman tell you it was half-past nineo'clock?
My sister came to me at Mr. Cole's one morning before Mr. Cole was up, and asked for some money, and something else to make away with; I said I had nothing; she went to the cupboard and saw this pepper-box and salt-cellar, and asked me for them; she laid them on the table; I said she might take them if she thought proper; she pledged them for 9d., and made away with the money; four months afterwards she owed me a little spite, and she took them out of pledge, and took them to Mr. Cole.
Can you swear I am the man?
I was going along, and turned down Sutton-street; a young man rushed by me with great force; I heard a cry of \Stop thief!\" I cried too, and the roan stopped me; I said, \"I have got nothing;\" I can assure you I am quite innnocent."
I picked it up against the Railway station.
I was going home that Saturday night, about eleven o'clock; I passed by a crowd; I was going home again, and the officer came and said I had picked a lady's pocket.
I did not have it; I did not know it was there.
I picked it up in Moss fields.
Did not you state next morning that I was one of the persons to the best of your belief?
Is it not likely, if he was in company with this female, that she should take the pin; and then, to screen herself, say one of those men took the pin? If she was an honest woman, would she not have come the small distance of thirty yards to see about it, for these females are generally very fond of setting into any bother or any row?
I did not touch the cheese; I was behind the cart, there were tiro more in the cart; I was not near the shop.
I was not on board wages; I did not get my tea or breakfast on board, and I did not think there was any harm in taking the sugar.
Did not you promise me forgiveness if I gave you up the property?
On Monday evening I had been out with my wife, and returned home about twelve o'clock; our candle went out; I went out to see if I could buy one; I went into Brick-lane, past the prosecutor's; in coming back I saw this bundle lying by a public-house; I took them home, and made use of some of them; I gave the boa to a woman who deals in the lane, to see if she could sell it; she brought it back, and said it was stolen; the prosecutrix came to my house, and said she had been robbed of some things; I said I had some; she promised me forgiveness, and I did all I could to restore them to her; I never stole them.
A gentleman came to the station who saw the occurrence; there was sparring in the house, and he got wrestling, and was thrown down several times; two gentlemen came to the station and spoke on my behalf.
The wash-house door was shut, but not bolted; did I not say the things were yours?
I called on a young chap to take a walk; we were standing at the corner of St. Martin's lane; he told me to stop there; he went away, and came running down Long-acre with these parcels: he askd me to carry them, which 1 did where he told me, and the policeman stopped me.
I did not break into the house; two men asked me, about twelve o'clock, whether I would earn a few shillings, and said if I went with them they would give me 10s. and a few odd things they got; I said, \Very well,\" and afterwards they gave me 10s., the waistcoat, and handkerchief."
Was the woman there?
I was about twenty minutes gone; at the time I was taken I was 200 yards from the place, with my hands in my pocket; I never struck him with my hands or feet.
The policeman saw me half an hour after it happened; I was standing still when he took me; I asked him what it was for; I said I did not think there was any reason at all to take me  I never rose a hand up to strike him; as I was coming home from the Borough I went in to light my pipe at a public-house; the prosecutor was standing with both bands against the wall; I passed him, and as I came out he was standing against the wall; I went past him; he said to me, \Well, young fellow, are you going to stand anything?\" I said, \"I have no money; and if I had, it would do you no good to have more than you have;\" he put up his hand and said, \"The sooner you go the better,\" and struck me with his staff; he put me right before him, and made a violent blow at my bead with his staff; I stooped my head down, and he fell down on his hands and face on the road; I walked away to get clear of him; it is the first time I was ever before a Judge, and I hope it will be the last."
Might not some person have put it in, or it have slipped in?
I deny that.
You say you were sitting by the furnace?
I was only in the shop while I drank a pint of beer, and you had part of it  I went away and washed myself.
The pieces were parts of broken rings; it was my own property, which I have had some time; the filings were engine filings; I used to buy old gold when I had not much to do; I have bought and sold at Mr. Syrill's five or six years; the pieces I sold are not the same quality, by 15s. an once, as that of my master.
Did I not tell you I could not take 1l. for it before I asked the person?
Does it stand reasonable that I should take a painting that I knew was stolen to a pawnbroker's where I was known? I said a man gave hie the painting, and I could not take 1l. before I went and asked the person.
I know nothing of the handkerchief; he threw me down very violently; I had no handkerchief near me; he knocked my hat off, and took the handkerchief out of my hat.
I picked it up.
I was on the other side; this man took hold of me; a man came and chucked it down by my feet; a lady told him I did not take it, and he said that lady was one of my companions.
Where was I?
I never touched the lead; I was passing up Holborn, and this witness came running along after another man; the man ran against me; I shoved him off, or he would have knocked me down.
I did not know I had the half-crown; I knew I had 2s. 6d.
I went into the woman's shop for half a pint of beer; when I gave her the shilliug she put it into the till, and gave me 6d. and 5d. out; she did not tell me it was bad money; she knows herself that she put it into the till.
There was no conversation concerning any woman with regard to getting rid of them, nothing of the kind.
I picked them up, and had them in my pocket some days previous to being taken; I never offered them to any one.
I never saw the 18d.; 1 saw the 4d. piece, and was going to give it him, but he was not in.
I went to serve my customers, and came in again, and put my basket down; I put my jacket and waistcoat on, and went to serve my customers again; I did not know the bread was in my basket; it was bread that had been counted out to me; I had a good character; the witness knows I left a place close by to come to Mr. Mackness.
I went in for a bit of bread, and when I came out I saw the cloak lying by the door, and picked it up  I was about the streets; I did not know where to go, and was obliged to go begging; I went to the workhouse, but they would not take me in.
How long did you see me in the coffee-shop?
I was not in the act, neither did I see any one else in the act.
The lad asked me whether I would take the trowsers to Regent-street; he gave them to me at the top of Bedford-street.
I did not cut his hand, it was done in the fall.
I was drunk, and am very sorry for what I did; I have a wife and three children.
I helped a vessel on shore, and the captain asked me to have a basket of coals; as I was coming down the yard I met the police-man; that was two miles from where I got them.
I was out of work for a long time, and had been six weeks walking about the country looking for employ; I applied to the guardians of the poor at Greenwich for relief; they put me to break stones; I could not earn more than 6d. a day; I was taken ill on Friday with a pain in my side; the doctor ordered me to go back and pick oakum, by which I earned three halfpence; they gave me a place to sleep in not fit to put a dog in; I was in such a state I did not know what to do: I thought a prison was a better place.
I have not been in that neighbourhood since the 4th of July.
She saw me that evening at twenty minutes after six o'clock.
His word is not to be taken, he has been convicted of fdony twice; he has been out of employ two months; the policeman has been keeping him on purpose to swear away my life.
I am innocent.
I lost it, and did not like to return.
You were fighting with Nicholls.
I did not hit the policeman; I hit this man; he was fighting with another man at the same time; the man had been intoxicated; he knocked him down and ill-used him; the Magistrate asked if I would have a month or come for trial; I said I would be tried.
I make it my home.
I did not have it, and know nothing about it.
I did not have it.
I did not have the money.
I told him the horse would be home on Monday; I thought you bad come for a horse I had hired on Saturday to go to Deptford.
I had a horse to sell  on the 3rd Nov. I saw this party, and told him I should take it to market, and chop it away; he said he could make a better bargain than I could, and get more money for the horse; I said I intended to send it to Mr. Giddings; he said, \Mr. Giddings knows me well; I will take it and make a better bargain,\" and I let him take it; my little boy went with him to bring back the money, instead of which he came back with another horse; I gave him no authority to get me another horse; he said, \"I have brought you 22s. and another horse, do not you think I have made a better bargain than you would?\" I said, \"Yes,\" and gave him 5s. for himself; next morning he came up; the horse was put in my cart, but could not even draw the empty cart; it was not worth 5s. for work; I told him to take it back to Giddings; he said, \"No, do not take it there, you will get nothing for it; they have so many horses; if you take it to a man at Wandsworth, you will get 6s. or 7s. more,\" and I took it, and sold it to the gentleman; on the Sunday night Day came for the horse; I was surprised, for little did I think there was anything wrong; I told the gentleman I sold it to my right name and address; I had no knowledge it was got in this way; I have known Henley a month or five weeks; I have a wife and five children, and always worked hard to get an honest living."
I did not pass the two on the Tuesday night; on the Wednesday I gave her one, not knowing it was bad. Witness. I am sure he is the same person  he had been several times, and always brought the same sort of money, and we had remarked them always being new.
I get my living by hard work; it is well known that I am not in the habit of passing bad money.
I know nothing about the watch.
Where were you when I came to the ship?
Did you see me take anything?
The prosecutor was sent for by the master of the ship; I took the coat to look at it; I never stole anything at all; in two or three minutes afterwards I was out of the ship, walking gently, with my hands in my pockets; the man came and said, \Come back to the ship;\" I came back, and the prosecutor did not know he had lost anything; the painter only saw me touch the coat; he thinks I put something in the water, but did not see the box."
I was at Wapping pier-head; a lighterman went down the river; I asked him if I could lend him a hand; I went down to the West India Docks, and he gave me this rope.
I ogt the sovereign changed, and lost the money.
Did not you mark the money at the station?
I was at Miss Rogers's three weeks, and while I was there I often gave her money to take care of; I was saving this money to go to my brother at St. Helena, and that is what I said, not that he had sent it to me; when I was in the prosecutor's employ I threatened to inform against him, as he had stolen a shovel from the gas company he worked with two years ago; I told his wife I would inform against him; she said he would give me a lift somehow or other.
Was I not sitting on the step of the door?
I saw a man drop the things in the street and walk away.
The property was only in my possession a few hours before the inspector found me with it; I bought it, duplicates and all.
Did you ever see me before
I met a young man, who offered to sell me the watch for 5l. 10s.; I bought it for 5l.; he came to me again in half an hour, at a public-house, and offered me a gold chain very cheap; I bought two duplicates of him for 5s.; the man was like me, with long hair.
He asked the way to Whitechapel church; I said, \You are opposite it;\" he took me to have something to drink, and at the bar be wanted to say I had his watch."
I wish to ask, what she was going to the cupboard for?
What did I say when I first came into the kitcheo?
Did I express anxiety about her?
It is a mistake about my saying, \I am the murderer.\""
I told you at the station how the marks came on the handkerchief.
Did I not show you where the knife had gone through my arm?
Did you observe any bruises or wounds about her neck or head?
All I have to say is, I left work at nine o'clock in the morning; my leg being swollen, I went there as I had done the Tuesday before; I went down into the kitchen, and told them to make some tea; I made two jugs full, and waited for it to get cool to put into a bottle; I was waiting for the water to be boiled, to bathe my feet in the back kitchen; I sat down by the side of the fire-place, cutting a piece of old boot to put into the boot I then had on; my feet were swollen, and I was obliged to cut my boots about; as I was cutting the leather to go into the toe, my wife passed me; I made the remark to her, \Here is a state I am in,\" as she passed by me I received a most cruel kick on the side of my contused foot; in the agony I was in with my bad foot, she stumbled against me, kicked with her leg against my arm, and the knife went into my arm; I did not know I had thrust the knife into her, or what I had done, till I saw the knife there; it happened in the struggle, and when I saw what I had done, I was paralysed and horrified, and could not take it out; when the policeman came I said, \"I am the man: if anything is done, I am the murderer;\" I was truly hor-rified at what I have done; 1 was unconscious of using the knife; I never quarrelled with the woman, never put a hand on her the whole time I lived with her but once, six or eight years ago; on the Sunday I went down to make a separate arrangement with her and the child, as I had got permanent work; my sister asked me to stop dinner; I was anxions to get away, be-cause I felt more pleased that week than I had been during all my life, as I had permanent employ, to carve work for the House of Lords; I never put a hand on her; as she kicked up her foot, I put up my hand, and run the knife into my arm; I was in agony at the moment, and went to thrust her foot away; she went from the table to the cupboard, which will prove I did not follow her into the kitchen; I was paralysed at the evidence she gave before the Magistrate; she fell over the fender; it was merely accidental."
I know nothing about them.
Was I not meeting you when the other man was begging; did not you ask me if I saw a policeman, and I said no; the other man ran away, and you took hold of me?
I was in custody ten minutes before you came up.
I know nothing of the tools; the carpenter said he would transport me some time or other; the policeman did not pick the things up at all.
Was I not to have come to work on the Monday?
I was late; I took the sack to cover me; I meant to bring it back on Monday morning.
I found the things in the London-road, and put them in this place, intending to fetch them away as soon as the policeman was Off the beat  I never was near the house, and don't know where the other man lives.
If he saw me pick the pocket, why did he not take me; I was taken at half-past seven?
I told him I had been out with my goods all day; I know nothing at all about it.
I am not the party.
How often have you seen me in your house?
Did you not swear that I put it into my pocket?
I knocked on the table; she came in; I said, \Bring me a pint of beer;\" she said, \"You are not going to take that knife;\" I said I was not going to take it; I had both silver and coppers in my pocket, it was not likely that I was going to take a paltry knife; I have no pocket in my coat; I threw the knife on the table, and said I did not want it."
You know that I have a wife and family in the greatest distress?
The check was given to me by a young man to pass; he said it came from Mr. Scott, in the manner that I said.
I was offered 1s. to take it to Whitechapel.
Did you observe the first shilling was a bad one?
I worked for a man, and he gave me the sixpences.
I am innocent.
This woman took an apartment for me to show her a few recipes; I was there four days, and had only 10s. 6d. for showing her; on the last morning she asked me if I had anything to do; I said, \No;\" and I went away in her presence."
I bought them of a Jew, in Petticoat-lane.
You saw that I was tipsy.
I bought it of a man in the street.
A man gave them to me.
I picked them up.
I never touched it; he seized me, and it fell down.
I bought the articles.
I was in bed at the time.
They were given to me.
I bought the clothes of a man on board the ship.
Did you see my face?
I can prove I was at Woolwich the very day this happened.
I have had that knife twelve months, and the hat I bought on Sunday morning, 3rd Sept.
I was coming home about nine o'clock; I met a man who asked me to buy some meat; he set it down, I saw it was mutton: he said a farmer had had an accident with a sheep, and what was left I should have for 5s.; I bought it of him, not suspecting anything wrong.
I was coming along, on the right-Innd side of the way, running, and this man called, \Stop him!\" I did not take notice of him; I had had a drop ofdrink, and fell down; he collared me, and took me back to the shop, and asked the woman if it was me, she said, \"No;\" several persons said it was not me."
I was at home.
I had nothing to eat all day; I picked out some good ones and was going to roast them under the furnace, where the men often do so; I only had 9s. a week
Did not I borrow the boat of you, and some oars?
Did you not see Mrs. Clapham give me the sculls?
I borrowed the boat to look after my own boat; I rowed about for two days, looking for it; I left this boat at Limehouse, and in the evening, when I went to take her home, she was gone.
I kep ta very good home for my mother; I never ill-used her in my life; if I wanted to get rid of her, I could; I could have put her in the Union; she fell off two chairs a fortnight before.
They were not in my boat; the policeman put them into the barge himself.
The trees are very apt to hit against the till and make a noise.
I generally had 6s. or 7s. given me at Christmas, and I laid it all by.
Is there no other way in which you can identify me but by my hand?
Did you see me afterwards?
Did you see me go into Holmewood's shop?
I saw two boys over the wall breaking up the glass; the officer ran past them and took me.
, Have you not booked my bread on Saturday night?
He has been in the habit of booking my bread only on Saturday; if he had booked it every night I should not have had the money; I had spent 4s. of it, and had not got the means of settling it; he kept all ray wages, or it would have been paid.
I have sold Mr. Hanson 8l. 10s. worth of them.
A gentleman hired me to carry some things for him, and I borrowed the chest of Norman to take them in; there was nothing in it that I knew of; the knot was not mine; I had lost mine on the Friday before.
You only paid me two and a half per cent.
I asked you to lend me 3l. to buy a horse; you told me to come in the morning; you gave me four five-shilling-papers of halfpence and two sovereigns, and I went and got the horse  you lent me the money.
I spoke to the prosecutor about it, and said I would pay him for it; he said, \Very well.\""
I offered you 30s., and said I would give the rest at 5s. a week, and you said you would have it all at once; you saw me in the Rising Sun the same day.
I sold the mare, and lost best part of the money; I sent him part of it; he said he would have it all down; I have been in the habit of buying and selling horses for him before.
Did not you strike me three or four times?
Did not I tell you to take him in charge?
Fenge is a fighting-man; he struck me, and a man with a basket also; three of them said, \Turn him up and take it out of him,\" and I took out the knife; even now I would not give up the threepence, I would suffer death first."
I came in with a jacket, and asked the sailor to buy it; he asked if I was a sailor; I said, \Yes,\" but was hard up; he asked me to drink, but Connell pushed the pot away, and knocked off my cap, and tore my flannel-shirt; I had some things in my hand, and a case of razors, that I had bought the night before; I was drunk; she gave me a shove, and I fell forwards; she came at me again, and in pushing her back again this thing, somehow, got in contact with her eye."
It is false what he says about Mrs. Tyrie borrowing the money; no such words passed; I told him I had laid out 10s. for things, and when he came to work I would ask mistress for the money, and would pay him; he said, \Never mind, give it me any time;\" I said I could not ask my mistress for it then, as she was unwell."
When Mr. Tyrie gave me the 5l.-note I went to Adams's house with it; I saw his son and daughter, but he was not at home; I had several things to fetch in for the house, and as Mrs. Tyrie was not up, I made use of 10s. to pay for them, at I was dally in the habit of doing; my master did not pay me my wages when he went out of town, as he usually did; next Tuesday or Wednesday my mistress settled with me, and paid me 1l. 3s. 3 1/2 d.; Adams was not there at the time, and I neglected to pay him the 10s.; I did not do this with any fraudulent intention; if I had had the inclination to be dishonest I had plenty of opportunities; Mrs. Tyrie has left her reticule in the garden and kitchen, and I have owned it to her, and I have had Mr. Tyrie's coat to brush when there has been money and bank-notes in the pockets.
Mrs. Tyrie gave me a 5l.-note to change; I lost it, and borrowed the 30s. to make it up.
She states I was in the shop on Thursday, I was at another part of the town; I went into the shop on the Friday to have a cup of coffee, and gave her the half-sovereign; whether it was bad I cannot say.
I got change for a half-sovereign in a public-house, and they must have given me the bad money; I was in liquor, and had no recollection of being in the place.
You said you did not know me, but you thought you knew my coat.
Did the prosecutrix say she thought she knew my coat but did not know my face?
I met a person I knew; he asked me to have some porter, and told me to go and get two cheroots, and he would wait at the public-house; I went, and the half-crown he had given me was bad; I said I had coppers enough to pay for one: the lady went out, and I was going to the man I got the half-crown of.
I was coming home through Smithfield; I picked up a pocket-book and took it to a public-house in Cow-cross; opened it; and it contained these twelve half-crowns wrapped in white paper very carefully; a young man said he thought he could bring me the party who had lost them; he went out and came back and said he had seen the party, and if I would wait till eleven, the party would pay me for my trouble; at eleven o'clock the young man came and said, \Come along with me;\" I went, he said, \"Don't carry them in your hand, put them in your pocket;\" I said I had no pocket, I told him to carry them; in going along we met the policeman, he threw them down and ran away."
I was going to fetch some potatoes; I did not take the money up.
Did not you sing out, \My God! he has got two pistols.\""
Did you say anything to me when you came up?
I did not go to the house with any intention to hurt my wife; I have always told her since I left her that I never wished to hurt or injure her in any shape whatever; when I went in she sung out, \My God! he has got two pistols;\" there was one in each hand certainly, and she turned round and struck my right aim;  it never rose high; if I aimed at her would the shot have gone down on the carpet, or the lower part of the wainscot? the fact is the pistol was intended for myself; I lived a miserable life; I have been robbed of my peace of mind through that vagabond that was a witness against me, her brother; he has robbed me out of house and home; it has distracted my brain; I have never been a man since, and never shall be; the only crime I have to clear myself of, is wishing her an injury; if I was to meet him to-morrow, and see the opportunity, I would never rest till I gave that man an injury; I will have my revenge of him if I was going to suffer for it to-morrow."
I put down the same shilling; there was a butcher in the shop at the same time, who examined the money.
You said before the Magistrate that there was a marked difference in the upper part of the face between me and the party who presented the order?
Did you ever see me write?
Were you advised of the letter of credit?
You said before the Magistrate that the party who wrote it had not the slightest idea of forging your name?
, I did not present the check  I know nothing about it.
I was not there.
The prosecutor never saw me inside the house, but came and hit me in the court, and knocked my cap off.
I met a man, and gave him a shilling for them.
I bought them in Petticoat-lane for 1s. 6d.
On the Saturday the mate desired me to come down in the morning and sweep the main-deck; I did, and these two bottles were given to me by a lad who is gone to the Mauritius; the other bottle is the one that Gill tried to take from me.
Are they always sent at three o'clock?
Are you aware that we have General Post letters at other hours besides three?
In which of my pockets was the envelope, found?
Did you find the envelope in the first, second, or third pocket you examined?
Is it not customary for the back-seat men to throw them off into three's, as well as the front-seat men?
I was going into the office to the six o'clock duty, to do the first set, and not the second, as I told Mr. Sculthorpe in my confusion; I saw this piece of paper, gathered it up, and put it into my left coat-pocket; I did not deny having any postage-stamps; I had had three, a day or two before, one I sent into the country to my wife, and one to my brother in India; I never saw this envelope before I went into the six o'clock duty; the letter might have come up at three, but if it had come up at four o'clock it would not have come into my hands; the fourpennypieces I had for the convenience of giving change for two penny letters out of sixpence; one of them had been in my possession ever since the Friday, and the other I got in change from my dinner-beer; I do not know what letters were on the postage stamps; my drawer was left open from the three o'clock delivery till six; I had one postage-stamp there, if not two; I acknowledged having them in the first instance, and gave every facility for being searched; I did not know what the envelope was till it was taken from my pocket; I forgot I had it till it was taken out.
I saw him there, and thought he might be stealing tea; I took it, to see what he would say.
I said\ Confederate;\" I had a confederate, who received the from me; I was willing to give him up."
Can you swear I told you I was single?
What conduct was it?
, They used me most shamefully; I was only married three months when this woman came and said I assaulted her, and she tried to get me out of my employ at Mr. Bell's; I went several times to the house, and they told me my wife was in the country; they told me at one time that she was at Amsterdam.
Is it not a usual thing for the goods-train to stop at Shrivenham?
After we leave the station is it not usual to whistle to receive a right signal?
This bill arrives with the passenger-train?
Did I tell you where the porter lived?
Did I say I bought it for 5s., or it was bought?
We had a long train that evening; between sixty and seventy wagons  my duty was, when the guard blew his whistle to answer him  the wagon that they say this was taken from was covered, and if I had been in it I could not have answered the signal; it was impossible I could be in it and give a light to the guard; it was my duty to be in an open wagon; J could not go twenty or thirty wagons back; I am willing to bring the party forward; I bought it of a porter who said he had it from a packer on the Eastern Counties; it was given me to get raffled, but as they were living in a country place, they could not do so, and all that I could get more than 30s. I was to have for myself; I sent to Mr. Collard, and had he come to me, there is not the least doubt the whole of the property would have been restored.
I picked it up, touched you, and gave it into your hand.
A man hired me to take it.
I bought it in the street for 3s.
What time did the publican order the fiddler out?
Who was it that called your sister-in-law \A little cat?\""
That thing never struck him; he was struck with the handle of a knife.
Brown is my lodging-master, and took me to the raffle; the old woman who won asked me to sing; Brown said, \Don't sing; they are sure to laugh;\" I said, \"I don't care,\" and sang; a young woman said something; Brown said, \"You d  d b  ch, what are you laughing at?\" Seihler jumped up, and said, \"Be d  d if you kick anybody's backside while I am in the house; Brown said, \"That is nothing to you,\" and struck him with the handle of a knife, and Dale at the same time, right in the head, with the same knife; Brown had this instrument, and gave it to a young woman; I do not know what became of it afterwards; I was drunk; there were twenty of us in the room, and they all know that Brown knocked Seihler down, and struck his head; this thing is not for fighting; it fell out of my pocket, and Mrs. Brown picked it up; I did not know it was in my pocket when I left home; Seihler was never struck with it."
On the 30th Jan., the apprentice came and said that the Captain had given orders for me to sleep on board; he left in the morning, and said a man would come for this rope; he told me there was a pass there, and to put the old rope on it; this man came on board, and I asked whether he was the man to buy the rope, he said, \Yes;\" he was stopped at the gate, and after that I went home; the next morning I went down to the station."
I had them given mc to carry.
Was not the shovel you gave me as good as this?
I bought it for 6d.
I picked it up; I stopped a minute, and no one came up; I walked on, and the gentleman said, \You have got my handkerchief.\""
He asked me to get him a lodging, and I did to next morning he took his clothes off, and told me to take them home, and he went to an iron-shop, not two steps off; I sold the things to a Jew, came back, and waited to see him; the policeman took me; the boy is almost too big for me to manage.
The prosecutor has known me the last ten or twelve months; he has lived in the same house, and he known that he never saw me that night.
Did you see me?
I came out of a public-house a few minutes after twelve o'clock, and went home directly.
I was in the last bed but one in the room, and the person in the next bed told me there had been an officer after me; at twelve o'clock I saw H 52; he saw me come out of the house with an old cost and a pair of slippers on; he has known me to have an honest character.
He gave me the money to get the tops and bottoms, and when 1 got there there was no money; I did not like to go home; I staid in London all night; I went down the next day, and got into the barn where he found me.
The warehouse was locked up  I was going to take the plates to the other warehouse, and went into the coffee-shop  a number of these things my mother has had for years  Mr. Hardwick never had any cups and saucers of this shape.
I was at Islington all day until a quarter to six o'clock.
A chap ran by me with a smock on, and they took me.
You told me to take it away, and do as I liked with it.
Did not you accuse the people next door of the robbery?
I have had the salt-cellars ever since I have been married; the stockings were clean and mangled when he took them; my wife has had things of Mrs. Solomons' for a week together.
You stated before that Mr. Hester came out to me a second time, and then I struck him?
I deny that I reversed the position of the knife; I admit that I struck him, but I had no idea of striking him with the knife; I was in liquor.
I had occasion to go into the top room, which is called the paper-room, to take a ream of post paper to complete an order  I went to my tea at five o'clock, and returned at half-past five  I found the ream of paper in the workshop where I had left it  I worked till seven, and then left it there.
I had no shirt, and be lent me his to put on while I had mine washed.
I bought the boots; I had had the knife three or four days; I worked for a man who has got three months.
I left Harwich on the Thursday before, and staid at Gravesend  I then went on board  I had my little bandbox with me and my child; my child's things were in my box  I live with my mother  I came up to take a little money that was in the Savings' Bank to pay for the schooling of my other child  my husband is at sea.
When I came out, did you see anything on me?
When I came to the door the landlord was at the door, and a boy  I asked what time it was  if I had bad this, they must have seen it.
I said I had chucked the housing over the hedge, and it did not belong to you.
I picked it up, and thought it was no good to me, and I chucked it over the hedge  I then thought it was a pity it should lie there  I returned, and went inside the gate  this man forbid me to get over the edge  I said I had chucked my housing over, and I would go and fetch it  I went with it, and met the man, I said, \Does this belong to you?\" he said, \"Yes; I missed it from one of the horses.\""
There were some boys getting some iron; I did not get it; the others ran away, and he took me.
I was coming down Coburg-road, and there was a policeman coming along; I passed three yards by him, and he hallooed out, \Stop thief!\" I asked what he wanted me for; another policeman came up and gave me a punch on the head."
They swear false; I picked up the shoes.
Was not I talking to a female when you came in?
Did I ever get business?
Previous to seeing you I saw your wife.
I have been on that road many years; I never had anything happen to me before; if the money had been given to me I would have accounted for it; I declare I never saw it, whether it was there or not.
What coat did you find the shilling in?
. I had half-a-crown, for mending a pair of boots, from William Clunie; I changed the half-crown with a fruit-man, and got the 2s. from him.
He said he thought it was me.
I did not say No. 1; I said \The young woman over the way.\""
. A young woman asked me to go; I told Mr. Thornett it was a young woman across the road; he said it must be No. 1, at Mr. Stevens; I said that was where the young woman stood.
Did you not say that you gave me a sixpence and a 4d.-piece?
. I was never in the habit of doing wrong; I have got an honest living; I was in the army two years, and was discharged on account of the reduction.
He only gave me 1l. 10s. 3d.
He said two or three times it was right.
You said you knew nothing about it.
Was there not a man went in before me with a sixpence?
What were you doing when I went into the shop?
You saw the three of us run away?
I had no knife; it was a ninepin which I used at my work.
I did not use a knife; that is a thing I never carry about with me; it was a ninepin.
I should like to be transported.
You were not in the room; you have perjured yourself; you are not a married woman.
After I had been married four weeks, I found my wife was an inveterate drunkard; she once took up a carving-knife to stab her brother-in-law, but was prevented; she has made away with all my furniture and clothes, and has been charged sixteen times at Marlborough-street; of her incontinence, my bad health will testify; she said a man named Murphy wished her to leave me and live with him; I did not know there was a knife in the room till I was charged; I confess I gave her two or three blows that night, for which I afterwards asked her forgiveness; for a considerable time I have had doubts of her sanity; she once threw herself out of a cart, and the wheel of an omnibus injured her head, and twice she tried to throw herself over Westminster-bridge; her late husband destroyed himself, her bad conduct preying on his mind.
Can you swear that I am the person that was in your room?
But you cannot swear that they were moved?
As I was going to work, about four o'clock in the morning, I heard a cry of \Thief!\" I was close to the house  I went round the corner, and was instantly collared by a policeman, who ran across the road  nothing was found on me, not even the means of getting a light  I was never in the house."
How long after I spoke to you on the rank was it that you took me to Mr. Unsworth?
Did I mention to you the name of Mr. Cahn?
Did not I tell you I was innocent, and that the young man wished to give the bills back to Messrs. Cahn and Co., of Paris?
Did Mr. Unsworth make any observation to you when he delivered the bills?
Did you find the letter containing the bank-note?
I never was in the shop; he said he was not sure about it.
He knew me before, and has a grudge against me.
Will you swear it was cloth I had?
I was only in there a second before he came, and he did not find the cloth; I never went out of the shop; I never bad the cloth, nor do I know anything about it, I was not in that street.
My master stopped 5s. for this.
Why did not you follow me down the court?
Are there others marked as this is?
I stole them to go to Church in.
How do you know it?
Were you not in a state of drink once or twice when I came in?
Did you not say Taplin suited you very well?
The silver was between the copper, and I did not know it was there till the policeman took me; Taplin was in a state of liquor, and said he did not care a damn for the place; I am not in want myself.
He was quite tipsy when he came; and I told him if he did not go away I would get a policeman; I went seventy or eighty feet from him; he kept following me, and jobbing his fingers in my eyes; I could not go a step further without falling fourteen feet.
Was Neal drunk?
.I had not been in the wine-cellar that day; I had not been in the room since the morning; I left the key in the door; there might have been a dozen people down in the cellar.
.I met with an accident by falling from a scaffold, and had a fracture in my head; and when I have a drop to drink, I do not know what I am about.
.I picked them up.
.I came from Hamburgh; one of the sailors gave them to me.
I bought them for 5s., of a man who said he had them for twelve months.
Did not you ask the customer if it was ordered?
I had had a great deal too much to drink, and did not know what I was about.
There were eight boys.
I never touched him at all; I only pulled out the knife to frighten him, and he ran against it, and stuck it into his arm.
I did not mean to stab him, only to keep the blows off; he ran at me with his head down, and stuck the knife in the back of his shoulder.
My son told me that he brought the table-covers and things to my house unknown to me; I did not know they were there.
I did not charge Mr. Matthews 5s.
I received 5s. one week instead of 18s., and you said if there was any mistake we were to come to you the next week; I was away ill two weeks; \Salter\" was called, and I went in and took the money."
We lived together six or seven months as man and wife.
We lived together six or seven months; she then left me and went to service; she wrote a letter to me to ask me to come to her; I went, and she gave me the money to bring the accordion; she said, \If I give you the other two duplicates, will you bring them back on Sunday week?\" I said I would, but instead of waiting the fourteen days, she gave me in charge."
I saw it lying on the pavement, and picked it up.
I never was in the house before in my life.
I gave her a good sixpence; I should not have taken the shilling back, only I saw she had a bad sixpence in the till, which I thought she would have given me.
Massey speaks nothing but falsehood.
I heard two females say there was a strange man in the house; I went in, and they took me.
I am sorry for it.
Did you shut the parlour-door when you answered me?
The prosecutrix came down, laid the steel and knife on the table, and sent for a policeman.
How long have I been in your employment?
Have not you said that three men rescued the bag from you?
I heard of the robbery, and being destitute and forlorn, I gave myself up, and said I had done it; I picked up the half note in Houndsditch on Wednesday afternoon; I did not have the meat; I made up the story on purpose to get shelter.
It was not me, it was my cousin.
If I had time I could bring the person here that I had that watch from; he has been here every day this week; he must be ill, or something the matter. I was at home that day till half-past five in the evening, when I went down Petticoat-lane and was taken; this watch was found because I did not give it up at the station.
I bought the eggs; I did not know the spoon was there; when I unlocked the box my master wished me to take all my things out, which I did; if I had known the spoon had been there I would not have kept it there.
I am as innocent as a child; I did not know the spoon was there; if I had, I should have objected to unlocking my box.
She said she did not want to give me into custody, but she had lost so many things before, that the next that came she would make him pay for all.
I brought the soap from home; my father is in the same trade.
The young woman was very tipsy, and I asked who was going to sleep with her.
I did not touch a knife at all; my fist was sufficient if I wanted it; I never had any dispute with the prosecutor.
I worked hard for the money.
I said I had nothing to say to you just then; I was going down to Romford on the Wednesday; I saw a man with some beasts and the sow on the road; the sow ran on before the beasts; the man told me to follow it, and put it in at Mr. Carson's, and all I could get above 30s. for it I might have; I went there and sold it to Mr. Harmer; I took the money, and went back and met the man with the beasts; I gave it him, and he gave me half-a-crown; I went round the same day and got work.
He came up to me, and asked where the articles were that I had taken out of his kitchen; I said I had not taken anything; I would go and see where I was drinking last night.
He asked me what that servant wanted with me, and I said it was about that paper-knife, and I said if I had a written agreement I would give it up; this man's word is not to be taken; he was turned out of the police, and the riding-school at Woolwich, for his bad conduct.
Did you search a place where I had been drinking?
I drew the money and lost it.
Were you near enough to hear me whistle?
I had been to a person's house, and took tea; I went to the witness's house for a quarter of an ounce of tobacco; I offered the half-crown, believing it to be good; they gave it me back; I went out, and met my friend; we walked on rather sharply, and Mr. Winfill came up and gave me in charge.
I was going to seek for work; as I was walking along the road, the man called me, and said, \I want you;\" I turned to him, and he had the trowels in his hand; he took hold of me, and said he would give me in charge; I freely accompanied him to the station."
I had no intention to defraud Mr. Shaw; I meant to pay him. I am sorry; I should have paid him if I had had time.
I lost the money, and did not like to come back; I intended to have sent the money if I had got work.
I lost the money.
I lost the money; I did not like to tell my mistress.
I took it in a public-house; I did not know it was bad.
Can you say I was the man?
You took the 5s.-piece out of my sight for a quarter of an hour, and said you would go and get change; you left me in the shop; I waited for my change, not supposing it was bad; I do not believe it was.
I gave a satisfactory account of where I got it from; at the station you stated that you went to a public-house and got this 5s.-piece in change for a sovereign.
I was not there at the time she states I gave her the shilling; I was at Finchley.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
Did you not take me on suspicion of picking a gentleman's pocket?
When he found he could not get the handkerchief against me, the gentleman brought up this print.
I never saw him till he gave me into custody.
How long have you known me?
I bought the duplicate of a man at the Adam and Eve, for a pot of beer  I never saw the things.
I bought them of a dealer in Smithfield; I hired the shed to put them in; I sold the wheels to the best advantage.
While I was in your service did I not behave honestly?
I am innocent of stealing the desk; I am guilty of changing the note; the baker has known me for fifteen years; this is the first time I have been charged with doing anything wrong; no one saw me take the desk; my brother-in-law lives at Liverpool; I went there to get another situation.
Did you see me with the ball?
Did you not say you thought I was the man, but you did not know?
Was any one with me?
What time was it?
Did I not tell you I borrowed the money of Mr. Wylde, and that I never named I was a detective officer or the name of police at all?
What time was it?
Mr. Wylde told me if I wanted any money to come to him for it; if it had not been for that, I should not have thought of borrowing it  I asked him to lend me the 2l., and said I would repay him in a few days  I did not use the word police or detective.
When was the first transaction I had with you?
Was not the first transaction I had with you for a portrait by Gainsboro'?
Did you not give me leave to have letters addressed to me there?
Are you not aware that since I gave that agreement I have had several interviews with Mr. Levi?
I was coming down from the barracks as hard as I could; a man collared me, and asked what I was running for; I said, \To get towards home,\" and he said I must come with him; I went to Mr. Henderson's, and was given into custody."
It was given me by two soldiers.
I was in Long-acre, and was asked if I would earn a few halfpence by pledging the telescope for 15s.; I went, but could only get 5s., and was taking it back, when I met the policeman; I thought if I said it belonged to my father he would let me go.
As to being acquainted with the house, I have never been inside it since I came from India, and it was not built before I went.
Did not you meet me about twenty minutes before ten o'clock?
On the day the robbery was committed I was at Stratford; on Sunday, 13th, I was going to work at the Barnes railway station, when I met the policeman and Mr. Gregory; I have never been at Roehampton since.
I heard the cry of \Stop thief!\" I ran, and another officer stopped me, not this one."
The shop-door is round the corner; if I had gone in, he would have had to have seen through the other shop.
He asked if I had seen the third party; I said no, I had seen no one but the prosecutor.
I was coming home and saw this man; we walked together; he did not walk quite so fast as I did, and another one whipped across; the prosecutor came up to me and said, \Where is that man?\" I said I had never seen him, only he whipped across the road; I had never touched the prosecutor, I walked before him all the way; he has brought me up to get his own expenses."
Did you not authorize me to get the fat, and take your things to the \Blade-bone,\" and get money on them; and you would give me your wages when you got out?"
When I took the belt, did you not ask me whether I was going to take the cook's clothes?
Did I not say I sold it for 8s. 2d. to pay his expenses, and tell him where I sold it?
I received money on board one ship, and on the other they did not pay me  I lost 1l. 18s. by one emigrant ship.
I did not know the money was bad.
Were there not many other persons there?
It was a soldier that called for two glasses of gin.
I was in liquor; I gave a sixpence, not knowing it was bad; I took it the same evening; one of the persons in the tap-room dropped this shilling; I know nothing of it.
Did not you mix my money with some other?
I started from London to go to Ascot; I called at public-houses, where I showed this machine, and got a few shillings; I got some drink, and did not know that I was passing bad money, or that I bad it; I have got my living by this machine for some time.
Did yon not put it into the drawer?
I gave the servant the shilling, and you tried it with your teeth, and threw it into the till with other shillings.
Do you remember falling down-stairs?
My wife received the hurt from a fall; she said she recollected it; we had been drinking for two days, and she was very tipsy; we have three children, who are now in a state of starvation.
She went to the hospital, and came back, and went to a public-house, and I went in to make an apology to her; she struck me first, and called me bad names.
Did she not strike me with a key?
I am not the party.
Did not I see you on the Monday?
I ordered the beer to be sent down; the landlord said he would send it when the lad came in; I met the girl and sent her for it  I had my hands full, and could not give her the money; I did not see the landlord afterwards.
Was she able to attend last Sessions?
The first lot I had was half a quarter, my mistress gave me 2s.  I had 1s. 9d. to Mrs. Hill, and returned the 3d. to my mistress  after that I had the two bushels and six bushels.
Can you swear that nobody told you there was some one in the cab?
Did not the policeman ask you who was in the cab?
It is quite true; I plead guilty to the stealing, but not breaking open the door.
I found the articles in this sheet as I was coming down-stairs, rolled up as it is now; I did not know there were twenty sovereigns in it; the officer knows that I could not tell him what was in it.
About three months ago I was coming down Cheapside, I picked up the brooch wrapped in three or four pieces of paper; I owed Mrs. Duncombe a little money, and said she might have it; two months afterwards, the policeman stopped me; I waited one hour and a half at the station, and then he made this charge; I thought it was an article of no value, and I did not advertise it; I have been three weeks in prison.
Do you know Sparks said he would take my life from me?
The words commenced between me and Sparks, between 3 and 4 o'clock; one of the chaps said Sparks took three shirts and a jacket, and three razors, and half a pound of soap; I missed them, and told the mate, who sent me on shore to a policeman; then Sparks went on the main deck, and pulled off my jacket; be began quarrelling, and strack me; that was the commencement of it.
I went to a tub of sugar, and took the five shillings and a penknife out of my waistcoat-pocket to put it into my trowsers-pocket  I came to the end of the counter, and my mistress said to me, \What have you in your hand?\" I showed her the five shillings; she said, \"This is my husband's;\" I said, \"No, it is my own; I brought it out of my bedroom this morning;\" the policeman knows that I went back, and took my penknife."
I told you I had left a penknife on the counter?
How can you swear to them without any marks?
The policeman asked the witnesses to come against me, and said they would have 3s. 6d. a day.
What did you first say to me?
What did you say when you first came to me?
When I met Hawkes, I told him if he had any doubt he should take me into custody, and bring me before a Magistrate, and then I should try to throw as much light on the subject as I could; but there was no evidence to prove that I stole them, or received them knowing them to be Stolen; I should be much obliged to the officer if he would state what he said; I told him he should have no direct answer from me; I said, \I don't think you have any right to stop me; if you have, take me before a Magistrate;\" he did not think proper to do so, but sent another officer with me; I have been remanded for seven weeks, and never had a chance to get any friends; I did not tell him that I was brother-in-law to William Johnson, nor that Mr. Johnson was the party that bought the sheep; he says that I said I saw Mr. Johnson buy the sheep  it is totally false; I have never seen the man, nor do I know there is such a man living; the officer was actually drunk when he came to me, and he insisted on calling at every public-house, and on my paying, as he was altogether incapable of taking care of himself or me; he said if I turned the sheep into money, he should like to go into the business of droving, for he thought it was better than being a policeman, he was tired of it, he could not get 1l. a week, and I think that a man's liberty is not to be sworn away in that manner; I leave my case in your hands, and ask you if you have a witness to prove that I stole them, or knew them to be stolen."
I met the prosecutor in St. John-street; he asked me to carry a stove for him which he had purchased, and I went with him; two or three days after this, he asked me to go to his place to drink; he was taken to the police-court, charged with robbery, and was discharged on account of being in liquor; I met him in Coppice-row, and he said, \George, you shall suffer for this;\" I asked him what about; he said, \"Never mind, you shall see;\" the same day his son came to me, and said, \"George, my father says are you not going out of the way, there are two policemen after you?\" I asked what for, and he said, \"For entering his dwelling-house;\" I said I had done nothing to go out of the way for; and he said, \"Well, that is all I know; my father has told you to go out of the way;\" I was there all day Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, and Thursday evening, passing Mr. Jackson's backwards and forwards, and he never said anything to me; I saw the prosecutor's daughter on the Monday morning, and she said nothing."
Did the policeman tell you you were to mind what you were doing?
I was passing the prosecutor's premises, and saw a man there, who asked me to take the two horses to the farrier's, and he would give me 6d. for it; they would not stand still while he fastened up the premises, and I got on the horse's back, and led the pony; I could not get them both along, and took the pony back to Mr. Wood's; I took the mare, and met Cope in the Bow-road, who asked me whose horse it was; I said, \Mr. Watson's,\" and that he was going to give me 6d. to take it to the farrier's; he said I must come back, and I refused; he laid hold of the horse, and I either fell or jumped off, and said I would go for a policeman; I told the policeman, and he wanted me to go back; and the policeman told Cope he must mind what be was after; when I got to Mr. Wood's, he gave me into custody."
Did you ask me to put the watch on your neck?
I wound up the watch, and returned it to him while be was paying for the drink; I have got a pension of 5l. a-year, and was on the boat going to receive it next day.
I was out with the prosecutor; we came in at half-past 9 to answer to our names, and he then went out, having laid the watch under his pillow; I took the watch, followed him, but could not find him; I stopped out till it got too late to go in, and by the morning my money was all spent, and I pledged the watch; I had no intention to steal it.
The boy that was with me opened the door, and there was a window open; he took the waistcoat out of the window, and put it under his coat; I had only a jacket on.
I heard a cry of \Stop thief!\" a man ran out of the shop, and threw something into a greengrocer's; I went in, to see what it. was; a woman picked them up, and took them inside; I ran after the man, but was stopped, and given in charge; Gosling said at the station he should have known nothing about it if he had not been told."
Do you not know that the carmen leave ropes at the tollgate when they have not got money?
Did I not tell you what I had got, and where I was going to take it?
Robinson used to come to the river, and point out timber, and ask me to take the ropes, and take them out one by one; and be told me the junk was perquisites; I have never taken anything without his knowledge. The prisoner re-called
I picked up the handkerchief under my feet, a considerable distance before I came to this man; I put it into my pocket; the gentleman crossed the road, and said, \You have got my handkerchief;\" if said, \"Very well, if it is yours, here it is,\" and gave it him."
Does any other person serve in that shop?
Was I drunk?
It is very curious that this woman would not press the charge against me; I never took the money off her counter; the policeman found no shilling on me; the half-crown I know nothing about; I sold my coat that day; the half-crown might be put upon me; I do not know.
Had you missed any things before?
How do you know it was me?
I am innocent; Mr. Nevett bad the opportunity of seeing me any day for at least a month before I was taken; I was in a place of work when I was apprehended; I know nothing at all about it.
I do not deny receiving these sums, but I never paid them in.
She left me three times; a man that she lived with at Ryde bad to go to prison for two months for beating me; I never ill-used her in my life; when I came here I asked her if she lived here; she said, \Yes,\" and it put me in such a passion that I knocked her down; whether she took the poker first, or I did, I do not know; I wanted my child, I did not want such a wife as that; the eldest child I left at home; it is between five and six years old."
Can you swear I am the man?
You are a cab proprietor?
I took a fare to the Surrey Theatre, and was coming up the Borough-road on the near side; there was a wagon before me; I passed it, and, before I had time to get to the other side, there was a chaise, coming down; I pulled to the off, to avoid them, and called to them, but they paid no attention to the hallooing I made, and came right on my horse's shoulder; they knocked my horse down, and cut a wound in his shoulder, an inch and a half wide, and three inches deep; their wheel cut my wheel, which knocked them back in their chaise, and their horse fell, and knocked the shafts off; my shafts never touched their horse; it was their wheel which did it; I had stopped at the time they came on me; they did not know where they were going to; they were first on one side, and then on the other; a young man who lodged with the deceased, and paid 3d. a night for his lodging, somewhere in St. George's-in-the-East, can prove that he had been an out-patient of St. George's Hospital some months; and the veterinary surgeon who came up and dressed their horse, and the sergeant who was at the station, can speak as to their state.
What was the value of the goods altogether?
When you were a bankrupt for nearly 2,000l., you swore in the Court you were not worth 20l., and you took the benefit of the Insolvent Act?
Did you receive the goods from me?
The goods were sent by another boy, and were never in my possession; I own I did pawn the goods; I got 2l. 10s., another party got 2l. 10s., and the boy had 10s.; I offered to pay the money back, if Mr. Dankley would forgive me; I have done several things for him, in getting him loans and other things; I sent Mr. Dankley a letter, to say he should not lose one farthing; these goods are the property of his creditors; there was from 500l. to 600l. worth of property he kept back, at the time he took the Insolvent Act.
When your niece brought it you, what did you do with it?
The sovereign I gave was a good one.
I was at work on that Monday night; I did not come across the water before 9 o'clock at night.
You said I was in your house on the 26th?
I acknowledge to having uttered the shilling  I do not know anything about the half-crown; when they told me the shilling was bad I gave another directly; I had taken the shilling about five minutes before.
I had not been in the house before; I was asked by a young man if I would have a drop of beer; I did not pay for it.
He paid me 5l. and left the 2s.; there was a discount.
Was I paid only by salary?
He owed me 16l. 18s.; I debited myself with this 4l. 17s., and gave him the account in.
I brought my own connection to him; I had a respectable trade, some of the first publicans in town; he gave me 2l. for a salary, and a commission; he thought I was getting too much, and he dropped my salary; his son knows it, and he has kept his son away; he put me on commission altogether; it ran on, and I found that this commission was not enough; I expressed my dissatisfaction to his son, and he said, \Go on a little bit;\" I acknowledge to the money that Mr. Snell paid: twelve months ago I went to Mr. Larchins, and saw his son; he said, \"Have you made out your, bill?\" I said, \"Yes, and I want my money;\" be kept trifling with me, and desired me to find some empty barrels, which I did, and sent them home nine months ago; this I am prepared to prove by Henry Larchin, but he would not bring him in Court, nor Mr. Woodgate; this is the first time I was charged with anything against my honesty; I believe it is a concocted scheme got up by the wine doctors; I think I was justified in holding back this 4l. 17s. when there was 16l. 17s. owing to me on my commission; a commission man has a perfect right to pay himself, if he debits himself with it, and credits bit employer; he knows if his son came in Court, and he was subjected to a cross fire, he would not succeed well; I never shunned their office, and never heard anything of this till the wine merchant threw down the gauntlet"
For two months I received no salary; there is 16l. due to me; his son was before the Magistrate; I called him twice, and be skulked out of Court; I wanted to call Mr. Woodbridge and Henry Larchin, junior.
What time in the day did I call first?
I never said the words that are attributed to me; I never named Mr. Alexander, but on one occasion he asked me if I knew Mr. Alexander; I said I knew him by name, that was all; I went there as every other commercial man does, under the impression that it was a respectable house; I said, \I am a commercial traveller;\" he was very glad of my proposal to sell for him; he gave me four samples; I did succeed with one, for fifty gallons of gin, at 9s. 2d., to Mr. Wells, of the White Horse; I told him I had effected this sale, and I supposed his were the usual terms of the trade, provided he was satisfied with the respectability of the man; I told him I should require the original sample for Mr. Wells; that always ratifies the transaction; he refused that, and I told him I could not lose my time any longer, I would go elsewhere; he said his brother would be borne in a few days, and I expected his brother would be no better than himself; all my expenses were out of my own pocket; if he had applied to Coding's and found the man not entitled to credit, I would have sustained the loss, but he has never tried it, but in his own stupid way; he deprived me of the money I spent, and the commission."
What time was it I came to your house in the morning?
Did I not walk up North-street with you?
Did you hear me ask her what she had done with the bill for washing?
I went to her house on the Wednesday evening to see if I could get any money for my wife's washing; she began to plead poverty; I had two duplicates in my pocket, and I asked her what it was besides the shirt that was on one of them; I thought it was a shift, and I asked her whether she would buy it or not; she told roe she had sold a clock the other day, and she asked me if I had sold mine; I said no, it was in pawn; she said, \Perhaps I could sell that for you, will you come to-morrow, my mother will then be here, she wants to know where a person lives that lodged with you?\"I went at two o'clock, her mother was not there; she said, \"My husband told me to offer you 4s. for the ticket of the clock;\" I said no. I would sooner burn it than take that; it was worth 16s. or 18s.; she asked me to come in the morning, and she would go and get some money from her mother that night, or in the morning, and she would pay me part of the money for that bill; she could not pay me all, for the lodger in the front room owed her three weeks, and the other lodger a month; I came away, and went the next morning; I waited while she had her breakfast, and we went down Whitechapel together, and she gave 4s. off the 7s. 2d. that she owed me."
Previous to this I had been with you twelve months; did I ever wrong you before?
Have you not given me these pincers to use?
I use these pincers to work, and when I go down stairs I sometimes forget them, and have to run for them; so I put them into my pocket, and sometimes take them into the City with me; I took these seeds myself, to have them made into a pattern or two.
It was neither of these constables took me.
I was going along with two men, they chucked my cap up, and ran away; I got up to get it, and the policeman took me; there was some one else on the roof of the shed.
My father gave me the shilling; I gave it to this woman, and she sent for an officer, and gave me in charge; she never told me the shilling was bad; I know nothing of the sixpence.
I do not know how to ask him any questions at all, but I want to give a statement; there was no one there but him and I; it is very queer to have him stand his own witness; I do not know how I should ask him any question about it
There is no reason to suppose that a person like me would do this; I suppose I am one of the first bootmakers in England.
I was three weeks in this country; my tools are the heaviest tools in the land; when I came I bad just 8d., I got a quartern of butter, and a half quartern loaf, that does sometimes keep a person in my line of life a week, we cannot afford much; I roamed very much through this land, to the extreme of it; I was grieved, though I could say nothing; I was confined to a bit of bread, and one cap of tea; I had one pair of shoes in hand, and my grievance was great, being confined to one meal after the hardship of travel; I am bred a boot maker to man's work, and it was women's work I had, the lowest of all work; when the week was over I was not able to leave the house; there was a dreadful fog, not more than four hours' daylight; on the third week I thought to get a meal; I was passing by a butcher's shop, and bought a bullock's cheek; there was four pounds of it, at 2d. a pound; I thought it would make some good soup for me; I had a bit fried of it, and about another half pound cooked with a parsnip, which cost me a penny; this was taken from me, but I never revolted for that; there was no cupboard, I took the food up stairs where I worked; they were grieved at that, and this young fellow I had great grievance with, which caused me to moan and sigh, and he repeated them as well as a comedian, to my great terror; he is one of the greatest cannibals in man's nature; when he was at work be would make motions with his mouth, quite grinning; they were the most rejected persons I ever saw; this morning he got on in this way, and kept it on with great force; I spoke a couple of words, that irritated him, and he gave me a push out of bed; I did not resent it in the least; I got up and lit a candle; I had this small pointed knife in my hand; I took that and gave the wick of the candle a poke to open the wick; I had only my trowsers on; I went to the bed to get my waistcoat, he repeated the insult again; I got hold of him by the hair on the forehead to get him out of bed; he made many attempts to bite me, a sort of cannibal attempt.
I went to the stable door, it was on the latch; I went in to look at Joseph Wren's mare; I had not seen her for eight or nine months, and being intoxicated, I took John Wren's; I took her to the trough, and was taking her back when the ostler came up and said, \What do you want;\" I said, \"I took this in mistake;\" he said, \"D  your eyes, I will pay you for this;\" he thrashed me; I got from him, and ran 200 or 300 yards  I fell down, and a man took me back, and gave me in custody for stealing the horse; I have been living with all the Wren's people on and off for the last four or five years, and was never known to do so before; I was with Joseph the day before, and sold fish at Waltham market for him, and he sent me down the marsh after a horse, as late as 9 o'clock at night; I have been in the habit of going in and out these stables, and did not think it any harm."
Had this lead been cut by a knife?
I know nothing, at all about it.
Did you follow the person?
I was returning from Tower-hill, about half-past 6 o'clock that evening; the policeman came to me, and accused me of stealing the books; I told him I knew nothing about them; he took me round a back street to the prosecutor's, where this boy took a lot of books from a lot of others, and said, \That is the man, and these are the books he stole; \"I am quite innocent."
What made you take it till the policeman came up?
I had not got it.
I got the truck from Charles Low; he met me in Long-acre, and asked me if I knew where to sell a truck; he said, \Mrs. Taylor gave me a truck to sell, I have not got time to sell it; \"he showed me the truck in Drury-lane, and three days afterwards I went to Mr. Cannon; I went and told Low, and he gave me a shilling to take the truck down; he told me to ask 2l. 5s. for it, but not to take less than 2l.; I took it to Mr. Cannon, he had not the money, and he took me to Taylor; he said he would only give me 30s. for it; I said I could not take it; I went back to Low, and he said, \"Take it, and I will meet you in Smithfield;\" I said, \"Give me a bill,\" and he gave it me; I met Low in Smithfield, he gave me a shilling for my trouble, and I have not seen him since."
I had been at my aunt's, and had been drinking.
My mother and myself were returning from the play, she told me to run home and light a fire against she came home; I met two gentlemen standing by the cellar, who said if I went down and opened the door they would give me a trifle of money; I went down, I did not know what I was about, or I should not have done it.
You said I was hiding?
It was a quarter of an hour before you came when you were sent for?
I was standing at the public-house door the whole time till the officer came; I had an opportunity of throwing the money away if I knew it was bad, and I might have been a mile away; I picked it up in the Mews.
I was not in the shop on Wednesday night at all; I have a witness here to prove it, Miss Weston.
Who did you get these duplicates from?
The present proceeding is entirely a piece of malice towards me; he directed Mr. Brown to come to me, and said if I would make a fair statement he would give me a fair chance to begin the world again; I was told it on Saturday night, and I attended on the Monday morning; Mr. Brown told me to tell Mr. Wilson everything, and my best way was to leave London; he owed me a considerable amount for salary; after giving him the tickets, he said he would make inquiries the following day, and see what money he could get for me; I called on the Tuesday night, and he said he was very sorry he was not able to give me more than 20s.; I had therefore nothing to depend on but to look after some employ; I obtained employment, where I have been employed ever since; I called on two of his customers, and one gave me an order, and this coming to his ears is the cause of the present proceeding.
I bought the things on London-bridge about half-past 1 o'clock.
You dragged me to the farther end of the loft before you got to the cash-box.
It was my own money.
I am quite innocent of the robbery; I went in there, and laid down on some hay; I laid about an hour and a half, and the policemen came and charged me with this robbery.
Where is the blackness on your hand?
Did you see me go into the tap-room?
When I gave you the shilling on Saturday night you put it in to your purse, among the rest of your silver?
You put the shilling in your hand, opened a purse, and put more shillings to it.
Did you mark it?
I met two men, who said they would give me something to drink; they asked me to hold a small parcel, and immediately on my receiving it the policeman came up; the others ran away, and I, being frightened, ran too, as I suspected there was something wrong.
I had a great deal of beer to carry out fire times a day, and had to account for it all; I had to trust a great deal, and lost a great deal of money; I told Mr. Dubois when I left on the Monday, that there was something against me, and if he would tell me what it was I would pay him; if he had paid me what he owed me, I should have been able to pay him.
I was half an hour off the hill, when she came and said I bad robbed her; the boy said he saw me put my hand through my pocket, but I had no lining in my pocket; I asked some persons to look at it.
There was a man between him and me; I was two or three yards from him.
I saw a man take this handkerchief; he threw it to me, and the gentleman turned round and took me.
Did not you ask the boy if I was the person, and he said he did not know?
I want to know what he has known me in?
Was not I in the act of throwing the bar away?
I am guilty of the house breaking, but as for the cutting and wounding, it was purely accidental; a great many more men were running after me; I wished to get rid of the instrument, and pulled it out of my pocket to throw it away; as I was in the act of doing so, it struck him in the face.
I put the box in.
I picked them up in a bit of white paper; one of the crates had opened the lid of the box, I expect; I picked them up in the van.
Where was I, when you went out?
What remark did you make to me?
You were standing at the pawnbroker's, and heard me give the name of Alexander Piper.
I have always pawned in the name of Alexander Piper; I pawned these in that name and gave him the money, 6s. 3d.
My brother, who was in India with me, used to write to Mr. Day, but I never did.
I never wrote them, but I did write the letter to Mr. Hankey on 28th April 
, I did not wilfully set fire to the place; I was in the drawing-room when Mr. Hankey came in; the bell rang, and with the sudden excitement I dropped the candle, and ran out at the back door on to the lawn; I did not go into the passage where the policeman says I said I threw the candle down; if I had, I should have met Mr. Hankey; it was then about 20 minutes to 3 o'clock; the sofa was alongside of me at the time.
I went to Mr. Barnes, he asked me if I had taken the money; I said, \Yes;\" and if he had given me a week I would have paid it him, but be would not, and gave me in charge."
I was standing on Tower-hill, and the handkerchief fell between me and another man; I went to take it up, and he took hold of me; I walked across the road, he came after me and took me; I was never in prison in my life.
I am placed in a peculiar situation; I have not been in London for the last twelve months, only four days previous to being taken; I unfortunately met the man named before you, and went into the public house to have a glass of liquor; not having seen him for a period of twelve months, we played a game at the toy skittles; be gave a sovereign, and I said I would pay; he took the change, and went out of the house; I waited and took the paper to look at; I did not attempt to move till the good lady came and tapped me on the shoulder, and said, \Where is your friend?\" in an agitated manner; I said, \"What is the matter?\" she said, \"Your friend has given me a bad sovereign;\" I said, \"I am very sorry, allow me to look at it; \"I took it and looked at it, and another man looked at it; the lady ran out of the house, and she came in again and said, \"Surely you know this man?\" I said, \"Yes; I will endeavour to find him;\" this bad sovereign, or whatever piece it was, I have never seen since; I left with the intention of looking after this person, whom I thought responsible; I looked after him with a good intent, and the gentleman tapped me on the shoulder, and said, \"You gave my sister in law a bad sovereign;\" I said, \"I have done nothing of the kind;\" he said, \"Will you come back?\" I said, \"Yes;\" I went, and he said, \"Is this the man?\" she said, \"No;\" he said, \"Where is the sovereign?\" she went round to look for it, and she turned back, and said, \"I forgot; he took it;\" and he gave me into custody for passing a bad sovereign; I was taken to the station, and stripped, and searched; I had nothing on me but good coin; I have not had lime, or my employer would have been here."
I was not aware it was bad; I had received some money of my employer, and had changed a sovereign; I am quite a stranger to it; I don't know bad money.
You said you were almost positive it was me when your husband came in.
You were in the shop when I told Mrs. Daubney I was in the shop on the Saturday, and you say that I said I had never been in the shop before.
You never once lost sight of me?
Mr. Ward never accused me of giving him a bad shilling till Mr. Dunnell pronounced the half crown to be bad; if, as he states, he never once lost sight of me, at the time I was taken I should have had the change of the shilling; I was searched, and I had one half crown, two sixpences, and one halfpenny; that was all.
I came into your shop on the Wednesday.
Mrs. Reed said, \I was very sorry to find that that crown piece you gave when you was here last was bad;\" I said, \"Was it, allow me to look at it?\" she said unless I could produce her 4s. 6d. then, she would give me in charge; she never said a word about the half crown; I said I had not got the 4s. 6d. then, but if that was the one I gave her I should be most happy to make the matter right with her husband."
When you came to me, what was I doing?
When I came back, where did the last witness take the shilling from?
Did I go outside the door after I had got the change?
I was a little intoxicated when I got the money; if I had known it was bad I would not have carried it there.
You went with a lantern to the area?
I went to the house for half a quartern of gin, and they said it was a bad shilling; they took me back to the house, and the landlord gave me in charge; they went to the area, and could not find anything; they went two or three hours afterwards, and found these in it.
Do you remember my calling with Henry Davis, at your office?
Did not I come several times to Scotland yard?
Mr. Watts met me at the King William the Fourth, King William-street, Strand, and asked me if I could discount a promissory note of Pace, Nephew, and Co., with a deposit of shares in the Galtymaen Mining Company, with 3l. paid up on each share, value in the market, 1l. 17s. 6d., per share; I said there was no difficulty; I received the shares from him next day, went to a respectable stock-broker in the City to make inquiries about the shares, and was requested to call in a day or two; I saw Mr. Watts and told him if the shares were of any use, the bill would be cashed, and he had better get the promissory note, and I should be able to carry the matter out; I met him the following day, he gave me the note, and I went into the City to make inquiries about the shares, but could not get any answer; I said, \I am going to visit a friend of mine close to Oxford-street, who will give me the money if the shares are all right;\" I left him at the American Stores; I waited for my friend two or three hours, he did not come; I was tired of waiting, and did not return to Mr. Watts, as I thought he had gone; I went into the City next day with Mr. Davis, to make inquiries about the shares, we could get no answer; we then went to Mr. Isaacs, he left me outside and took the note into the office to get it discounted; Mr. Isaacs came out, looked at me, and went in again, and Mr. Davis and I walked away together; he said, \"I have got to be in London about 3, o'clock, we will meet again in the morning;\" I went and found out that the shares were not worth a halfpenny, it was a regular swindle, the stock broker and the mining broker said that a cart load of them was not worth the trouble of fetching away; I took them away, and I believe they were left at Mr. Isaacs' with the bill; we went several days afterwards to a tavern in Catherine-street, Strand, between 12 and 1; we sat down and took some beer, and he wrote out some memorandum, I do not know what it was, I signed it; whether this is the piece of paper I signed, I do not know, but I have never received any communication from Mr. Davis, and therefore the bill has not been discounted; if the shares were worth the money I should have received 15l., and therefore I detained the bill for my commission, and demanded 30l. to give it up; when I was before Mr. Jardine, I said, if he thought I was not entitled to any remuneration for my trouble, I would return the bill and shares within a few hours; he said it was out of his jurisdiction, and the case was adjourned to Marlborough-street; the bill has never been discounted, nor are the shares worth a farthing; Mr. Watts said if I could get this carried out, he would give me 1,000 more shares to borrow money on, and therefore he was raising money by false pretences, as 3l. has not been paid upon them; I am innocent of any charge of fraud whatever."
Did you take some money out of that bag that morning?
I was tipsy; there was a man came and put his hand into my pocket.
I frequented that house when his brother kept it; I was there on the Saturday and Sunday, and stopped till a quarter before 11 o'clock at night; I changed several shillings and sixpences; when I left I had 2s. 9d. in my pocket; I went out, and saw a young man, and we stopped at a card table till 4 in the morning; I won a little more, and that was what was found on me; I was drunk at the time.
I picked it up close to your feet.
I am very sorry; it has happened but once; I have been out of work four months.
Did you not go out in the village, leaving the half crown there?
I was working at the Red Lion, and got the half crown for my labour.
When I came up for you, and you came down, did you see any water?
When you came to the room did not you find persons washing her face?
I was inquiring for a lodging; I worked at the East India Docks, but had no work for four days.
I was waiting for a man at the works; I sent this boy with the shilling; I did not know it was bad; I then asked him to go for some bread; I waited there till he came back; I saw the policeman, and he says I threw the money into the pond; I did not do anything of the kind.
I get my living in the streets; I did not know the money was bad; I asked him for ld.-worth of sprigs.
What time did I come into your company?
What colour coat wal it?
Was I not on the box when you first came out of the bowling green?
I know nothing of the coat; I did not leave the grounds from the time I first went till I left; when the coat was found Dixie was given in charge.
I bought the waistcoat of a man for 3d.
I had been out from 9 o'clock in the morning, and when I came home my wife began abusing me, and said, \Well, you have had all this day again, I hope you have had enough drink now;\" but before that, in the morning, she asked me to move a tub out of the back room into the wash house, and when I got it to the door I asked her where I was to put it; I asked her the question three times and she gave me no answer, but stood and laughed at me, and that was the cause of my going out; she generally treats me in that way."
I desired you to go and tell my wife to come home, and I would not hurt her.
I came home, and went up stairs, into the front room, and went to bed; I recollect my wife coming into the room; she said, \Wallis, shall I bring the children home?\" I said, \"You can do as you like;\" with that she runs up to me, to the best of my recollection, and drags me out of bed, and then I suppose I followed her down; I have no recollection of having the knife, or seeing it, until I saw it at the station on the Saturday; there is an iron round the, ironing board that my wife works at, and the knob is off the door of the front room, so that it has a sharp point sticking out, and she might, in the scuffle, have knocked her arm against that or the ironing board."
How far were you from me when I went by with the two coats?
Are there any more rooms on the same landing?
I came up to Harrow to look for a little hay-making; I did not take any coats; if I had done so, it is not likely that I should have remained in bed till 10 o'clock in the morning, and left them where I had been sleeping; it is my firm belief some evil-disposed person or persons took the coats, and placed them by the side of my bed.
The four caps I bought, I have a witness here to prove it; I beg for mercy, it is my first offence; I was urged on to it by other people.
Did you take me to the back shop till a policeman came?
Did you have the note in your hand?
Do you recollect my coming into the shop several times before?
I took the notes for some shares I sold in the Exchange, and had no idea they were forged, as I never had such a thing in my hands before; a man named Nicholls, on the Stock Exchange, gave them to me; his name is on the back of them; I have given information to have him apprehended, but he has removed; he used to live in St. Ann's-road, near Horsemonger-lane; I would not have sacrificed the happiness of my wife and children upon such a paltry sum; I have been dealing on the Exchange upwards of twelve months; previous to that I had a situation as clerk.
Was it on Monday or Tuesday that I came?
It is false; we were both together on the Tuesday evening at Mr. Perry's dining rooms, and I gave you the key, and you gave it me back.
I got the key on Monday morning, and took it back, and he had it till Tuesday morning; I got it that morning, and took it him on Tuesday evening, and he gave it me back again; I did not want it, but he gave it me; I was at Mrs. Franklin's on the Wednesday night.
I have some witnesses, but I do not know whether they are here or not; the deceased man belonged to another ship; I cannot say anything; I leave it to your Lordship and the Jury.
I hope the Lord will forgive him if he is saying anything against me wrong; I did not know anything of the transaction till last Monday week, when I was sent for at Poplar Union.
He has made a little difference; he said at Arbour-square my brother was there, and now he says my wife and brother were there.
I am subject to these fits, but it was never so strong as it was this time.
Stagg asked me to mind the horses a few minutes; he was gone a long while, and I left a boy to mind them; the coats were safe then.
Is it likely that if I stole these things, I should send you and the policeman to the house where they were sold? I sent you there.
I sell hay and clover on commission; I went to a gentleman to sell some, and coming back I met the policeman; I told him I bad picked up the hat the night before, and that I did not know anything about the watch; I am an honest man.
I wish to know whether they are seal skins?
Do you know that I was in partnership with Mr. White once?
You have seen me repeatedly with White?
Who showed you which way to drive?
Mr. White said he had five vanloads, and he told me to get a van of Mr. Miller; we went and got a van, and paid the toll; I took this load; he said we could take the other to-morrow; I went and delivered the skins; I told the policeman, \That is where you will find me\"  I told him where the skins came from, about five arches beyond the St. Helena Gardens; the witness knows that I did not know which way to go; whoever had come to me, I should have gone with him, and done the job."
How far was I from you when you gave me in custody?
I went down to London-bridge to see if I could earn a few halfpence by the steam boats; I picked up the cigar case, and put it in my pocket; this gentleman came and asked if I had a cigar case; I said I had, and I gave it.
What did you do with that sixpence?
When you first came up you said you could not swear to me.
You opened the drawer and put the sixpence in, and said it was a bad one.
I only offered the sixpence; I never offered the crown piece at all; I never was in his shop in my life.
, When I gave you the shilling, you opened the drawer and put it in.
Had I got the same dress on on Thursday that I had on the Wednesday?
I am innocent of the half crown; I gave the shilling, not knowing it was bad  I will take my oath I was never in the shop before.
Did I receive any goods from you?
Blanch wrote both the tickets.
It is my first charge since I have been in London, that is nineteen years; I hare two children without a mother; I wish to call Francis Jones, who lives in Dudley-street I do not suppose he is here; he is the man who saw Blanch write this note; I did not utter it; I did not go with it, how could I utter it? if that man were here be could say that he saw Blanch write more.
Did I put the halfcrown on the counter, or drop it?
Where did you. search me?
Was I sober?
Which pocket did I take the bad one from?
I was coming from Highgate, across a narrow lane by myself, and there found the paper of money.
I was not at the shop on the two first occasions; I was not aware the halfcrown was bad; I had received it for goods a day or two before.
Did not you tell my aunt that you would fight any b  man in the family, and did not she say you were too fast?
How long did you find it after I put my things on?
I knocked at the man's door, and asked him to lend me a hand upstairs with my wife; I did not know she was there till I came down.
What I stated before is all I have to say.
When you first came up to me, was I not standing outside the Bricklayers' Arm, and did not you say to me, \Go on?\""
That was before there was any blood at all; I turned round to go away, and you put your hand into your pocket, took your truncheon out and knocked me down, and there was then about four feet of blood went out of the back of my neck; you then went away, and came back to me about 10 minutes or a quarter of an hour afterwards, and said, \Will you come to the doctor's with me?\" and I said, \"certainly.\""
I never said I would do for him; I do not deny kicking him, and I certainly did throw him, I daresay three yards away from me once, but I never did no more to him, nor did I use any threatening words.
If you will call on the other policeman, you will find he will deny what the Counsel says about his being at the station house at 7 o'clock; in the depositions, where I was tried before, it states that he came after the row had been up for half an hour or three quarters of an hour.
When you first came up, do you think you were sober enough to hear and see what was done, when the boys were taking your cap off and making game of you, because you were drunk, and said it was you that ought to be locked up, and not me?
He was quite drunk; he comes here to-day, because he is getting me out of 8s. a week.
You saw the first of this; did you see me kick the police-man?
I did not know I was coming here; I was sent from Horsemonger-lane on the same case, and they passed a sentence of two years, and then they fetched me away, and try to try me here.
I took the crown in the course of trade, and was not aware it was bad.
Did I not say if anything should happen, do not blame me for it?
I had a business transaction with Mrs. Rodgers's father six months ago; it was not to their satisfaction, and they called after me every time I came down the street; this is nothing more than animosity; I have lived in the street four or five months, and they have always said they would transport me if they could; they were aware where I lived, and yet did not fetch me till 10.
How long afterwards did she live with me?
Was I lodging at the house at the time?
Did I find the money for the marriage?
Did not I come and ask you if you wanted me?
When I was married to my first wife she used to get up and go to work; my father was a tailor; we lived very comfortably about three weeks; this young man that she kept company with, that she is living with now, came, and the witness came round to the shop, and asked if I would go round, as her sister and another person wished to see me; I went round, and saw her and her mother; her mother said, \Kate, it is no use your keeping company with this young man, you are married;\" the next morning I got up to go to work; I said to my wife, \"Are you going with me?\" she said, \"No;\" I went home in the evening, and everything was gone; I went and asked her mother if she was coming home; she said, \"No,\" she was going to get married to this Alexander Winden; she has been living with him, and I believe she has had three or four children; my second wife and I lived comfortably till Mrs. Jeffreys came and kept a chandler's shop; we bought things of her, and at last we were obliged to go on credit; I found that we could go to another place and buy things as cheap again; I told my wife we could not have things there, and she would go there, and this woman has made all this disturbance; as to knowing whether my first wife was living, I did not; I asked her brothers some time ago, when they were in mourning, whether she was living; they told me she was dead; two of them are transported."
Are you sure that you felt my hand in your pocket?
You told me to put it on?
He thought I was coming to receive money, and when he found I had none he turned against me.
I walked civilly with you; but you held my collar so tightly I could scarcely breathe; then I threw them down.
When I was in the Mews I had been out of employ for four or five days; I have a wife and two children; I saw the door was open; I went in, and the things tempted me, and I stole them; I am a tailor by trade.
How near were you to me?
Was I behind, or in front of you, when I caught hold of you?
She is a girl that walks the streets for her living.
When he asked me which way I came, I said I came from Crown-street, and that I had been in a public-house, having a drop of beer; he caught hold of me, and said, \Come with me;\" as soon as I got across the road, he said, \"I think you are the party;\" and this man said I was; and then he said he thought he had lost a half-crown, but he did not know; the man did not want to come against me, but the officer fetched him away from his work to appear against me; the policeman and the inspector went down, and were gone two hours to fetch him; he said he did not think I was the man; he had a good deal of money left when he was at the station, and why was not that taken as well as the half-crown?."
Did I say anything to you?
Did I speak a word to you?
She had the gown and shawl in her possession till Tuesday; she might have done it herself, most likely she has.
How many were together when you met us?
A man said, \That policeman that broke your arm is watching you, and he will give you three months;\" I said, \"I will go home;\" I went home, and the next night I came to you."
You said, \I want you,\" and I said, \"What for? I am going to the station house.\""
The officer took me, and said I had assaulted the man; I never touched him.
I received the 1l. 11s. 6d., and lost it out of my pocket going home; I went back to see if I could find it, and on the way back I met the policeman; I have been fourteen years in the prosecutor's service.
I was in bed at the time he says I was in Farringdon-street.
Is this your canister?
I live next door to this man; I was going home on the Saturday night, I had two pieces of wood; I went to put them in my place, and I put them in his premises; I got over, and be came and brought a gun; I told him not to hurt me, I had come for the wood; he saw the wood; the spade and potato fork were not moved out of the shed at all; the powder canister is mine, I had had it three days before; he has known me a great many years, and knows nothing against me.
I received the money down at Gravesend; I had no knowledge that they were bad.
He was at a loss to identify me; you pointed me out, and Mr. Cook said you ought to be ashamed to do it.
It is strange that he was thirty or forty hours before he took my boots away.
There is a wall, which has been knocked down lately, and there was free admission from three or four bouses for people to run all over the yard; if he had had any suspicion against me, why should not he have taken me and made me tread in the same footmark; there is only his hare word against me.
You said it was bad, and gave it to your husband?
I did not know the shilling was bad; I took it for carrying a parcel.
I came back when I was called.
A Person asked me to fetch a bottle of stout, and gave me this coin.
What she states is correct.
Did I remain in the shop till your husband came?
Where did you take me after I left the shop?
I came up to London to look for a ship; I went in the shop to purchase half a pound of sausages; I then went to the Cock and Neptune, and remained there a few hours; I then went to the last witness's shop, and gave her a shilling; she said it was bad; I then gave her the half-crown, and that was bad; if I had known it was bad, would I have given her another coin, knowing it would undergo the same operation? and not only so, but I had every opportunity to get away; I bad changed half-a-sovereign that morning, at a house on the left-hand side in the Broadway; all the change might be bad, for I did not even count it; the first half-crown I destroyed previous to my going to the Cock and Neptune.
Did I not complain that I was working for you at a starving price, and, though I was engaged by you as town traveller, you sent me country journeys?
I have been as far as Sunbury, and not come home till 11 o'clock at night.
Did you receive a letter from me about 3l. 7s. 6d.?
I said my accounts were wrong, and I feared his account was included amongst them; I begged that he would not call and explain the matter to Messrs. Huttons, but that I would call on him; and I called on him, and explained the matter, and he said he had no transactions with Hutton and Co. but through me.
Did I ever come back to you, saying I bad lost my purse?
It is through trifling mistakes and long journeys, and the loss of my purse, and also money I paid to the Guarantee Society; I paid to them 10l.; after the first defalcation he suspended me, and said he could not send me out; I left, and applied to another, house, Fardell and Co., who would have engaged me provided I was settled with Messrs. Hutton; I went back, and Mr. Charles Hutton asked me where I had been; I said I was not aware that I was to come again; he then said I must have a guarantee for 100l.; I went to the office, and they said they would have no objection, if my employer would sign a certificate that my accounts were correct; I went to Mr. Charles Hutton, he sent me back for a certificate; I got one, Mr. Charles Hutton signed it, and they took it; I then went on a journey; I was allowed from 4s. to 4s. 6d. a week, and I brought my account home, 3s. 7d. and Mr. Charles Hutton said it was too much; I used to go to Peckham, to Hounslow, and a variety of places, and I was allowed only 4s. 6d. a week, and that was not sufficient; I had frequently to go without my dinner to make it enough; I do not deny having received the money, hut it was entirely through poverty; I was in hopes of clearing myself, and I was clearing myself gradually.
These braids came out of my own stock when I was in business; did you ever see that particular piece of velvet.
A man gave them to me out of the ship; he carried them on board another ship to me, and hired me to take them out of the dock for him; I did not go into the hold myself.
What time was it from the time you say I got away till you saw me next?
I was pointed out by the policeman to the boy; be put the words into the boy's mouth, and asked if that was not the man.
Did not you state before the Magistrate that the box was partly off the tail?
Did you appoint an interview with me in your first or second letter?
Did I say the loan was to be granted through the Gresham, or through myself?
You have other clerks in your office?
I did not obtain any money from Mr. Lynn by false pretences; I stated I would get him the loan, but it would be necessary for him to insure his life, in connection with a Bill of Exchange, which he was to give for the amount; he gave me four references, some situated in Essex, and some in Clerkenwell, and I told him I should require 1l. 1s. as inquiry fee; he said he should have no objection to pay, provided it was repaid him I told him I would get a proposal for his life from the office, which would be going on in the meantime; in my business as auctioneer I can get persons to discount bills in connection with life insurances in any company; the guinea was paid to me for the inquiries, I never refused to return it him; it is only because I have been brought up on another charge that he has thought fit to charge me with this; I have often effected insurances in other offices, and was never charged with this offence.
You say you wrote a letter to me in Stamford-street?
Did you open the door to me?
I never represented myself as Mr. Rickerby's clerk; I represented myself as Mr. Rickerby; whatever Mr. Ratten represented me as, I do not know; I never made any false representation to any of them; I only went as a visitor.
I never was in the shop.
Will you swear you saw me in the shop?
Where is the knife?
Why did not you take the knife from me?
I was not at the shop at all; I heard cries of \Stop thief!\" and I called, \"Stop thief!\" the gentleman then came out and knocked me down; he swears I had a knife; why did not he take it from me? and where is the 15s., out of the purse? nothing was found on me."
You say you saw this knife?
You say you can swear to that knife, by what?
I hope, gentlemen, you will see I must have had great provocation to do such a thing as I have done; I admit the charge now; since my mother died my father says, \You shan't go on in this manner,\" and he has undermined me in everything; in every way; my brother here that gave witness against me, is really obliged to do so; if he did not, my father would say\" You are as bad as he is,\" and actually turn him out of doors, as he has me, in several instances, because I would not go out to thieve and pick pockets, and all those sort of things, in order to get him money to buy fixtures to get him up in business; that is how it was; I have this charge to make against him, which I would not have done, but he has employed two counsel against me to show that I am a bad character; I say this in order to state what he really is; I have been greatly provoked to do such a thing as this; when I was about fourteen there was a scuffle or something of that sort, a row between us, and he struck me several times, and with the assistance of a porter that he brought up, he got me down and got hold of my handkerchief, and very nearly strangled me; for three months afterwards I had a blood-shot over my sight; if my mother had been alive, I should not have come here; I should not have been to a police-court, much less a criminal court; if my mother had been alive, she would have shown you how I have been put upon, and undermined in every respect."
Why did not you stop me?
I am not guilty of the first, but the second one I am.
It is true I was convicted.
I was sent by the sailors to get it.
What did you speak to me about first?
How was it you did not take me on Saturday night, when you saw me at the White Swan?
The man who took my money for a counsel is not here.
I did not know they were bad at the time.
I worked for a person at the water side; I am a poor working man; I do not know where I took the money.
I come along Aldersgate-street every day; but if I had taken the handkerchief, it is not likely that I should have gone to the same spot again.
I bought the trowsers of you on the Sunday morning, and you told me not to take them away on a Sunday, as it looked so bad.
The concertina was not in the box.
I was in the prosecutor's bedroom, and asked him if he would sell me the trowsers; he said yes, I should have them for 2s., only I was not to take them away on Sunday, because it looked so; I know nothing of the concertina or the box.
Had I a hat or a cap on?
If the policeman was looking after me he might have seen me, because I was in my father's shop serving until the day I was taken.
You put the shilling in the till when you gave me the change?
I had been out of work two months, and a man gave me them, who I used to go to the same school with.
Did not you swear that I called for half a pint of beer, and that I gave you a good shilling afterwards?
There was a piece of paper about the shilling\\ that\\ youshowed to the policeman. I saw you pick it off..
As you and I walked on before the witness, were there not two women at the door of a shop?
I never knew it was a bad shilling; I am a shoemaker, and came from Northampton, and I am a stranger in town.
, I am nearly blind, and could not see good money from bad; what was bad this woman must have had, I had no bad money.
I said I did not know whether I got it from Mr. Lowe's, but I was in the habit of getting change there.
Did you not ask me for some money?
, He knew nothing against my respectability to the present time; and Gough knows me.
, I was going home that morning, and was accosted by two females in Portland-road; they asked me to drink; I went into a public house, and spent about half a crown; T asked for change for a sovereign; the landlord was a long time about it, and a gentleman there gave me two crown pieces and some silver; I came to Tottenham Court-road, and met this female, who asked me if I could give her some money, as she had not got a bed to go home to; I gave her a crown; I have had a very good character before..
Where did you first meet me?
I am guilty.
, There is a combination of false witnesses against me.
, Q You say you saw the pistol in my waistcoat; I have not had a waistcoat on for these three months.
, I deny her evidence altogether.
There was no powder in the pan?
I wish to contradict the statement about cutting her b   y throat; he said to me on the road that he was surprised that I did not out her throat, and I made the reply that if I had intended any mischief, probably it might be done in that way.
I have been most recklessly treated by my wife, in consequence of not being in regular employ, and being afflicted with the gout repeatedly, and not being able to earn plenty of money to bring borne for her recklessly to spend, as she has been in the habit of doing for the last twenty years; I am undefended, and leave my case in the hands of the Court.
I was with my nephew at the hospital, and a man met us, and led us away.
You said you saw the watch in my hand?
How can you swear to that tool being yours?
Did you ever ask me whether they were my own or my master's?
My master is in a small way of business; and if I had carried on this game, he certainly would have missed it in a month; if he had missed one comb he would have wanted to know where it was
I was not there, I was at Sydenham.
It is false; I was not in his house; I picked the pot up; it looked as if a cab had been over it.
Are you a partner in that firm?
Are you prepared to swear you never saw me at Lake's Dining-rooms?
I never premeditated any fraud; it is true my name is a real one, but I refused to give any address, which went very much against me, but I did it out of respect for the lady who is my wife; I do not fear your detective police nor your Mendicity Society men; I never was charged with any case before; I defy any one to come forward, if he can, to prove me a convicted party, or the associate of those who have been convicted; when I came to town, I was with one house for two years; I then went to a house in Cheapside, where I lived eight years; I left, to go into business with Mr. Price, for two years, but finding affairs were going wrong I withdrew, with the loss of 1,700l., and went to New York; I went into business, and for two years with success, but I was seized with illness, and when I got better I received information of my mother's death; I am a Warwickshire man; I came here three years ago, and she had bequeathed to me a house, which brings me in 60l. a year; I have endeavoured to steer an honest course; I have had the delirium tremens twice, and was discharged from St. Thomas's Hospital, as Dr. M'Murdo knows, and if I take a little spirits it flies to my head, and I scarcely know what I do; I have been three weeks in prison on this charge, which is a frivolous one; I did not act in the way in which an impostor would act; I envy not the feelings of that man who could give a fellow creature into custody on such a charge as this; I had no intention to defraud; if I am to go to gaol I shall submit to it, and God Almighty forgive those who have sent me here!
Did I, on 2nd Dec, produce any copy of testimonial or testimonials from Mr.. Johnston?
Upon your oath, did I present to you any single certificate, or any collective number of certificates?
You have stated upon your oath that I presented this to you; I ask you again whether the documents were not collectively presented to you by your secretary?
Did I state that that was Mr. Johnston's original?
Pardon me, you are wrong there, I made no answer.
You did not ask me as to the signature at all; will you swear that I afterwards said it was not?
Did I not, when I produced that book, refer you to certain certificates, to prove that I had held a school under Mr. Johnson?
Did you not, when I showed them to you, make the observation that they had nothing to do with this present certificate of Mr. Johnston?
Did I not show you an original letter of the Rev. Thomas Smith, in which he states that he had received an excellent character of me from one of the members of the committee of that school?
Mr. Hoole was treasurer of a school with which I was connected nearly six years.
Did I say one word to you about wishing to return home in reference to the certificate of Mr. Johnston?
Did not I say, in answer to your question about Mr. Johnston's, that I had it not; that I had received other letters from Mr. Johnston, which I had, and that I thought I had one in my book?
Did I not distinctly state to you that I received a most excellent testimonial, of which that was a copy, from the Rev. Thomas Sutton?
Did you not, in answer to my question, say, \I knew Mr. Sutton very well, but he is dead,\" and I then referred you to Mr. Lipsey, of St. Philip's Sheffield; also to Mr. Harris, the assistant minister of the Old Church, at Sheffield, and to the Rev. Mr. Langston; and did not you say, in the presence of my wife, that you knew most of the clergy at Sheffield, but Mr. Sutton was dead?"
Did not I receive a most excellent character when I became master of the Hinckley school?
Did I not receive a most excellent character from the committee of Hinckley on my removal to Sheffield?
I think it was a letter dated 1850; it is not among these papers; it was produced and read before the Magistrate at the first hearing, and I particularly requested the officer to be careful of it; in that letter Mr. Johnston states that he still remembered the excellent manner in which I had conducted the school.
This letter was in consequence of there being a vacancy for a school at Lutterworth, and in the letter you state that you well recollect my excellent management of the Hinckley school, but in consequence of there being 168 applications for it, you advised me not to apply?
You have hinted in your letter to Mr. Woodhouse that there was something in my moral character that made me leave. Do you know Mr. Dicey's handwriting?
Mr. Dicey being a Magistrate, and a principal supporter of the Hinckley school, do you suppose, if there had been anything prejudicial to my character, he would have addressed me in '42 as \Dear Mr. Sharman?\""
If so short a time since as 1849 you did not recollect having communicated with me, is it not possible that you may have altogether forgotten having written a testimonial for me to the Rev: Thomas Sutton, some six-teen or eighteen years ago?
You will not swear that this is not an exact copy of a testimonial that was given by you to Mr. Sutton?
How can you charge me with a forgery, if you do not know whether you gave me a certificate or not?
What did you say the charge was?
What did Mr. Baxter charge me with?
On your oath, did not Mr. Baxter give me in charge for a certain thing, and did not the inspector say across the desk, \You cannot sustain that charge?"
Did not I give you the whole of the originals that were produced in the room on 7th Dec.?
I have nothing further to state in reference to the matter than that I did use a copy of a testimonial that Mr. Sutton received; and not wilfully knowing that it was a forged document, I used it as a copy, but not as the original testimonial; I did it under the impression that if I had written to Mr. Johnston, he would not have denied me, more especially as he had written me a letter by the hands of Mr. Firth, requesting me to return to the school, if I was not comfortable; and as late as 1849 he spoke of my excellent management of the Hinckley Infant School; I have never had, directly or indirectly, either from Mr. Dicey, who was intimately connected with Mr. Johnston, as founders of the Hinckley School, or from Mr. Johnston himself, the least intimation that my character had so altered as to prevent them from giving me the same testimonial that they would formerly have done; I have nothing further to say; that was the impression under which I used this copy of the testimonial which it is stated, though it is not true, that I said was the original.
When I gave you the first shilling you put it in the till?
Had not you put any other money into that pocket?
I was not aware that they were bad.
Did you call Mr. Airey out to tell him that it was bad, or did you go to another man?
Did not you say if I gave you another you would let me go?
The first one I took in change at a public house in Lambeth; a policeman was sent there by the Magistrate, and he brought back a satisfactory answer; the second one I know nothing at all about.
I did not pass the bad sixpence nor the half crown.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court; I am a poor lad, and a cripple.
I did not know they were bad; I took them for my day's work.
Did not you break my windows a week ago?
This woman has been three or four years coming backwards and forwards, and breaking several squares of glass; on the Sunday before Christmas day she put her hand right through the window, though she knew the way to come in at the back door; nobody will take her in charge, though they know her so well; I have been eighteen months in three different hospitals; I have only been six weeks out of Brighton Hospital.
Was not your wife's back against the railings?
I further add that I distinctly saw your person.
Your wife was standing with her back against the rails, and before I got within a yard of her, I saw her dress fall, and put my hand on your shoulder and asked what you meant, and you called out \Police!\" and I said, \"Gadcombe, take this man in custody.\""
When I took you in custody, were not you standing with your back against the railings?
Was not I very much in liquor?
What do you know it by?
Did not you say at first you did not think it was me?
Will you swear I broke the half crown?
I had been drinking with some friends; I changed half a sovereign; I do not know where, but I must have taken the 4s. then.
What mark have you got on the shoes?
I could bring the man forward to-morrow morning that I had the shoes from; he would have been here to-day, but he did not know my trial was coming on; I am innocent.
A lad passed by me, and gave the handkerchief into my hand; I stopped and looked, and the gentleman asked me for it; I gave it to him.
Did I not change those checks for you?
I say you did give them to me; they are not my writing.
\Or had done something with it.\""
I have been in Mr. Stoughton's service nearly five years  I was bred and born in the family, and always did my duty. On 21st Dec., my master was taken ill, and I was obliged to stop up with him night and day; he was quite delirious; he gave me checks on several occasions; five checks; three I changed at Mr. Davis's, one I gave to the head waiter at the hotel, and another for 25l. I changed at the Bank; I gave all the money to Mr. Stoughton.
You cannot swear to this sack?
Did you see me take it?
I was standing in the market, and a man came to me and said he would give me a penny to take it out of the market; when this man came to me and took me, I told him to come with me, and I would take him to where the man was, and he would not, but he took me in the market.
I said I had lost a sovereign.
I was three hours and a half in getting up one hill; I had to go back and help the others up; I offered to pay my master at 5s. a week.
When I gave you the bill, did not you agree to advance me a few shillings a week on it?
My wife tells me that a person called on you last week to take up the bill.
The bill is not my writing, neither have I put my name to it; I found it in Great Winchester-street, City, and as I was pressed for rent, I gave it to her.
This officer knows me as a hard working man.
You went to my place, No. 29, Crown-street?
The shilling went through three or four different hands, and he said he took four or five bad shillings, it might have been one of them.
You took me at my own door?
I did not strike you.
He swore at the police court, that the man went back with it to a table.
That 5s. piece was out of my sight for a quarter of an hour; I am guilty of going in with the 5s. piece, but not knowing it was bad; the shilling I know nothing about.
I went to a public house to change a half sovereign; they gave me 5s. worth of copper, wrapped in paper, and the rest in silver; I went to get some apples, and when I came out the policeman took me; I was very much in liquor.
I was not in the house that day.
I was not in the first house at all; I went for a penny Valentine, and gave a shilling to a girl, and the woman came in and took it; I went to the last witness's house for a glass of gin; I gave the shilling, and he said it was bad; I gave him 2d. to pay, which I had received from another person there.
I was never in the house before; I received the second sixpence from a gentleman, for carrying a parcel; the reason I ran away was, there were two men in the house threatening to fight me.
Did you see me in the morning of 26th Jan.?
I was not there in the afternoon.
I was never in the shop in my life.
On the day I passed the shilling, it was out of my sight a quarter of an hour.
Did not that servant give you a shilling two or three weeks ago which you detected to be bad?
I did not move out of Mrs. Burke's kitchen from half past 6 o'clock till the policeman came and took me; I used to lodge there, and somebody put her up to it that it was me.
I was not aware of it.
He stated at Greenwich that he was agitated at seeing two military men in his shop, and that he did not examine the half-crown; if so, how can he swear to it?
It is hard for a man to swear to tobacco when his name is not on the paper; there were plenty more soldiers on the road beside me.
It is very hard that after being discharged, the same piece should be brought against me again.
I did not know they were bad; I am very sorry it has happened.
Were you present when I made the arrangement with the landlady?
Did you see me come out?
I did not refuse to give my address; I gave my brother's address, where I lodged.
Did not I tell you I bought them?
There is part of the neck-tie ripped at the end, and it has been so for some time, and if it was the prosecutor's he would have known that; I wore it better than a month; I bought the other things in Petticoat-lane, of a tailor; if I had stolen any of the property, it is not likely that I should leave the name in the book; on the day before, I bought three other books, and they have been taken away from me; it was in fair daylight that they saw me come out of the room, and I had nothing in my possession; it is a made-up plan because I had the misfortune to sleep in the house; three or four men slept in the house, and perhaps they committed the robbery and gave me in charge for it; I pledged the things in my own name, and with a man who knew me.
I picked the purse up.
I was standing looking at the carriages, and saw the parse lying at the lady's feet; I picked it up and put it in my pocket; I did not know who it belonged to.
I lost the half sovereign, through a hole in my pocket that I did not know of; this is it
I was intoxicated when I sold the spade; I meant to get it back again, and take it to Mr. Wilson's; I went down last Thursday to see if I should get the spade, and I called the foreman outside, and he told me not to bring it back, or I should have done it; I came up to. London, and was at work three weeks at the gasworks in Oxford-street.
What time in the evening was it when you first saw me?
Was it not in the cell that we had this conversation?
Whereabouts was I standing at the time you took me?
What distance were you standing from me at the time?
What time was It when you found these things?
On 7th March I had been down to Lower East Smithfield, and on returning home I was walking up the Kingsland-road; I happened to turn round, and saw Mr. Umpleby on horseback, and to avoid him I walked up this turning that he terms a court; he came up to me, and said, \What are you doing here? I have been looking for you for some time; I want to have some conversation with you;\" I said, \"Very well;\" he said, \"Where can you got\" I then condescended to walk with him, I suppose pretty well a quarter of a mile, or nearly so, till we saw a policeman; he called him, and gave me in charge; we went to the police station at Smithfield; the charge was entered; the policeman was desired to search me; I had the pistol now produced in my pocket, and when the officer was told to search me I pulled it out of my pocket in a hurry to lay it down, and it exploded; the inspector called out, \"Police! murder!\" and sent for assistance, and I should think not less than twenty policemen came in, most of them with their jackets off, and each of them took a very active part, or tried to do so, in searching me; I had a pair of gaiters on at the time, and they were trying to take my boots off without taking my gaiters off; I could not help smiling at the time; I was told to stand on my legs; that accounts for Mrs. Marshall saying I was laughing; I might have smiled, for I could not help smiling to see so many able bodied men trying to get my boots off without taking my gaiters off; they searched me and found some money on me, and they locked me up; about an hour after I was locked up in the cell, inspector Teague came in, and said, \"Now you seem a little more cool than you were a short time back, is there anything you want?\" and he said to the housekeeper, who was standing outside, \"Let the prisoner have anything he wants, any refreshment or anything of the sort,\" and pretended to make me very comfortable; he sent upstairs for a mattrass to lie upon, which I thought was very kind of him; he rubbed his hands, and said, \"I don't know whether you meant this for me, but you gave me very short notice;\" this conversation took place in the cell, I have no recollection of any other; I said, \"It is not likely I intended it for you, neither did I intend it for Mr. Umpleby;\" it is not likely, if I had intended it for Mr. Umpleby, that I should have said so to inspector Teague; Mrs. Marshall hearing Mr. Teagues statement at Guildhall, as a matter of course states the same thing, it is natural; having bought the pistol the same morning that I saw Mr. Umpleby, it does not appear at all probable that I bought it for the purpose of shooting him with it; if I had intended to take his life, I should have been prepared weeks before, or days before at all events; having bought the bullet mould for the purpose of making bullets, it does not appear very much like intending it for one particular purpose; my object was to have left London; I intended to take the pistol with me; the knife I had had in my possession for a long time, and generally carried it with me."
How long were you in, the parlour before you came out to the bar?
How long do you suppose I was standing outside before you came?
How long was I standing outside before you can out?
I had an opportunity of getting away if I had been guilty, as I was standing outside for some minutes; somebody else went in, not me; and I being the only man that was standing outside, I was accused of it; I can neither read or write, I am sure I could not have forged that note.
Were not the duties of the clerks assigned by the manager of the firm, and not by the partners?
What is the rule with over-due bills?
Did not you give me the suet?
What he says is false; the prosecutor said himself that he would not believe that I took it out of the shop, the door has a bell to it.
I never took it; a boy saw Giles take it, but said he would not have anything to do with it.
Where is the boy that said he saw a person give me the money to get the stamps?
Copenhagen-fields are a mile from where you took me.
Did I not say if I went back I could find the man?
On 6th March I sold some goods to Weston; he paid me 8s. and some halfpence; next morning I was dressing myself and a half crown fell on the hearth; I thought it had a very bad ring, and when I was dressed I took it to Mr. Weston, and asked if he knew what money he gave me; he said, \No;\" I said, \"You gave me this;\" he looked at it, and said he thought it was good, but he changed it for me; I went in the street and saw a man, who asked if I had any old clothes, or boots, or shoes to sell; I said I had a few at home; he said he would buy them; he came to my lodging, and I sold him some for 9s. 6d.; he gave me a crown piece, a half crown, and some silver; I went to Mr. Jones's; I owed him 8d.; I called for a pint of beer, and put down the 5s. piece, and the witness's father took it up; I went out, and laid out the change in different goods; I then met a young man I knew; I asked him to have a half pint of beer; I went in, and having no other money, I laid down the half crown; the witness took it, and showed it to his father; he said it was good; he put it in his pocket, and gave me the change; I stopped to drink the beer; I was there twenty minutes, or half an hour; he then called a policeman, who took me for passing bad money; I said it was more than I knew."
If I had done the robbery I should have had some money upon me, but I had none.
I am quite innocent of it, it is a mistake in the party.
When I met you in Poland-street, and I asked you might I get the things, you gave me permission to go and get them.
I hope you will have mercy upon me.
What reason have you for thinking it was me?
I had no idea about the half sovereign; I offered the crown, not knowing it was bad; I picked it up.
You were not there at all.
He took the half crown out of my hand and put it into a drawer.
On the 8th I was not in the place  I was asleep at the time that the gentleman says I was in his shop.
I went for 1s.-worth of Abernethy biscuits, and she had not got them; she said she would make them up with captains.
Where were you when I came?
Did I not ask for change and you would not give it?
I am a hard working man, I know nothing about the shillings no more than a child; I never stood in the shop before this one night in my life; when I did go he went and took a shilling out of the till and said, \This is one you gave me on Tuesday.\""
I never was in the house till I went in with the florin; the young man asked me if I would give him a drop of porter, I went in and a man was doing something to the floor; I laid the florin on the bar; this man never took it, but the woman did; the prosecutor took me by the handkerchief, and I was nearly choked, and the people rushed in and rescued me from him; I never knew the florin was bad till he seized me, and the woman opened the till, and took another piece of money out; but I never was in the house before.
I hawk china and glass about, and buy old clothes; I had sold some clothes for 3s., and was returning home; I went into the house for a glass of half and half, and put down a shilling; it was taken in the tap room and passed round, and a man said it was a bad one; I never was in the house before the time I was taken.
I am quite innocent; there were two other men before me, but the prosecutor caught me, and gave me in charge  the other handkerchief is my own, and the tobacco box is my father's.
It is my sister's  she is a married woman  I got playing with it, and kept it.
When the constable took me I heard him telling the boy my description, and he brought him in, and said, \See if you can see him there;\" the boy then came in, and he said, \"I think that is him;\" I was standing behind, and I was pushed forward for him to see me."
You never bring letters to the room where I was?
Were you in front of the shop?
I was chastising the boy for taking the trowsers.
I had been putting ballast in a ship all night; there were seven of us, and we went to a public house and had some rum; we were drinking from 8 to 12 o'clock; I went to sleep for two hours, and when I came out the boy accused me of taking the trowsers; I never saw him before; the man must have taken the trowsers and ran away; I never saw the trowsers till they were produced at the station house; I had a drop of drink, and do not recollect their knocking me down at all.
Why did not you speak to me first, If you saw me take the trowsers?
When the policeman came he took me round the throat; the money flew out of my hand; I do not know where it went.
The gentleman gave it to the persons all round.
I get my living by costermongering; I took one at Dartford, and the other at Bexley-heath, in going about to get my living with a basket.
It went through the post; it took four stamps.
Bid you give me any order to induce me to give the lecture at Anderton's hotel, instead of in the private lecture room?
There is your own handwriting for it  did not you say, \When you do give your lecture, I do not mind the expense; send me in as many copies as you like?\""
I felt myself very much aggrieved at the treatment I met with from the prosecutor, and perhaps I exceeded propriety, for when paper is before me I scribble away; but as I am going to Turkey I am not likely to do it again, and I have two friends who will be bail for me.
He stated at the Mansion House that he never took the handkerchief from my breast; he told me I had picked a gentleman's pocket; I said I had not picked any gentleman's pocket; he struck me in the face two or three times, and he said to the officer that he had tapped the gentleman on the shoulder.
I never was in prison but once in my life; I was tried at Clerkenwell, and came out last Feb.
How did you have a previous knowledge of me?
When did I take an order for you to Venables?
I know nothing at all of the notes; Mr. Trounce has seen me write, and if he says that is my writing, I have done.
The night that I was given in charge for this bad sixpence, I had had a great deal to drink; if I had a bad sixpence I was not aware of it; I went to have a cup of coffee at the stall; he told me it was bad, and I gave him another; I drank the coffee, and would not go without my change; he came and took hold of me, and gave me in charge; I had had so much to drink, I did not know what I had till I was taken to the station.
How long was it before the shilling was offered that I offered the 4d. piece?
I could take a solemn oath I never passed any bad money; I went there in hopes of getting some work; I was promised work that evening.
I did not act with any violence.
I was coming out of the boat; I perceived the purse, and I took it up; I examined to see if there was any one near to claim it; I looked round for three minutes, holding it in my hand  the officer who saw me with the purse in my hands took me in charge when he saw me put it in my pocket.
How are you sure it was me?
How can you swear to me?
If you saw me speak to the boy, what did you speak to the boy for?
I never was in the Court at all, I was in the private office where the clerk sat?
I have no one to defend me, and there are two children brought against me; I was remanded three times, and they never brought the piece of money against me; if I were going to die this minute I never saw them; I have a wife and two children; I would scorn to do such a thing.
I went with another young man to the stall, and had a 1d.-worth of oysters; he then went to another stall, and said he would have some more oysters; I said I would have a halfpenny worth of coffee; we were then going along, and the policeman took me.
There had been no work for us to do, and a man made me drink with him, and wanted me to go for money; I refused, but I was so tipsy that day, he made me go; I was foolish enough to say there was a parcel, which there was not; I am very sorry for it; I had a seat of work to go to the next morning; I have made up my mind not to have anything to do with that man any more.
Did you leave your coat in charge of any one?
Mr. Smith keeps a common house; were not there some of his people there, several women?
This man keeps an indifferent house; there were several people in the taproom, and they have corresponded together to take my life away.
But when I was taken I had only 2d. in my possession.
How is it possible I could get away when you had hold of me, and Mr. Corbett?
On the Wednesday morning I heard there was some work to be done; I went out, and had 3s. in my pocket; I changed 6d., and then went to change the half crown, but I know nothing about the 2s. piece; I admit I had the half crown; directly I gave it to the publican he pronounced it bad; the reason I did not pay with the 2d. was, I was going to get a bit of steak, and get my dirtier.
Did you see me take it?
I never had the purse in my hand, and never saw it.
I do not recollect anything of what passed; I have no recollection of having done so.
You tore my coat, and pulled the clothes off me.
I was taken to this man's house on Friday afternoon, after being paid off; I had 15l. 10s. in my pocket; the two men took me in a car down the highway; they took me into a shop in the highway, and asked me to have something to drink, and they went and locked me into this room, got a musket, knocked me down, without giving me time to speak a word, and took the waistcoat and trowsers off; I made a bolt through the window, and said to some persons, \Go, and get a policeman;\" I met a policeman, but I did not know anything about giving anybody in charge; I was in such a way about being beaten, that I could hardly speak; I went to Captain Pearce, and told him, and he told me to give the man in charge; I went before a Magistrate next day, and he fetched somebody to swear against me; I could not get any witnesses to speak for me, everybody spoke against me; the man was discharged, and I was given in charge; I think it is very hard for me to lose my money; I thought when I came to England, that I should be better off than I was in my own country."
Did you follow the cart to Mrs. Ward's house?
Who was there besides yourself, when I broke the chest open?
Which hand did you see the chain come from?
You say I came to you at the public house at 10 o'clock; was it not 9?
I did not have the saddle and bridle on the Friday morning that I went to London.
Who brought the horse up out of the field?
Who fetched the horse out of the field that morning?
Who was the young man that was with me?
I do not disown having the horse; I had had it for sale previous to this several times; I did not mention to Mr. Oaks where I was going to take it that morning; I said I knew a party that would most likely buy it; I went to a coachman; he was not at home, and I thought I would go to town with it; I did not intend to be away long; I went to St. Martin-lane; I saw the man, and said I had a horse for sale; I was drinking, and was very nearly tipsy; I told the man I had to take Mr. Oaks back forty guineas for it; I never offered the horse to Mr. Barber for sale at all, till I got near drunk; I said, \I must take Mr. Oaks home 30l. for it;\" he said, \"I can't give you as much as that; come inside; I will write out a receipt, and you shall have 25l. for the horse;\" I went inside, and was drinking with him; the man who was with me took the money, and put it in his pocket; he left me drunk in the public house, and went away with the money."
When I gave you the half crown, what did you do?
When you got the half crown, what did you do with it?
I uttered the first half crown; I did not know it was bad; I offered to pay with a good shilling, but he would not take it; he told me I was a d  vagabond, and he would make an example of me; as to the last one, I know nothing about it; I had been out with a lad, and when I just reached Kennington-common, this man came and took me; I was never in the man's shop in my life.
Was I in the room when you went out?
The party had moved away that morning.
That was my landlady; she is living in Gray's Inn Lane now.
I was at home and in bed at a quarter to 12 o'clock that night; I am innocent of the charge.
This witness has sworn false.
That is false; I gave 3l. for the mare, and sold it to Osborn for 3l. 10s., and if she turned out well he was to give me another half sovereign; I went to him again, and he said that he thought she was going to have the glanders; I bought her of Alfred Hitchcock.
I went home on 3rd June very drunk, and asked my wife where she had been; she made use of very bad language, and I said, \You have been out along with Mr. Cox again;\" that is a man that she is keeping company with."
I am very sorry it has happened; we have been married fourteen years, to my sorrow; wherever I am at work this woman comes and annoys me; I have two cuts on my hand where she struck me with a knife; I had only been home a month, and a fortnight out of that was out of work; the night this happened I was very drunk; I said to her, \You have been out along with this Cox at the Wheatsheaf again;\" she made me a bad answer, and flew to the cupboard, and got this knife, and we had a struggle together; after this happened she lighted the fire, and put on the kettle, and it was three quarters of an hour before the policeman came, and I was sitting, smoking my pipe; I went along with him; I have been obliged to walk through the country over and over again through this woman, and no longer ago than last Thursday she said she would never sleep till she saw me out of the country."
Did you not come to the station and pick out a person with carroty hair, and say that that was the person?
He picked out another person as being the person he saw, and the next morning he came and said that he did not know that person, but he knew me.
I bought the things.
I took the book off the front of the van, and told you that I I would have a ride, and you said that I might have a ride behind you. Witness, I did not know you were there till I got to Houndsditch  my book was in the boy's possession.
Was the piece broken off the box?
A man lifted it up on my shoulder, and the other man said that he would go and see if his sister was at home.
I had 4s. 6d. in my hand, and when he caught hold of me I dropped it; Taylor told me to take the box to Morrison and Dillon's, and wait till he came; he did not come in ten minutes, so I left the case by Morrison and Dillon's cellar, and asked a gentleman who I saw with a carpet bag if I should carry it; he said, \Yes,\" and I carried it into Chiswell Street, when he got into a cab and gave me 7 1/2 d.; I came down to where Taylor was going, to see if I could see him, but could not; going along Shoreditch, I saw a young man with a case, who asked me to carry it for him  I did so, and left him in the court with it."
You said that you did not see the knife in my hand?
I have a witness to speak of my wife's character during the time I was married; I procured all I could; she was dissatisfied with it; I was driven to a state of madness; I did not know what I was doing.
This is the man that she was after when she went away from me. The prisoner received a good character.
When you told me there was 4d. in the bed, I asked you to lend it to me till I got some change.
I am innocent of it.
You stated that the man who stole the pony had a blue smock frock on, a thing which I never wore in my life.
This witness speaks the truth, and he is the only one who does.
I got the pony in London; I have been in a mad-house, and I will go again.
I said a man gave me them to carry.
Did not I ask you for a lodging?
Did not you take it up, and say that it was good enough, for it rung well?
You put the two half crowns into the till together.
I left home five weeks ago, and came to Covent Garden, but could not get employment; I had a half sovereign, which I changed, and if I had any money that is how I got it; I thought this was a bad one, but this man persuaded me that it was good, as it rang well; it is not feasible that I should have told them where I came from if I had been passing bad money.
When I came into your shop on the Monday, I told you that the meat was bad.
I took the florin of a countryman with a hay cart and gave the money to my wife, with, a few halfpence, and between 10 and 11 o'clock she gave me the money to get something for dinner; as to giving a bad shilling to anybody, I am positive I had not got one; I have lived there eight years, and nobody can give me a bad character.
Did not you kneel on me?
Mr. Johnson is no relation to me; he is not married to my sister, he is only living with her; he beat me about shamefully.
At the time Martin Burke had his trial, did the Judge ask you any questions concerning me?
On 4th April there was a benefit for the widow and children of the late Henry Hayes.
I told the inspector I had been struck by you; and after you got me by the throat, after the garotting style, you took my porte monnaie, and gave it to another man.
Did I not go up before the Judge, and say, \My Lord, have I committed any perjury?\" and he said, \"No, I had not\"?"
After I was taken before the Magistrate, did he not say, \I see no case of perjury?\""
On 4th April there was a performance at the Strand Theatre, for the benefit of a man of the name of Hayes, was there not?
How many times was I in the House of Correction?
There was no question asked whether my name was Moses Aaron, but whether I was in prison by that name; the Jury brought in Martin Burke not guilty, and did not I get up and ask the Judge whether I had committed any perjury?
When do you say I gave that boy in charge?
Did you take them into custody?
Did you take those men into custody?
When Martin Burke was in the dock, you were in Court?
Were you at the Sessions when Burke had his trial?
Is there Grace's Alley, Wellclose Square?
Is there not Grace's Alley?
Were you in Court when a paper was handed up to the Judge, and they asked me whether I ever went by the name of Moses Aaron?
This man has been convicted of felony, and suffered eight months in the House of Correction.
It is not likely that I should go up to him, and ask him what he wanted with me.
You found that I had been living in Oakley Street, but I made a mistake in the number?
Did I not say, \Near Great Garden Street\"? I told you I only lodged there two or three nights."
Have you never seen me in Oakley Street?
I met a party whom I knew; he asked me to buy him two yards and a quarter of cloth and a yard of alpaca, and, not having any money, he gave me a 5l. note to pay for it; on my return I handed him four sovereigns; I told him that I charged him 18s. 9d., keeping the difference; I declare I had no knowledge of the note being forged when I offered it in payment; I received it from an acquaintance of some years standing, the man introduced to me by a party named Tyrrell; the following morning I went to Great Garden Street, which was the only address I knew where I could get a lodging; I found I had given No. 39 instead of No. 29; I was well known in London; there has not been the slightest imputation on my character, and it is not likely I should sacrifice my character for this; there has never been a charge against me, and I had not a guilty knowledge of the note being forged; as to my saying, \Eighteen months,\" I have no recollection of saying so."
When you and the policeman put me out of the house, I got the space of fifty yards from the house by myself and the policeman told me I was going the wrong road.
While you held one hand the policeman knocked me down.
You were inside when the landlord and Goddard were together outside.
After I got outside, you and the landlord let me go along the road.
I was drinking from a quarter before 6 o'clock on the Saturday morning till 4 on the Sunday morning; I then went home and had my breakfast; I then went to that house and remained there till between 10 and 11 o'clock; the policeman came and awoke me and knocked me about; I did not know what it was till I found myself in the road to the railway station; I fell asleep; the policeman came and awoke me, and there was some blood on my eye; I took my knife out to scrape it off, as I could not get it off with my finger.
I am innocent of it.
I do not remember anything about it; I hope you will forgive me; I am almost blind.
He never saw the scythe in my possession.
I went to this field to lie down as I had nowhere else to go to; I picked up this scythe to mow with, and went to this shed to lie down, when these men jumped up and threatened to cut my head off with the scythe, and gave me in charge.
Did you see me there?
It is wrong what he has said, that he saw me chuck the lead off my shoulder.
I am not the man you represent.
When you came into the Greyhound, did you not say that you thought I was the man?
Where were you when the man gave the half-crown to Mrs. Bullen?
Did you let the half-crown go out of your hands to anybody else in the Greyhound?
Did you put any mark on the half-crown?
Did you not put the half-crown into Mr. Stephenson's hand?
Where did you keep the first shilling?
I can assure you of the four pieces of coin I am innocent  I believe the fact is, the coins were passed by one person, and then I unfortunately passed another.
I changed a crown-piece with a costermonger for some coke, which was the last money I had; and the money I had from him was the money I uttered  I did not try to make my escape; I did not know the money was bad  in going to the station my cap dropped off, I wanted to stoop to pick it up and he would not let me, but struck me, and seized me by the throat  the inspector knows that I went to the station without a cap  he knows that I get my living by hard work  he called me a smasher.
Did you not strike me twice? No; only once  Millerman had not got hold of your neck  he seemed regularly lost with you  my staff was never drawn  when at the office, a policeman said, \That is the man that gouged one of our men's eye out; \"and the prisoner said, \"Yes, I gouged his b  eye out, and would have done for him if it had not been for him,\" pointing to me; \"he ought to have been done for long ago.\""
Did I not drop my cap?
The evidence of the officer is very wrong  I was very drunk  I was almost dead with his screwing his knuckles in my throat  Carr gave me two severe blows, and struck me with his staff  they threw me down several times, and no sooner was I down than I was kicked again.
Did not the policeman stand behind you at Bow-street and tell you what you were to say? A. He stood behind me, but never said a word to me; you complained of the witness's door being open, and Mr. Jardine ordered it to be closed.
I was coming down Parliament-street  I heard a woman screaming, and just as I got to the corner a man came past me, knocked me down, and ran away  he took my hat  I ran after him, and the policeman came and took me.
Are you quite sure it was me on the area steps?
I was not in the house, neither did I get over the area gate  there was a person in the house, who came out and asked me if I could see a policeman  I said that I had not seen one  I did not leave the turnpike gate till a quarter-past 1 on Sunday morning, and then this person came out, and I thought he was a policeman  he asked me if I should like anything to eat  I said \Yes,\" and he brought me out a piece of bread and meat  directly I heard Mrs. Maldon's bell ringing I ran away  I was quite tipsy  I had been drinking all day long  I declare I had not been in the house for twelve months."
It is false; I never put my arm through the window, I stood at the lamp-post.
I never had the time-piece  I was at the lamp-post when the other man took it.
You were in the public-house from 12 till 3, the landlord can prove that.
We stopped at the public-house till 3 o'clock with the soldiers, as the landlord can prove  we went over the bridge to look for a coffee-shop  I got a bed, and then we went down to the water side again, and the corporal said to the young woman who was with the prisoner, that be would give her the key of the handcuffs if she would take him home  we were all drunk together, so they opened the handcuffs at the steps of London Bridge, and the prisoner ran up Cannon-street  I did not see the soldier struck, but when he could not take the deserter, he said that I was one of the party, and gave me in charge.
I was willing to be searched because I was not guilty  I wish the mistress to be examined.
What sort of character did I bear while with you?
In the indictment I am charged with striking her  I did not strike her.
What brought you up two pair of stairs?
Where did you take the sixpence from in the morning, which you gave me?
Did you not leave Drake and me in the room?
I did not mention whether the friend I met was a man or a woman.
About 10 o'clock that morning I came from parade  there were four or five of us in the room  Drake left the room, and Dumbelow came in with a letter, and said, \Where is Rickards?\"  I said, \"I do not know, I suppose he is gone up stairs\"  in a minute afterwards Rickards came into the room, and they went to the window and read the letter  I left the room and was below about ten minutes  when I came in again they were both sitting down writing, and Drake was overhauling his bed  I said, \"What are you looking for?\"  he said, \"I have lost my tobacco-box and 14s.\"  I said, \"You must have mislaid it somewhere\"  he said, \"I could not; I had it when you gave me the 6d.\"  in the afternoon at 2 o'clock we went to drill, and came in at 20 minutes before 4  I saw a friend, and he begged me to come out  I went and met another marine, who asked me where I was going  I said, to see a friend outside; and we both went together and met him  he walked two or three paces ahead of me  he said, \"Come and have something to drink\"  I said, I could not, I had no money  he said, \"Never mind, I have plenty,\" and he put his hand in his pocket and gave me 10s.  I called to the other man and said, \"Where will you go and have something to drink?\"  we went to the Navy Arms, and had some porter  my friend left me and said he was going to London, and he would come again on Sunday to see me, and then he was going away for a long time  the other marine was going down the town and got among the girls, and I said I must take care of my money, and I went backwards and put 5s. 2d. in my stocking  I have been nearly 11 years in the service  it is not likely I should do such a thing  and in another 12 months my time is up  Edward Phipps is the marine that was along with me at the time  he is not here  neither he nor I were allowed to speak, only the witnesses against me."
Mr. Berdoe asked the father where the shilling was, and he said it was smashed up.
He told the Magistrate there were seven more shillings in the till; how does he know it was the same shilling?
Do you recollect who was with you in Newgate-street when you met me?
I am sorry it occurred; I received the money, but had not the least intention of doing anything dishonest; I had been up all night and fell asleep in the tap-room, and unfortunately lost my money; as soon as I found it was gone I sent my wife to Mr. Shopland and acknowledged to it, saying I would repay it in the course of a fortnight, if he would allow me.
I was out to look for a job, and a man asked me if I wanted a job  I said, \Yes;\" he asked me to carry this to Brick-lane and he would give me a shilling: I said, \"Yes;\" and was going there  he said he would follow me  I found it rather heavy and put it on a barrow, and the officer came and asked what I had got: I said, \"A chest of tea.\" I went back to see for the man but could not find him, and the officer took me to the station."
When he took me, he asked the lady whether I was the man?
I had been at my cousin's over night and was coming home; I lost my clothes on the Thursday night, and found myself on the Friday morning without them  I was making my way to the Lower-road, Islington, and some one called \Stop thief!\" The policeman was coming down the road, and he collared me and said he saw me get over the railings. I never was in the place, and know nothing about it."
Did you see me steal your watch?
I was coming by about half past 6; the colunteers were coming by, and I picked the watch up by the man's feet and ran away with it; I did not know it was his; I thought the first witness saw me pick it up, and he might have said it was his; that is why I ran. I did not steal it; the prosecutor cannot say that I did.
Are you sure I am the man?
Were you in the shop?
I was in liquor.
I went for half an ounce of tobacco  this woman served me; I gave her a shilling; she said it was bad; I said it was more than I was aware of; she said, \I took a bad shilling to-night before, and I have no doubt you are the man;\" I said she was mistaken; she said, \"This man passed bad money, I will give him in charge;\" I said it was a lie; she said that a man gave her a bad shilling and she gave it to her husband; I am blamed for another man; I am not a passer of bad money."
I asked for gin and water?
When I left home I had two half-crowns and two shillings. I conceived that one of the shillings was bad, and that was in my pocket; I could not give it to any one. I hope you will take a lenient view of my case; it is the first time I ever was taken in custody.
He is a lodger of mine: I came in on the Saturday night and found him in my bed room.
Did you ever hear anything about my wife and Callaghan heiore that?
I do not care what becomes of me; I intended to kill him that night because I caught him with my wife, but I forgive him now.
There was a looking-glass in front of the prosecutor as well as one at the side.
Do you think it possible with one arm and one leg for me to climb several walls, break an iron bar and force the shutters open and break into a window and get these things, and then climb over all these walls back again. I can hardly walk on level ground. I am a paralytic on one side and cannot use one arm and leg; since I have been afflicted I get my living by cleaning boots with one hand. I was out all this night. I had no money to pay my lodging. I knew a young man at Islington who owed me a shilling, and I thought I would go and ask him for a sixpence to pay my lodging; I waited there till past 12 o'clock, and then he had not come home; I did not know what to do, so I walked about till the morning. I was going along the Lower-road, Islington, at about half-past three, and I was stopped by two men and they asked me if I had a mind to earn two or three shillings; I said I should like it, and they gave me this bundle to carry, and I was along with them when the policeman took me, and I have been in custody ever since.
I was drinking in the Bedford Arms, and a girl was drinking in my company; I got up to go, and she followed me, and asked if I was going home; I said, \Yes,\" and she told me not to go without money as she had plenty, and she gave me this money. If I had thought it was bad I would not have offered it. I got it about 12 o'clock; I did not know it was bad."
On Saturday-night, 10th November, I was going down the Kent-road, and when I came by a public-house a man called \Archer, where are you going?\" I said, \"I am going to Deptford, how do you know me?\" he said, \"I know you well, I know your brother;\" he asked me how I was getting on, and whether I would have anything to drink; I said I would rather not. I told him I had been out of work a fortnight; I said, \"I am not very well off;\" he said, \"Here is something to carry you on a little while,\" and he gave me this sovereign; I took it in my hand, and saw what it was, and put it into a little bag, where I had a farthing. I wished him good night; he said, \"Oh! you might as weil call on me;\" he mentioned the name of the place where he lived; I forget it. I went to his house afterwards; he was not at home; I had some tea there, and then he came in; he took me to a public house, called for some ale, and gave a sixpence for it; I said I was rather tired; I called for some rum, and gave the sovereign; the landlady took it away into the bar parlour; they both came out togethar, and said it was a bad one. That is the truth."
Have you known me?
Have you known me?
Did not you go to Mr. Mix, and did not he tell you that he gave the two-shilling piece to my boy to pay the rent with?
On Saturday morning as I was coming down the Walworth-road I went up to Mr. Mix's doorway and found the parcel lying there; I picked it up, took it to the White Hart, and asked the barman to take care of them till I called for them; he said that he would; I went then and saw Mr. Drew and he asked me to have a glass of ale. I earned 1s. that morning; I came home about 2 o'clock and had my dinner; I went to the White Hart in the evening, asked the barman for those books, and he gave them to me; there were about ten or eleven people sitting in front of the bar; I opened them before everybody. I said I would take them up to the station on Sunday morning; I went away then. I went back again and saw Drew, and he said he would give me a half-crown for them; I sold them for the half-crown. I know nothing about breaking into the place.. I worked at the Great Northern; at coal carrying.
I only asked him a few shillings, and then a crown  he said, \They are not gold,\" and I said, \"I am aware of that.\""
I did offer to sell the articles certainly, but everybody knows that we Jews are in the habit of asking more than we take; nobody ever expects to give us what we ask. We are unfortunate fellows; the City authorities will not allow us to have a barrow in the street. I had only taken 1s. all the day. I have been here a week, and ill all the time.
Was it at half-past 2 you saw me?
Was there any mark on the five shilling piece?
When I went into the shop and gave the five shilling piece, she gave it to another woman in the shop; that woman went out, and then it went through three or four different hands, and no one knew it was bad but a man that was standing opposite the house.
I wish you to state positively whether you saw two half-crowns on your counter at once, or not?
Did you put the half-crown into the till?
I do not know the lady at all.
I had taken that half-crown; I did not know it was a bad one when I offered it.
He took me over to his room and lay down on the bed: we lay there for three quarters of an hour, and he was acting indecently; I got up, and he said he would not let me go, without my watch and money; the other man took his watch and chain  I am innocent; every time I have seen him he has wanted me to go home with him: he always treated me.
What I told you was, that I was not so drunk that I did not know what I was about.
I am innocent of this charge  it is the first time I have been in custody, and I hope it will go leniently with me.
.. Originally I had intended, through poverty, to defend myself, and had made up a brief, which through the assistance of my friends was kindly handed over to Mr. Sleigh last evening I now feel that I can say nothing to the jury, therefore I leave it in your lordship's hands.
. When Mr. Bone spoke to me about this money, I told him I had made use of it, and had been trying to obtain a loan to repay it; he said if I would acknowledge it as a debt, he would not punish me; he afterwards gave me into custody.
He says I entered the shop twice, but I only went once.
. I went with a jug to get a pint of ale for a man, and the prosecutor said that the florin was bad, and that I had been there twice. I had never been in the shop before in my life.
Did not the party you bought it of say that it was not the case?
Did you see me shift the seal from the bags and use the button to make the seal?
. There are a great many likeness-cases alike; there is no proof that I opened the bag or took anything out; a small scratch on the case might happen in packing it up. I purchased the case before I went to the Crimea and have had it ever since.
You never saw me run after the man twice, did you?
On Christmas-day the man that is dead had a pipe of mine. I went outside the hatch going to the rear, and coming back I saw him with a pipe, answering to my pipe; he would not give it me; we both had a row; we struggled and had a fight; we had two rounds when Knight fell; he got up, picked up some stones, and hit me; I ran after him and hit him; down he fell and I fell over him. I don't know any more of it.
I had a half-sovereign, a sixpence, and a peony-piece when I went out that day; I changed the half-sovereign at a public-house; 1 went on further and stood six-pennyworth with a potman at another public-house; I went across to Woolwich with a party to have something to drink; I then bad 5s. in my pocket; I went into a public-house, and called for half a pint of beer, and they gave me two fourpenny-bits, and a threepenny-bit; I had been drinking rather freely; I said, \I don't like this little fiddling money, can't you give me copper?\" the landlady said she had no other money than that; I walked about first into one house and then into another, and found I was rather on the drink; as to knowing what money I had. I knew nothing about it scarcely; as to the shilling, I know not where I took, it; I get my living honestly enough."
. On Friday evening I had the misfortune to take that On my way home on Saturday night I called in at the public house for the ale; I was going to buy a pair of new boots with the change.
I cried out, \Queen! petition! Parliament! petition!\""
The doctor brought my bitter enemy near me, who has tyrannized over me.
. I never sold them to this gentleman; I sold them to a party who is in Court, but who never paid me.
I am guilty of letting the man come from Whitechapel  he gave me a shilling to let the things remain in my house, but I never made such a thing, I could not.
. I admit allowing a party to bring them into my house; I never made such a thing in my life. I work at the docks.
. I went into the yard to get a drink of water, and I no sooner went in, than a man caught bold of me and said, \There is a woman calling out 'Police!' I shall hold you till she comes;\" and he held me the policeman came, and gave me in charge: he did not see me on the tiles, I was not on the tiles."
When you took me, you said to me, \You have pulled that shutter down?\""
What did you say?
Did not you say at the station-house, that I was running and stopped and spoke to you?
On the Sunday night when you came in, what did you say?
Had she received some injury from another woman before?
where did you\ put the half-crown I gave you?"
. It is very strange if he saw me talking to the woman he did not stop her. He must have seen the loaves and flour if I had them. He has mistaken me for another party.
About what time did you grant a procuration in favour of Mr. Sergius Umnoff?
I believe you stated before the Alderman that I was perfectly acquainted with the mode in which you usually accepted bills, and you also stated that you had never accepted a bill from London at seven days' sight, during the three years I was in your service?
You stated before the Alderman that you asked the boy where he came from.
When the boy applied for the book, what answer was returned to him?
You have seen the signature of Mr. Matvieff on the forged bill?
Did you not the evening before my arrest call at my house, and did not my wife tell you I was not at home, but you could see me between half-past 8 and 9 the next morning.
Where was the constable standing when the charge was booked?
Did you hear me say that I had taken the note at Liverpool?
. There is no legal evidence to show that I had guilty knowledge or that I was previously acquainted with forgery; it may be the misfortune of any one to be in possession of a forged note. It may not he a satisfactory way of showing how it came into my possession, but my occupation leads me into business transactions with persons who I am totally at a loss to give any account of. I am a stranger in London.
What weight was it?
Was this meat exposed for sale?
Gentlemen of the jury,  This bullock was my own, and I gave 12l. for it; it was healthy, and as sound as any animal in the world. I put it out to feed, and it jumped a ditch and broke its knees. I dressed it as quickly as possible, took it next day to the station, sent it to London at 10 o'clock in the morning, and it arrived at London at 7 o'clock the following evening; whether being twenty hours on the journey made any difference, I cannot say. Mr. Newman has been down twice and inquired into the circumstances. The bullock was four years of age.
When I gave you the shilling did not you open the till?
Was the shilling disfigured when you put it in your pocket?
Were you on my right side or on my left when you took me to the station?
. I was convicted nearly two years ago. I knew I had another shilling when I went into the public-house, but that was to keep me on Saturday and Sunday. Now a man who had been convicted of uttering counterfeit coin would know what he would have to undergo if he was found doing so again; I had an opportunity of swallowing the shilling if I wished, and I am a very good runner, and might have run away, but I did, not, I am innocent.
Where did you place the money?
Was your daughter in the shop when I came in?
Did not you return it to me, and did not I say, \I think it is a good one?\""
I am innocent of entering the shop before  I went one Saturday in January, for the first time  I did not know that the half-crown was bad  I bought a pair of boots of a friend for three shillings  he wrote to me for the money; I sent my wife to pledge a coat, and she gave me the half-crown and sixpence to buy the stamps  my name is Charles Stevens  I gave the name of Lydiard because I was frightened.
Did I not say that it was the 2s. piece that I had received in change from Mrs. Clothier?
I went in for half a quartern of rum for my wife, who was poorly, and I should not have gone into the house except for my son's knowing her brother at Portsmouth. I went in the house about three or four times; I had two half-crowns, and I am positive they were good. I went in more for the sake of getting change for the second half-crown than for the rum. She said, \I think this is a bad half-crown.\" I said, \"I don't think it is.\" She took up another one from somewhere, I don't know where, and said, \"You have given me another before to-day; I will give you in charge of the police.\" I said I was not aware that I had done anything wrong, but if I had I would rectify it I do not get my living by passing bad money; if I did I should go further from home."
Did you give a description of the person who presented the cheque?
Did you give a description of the dress also?
. I had nothing whatever to do with the letter. There is a desk between the Temple walk and the Paternoster-row walk, and two rows of men, and there are two walks nearer to the pigeon-holes than the Temple walk, so that I had no means of getting at it in that way. It might have been mis-sorted to any one of the 150 men in the office. I found the nine 501. notes. Having occasion to go into the City on Monday, 28th January, for some money that was owing to me the previous week, and passing through Lothbury, I found the bundle of notes. I put them in my pocket and kept them till 25th March; then I did try to purchase a watch and chain with one, I must own. The others I gave to Mr. Russell, except the one I gave to the landlady at 29, Euston-square. The gentleman says that he gave a description of the person presenting the cheque; it varied very much from me. He said it was a person twenty-five years old, I am twenty-two; of sallow complexion, mine is fair; with blotches, I have not got any; 5 feet 8 inches, I am 5 feet 10 inches; brown hair, that would do certainly, but then anybody can perceive that I have curls, which would have been put down if they had been perceived. I know nothing whatever about the cheque or the notes presented at the Bank of England. I read the account in the paper, and it stated they were presented by a man of fashionable appearance. The gentleman from Glyn's says it was the personal appearance of the man that made him suspect. I know nothing about the letter stolen, the cheque, or the notes presented at the Bank. The only thing I know about is the nine notes; those I found and have given up, and I am very sorry that I did find them.
I was in liquor or, and know nothing about it; I am guilty of the assault, but not guilty of the theft.
I think it very possible that some one else may have given them those bad half-crowns; if I had them, I must have received them in change for a sovereign which I changed.
There is a sum of 480l. which is not yet entered in that book.
It is all false; I was not there.
I am not the person; I cannot run very fast, I have to a broken foot.
The policeman described the man to you before you came in.
Did the boy describe the man to you as being all over flour?
How was it you have never been to my residence? you have got another indictment against me, and you might have found the tickets for the blankets?
I am as innocent as the child my wife has in her arms. It is all villainy and spite; he told them what sort of a man I was, and got them to perjure themselves. It is an old grudge.
The policeman took me out of the market where I deal, and you told the inspector that you did not knew it was me, for I had not got so much beard.
I had my beard shaved off, and the barber can come forward.
He is telling a falsehood.
You told the Lord Mayor that you had been to my place to look after me four times. You never went once; you saw me five or six times, and never took me.
. I am as innocent as a child.
I shall be satisfied if you will give me two years.
Did you employ me as a servant, or as a partner?
Did you not give me full power to do at those sort of places just as you would do yourself?
When I came back you used to ask me for your amount?
Did you know Mr. Crosswell?
I owed Mr. Crosswell some money just before Christmas. I used to earn sometimes a pound or 25s., and then on Saturday night he gave me 2s. or 3s., or something like that; I asked him for the money, and he said, \Oh! I must look out for myself.\" Sometimes, instead of paying me the money, he went in the country, and never paid me."
Did not you say before the Magistrate that I dropped the bacon when I was first in custody?
I deny the charge; I was not in the shop; I don't know anything about the bacon.
What did you give me in change for the 2s.?
When you took us into custody had we not shoemakers' tools with us?
I was going to London-bridge railway-station, and I received some money to pay my fare down to Worthing; that was the money I had found on me; all good money. I was too late for the train; and I went into this public-house with my friend; I asked him what he would have to drink, and he said a drop of beer; he paid for it himself We went out afterwards, and had some dinner, and afterwards we went back, and my friend had some gin, and then I said it was getting time for us to go to the train, and we went.
Had I not dealt for some time at your shop?
I am innocent. The shilling I gave at the chandler's shop I did not know was bad. I have got Mr. Whaley here, whom I have worked for the last 7 or 8 years.
Did you mark it before you went to the door?
As you were taking me to the station from Mrs. Rooke's house, her husband came with us to book the charge, did he not?
Did you not say you were not exactly sure I was the man?
I had half-a-crown on the previous night, and got 1s. in change, and went the next day to Mr. Rooke's house. I did not know it was bad. When the landlord of the King and Queen came before the Magistrate, the clerk told me to put my cap on. I did so, and he said, \He is a different sort of man.\" The Magistrate then said, \"If you could swear to him when he was brought to the door, you can now;\" and he said, \"Well, I think he is the man;\" and I was committed on that evidence. I could easily have got out of Mrs. Rooke's bar if I had liked; any guilty man would have got away, but I had my conscience clear. I was not in the King and Queen public-house at all."
Have you never seen a man like me before?
What is it you swear to me by?
Am I the man that gave you the 2s. piece?
When you saw me at the police-station, when you were asked if the man was there, did not you say, \No, there is none of them there,\" until the constable stopped you, and said, \"Look again!\""
Do you think, if I wanted a pair of boots done, that I should take my boots and want to pay some money besides? Would not my boots be security enough? I am not taken in the act of passing bad money, neither is bad money found on me.
Was I not six days with you without work?
I never denied having the things; I bought them Three weeks before I was accused. He owed me money, and let me have the things in payment.
I bought the things of a person in a street leading out of Petticoat-lane. I did not know that they were stolen or I should not have kept them by me a week after the robbery was committed.
Before leaving Paris did not you give me orders to sell the samples before coming back?
In December last did you not go on a journey?
On 22d March, when I was at your place, did you not ask me what my expenses had been on an average?
Who was it had the carpet bag on the day you mention; was it I or Sellingham?
Did I not sell them to you at the market price, or very near?
Were those goods pawned by me?
Do you know when I was in London first, about what' date?
Did it pass out of your sight?
How could I be there three weeks before? I was in prison at that time..
I received them in change for a sovereign. I was very drunk when I went into the house, and did not know whether they were good or bad.
She said at Guildhall that she thought I was the man.
On 10th April, when you were taking me by Smithfield, did you not say to me, \Mrs. Crowson thinks you are the party that was in there a day or two ago, and rung the changes on her for a counterfeit shilling?\""
On 9th March I went from Billingsgate-marke to Charles-street, Westminster; I had about 6s. in my pocket. I got drinking up there, and playing at skittles. I played a man for sixpence and a pint of ale, and I lost; on the last two games I lost a shilling, and had two pints of ale to pay for. I said, \Here, take your shilling and give me eighteen pence out of this half-crown, and we will have two pots more, and then go home.\" On my coming home I went into this lady's shop. I was sitting down eating and the policeman came in and took me. Do you think, if I intended to get my living by uttering, I should go in two days running, with counterfeit shillings? I must be sure that she would know me or lock me up. I can prove where I was; I was not in the city all day long; at the time she charges me I was at Stepney fair. I am perfectly innocent of what I am charged with."
You say you knocked the pistol from my hand?
He never touched the pistol at all; I did present it at him, but not with intent to fire it at him; I had been drinking; he had been telling parties I had absconded from my wife and children. I took him in as a partner and he cheated me out of my profits, that is why I left him.
You did not come out of the gate till after this was over, till your father told you to follow me.
It is false; I said no such thing.
I can assure you that I had been drinking, which is a thing I was not in the habit of doing. I was so aggravated, and one thing and another, I know not how the pistol came into my possession, nor yet its contents. When I came to my brother-in-law's we had a few words about taking my connexion away, which, I believe, some shopkeepers here can prove. I was never in prison before in my life; I have a wife and seven children dependent upon me.
When I went to the house his uncle asked who was there.
Did you lay hold of my fingers with your teeth?
When I went to your door, you raised up the window, and looked out, and asked my name.
I told you I was going to get my cap.
They beat me as severely as they could; Collins beat me and had me down, and was on top of me, and his uncle hit me with the pail two or three times; people who were looking out at the window said that it was a shame to use me so. Before Carey came downstairs I was struck with something, and was got up against the door, and hurt so that I was obliged to get medicine from the doctor for it. I was told that Collins was watching me, and would take my life whenever he caught me. I was cut on the nose and cut here.
How long had you the half-crown in your possession before you found that it was bad?
What part of your premises were you in when the half-crown was given?
The half-crown has been in these people's hands a month and a few days, and there is not the least doubt that it has been hawked about from one person to another, and it stands very reasonable that they have made mistakes in the money. I came that day from Kingston, having only 1s. 2d. in my possession; I went and had something to eat and gave the shilling, and was told it was bad; I did not know it was bad.
Mr. Robinson never said that I was the man till I came to the station. A. Yes he did, and you were present.
I am not guilty of the half-crown at all; the shilling was given me in the Old Kent-read by a gentleman, when I was out looking for money to pay my lodging; I stopped him in the street and asked him for it. I got the pills for my wife as she was not well, but never stepped inside the shop before that.
I did not know what I was doing, I was intoxicated.
How can you swear I am the man?
When I sold you the first lot, did you say you would take more if I brought them?
When you saw that parcel in Mr. Jenkinson's shop, was it a square tightly tied up parcel?
I admit the letter 
At what time on the 29th did you give me the keys
From your experience and knowledge of the material in question, will you swear that it is leather at all.
Was not this what I said, that parcels were passed as dirty linen.\"	q"
I think you have stated that from the time I left the barracks, I should not have had time to get to London by the time I was apprehended?
There are three things to be considered in this case; first, whether according to the evidence there have been any goods stolen, and if so, let us see whether the goods in question are the goods that have been stolen, and then let us see whether I stole them. Now, so far as the evidence goes, that there have been goods stolen, it only amounts to this, that Mr. Morris takes ill something like seven or eight weeks previous to my apprehension, and when he comes back to the shop he finds his goods diminished; and a very likely thing too; there were a great many men at work there, and a great quantity of material used, and it is very likely that the goods may bare been out up in our trade. So much for goods being stolen. Then as to the identifying of the goods. It is all very well telling business men that goods are had out of the stores not marked; we all know it is not so; even our gloves, boots, and everything we get, and the tools we use, are marked with the Government stamp; it is only a trick that is tried to be played upon you, to say that there are goods in the store marked and not marked; but it so happens that the goods in question were given out of Mr. Morris's private store. Then as for my stealing them. The only evidence laid before you that I stole the goods, is that I was entrusted with the key from dinner time till evening; if Corporal Weaver had been here he would have told you that he was at work with me, and also another sergeant, and that I did not go to the stores the whole afternoon, and that I left without any parcel, and that I could not have taken or handled the goods without their knowing it; but the witness, very unfairly, is kept back, purposely, no doubt, that you may not see the rights of the case; I leave it to you, gentlemen, to say whether I did steal the goods, or whether they are the property of Her Majesty. I have great doubts whether they are leather at all; if not, the indictment must fail. I trust you will show by your verdict that the humblest, as well as the noblest in the land, can have justice at your hands, and that you will not send a man to prison solely upon doubts and suspicions, without the least foundation, and without being supported by evidence.
The cheque is not mine; I am positive I brought no cheque there at all; the only cheque I had was the one for 4l., which I have owned to.
I am innocent of stealing the watch. I received it from Mr. Benjamin in the coffee-shop in Eagle-street. At the time the gentleman came for the watches Mr. Benjamin was busy, and said, \I cannot come over myself, I will send some one over.\" I was in there taking some coffee, and he asked me if I would go over with it. I said, \"Yes.\" The first watch I took over was a large gold one, as he told me, and he told me to ask 7l. for it  it did not suit the gentlemen, and he gave me another  that did not suit, and I took another, which I was to ask 3l. for; the gentlemen said he would give 50l. I took it back and told Mr. Benjamin about it, and he said, \"Go back, and take the 50s.,\" which I did, and I immediately returned to the coffee-shop, and gave it to Mr. Benjamin, and he gave me half-a-crown for my trouble."
I was not there; I was at the Victoria Theatre.
I was not there; I was at work at the City Kitchen till half-past 5; I then left my mate and went over to the Victoria Theatre.
I met a woman outside the public-house, and she asked me to have something to drink, I said I had no money, and she gave me a two shilling piece. I went in and called for the glass of rum, she came in, and then walked out again in a great hurry, and the lady detected it was bad. I then paid for the glass of rum myself and went out. On my way home I went into this beer shop, and called for a glass of ale, and gave a shilling which was bad. I did not know it was bad, and this policeman took me in charge. I did not know what I was doing.
\My Lord, I came into London on Friday evening and Mr. Gardiner came into the ship and asked me where I was going to board; I told him I had a boarding-house where I was stopping before, named Jacobs; he said that she had left the place altogether; we came up to London in the morning and that man came on board the ship, it was a wet day on Saturday and he stopped all day waiting for the crew and he said \"You must come with me for the woman has left the place. I went with him and was four days on shore. I came down and was four days in his house, when I was paid off I went to the office, he had a bit of paper in his hand and said \"Are you going to remit your money to me?\" I said \"I can keep my money myself;\" he said \"There are a great many robberies about here and it may be picked from you\" and I gave it to him. I was paid off the Dunbar and I went to a man named Davis where I bought some clothes. I waited till 3 o'clock and saw him in his own house and asked him if he was going to settle; he said \"There is plenty of time the night is long. I went up to his house and then met him in the public-house and said \"Are you going to settle with me, Mr. Gardiner; I want to go to ny mother and father in the morning.\" I was sitting down in his house about an hour, and I came down to the public-house again and asked him \"Are you coming to settle with me or I shall lose the steam-boat in the morning?\" He came up and came into his house and said \"This chap is always offending me and he put his back against the door like this. Some of my shipmates were there but they have all gone away. He said, \"You owe five days board,\" wanting to charge me for Saturday, when I only arrived on Saturday night and he said \"There is 4s. for putting the heels on your boots.\" I said that I would not pay it I could get it done for a shilling. He said \"There is 18s. 6d. for the pair of boots you have got on your feet\" and he said \"You are in my debt.\" I said \"I cannot be for only four days board.\" He would not settle with me and I went to a policeman and told him of it, in St. George's Highway; he said \"You must wait till morning.\" \"I said \"I want to have my money before the morning\" and the policeman said he could do nothing further. I asked him to come into the house with me and settle for me but he would not, and I went to the public-house; he was there drinking and one of my shipmates was there: I asked him to give me my clothes and I would go home with what money I had in my pocket, he said \"Go away you scamp or I will kick your a  \" he struck me three times. I said if he kicked me I would summons him in the morning. I am not getting justice, that man (pointing to Cohen) can give me justice if he likes but he wo'nt. He kicked me and turned me out. I went into the public-house, and was drinking, and this man with him, and one of my shipmates and two girls. My shipmates called me in to give me a glass of rum but I would not take it, I was crying. He would not give me my clothes and he came outside the door. I asked him if he was going to give me my clothes and he struck me in the pit of the stomach. I went in this manner (stoping) and two girls said \"Are you stabbed?\" I could not speak, and they said, \"The boy is stabbed.\" When I came to my senses I said, \"I am not stabbed.\" I heard no more till I was taken by the police. That is all I have to say, I beg for mercy and I know I shall get justice. Have mercy upon me my Lord, have mercy; don't hang me; my father is an old man and I have no one to help my mother and my little brothers and sisters and what am I to do."
Was I not coming towards you to ask you whether it was right or wrong to take them out?
I work 136 hours a week: my master has been up here two days to give me a character  the policeman went to one of my masters and he told him I had a good character.
I was wheeling the barrow down Fetter-lane, and a man asked me where I was going; I said, \Straight down;\" and he asked me if I would give him a lift with the can. I said, \"Yes.\" He put it on the barrow; I wheeled it about forty or fifty yards from him, when Hench tapped me on the right shoulder. I asked him what he wanted. He asked me where I got the can from. I told him the man asked me to wheel it for him. He told me to wait a moment. He looked at the can, and I said, \"Does it belong to you?\" He said, \"Yes.\" I took it off the barrow, and placed it on the pavement. If I had stolen the can, or known that it was stolen, why did I not place it inside the barrow? it would have been concealed there. Instead of which, I placed it on the top of the barrow board, and it could be seen from the top of Fetter-lane to the bottom. I did not know what it contained. I never used any of it in my life. Mr. Hench saw the other man who was with me."
Those goods do not belong to me; with reference to the box, I had that given to me in the warehouse.
These were not my goods, they were purchased by a lady who had formerly made millinery at my establishment. I told the constable he could find them under the bed; there was no concealment; as to the box, it was given to me by a young man from the firm, named Amor; about the feathers, I plead guilty, as I had them in my possession; I took them to show to a customer, and carelessly placed them in my pocket before I had them properly entered.
I am sure I do not know what benefit it was to me to set fire to the rick.
What time do you say it was when you saw me that night?
It is false. I was at home and in bed at a quarter past 1.
When you met me at quarter past 1, did not you say to me, \Holloa, young shaver, ain't you at home yet?\" and did not I say I was just going home?"
I am quite innocent of it; my brother can prove I was at home at quarter-past 1.
Where had you been to?
Did you see me picking Mr. Ward up?
I gave you my address.
Did you see the snuff-box?
I live at 2, Gloucester-court, Whitecross-street; I had been out, and taken a little drop of drink; I saw Mr. Ward lying on his back, and went and picked him up; he shouted out, \I have lost my purse,\" and instantly gave me in charge; after the inspector wrote it down in the book he would not press the charge, but went away; he did not come to the police-court next morning, and was summoned, and on the following week he appeared; he says that he saw two men and did not take particular notice of them, and yet one of the two was me; that they were not linked together, but were at a distance from each other, and not in company; he says that one of the men, not me, knocked him down, and, while he was in a sitting position, another man came in front of him and took hold of him; he says that my left hand was under his right arm, and that he lost his purse; the money was not found, and consequently he charges me with it."
It was a knife which I made her a present of, eight years ago; she wanted it back, and I would not give it to her; I was cutting up some hard tobacco with it, and I raised my fist to strike her, forgetting that the knife was in my hand, and that is how it happened: what she says it true, but it was not done intentionally.
I am sorry it happened; it was not my intention to use a knife upon the young girl I have known her a long time; it was through my being intoxicated. I was just talking about going away next day. I was cutting up tobacco two or three feet behind them. I asked her if she was going home, she made some reply, and I hit her with the knife in my hand; it shut on my hand, and fell. If I had been in my right senses I would not have touched her at all.
I never stole the pork nor yet sold it.
The policeman asked me what I had in my hand, and I said it was a wrench.
I am innocent of what I am accused of; it was with no intention of taking them that I went there; I went there to relieve myself.
I picked up the spoon in the street, coming on the road from the barracks.
Did you hear me beg of any gentleman?
You say it was in June that I called?
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
How far were you from the boy when I came up?
I had been working at the London Docks, and had received 3s. 6d. for my work that day; at the corner of Christ's church a young man offered to sell me a vest for a shilling; I thought it was cheap and said I would have it; I handed him a half-crown, he put it in his pocket, and then pulled it out again, and said, \I have not got change.\" I said I would send that boy for change, and I went and asked him to go and fetch me two ounces of salts, and I would give him a penny; he went and I stood talking to this young man at the corner, awaiting his retain; I saw him coming along by the church and the shopman and another boy with him. Had I known the half-crown to be bad, do you think I should be so foolish as to go direct up to the boy and ask for the salts and change? it stands to reason, if I had known the half-crown to be bad I should have made off as quick as possible. When the shopman laid hold of me I did not try in any way to get away from him, but I went back direct with him. I was searched at the shop, there was nothing more found on me, nor at the station-house, where I was stripped and searched again. Had I any more on me, or had I tried to pass another at another place, it might look something like guilt; as it is, a man may take a piece of money without knowing it to be bad I took 3s. 6d. at the docks, and to my misfortune the half-crown turned out to be a bad one."
Did you ever see me before that?
You knew me perfectly well?
Is that anything like your writing?
I am wellknown about the City, the porter is mistaken about seeing me in the place on this morning; it is not proved that anyone every saw me with a parcel.
I made no such statement at all, no statement was ever made when we balanced the money; I merely handed it over.
Did you see me throw the chisel away?
In what part of the skylight were the marks?
Did you examine the skylight previous to leaving the place?
I wish to call the attention of the Jury to this chisel; it is not much like a housebraeaking instrument.
You say I dropped the chisel?
Can you swear that is the florin?
I am innocent. On 28th March a young man paid me 3s. which he owed me; it was a florin, two fourpenny-bits, a threepenny-piece, and a penny. I spent all the money but the florin and the fourpence. I changed the fourpenny-piece in Holborn to buy a penny pie, and came into the street where this robbery was committed. As I came aloug I perceived two men go in at the door. I went in to see what it was, and one of the men came and shut the door. I could not open it again. The men went up stairs, and then came down and went out. I took the lock off, and was trying to come out when the constable took me.
When the policeman arrested me I had nothing at all on my person. I am not guilty.
How do you know I gave you that?
Did not you ask Jemmy Downy whether he was the man that got the drink?
I was drinking with six or seven shipmates; I know nothing about this order; the barmaid came and pointed out some men before she pointed me out.
How much did you give me?
A gentleman gave me the shilling to mind a horse for him; and another gentleman gave me another in the landlord's house; that is how I came by the two shillings.
Are you quite sure I am the man?
When did you see me last?
Do you swear that you never lost sight of the 1s. 2d. which was picked up from the ground?
I told you to stand off, that I would not give it up till I heard what kind of a shilling it was that the female witness, Mrs. Brown, had lost; you said, \You had better give the shilling up again;\" I said, \"No, I shall not yet, till I understand the case, and you are bound to tell me true because I am tipsy;\" and the inspector said, \"Give me back the shilling, Mr. Connell, and it wont go hard with you;\" is that right?"
The witness, Henry Brown, has sworn to a falsehood; he says he took the shilling off the counter, and the woman says she had them in her hand and never let them out of her hand; they lay on the counter, and all the time we were talking about them I could have taken them up off the oounter and gone about my business if I had liked; not being guilty, I let them lay there. She does not say she saw me touch the shillings, and I never handled them. She never marked or weighed the money, or sounded it, or tried it in the detector. She does not say what sort of shillings they were, Victoria, or William, or George the Third; she does not know whether they were good or bad. She say, \I think they were two good ones.\" The shilling that dropped out of my pocket was my own, and if it had not been I should never have given it up, but they held out a promise to me that they would not press the charge against me if I would give it up; I gave it np willingly. If ever there was a man sent to this Court innocent, I am that man, and as for running I was too tipsy to run. I had gone half way down the street when the prosecutor left the shop. He came up to me; I shoved him off with my-right hand, I never ran at all. He says I took it off the counter. That is a falsehood, and if he will say that he will say anything. I have got a respectable hard-working wife. I gave correct address, and the policeman saw my home, a clean respectable looking home. I have a family. I have no occasion to do such things. If I had done what a cunning man would have done, I should have put the had shilling under the good one, and not the bad shilling at the top."
I acknowledge to the name of Vandyke but not of Connell.
The trap-door was bolted, for what I could see of it, it goes up straight from the gutter, which would leave nearly a yard and a half from the roof to the tiles; will you swear that a person could reach the bolt?
How was the door fastened?
Did not I make a statement regarding that scarf and the yellow haudkerchief at the Court?
That was the yellow handkerchief and the scarf which I had round my neck.
I was going home at a quarter-past 4, and saw somebody on the roof; I had heard of a robbery at Mr. Lisle's the week before, and went up the ladder as I could not see a policeman; I crossed the plank and found two handkerchiefs; the policeman then came up the ladder and removed the board; I thought if I did not get down some other way he might conclude that it was me. The handkerchiefs are not folded in a particular way at all. I refused my address because I did not wish my friends to know where I was.
Did I snatch it from him, or take it out of his fingers?
Are you sure that it was 25th March or Monday that I came into your house?
He never said anything about that at the police-court.
I did not know the value of it any more than he did.
I told him that at first  have got ten houses in Church-road, Barking.
I am a baker, and work in Tottenham-court-road. On 11th March I was round Burton-crescent, and a man, who I knew by sight, came up to me and said, \Do you know where I can change a 5l. note? I have had it given to me.\" I said, \"I do not know, but perhaps my master will change it for you.\" I told him to meet me in the shop that night, and I asked my master to change it, who had not sufficient cash. I then thought of my brother-in-law, as being a respectable man. I asked him, and we went to Mr. Meadows, who changed it I brought out the money to the man, who gave me 25s. out. I am quite innocent of knowing it was forged."
How could you see me?
Did the policeman say he recognised any of the others?
It is all false what he has said.
How long had I been in your service?
I only came to England on the 4th; I was never in his employment before 7th March.
Have you got any orders from a book?
I have only to say that I never robbed my master at all; always what I fetched there I brought him. I have not been four months in England; I only came over to England on, 4th January.
Was it 9 or 11 o'clock when you missed the cheque?
Everything he has said is untrue.
When we came up the street, and saw the policeman standing there, the witness came and gave information to the police to clear himself, or else he would not have done it.
I saw the prosecutor about 9 o'clock in the morning, and went out with him; when he came back about 11 o'clock he only missed the bill then. I took it, and only kept it to frighten him. When I went out about 11 o'clock I did not say I had it, but went out with the view of changing it, and bringing him the cash for it I thought it would be more agreeable to him. I could not change it, and I met Zach, and told him; he proposed to change it, and that then we would run away with the proceeds between us. I could not get it back from him, and so I thought I would let him change it, and then try and get the money from him, and bring it back to the prosecutor.
I fell against the window as I was very tipsy, and did not know what I was about. I had no thought of taking anything.
Did you not say you would go out and see if you could sell them?
I was at work at a coffee-shop till half-past 4 in the morning, and had them offered to me for sale, or if I liked to dispose of them; I was to have one pair for my trouble; I took two pairs and the uppers to Shepherd, and he said he would try and sell them; I knew nothing of their being stolen; I had bought some shoes of the same man sometime before.
I was standing by the office, and he came and laid hold of me about an hour after his watch was taken.
Did not you and your husband have a few words?
I stated I had had the money outside the beer-shop, and I said it when at the station-house, that his wife had given it to me.
She gave them to me on that night. Mrs. Roberts the worse for liquor. I spent the money.
They were both the worse for liquor.
I am very near-sighted, almost blind, and I hope you will have mercy on me.
I did not pass the florin or shilling at all.
I was not aware the last shilling was bad.
I was never in the shop in my life.
When I snatched the shilling out of your hand I gave it you back again?
It does not stand to reason that a man should go in and get one broken up, and then go in three or four weeks afterwards and get another broken up; what the witnesses have been saying is all false.
Will you swear that that is the 5s. piece you gave to Mrs. Carpenter?
If I knew it was bad, I should have thrown it away. Do you think I should stop there and have two more pints of ale? It had been through five or six different hands.
The first words that you said were, \Hallo, what do you do here?\""
I have learnt a trade since I have been a convict. I have had four years' imprisonment, and twelve months for robbery, and ever since I came out of prison I have been at work. I believe this policeman can say that he has seen me coming from work at half-past 6 in the evening. I was working for Mr. Davis, and for a gentleman who is now in Horse-monger-lane. I have not associated with any bad characters. I turned over a new leaf twelve months before I came home. I gave myself up, I never had a better friend than Mrs. Bradbeer. My father bad been out of work sixteen weeks, and she kept him, aad she gave me victuals while I was in the hospital I saw Mr. Davis the other day, and he said be would give me a character.
You were in liquor, and there was a crowd of people round you.
It is quite false; he knocked me down directly he got hold of me, and put both his knees on my chest.
I was intoxicated at the time.
I was never the shop on the Wednesday.
I never passed any had money anywere. I always got my living honestly; I have got masters to prove it. The two shillings on me were two of the three shillings.
On the Tuesday evening, as I was returning home, I met three men, who asked me to go to a concert in Vauxhall-road; they said they would pay my share. We went, and stopped very late, and I drank too much, and was very ill the next morning. I went that afternoon to Notting-hill, and stopped there all the afternoon. As I was coming back, I met my brother, and stopped with him till about a quarter to 9, when I left him, and went to a house in Piccadilly to have some stout. I went home, and was in bed before the dock struck 10. On Thursday we started from home at half-past 10 to go to the Exhibition, where we remained till half-past 6 in the evening, and then my wife went home. I went to St. James's-street, and stayed there till about half-past 9. On the Friday, I went out to try and get something to do. I went up to the Edgeware-road. A man said, \I will give you half-a-crown and something to drink if you will help beat these carpets.\" I said, \"Very well.\" It was about half-past 1. We stopped till nearly half-past 6, and then came back as far as Port-man-market, where I said, \"I can't go any further,\" and we parted. He gave me the half-crown, and I bought threepenny worth of cheese with it, and received a two shilling-piece and a threepenny-piece change. I went to St. John's-wood, where I stopped about two hours and a half, and then I came back by this man's house, and, feeling rather thirsty, I went in and asked for a glass of the best ale. He drew it, and I was going to drink it when I saw him looking at something in his hand on the other side of the bar. I was going to ask him if it was a bad coin, but he came round and collared me, and gave me in custody. I have a seven years character from one of my employers, and it is not likely I should forfeit that for a two shilling piece."
Where I was lodging, they did not know me by the name of Green, but by a nickname; the landlord knew me by the name of Green.
I was called Clogger because I wore a pair of clogs at one time. The box was what I kept my clothes in. My father is a tailor. I used to work with him; he could not maintain me, and I left him and went to sell fish.
I expect I look the sovereign down in Billingsgate; I go about selling fish.
I was walking in Leather-lane, between 2 and 3 o'clock, and I found the cellar door and the window open. I had been walking about all the previous day; it was coming on to rain, and I went in to get some rest. I had no intention to rob Mr. Josephs or his house. I never saw these articles before they were produced in Court.
It is not me; he has made a mistake.
Did you not say before, that I had thrown it down the area or over the wall?
I never had the meat in my possession.
The cloth I had in my possession was used for horse rubbing?
On what day did I receive the pass-book from the Bank?
On the evening of 4th January, when you called upon me, did not I produce the book of counterfoils, the ledger, and some others?
Did you not tell me on that occasion that Mr. Smith had treated you very cavalierly; that he had refused to give you any positive information, and had told you that he had not paid the cheque into a bankers, and refused to tell you to whom he had paid it, and you wished me to see him?
On 27th December, I believe, Mr. Bosanquet met me at your office?
When do you say you first called on me with reference to this cheque?
Whereabouts was my banker's office situated?
I think you called on me on 20th December in reference to the cheque?
Did I not tell you that it was in consequence of some cheques which I had paid to Brittain being misappropriated that I stopped payment?
You cannot say the date?
I think, on 28th December, you called at my office and I gave you cash for that?
I think at this time there are two actions in which I am plaintiff?
When you took me did I not request you to search a black bag in my presence, containing a least and some other documents?
You stated that you had sued me upon bill of exchange, and obtained judgment against me; can you give me the name of the solicitors you employed.
Where did I find that flat, it was never in my sight since you hammered the table to pieces with it?
Were you not in the street when this row occurred?
How can you stand there and say that I said that, did not I say that I would come with you directly?
This girl of hers will go out to nurse children at 2s. a week, when she can earn 7s. or 8s. a week at binding boots; I have told her if she will be a good girl what kindness I will do her, but if her mother locks the door, as soon as my back is turned she jumps out at the window; her mother complained to me about her, and called me a b  y Irish bastard, though I am not Irish, and flung a cup of hot tea at me; if I buy anything she breaks it all to pieces. On this evening we went out and had a glass of ale apiece, and both got very nearly drunk; we took three quarts home with us. The girl wanted to be in the street, and I said, \Let her bide, we have always had this bother about her, let her go and get her living the best way she can. Her mother kept calling me names, and pulled my whiskers and nose, and shook me; I said, \"If you do not let me alone I shall knock you down;\" she said I am a b  y soldier's daughter, and so long as I have got blood in me, I will fight She struck me and I hit her, she got a poker 18 or 22 inches long, but I took it out of her hand and put it under the grate. I said, \"I will go out;\" she took me by the collar and threw me back, and said, \"You b  r, you shall not go out till I have revenge. She fell against the box, and I on top of her, but as to striking her on the head, I did not know it was done till I got to the station house. I had not seen the flat for two months or ten weeks, since she hammered the table to pieces with it."
As soon as my companion iusulted the Frenchman, did not I say, \Come on, and do not fight?\" and did not you say, \"You can't shine here?\""
You said at the Thames Police-court that you saw me strike the man on the shoulder, and I had no knife?
There were some performers on a bit of a stage at this public-house, and a foreigner wanted to give then some money to buy bread and cheese. One of my companions felt affronted, and wanted to fight. I said, \Let us go;\" and, as I passed by the prosecutor, he said, \"You can't shine here.\" I said, \"I do not want to shine.\" I turned round to see if my companions were there, and the potboy struck me in the mouth, and knocked my cap off. I picked it up, walked to the middle of the room, and heard somebody say, \"Let him have it.\" I retreated several paces; the potboy still followed me up; a policeman stopped me, and the potboy gave me in charge for stabbing him, but I had no knife; I lost it at sea before I came to London. The men who were with me have gone to sea; they were struck also. I had a scar when I was first locked up, and my mouth was swelled."
Were my boots clean or dirty when you took me?
The knife is hardly able to out a piece of board, and the waist of this boot is higher than the sole.
Do you ever walk in your garden in wet weather?
The policeman says he found marks of some person having trod on the mould, and then on the gravel where the mould remained, and if he left it on the gravel, it would be off his shoes, and then he could not leave the mark of shoes if he had fetched the mould off them; when my shoes were measured with the footmarks, they were quite clean, so that they must go into the footmarks and a bigger shoe would go in it.
I knocked the coat down accidentally. I did not steal it.
You say that I brought that order in my hand on 8th March?
Are you quite certain it was New Brentford?
Who did I say the paper was for?
What did I say about it?
Did I not tell you to mention to Mr. Heppenstall that it was for myself, for my own use?
You say I had no authority to open a new account; how was it that I opened an account with Barry and Co.; did I not do that?
I brought them up for the boilers.
I was not in the shop when Mr. Fisher came.
I did not intend the meat for human food, and that has been my statement all along. I put it in Mr. Burroughs' shop, while I took the other meat out of the cart, as there was a good deal of good meat packed on top of it; I was going to take them to the boilers; the inspector was taking meat away, and I thought he would take mine away, so I took them into Mr. Burroughs' shop. Here is the card where to meet me, with his name at the bottom: \George A. Hillier, licensed horse slaughterer to her Majesty, Belle Isle. T. Baker, agent.\""
It was not handed to me; it was left at your office for Mr. Wildman.
Do you remember seeing a label on the hamper?
Was it not very wet?
I told you to ask Mr. Wildman whether the calf had any physic.
I have never been before a jury in my life, except as a witness. When Mr. Wildman called at my house it was almost dark, and I thought the meat was good for human food. I asked him whether he had given it any physic, and he said, \No.\" I examined the heart, liver, and lights, and found them all sound. I said, \"The best way will be to send it to London by the horse and cart. His son and I directed it, packed it up and sent it to London, and Mr. Shelly took Mr. Wildman's address. I heard no more about it till the detective came down. The most I can say is that it was an oversight; I should not have sent it if I had been aware that it was unfit for human food. I did not slaughter it; Mr. Wildman's son and another man killed it and dressed it, and the skin went up to the skin-market. All I did wan packing it up and\\ send\\ ing it to market. Mr. Wildman is here and will not deny it."
Did I not ask you if it had had any physic?
Do you remember on the Saturday before last, you said, \I have got to go to London,\" and I said, \"So have I;\" and did not you say, \"There is not a bit of it but what you could eat?\""
I never told you what it was worth for dog's-meat; you had a large dog of your own. I slaughtered the sheep, and sent it in your name to London; but the calf I did not.
Did not you say at Guildhall that you saw fire or six men, and did not like their appearance?
How could I put my arm round your neck, then?
Where did the prosecutor come to me first?
On the night in question I was up at Fanner's, a place of amusement, and we walked round with my friends to Barbican, and the prosecutor came down and said, \I give this man in charge for robbing me.\" I said, \"Where did I rob you?\" He said, \"Up the lane,\" I have got a witness here who will give the same account of it."
When at Greenwich you said that you never missed the tobacco since you put it in the ears, and took it out?
What did you find on me when you searched me?
Did you tell me I had given you a bad sixpence?
If I was there on the 29th March, and offered a bad shilling, and the young man tarred me in the way he says, is it likely I should go on the next Saturday night and give him another; if I did I could expect nothing else but that I should get into the station. I get my living by exchanging articles of hardware for old clothes. I was coming home and went into the public-house, not with the intention of changing Anything, but I thought I had three halfpence in my pocket, and when I got in I found I only had an old and new halfpenny, and thought it was three halfpence. I gave the sixpence for the gin. He never told me that I had given him a bad sixpence, and I did not know it; so I had no occasion to go out My wife came to the door to speak to me, and that is why I turned round. I am not the man who was in the house at all on the 29th, and I never offered him the bad shilling.
Had not I been drinking in front of the bar for about two hours?
Did not you come to me at the corner where I was standing, and say, \Come back, I want you?\""
I am a bard working man; if I had known the things were bad when he offered to lei me off on paying 4s. does it not stand to reason that I should have done so? As I worked hard I did not like to give 4s. I have a wife and four children, and it would have been a great loss to me.
Did I see you afterwards until I was in custody?
Had I received accounts before for you?
Did I ask for the account?
Was I in the habit of taking goods for you to different parties and bringing them back?
I said, \I have no address;\" and Mr. Cunnew knew that; after I received these goods I did not see Mr. Cunnew until I was in custody; I do not deny receiving them; I did not want to receive them from the parties."
The Sunday I was taken at Victoria-park there were two witnesses with me that knew where I bought the coat, but I was taken to Arbour-square-station, and it was too far for them to go  I did not know where they lived.
18th May  I cannot say exactly what day, but I think it was the middle of the week.
Two witnesses saw me give the money down for the coat. I do not know where they live; it was just after I had done work at Billingsgate-market, and going through Petticoat-lane, I bought it there. At the place I was at they gave me a bottle and 2d. to go and get some brandy; they used to give me 4d., and when I had done a hard day's work they used to give me 6d. I broke the bottle, and went down to Billingsgate. I had not been there fire minutes before a man asked me if I would carry some winkles for him to Smithfield; I said I would, and I never went back to the other place any more. I left Cohen's lodging-house because they said it was going to be broken up, and I lodged at 64, Wimpole-street, Spital-fields. When the prosecutor's friend met me I was against a new drinking fountain; he asked me about a medal first, and never about a coat. He asked me if I would walk down as far as some house. I said I would. I had a pipe, and when we got out of the house he said, \Oh! there is the gentleman; I will go over to him.\" I said, \"I will go with you,\" and then he gave me in charge to the policeman."
You said on a former occasion that I deserted your sister?
Why?
Did I make any remark?
I wish to call attention to the time which elapsed between the time my wife deserted me and my second marriage  a report had reached me that my wife was dead.
I received the money from a man who was going on board a ship to America the next morning; he did not tell me it was bad. He was going to see some friends, and said that he did not wish to take it with him, and gave them to me. I put the other sovereign in my drawers because I thought if one was bad the other must have been bad. The knife belonged to the other man; he only lent it to me.
When the first shilling was passed, why did not you say it was bad?
I took them all out of my pocket at the same time.
You swore that if you could have seen either of the two parties you would have said it was a bad shilling?
You said before that I stood between you and the gaslight?
I was remanded for a week, and have been a fortnight here; I have never been known to do the like before in my life; I get my living by working hard. I could not pay for the stout with less than a shilling. I had two shillings with me, and I put down one; if I had been guilty before, there was nothing to prevent me from going away, which I did not attempt to.
I did not say that I had worked for Reichberg; I said I knew him.
I never said that I was an engraver and dealer in plates, and that these were engravings; I said there were some plated things and brooches in it.
How many times was Josephson at your house before me?
About ten months ago I was crossing Finsbury-square to go to White cross-street to buy some meat, and, when against Cater's, I saw this book. I did not look at it till I got home, when I found in it, in a dirty envelope, the two halves of a 500l. note. I said, \Very likely there will be a reward for this,\" and kept it. If I had stolen it, is it likely that I should have kept it? I did not steal it, or know it was stolen, nor did I receive it from anybody. I was in hopes I should get a reward by keeping it, but I never saw any advertisement"
I could have murdered him, but it was not my intention to do so.
As to my saying she would not be alive on May-day it is a gross lie, but I know she said that May-day would be a gay one. I had no intention of taking her life; if I had wished to do so I would have done it when there was nobody in the room, and I should have locked the door. I did not intend to take her life; I only intended to draw some of her blood. It is evident she is connected with the devil. There have been persons connected with the devil who have done things of witchcraft, though it is not believed in at this day. If you can prove to me that she does not work by devilish arts, I am willing to forfeit my life for her's.
When did I try to take your life before?
When you take that book and say, so help you God, do you mean the God of this world, commonly called the devil, or the God above?
Why I did shed her blood, was because she should not have that power over me which she has done with her arts; two hundred years ago I know such a woman would have been put to death without any ceremony about it. The reason I took upon me to revenge my own wrongs, was because I expected I should get very little redress from the law, because people consider themselves so much enlightened in these days that they do not believe in such a crime, but I do believe in it.
Did you ever see me in the neighbourhood?
I told you a man gave it me to carry in Brick-lane?
The female witness swears that at the time she missed the plate, all the doors were looked; how could I obtain access into the room to steal it? Supposing a person stopped me and asked me to carry a parcel and then the policeman found me with it upon me, what could I say? should I not be employed to carry it? and that is what I say in this case.
I was at work at Harrow Weald, and a man told me that if I would take them to Stanmore in the morning, he would pay me. I did not start from Harrow Weald that night until 11 o'clock.
What do you swear to me by, as being there before?
I can assure you that I was not aware that either of those florins were bad. I get my living in the street  I am not able to work, as I have lost the use of one of my hands.
You said I was on the right-hand side when you give me in custody.
You came and took me back, and did not say anything to the prosecutor at first, but said, \I had better run you in for loitering.\""
I had nothing at all to do with this knife (produced)  I saw the house open, and 1 went inside  it is true I picked up the cravat  I had not got any place to sleep in; I went inside and picked them up.
I wished for a shirt  I had not any idea the shirt was his.
The brooches are not mine.
I was putting on my boots, was I not?
I was not running with the other man.
I was coming along Great Tichfield-street about a quarter to 2, and heard a cry of \Stop thief!\" I saw a man running along Langham-street; I turned round and ran towards Wells-street, and was stopped. I am innocent of it."
Was it not sweet and good bullock flesh, and as hard as a board?
I had not the means.
It was not diseased; it was sweet and good.
When it went away from me it was fit for any one to eat, and as for that gentleman saying it died, it was stuck; and there was no disease about it, but a broken leg.
Did I strike you before you struck me?
Did you hear me say anything to the complainant?
Do you know Eagleton?
I told the policeman I had got no such thing as a knife; all I had was two combs and a tobacco-box.
If he fell on a piece of glass would he not have got that cut in his hand?
The man fought with me fairly. I had two witnesses who were there to prove that I never had such a thing as a knife, and that the complainant struck me first and knocked me down. When the policeman came I was bleeding through the nose and mouth. It is impossible that I could have struck the prosecutor in the back of the neck without his being aware of it. He was sober and I drunk.
You say you put the shilling on the shelf, did not you when you gave me in custody ask the missus to give it you out of the drawer behind the counter?
What did I ask for?
You say you saw this two-shilling piece on the counter?
A young man came up to me, and said I was wanted in the public-house. I went there, and he told me about the two-shillling piece. I did not know it was bad. I say every word they say about the other one is false. It is not likely that I should have gone back with a strange man, if I had known the two-shilling piece was bad.
I was not out after 8 o'clock.
What do you suppose was the distance?
I shall not make any defence.
I do not deny it.
I wish to deny that statement. I never resisted you at all; I had nothing in my hand; and I can bring forward my wife, who was present, to prove that it is a base falsehood.
Did you go to a public-house as we came along?
If you consider there is any offence in an innocent man breaking out of prison when he has an opportunity, then I am guilty; but as to what the policeman says it is perjury.
When he came up to me I told you you had no case against me.
Did not you tell me to come to the station-house to see my children, as some one wanted me?
You struck me and broke my arm in two places, and struck me on the ground.
They had not got the warrant with them.
It was not a screw-wrench; it was a small spanner. This man summoned me to the police-court some time before; there was 2s. 9 1/2 d., half a day's wages, coming to me. He did not like to pay me, and I got fighting with him.
It was because I would not swear what he wanted that all this happened. He got me to go to the Court to prove damages between him and the landlord of two or three houses. He did not like me because I did not take a false oath, and that is the reason of this. We got boxing outside my door, and when I got the upper hand he went for the police. Two men came against me, and I took out this spanner to protect myself The police came out against me, and I went about three-quarters of a mile. I returned back when I saw the police, and said to them, \You have got no cause to take me; I have done nothing, only taken my own part.\" The policemen drew their staves. One of them hit me, and I hit him with the spanner. They both had their staves drawn before I raised my hand to them. As I could not go to the station on account of my five children, he hit me on the mouth and pulled me down. I have got six cuts on my head. He fractured my arm, and broke my finger in two places."
On or about 12th June, I became acquainted with a lady, whose name not having been mentioned it is scarcely worth while to bring forward, more especially as I do not know whether she is a party to the deception practised upon me; she, in a few days, introduced me to Mrs. Dillett, and I met her once or twice. Mrs. Dillett afterwards came to my place of business in a great hurry, and asked me if I had any objections to go to her husband's deposit bank and sign his name, and she gave me his book which she had had given to her for the express purpose of my copying it. She said he wanted the money so particularly and could not leave, and did not mind giving anybody a sovereign for it. I said that I could not think of taking a recompense for it, and I started off without any intention of going to the bank, but I led her to believe I had been, and when I returned, I gave her to understand that the bank had closed, and advised her to give me a written order to receive the money. I thought the matter had dropped; when, on the 26th June, I received a letter from the friend I have mentioned, in which she stated that Mrs. Dillett would be at St. Martin's Church at 2 o'clock; I went and waited for her till a quarter-past 2; she said that she had been waiting for a signal from her husband whether he could attend, that she could see his place of business from there, and that he appeared and gave her a negative signal, and would I sign her husband's name. I said I had no proof that she was the wife of Jonas Dillett, she produced her marriage certificate, and I accompanied her to the bank and signed the receipt. To prove that there was no premeditated act of forgery, I signed the surname incorrectly. I was not asked the question whether I was Jonas Dillett till after I had signed the receipt, when I said that I was not, and immediately despatched Mrs. Dillett, believing that her husband would appear and extricate me, and even if I had received the money I should have placed it all in her hands. It will be suspected that there was an improper intimacy subsisting between Mrs. Dillett and myself, such, however, was not the case, nor anything approaching the case, so that I had no inducement to act as I did. This it a truthful statement, and I trust, when you come to look at all the circumstances, you will believe that, however foolishly I may have acted, I was not intending to defraud either Jonas Dillett or the Provident Institution.
I had it given to me for good money.
When and when did yon mark it?
Were you present when I paid the money?
I came to London for the first time on 4th June, and through destitution I was obliged to pawn a pair of boots, the ticket for which I sold, and amongest other money received the half-crown, and paid for the porter and tobacco, believing it to be good; the money which I
paid for the stamps I received at Croydon in change for a half-sovereign; I had not the slightest knowledge of its being bad.
I did do it, but not with intent to murder him.
The rag-merchant asked me whether I would sell the harness, and I said \Yes;\" he said, \"How much do you want for it?\" I said, \"3s. 6d.\" I did not know the value of it, or I should not have bought it."
When I was brought from Maidstone on remand, you commenced abusing me and calling me names?
I know no more of it than a child. I was not out of Deptford that morning.
What time did I first come into your house?
What did I give the other man?
The shilling I offered was good silver, only it was cracked, and I told the woman that.
Where did you go to?
How many constables had you to apprehend me?
There were no external marks on the lower part of the body?
I was walking by the house, and the gentleman rushed out and caught hold of me; I asked him what he had hold of me for, and he would not tell me.
I changed ten shillings in the morning, but did not know that I had a bad half-crown.
Was there anything remarkable about the person?
I wish to call the sergeant.
Do you think it at all improbable that a person might make a mistake in the identification of a soldier, particularly in the dark?
I did not know what was in the letter.
On the day in question I was in Regent-street, near where the fountains play, and a young man accosted me, and asked me if I would take this letter to Mr. Charles Thompson, and promised me half-a-crown for doing so. He told me I should receive three pieces of silk, and I was to bring it to the Strand; I, not speaking English, asked the boy to go there with the letter, and told him I would give him 6d. I waited on the same spot, and he came back to me, and I was taken into custody. I afterwards went to the Strand with the policeman, but I could not find the young man. I am not guilty of writing that order. Out of the four months I have been in London, I have worked all the time, except nine days, at a confectioner's shop, and I then commenced buying small pieces from tailors for tailoring, in proof of which the scales which I used to weigh them were taken from me at the station. I come from Berlin, and came to London with the intention of afterwards going to America.
He gave me the knives..
A boy told me to ask that boy for some things. I saw him on the Tuesday, and he told me to come in; he gave me a packet of knives, and I put them in my pocket. I was going to take the other packet. I heard some one coming, and I dropped them and ran out.
Mr. Hare kept me out of work for six months, and I was so destitute I was obliged to get money the best way I could. I could not get work; no one would employ me.
I never meant to do the man an injury  I have been eleven and a half years in Her Majesty's army; I was in the Crimea, and through the Indian mutiny, and never did any man any harm yet, save striking him with my hand.
I bought them for 1s. 6d.; it was about a quarter-past 6 when he stopped me; the Arsenal bell was not ringing.
I never was alongside the man; he is mistaken in the party.
The statement I have made there is perfectly true; I was to have been home by 4 o'clock; I never touched the man's chain or his watch.
I don't remember anything about it; I was very tipsy; what I went to the house for was a walking-stick which her husband had belonging me, and on which he had lent me s.
He knocked me down with the blow he gave me on the back of the head, and he hit me in the eye.
That blood came from my head and nose.
I was living with this woman for ten weeks. I went into the country for a couple of days, and when I came back the woman of the house told me she was gone; that her husband had come and taken her away in a cab, and she had left the things with her for the rent. I went out and met some friends and got tipsy. I went to Mrs. Edwards's house, not knowing they were there. They were all sitting round the table, and I sat down, when he started upon me, and I got hit in the back of my head with something; I don't know what, and from that I don't remember anything that happened. She came to me afterwards in Horsemonger-lane, three times, and when she bad got all my money, I saw no more of her.
Was I standing in front of the till?
Did I tell you where I had received my money that week?
I had a sovereign given me on Monday before I left Aldershot. On Tuesday, I worked for Mr. Ayling, of Wandsworth, and took four shillings of him: whether they were good or bad, I do not know. I took some money in the King's-road, and had half a sovereign of my own. I did not know I had any bad money; but people take advantage of a man who is near sighted, and give him bad money. I gave this woman a good shilling, and therefore had no occasion to hurry away, but had another pint of beer. I do not know where the pond is, I never noticed it, and never threw anything into it.
If you refer to one of those books, on 9th, in your ledger, you will find two entries; you stated that for five weeks you had not seen the ledger, is it not the practice when you give credit to put the names of the persons in the ledger, and not the amount?
Was there not an error in the account?
Was it not broken open before you came in?
With regard to Mrs. Crutch's account I admit having the money, but it was paid on the Saturday-night, which is a busy time, and she paid it with a 5l. note, and having that to change, I may possibly have passed it over. I had no intention of defrauding the prosecutor in any way. It came to his knowledge that I had been offered a business which was to let in the neighbourhood of his own shop, and he was rather annoyed at it For the last three months it had been his practice to come down on the Thursday, and if he had done so on this occasion he would have had the money. I sent the boy for a screw-driver, gave Mr. Lenton the keys, said I would go through the accounts with him the next morning, and went out. If he had come on the Thursday I should have been prepared to have met him as I have always done.
I had been drinking, and I changed half a sovereign at Kingston, which I got for my work. I didn't know the money was bad. I took it for good, and worked hard for it.
Are you sure I am the person that gave you the half-crown?
I know nothing at all about it.
It is quite wrong. I never had a glass of porter in that house.
How can you swear that I was the person who came in and gave you the two-shilling piece?
Why did you not take the little girl into custody?
My wife got this money into my possession to get me sent away. A week or two before this, she put two bad shillings in my purse to get me sent away.
My son took the house, and my wife paid the deposit.
I never uttered anything. I did not know what was in the bag. My wife, conveys these things into my place, she told me long ago she would do it. I know nothing of them. Three weeks ago, she pat two bad shillings in my portmonnaie, and I went to a public-house and was going to pay for some drink, and found them. She has been living with another man, and wants to get rid of me.
You did not have your coat off at all; you were taking it off when I shoved you in the mud.
You shoved me over.
I had been to an Irish funeral in Long-alley; the prosecutor was there, and we went into the public-house together; we got rowing, and he took off his coat to fight me.
I did not do it; three boys were standing in a row and took it out of her pocket, and ran up the street; she took hold of me; they all clustered together, and one of them threw it over their heads into the road, and the gentleman caught hold of me.
Was it not in the White Hart that I met you and your mates?
Did you say that I took the money out of his right waistcoat pocket?
The woman swears I took the money out of his right hand waistcoat pocket, and he swears it was in his left. What was had in the Bull I paid for; we afterwards got quarrelling and fighting.
Was the coat at the shop or on the ground?
Did you see me take the coat?
Did you see me with the coat?
My wife deals in clothes and does them up, and I was buying these things in the market. That coat is not worth a shilling. I picked it up and the lad ran after me, and said it belonged to the woman  I said, \Take it; it does not belong to me;\" and I gave it up. I am innocent."
Were there not plenty of other people besides me there?
Did you see me take the coats?
Were you not drunk?
Did I not say that I met a man who gave me the cheque?
When you heard that the things had been stolen, why did you not make this known the first day?
These bands I bought with the intention of making a waist belt. I know nothing of the property. I am innocent. I bought them for my own use. If they had given me the opportunity I could have found the party I bought them of.
Were you ever drunk?
I did not steal it; I was merely passing by.
On 29th February, when the policeman fetched you to recognise me, what did you say?
On 29th you asked a man named Jack Hook, where I was, and he told you, did he not?
I am entirely innocent of this affair. I know this policeman who was after me. If I bad done this crime I had an opportunity of going away.
I was coming down Whitechapel when I met this man, who said, \Don't you live down that lane.\" I said, \"Yes.\" He said, \"Will you carry this clock for me?\" I said, \"Yes.\" He said, \"Will you have a few sweets?\" I said, \"I don't mind,\" and he gave me some. He said, \"Put the clock down at the bottom of the court, and I will come down and fetch it\" I did so, and the policeman took me into custody."
Did you see any remarkable difference in me at the time you saw me, after six months had expired?
I ran away to get to my landlord's house for him to come and be bail for me.
Do you see any change in me at all?
Did I not state that I did not know Mr. Black?
Had you ever any reason to complain of my conduct when I was with you?
The prosecutor has mistaken the party altogether. I have never seen Mr. Black or his brother before, nor do I even know the locality where they represent themselves to live. As regards the receipt I never received the money for it; he paid another person the money. If I had wanted to receive the money I should have given him a bonafide order to fill up from Mosers. Stubb's, and he says he never had that. I ran away from the policeman, as I stated before, to get bail. I was under the impression that if I was taken to the station I should not be able to do so.
What time did I leave your house on 18th March?
Did not I tell you going along that I had bought the jacket of Mrs. Sillence.
She told me that her house had been robbed, and that she had lost her husband's boots.
I left Mrs. Sillence's house between 6 and 7 that night; she swore at Stratford that I left about half-past 9. I have witnesses here. Witnesses for the Defence.
She took the jacket off a basket, where a dog used to lie, and said that I could have it for 2s., and I went to her house with it on twice the next day.
Does it stand to reason that I should go to her house with it on if I had stolen it? She has not paid me for the moving.
Didn't you say to me, \You have taken something from the hut."
I did not steal it, but went willingly with Mansfield back to the hut. I know nothing about the theft.
Did you see me take the watch from your pocket?
I was standing looking at this galvanic battery as well as the prosecutor. He lost his watch, and caught hold of me. Somebody in front of me dropped it out of their hands, and I got blamed for it. He did not see me take it from his pocket.
I was walking outside the gas factory: a man came up and asked me for change of a half-crown. I gave it him. He asked the way to Regent-street, Westminster. I told him. I placed the half-crown in my pocket, and did not take any more notice of it. I went to try and get a pair of boots. I could not I went to the baker's to buy a half-quartern loaf to take home to my mothers to tea. I did not know it was bad any more than the dirt under my feet.
It is very strange that on two occasions there should be no half-crown in the till; how do you account for it?
Did you search my lodging?
Did I say with two friends or two men?
You knew that I was a married man, and that my first wife was living.
I have got nothing to say.
I did not say they were samples of barege  I said a piece of barege for sample.
If the ticket was thrown on the ground why did not you pick it up?
Do you invariably erase all marks on papers of goods that are sent out?
You cannot swear to the cloth I believe?
Did you see me offer the coin to your father?
It is a knife I use at my work. I always keep it in my pocket.
The accounts were all right on the other days were they not?
Did I appear just as anxious to do good to Mr. Hayward that morning as on the other mornings?
I think you are mistaken.
Are we not very often obliged to give shilling tickets when we have not got sixpenny ones?
Have you always seen me zealous and anxious to do every-thing for Mr. Hayward's interest?
Mr. Hayward never had them crossed?
Was I sober?
It was only agitation. The officer who locked me up told me it was illness.
I had nothing in my hand. This witness has been telling the same trumped-up He as the former one.
Mr. Death, or somebody, must have taken forty-two ounces of gold from me, because I lost it when I was passing there. It must be Mr. Death; and out of spite that I could not get it, I broke the glass, and ran away. Mr. Death owing me this money and not paying me, I broke the glass. He does not understand Spanish, and that is the whole misunderstanding.
I went into the shop, and asked the price of a hat; she had not one to suit me. I went an hour afterwards, and took two umbrellas. The man who gave information against me went an hour after and took the other two, and pawned them. I only took two, and an alpaca one.
What clothes did I wear?
I can produce the clothes I wore on the day the robbery was committed  I wore a spotted waistcoat, a striped handkerchief and a pair of cord trousers. I know no more of it or I would plead guilty.
Did not I say I was a tramp?
I was travelling through Deptford, and saw four men standing at the corner of the shop, two and two arm in arm; the behind two took the coats off a few yards, and then dropped them down; there were three females in front of them; I followed them across the road, and followed one of them down the turning, and said to the boy, \This man has taken some coats;\" he said, \"Give me my clothes, 'and came after me instead of going after the man with the coats, and I was taken back to the shop, and given in charge."
After you sent for the constable did I try to get away?
Did I go quietly to the station with you?
On the morning I was taken I was not very busy and we commenced gambling. I won 13s. or 14s., and among it were these two florins.
I have respectable friends here to prove that I was not out on Thursday, and likewise to my former good character.
I had asked for the loan of ten shillings, and got a post-office order, which I got changed, and received this half-crown.
Did not you state before the Magistrate that you could not say the watch was there when I came into the shop?
I am innocent; the reason I ran out of the shop was to speak to a friend who I saw passing. I heard a cry of \Stop thief\", and saw a man running, and I ran as well."
I was never in prison before  I have no home  I belong to Hull.
Did not you say before the Magistrate that you would not positively take your oath that this was the same florin?
I was on my way to Eastcheap; I was not aware that it was a bad florin, or I should not have offered it; I changed a sovereign in the morning.
I have now a petition to Sir George Grey; the man swore at the Sessions that he bought the cart of me. I shall be able to prove my innocence.
I did not run away; you told me to go.
I took the florin for selling 3 small copybooks and 2 quires of paper.
Did not I say I had lost it?
I wish to state that I found a portemonnaie and some stamps and a little silver in it; in the first instance I had some thoughts of making use of it, but thought better of it and gave it to a man at the Hibernian, to take to Vere-street to see if he could get anything for me; that is all I know about it. I do not know the man's name; I only knew him by sight. I never presented it and never endorsed it, and had nothing further to do with it; placed in the position in which I was many would have done as I thought of doing. I had left the Post-office six months and was in a starving condition, and my wife just on the point of being confined.
Did you find any stamps on my person?
No letter of any description was found in my possession; with regard to the six postage stamps found at my lodging there is a gentleman who will, no doubt, substantiate what I say. I have been in the habit of corresponding with a gentleman at Liverpool, in whose service I was for three years, and I used a great many postage stamps; I took the stamps, but, of course, I paid for them. On my return that afternoon I commenced my duties again, and in case any postage stamps are presented at the window it is my duty to buy them; whether it is my duty or not I have done it, and have paid the money out of the till; that is the only way in which I can account for these coming into my possession; if I had taken the stamps out of the drawer and appropriated them there must have been so much money over. I can account for every penny that I had in my possession; I had received 7l. 5s. 3d. on account of the gentleman at Liverpool, out of which I had expended 2l.15s. 10d., 1l. leaving 4l. 9s. 5d.; only 15s. 4d. of it was my own money, it was what I had to account for to the honorary secretary of a society, held at 22, Berners-street.
I never saw the girl before she was brought to the Court.
There was nothing said till we got to the station, and then you told the inspector that I said I deserved six months.
I am innocent of the crime. On the day the child was lost I was down at Bromley, six or seven miles away from the neighbourhood. I was at work at the docks on the Tuesday and Wednesday, and on the Thursday, Friday, and Saturday, I did nothing. I was not out of my shop; I could have had plenty of witnesses, if I could have gone down to Bromley to the people that I served there, but I don't know their names.
Where were you standing at the time I took that?
I was walking along Fleet-street, and saw the cape hanging out over the back of the seat, and I lifted it and threw it up to the coachman.
He ought to have let me go with the boots.
My diary will show it.
What coin did you see me pick up?
I went to the King Harry with Jones, Bower, and Davis; they were making a noise about a pot of beer; they were outside and we followed them; they were jangling all the way. I do not know whether this gentleman knocked against them or not, but they hit him on the hat and surrounded him, and a lot of money fell on the pavement.
Did you speak to me at the time I was at the door?
What time was it when I gave you the note?
Was the money that you lost nearly all half-crowns?
Did you see any two-shilling-pieces in the money I gave you?
I have witnesses to prove that at the time that Chapman says I gave him the 5l. note, I was at Charing-cross, and the money I gave to Mr. Payne I received from a gentleman whom I am in the habit of going to see at Knightsbridge; he gave me 5l. 5s. 6d.; I was at the Inkermann that same afternoon; I know Mr. Payne very well; as to giving a 5l. note, I never saw it.
Did I not ask you to send your lad down to my place?
Were there not about forty people there?
How far was I from you when you called out \Heigh?\""
I was in the midst of about forty people, and my button got attached to the gentleman's chain, and withdrew it from his pocket  I apologized to him, but he was not satisfied.
Were there sdef3-129-18651218ome females there?
Did I not give you the money, and the knife, and the comb?
At half-past one I was coming up Whitechapel-road from the play with my employer, and saw two females and three or four men; the prosecutor was lying on the ground, and as they picked him up some halfpence fell on the pavement. I picked up 2 1/2 d., a knife, and a comb, and my employer picked up a penny. I was going along when the policeman came up and took me for being concerned in a robbery. I am innocent of it.
I went into this public-house and a man there struck me: I pulled my coat off and threw it down, and then two more attacked me; I then picked up, as I thought, my own coat and went out. About 11 I met this man and he said, \You have got my coat on.\"I said, \"I have not,\"and he got hold of me and dragged me about and tore my shirt, and I got a good licking, and could not see; I was about half tight. As to having a knife, I don't recollect anything at all about it."
I know nothing at all about it. I am as innocent as a child unborn.
It is false, I was not in the shop.
I made a mistake, it is Salisbury-street.
You said, \Did not you give the half-crown to the little girl?\" I said, \"Yes, but I did not know it was bad."
I was waiting for a man to deliver some goods, and was afraid he would pass; so I sent the little girl for the rum.
Was there anybody else in the bar?
I was the last man walked out of the cells, and you said to Mr. Martin, \That is the man.\""
When you told me it was bad, did not I ask you to come to the station?
If I was guilty, should I ask a boy not sixteen years old to come to the station, and lock me up? I never went into Mr. Masters' house in my life.
Have you got three pieces of candle there?
At 11 o'clock on Thursday, 12 October, I went into your dining-room, did I not?
Why did not you stop the man, and ask him to let you see the contents of the bag?
When you discovered a footmark on Tuesday morning, did you call the butler's attention to it?
I believe Mrs. Rowe, your housekeeper, is in the habit of giving you these cloths?
I believe you saw the towel on Monday, October 2d?
Who first called your attention to its being an unusual circumstance, my going out that way?
Was it on the Saturday that your attention was first called to it?
I have been in every room in that house, have I not?
Did I give you the bad shilling?
Was the half-crown laid on the counter, or did I give it to you?
Are you quite sure you saw me throw it?
Did not you say at the Police-court that you did not see me with the bundle?
I know nothing about it. I was walking by when he came and collared me. GUILTY .  Confined Nine Months .
Had not the other two constables pointed me out to you before I was apprehended?
When I asked you what it was for you said, \On suspicion of a robbery.\""
I am innocent  I can prove where I was  I have lived in the neighbourhood all my life  I believe it is a planned thing between them to have me for it  none of the other men had a slop on like me  what I said was, \You have planned this up very well between you  it would be more to your credit to go and get them that has done it.\""
. I know nothing about it.
. I was carrying the parcel for another person.
What time did you leave the premises that night?
Have you known this house long?
Did you find that knife in my possession?
What occupation do you hold there?
I have been a traveller for a gentleman in the City. On the morning of 17th April I left him about 7 o'clock; I proceeded along the road and came to a wood. I got over a stile, and saw a man running away; I went into the field and found these things; I had two straps in my pocket; I intended to keep these things in my possession. After I proceeded along the road some distance I met two policemen; one of them asked me some questions, and I gave him straightforward answers. He then left me a second time; I walked along the road about half a mile, and turned round and saw the policemen coming along. Would a man if he had entered this house have fallen into the trap and not make an effort to escape? Do you not think if he could have got away a dozen times be would not avail him-self of the opportunity? The evidence is circumstantial and contradictory; there was no person seen on the premises late at night or early in the morning. GUILTY .  He was further charged with having been before convicted, to which he PLEADED GUILTY.  Seven Years' Penal Servitude .
I made a mistake in the gentleman. I thought he was another gentleman I knew who had been in the habit of giving me a few shillings. I had been drinking.
Did I receive the coat?
I deny throwing a stone at him  he hit his head against the railings.
. I was coming from Holloway, and saw two bundles in a garden  I picked them up and put them under my coat  I saw the policeman coming, and threw them into the garden  I never threw a stone at the policeman.
. A man offered me 1s. to carry the bag to Leadenhall Market  I did not know what it contained. GUILTY . He was further charged with having been before convicted.
You said before the magistrate that you saw me with a woman?
. I never was in company with a woman in the Holloway Road  I had the black clothes ever since the death of my last child, six weeks ago  my wife is dangerously ill at home.
When did I take the rooms of you?
Did not I come that night to demand the child?
Who did you take it from?
How long was the child out of your care before you had it again?
Did not you come to me in the cell and say, \It is a servant's watch; do you know anything of it?\""
. I have nothing to say  I should like the owner of the cart called.
. I never slept with the woman in my life  I was never in the house of Mrs. Douglass.
Did your nephew fill up the specification according to your prices?
Did you tell me not to come to the office?
Did you warn me that what I said would be brought against me?
What did you do with it?
Was I sober?
Did you search me in the public-house?
Did you have any one else in custody?
I took the money in change for a sovereign.
I have a witness to prove I was not there; what time do you say I came first?
I was at my landlady's from five o'clock till eight, as my witnesses can prove; I then took an omnibus to go to Old Ford, and therefore could not have been there at seven o'clock. It was a florin I gave for the rum; I had not a sixpence. The 1s. 6d. the policeman has got is the change out of the florin.
Two other men hit him, and he fell down and I ran away.
I plead guilty to being concerned in the robbery, but as to knocking the constable about, I never did.
I had been to Paddington to see a friend, and I changed a half-sovereign with a conductor  I went there to pay a shopmate 2s.  I was not aware that any of the money was bad  it is not likely I should have tried to pass two bad coins if I had known it.
Did I threaten you?
Were there not a lot of people there?
I gave you my right address, 41, White's Row, and have sent letters there, and the governor of this place will say so.
I was in Houndsditch, heard a cry of \Stop thief!\" and ran the same as the others did; I ran into Brown's arms; I never saw the prosecutor till he came up."
During the time I was with you did you always find me honest in all things?
When you received those four notes, were they in an envelope?
Have you been at my father's house two or three times?
When I showed you four bits of paper, can you recollect whether the conversation was about the\\ amountof money I had in my possession?
With re gard to my going to the shop, and asking you to cash a note, were you not afterwards told that it was an excuse?
What are you?
Did you put the half-crown in your purse?
I was at the races the day before, and must have taken them there.
Did I seem in any way embarrassed?
Do you know the man who was taken with me?
I took the half-crown and florin for some work I had done  I have worked for Mr. Pocock, in the Southwark Bridge Road, for some time  it is not likely I should have given two bad coins at one place if I had known they were bad.
I received these two shillings from Mr. Clarke's house  I had been in there several times during the day, and had changed money there.
Did you lose sight of the man you were running after?
Did I make any resistance?
I was walking up one of the streets; I had had a drop to drink; I heard a man sing out, \Stop him!\" I was running. As for seeing the old gentleman, I did not, nor take any umbrella. I know nothing of it."
Did not you say that you put it with other silyer, and the master took the other silver away?
Was the man in the shop when I came in?
I know nothing about the charge of 30th March. I never was in Chelsea on Saturday night. I put down a florin to pay for a scarf, and the man said that it was a bad half-crown. I said that it could not be, for I had not a half-crown in my possession.
I picked it up.
I stole nothing from him.
Was I not fighting with your son?
When I went into the beer shop did not you want me to come in for some-beer?
Was I not blooding from the mouth?
I was very tipsy, or I should not have got info the company I have. I am a seafaring man. I produce my discharge from the service.
I went in with my comrade, and the potman caught me by the throat and pushed me out of the house.
I was in the house, but was never near the till. I was pushed into the road; you can see by my coat that I was pushed down. This man seized me by the throat and sent me out into the dirt. I went in again. Three or four soldiers and a civilian were fighting. There were ten or twelve soldiers in the house, and a number of loose women. They were fighting all over the house.
About one o'clock on Tuesday morning I missed my wife. I went home and lit a candle to see if she was in bed; but, not finding her there, I went to look for her, and found her committing herself with a man in the open streets. I struck the man, and he ran away, and then I struck my wife with my left hand. She has had no provocation for ever deceiving me. I have always been a good husband, and a good father to my children.
Were you not in Holborn with two or three females, and did not one of them demand payment of you?
When you came up did I not say, \I think he has dropped something out of his pocket?\""
I was engaged by a man to see him to the Great Western Railway. I had been there and was returning home. I saw the prosecutor with a female in Holborn. I never put my hand near the man's pockets. I am innocent.
I paid him the bill on 10th October, the day before, and he sent it back to me.
A lady and gentleman said that somebody wu coming after me, and I ran. I afterwards stopped, and the witnesses came and said I had taken the girl's purse. I said, \I have not; you may search me; all I have got is 2s. 2 1/2 d.\""
On which side of the man was I?
I picked the bundle up in the park, and the dirtiest of those handkerchiefs was round it. Some girls kicked it along. When I was at the station Mr. Phillips said I struck him, and gave me in charge for attempting to steal his watch.
I was coming from Bexley Heath, and saw the donkey by the side of the road, and thought I could lead him to Blackheath.
You were fighting with two men under the railway arch?
I did not, I never moved from the spot.
He was half tipsy and did not know what he was doing. The policeman has put him up to say here what he did not say to the Magistrate. I have worked twelve or fourteen years at the water-side, and no one can charge me with a ha'porth of thievery.
Did I make any attempt to go?
How did you know it was bad?
When I saw you were determined to lock me up, I said I would go and fetch a constable.
Did you find a good florin on me?
In June, 1857, I went to America. Since then I have only been in England for three weeks. I was there five years, During that time I never handled a pound's worth of English silver or gold, and am a very poor judge of money. I got half a crown from my sister at Notting Hill, and received a florin from an omnibus conductor in change. I did not think I was getting bad money. I called for a glass of ale, and unfortunately gave a bad shilling. I then laid a good shilling down. The gentleman tries to make out that I had the tenpence-halfpenny at the time I gave the bad shilling, but the evidence shows that it was not so. With regard to the second case, I received 5s. 6d. for work, two florins, a shilling, and a sixpence, one of which florins turns out to be bad. I told the Magistrate that I required the attendance of witnesses.
Have you not been bringing tobacco from Mr. Goode's for the last three months?
When did the boy come in?
Did you see my hand?
I know nothing of the females; I never saw them till the day in question. I was going down St. Swithin's Lane, and they were in front of me. The pavement is narrow; I tried to pass, and one of them said, \Where are you shoving to?\" I made an apology, and asked her to have a glass of ale. One of them put this parcel into my hand, and Jesse seized hold of me. If the policeman had seen anything in my hand he would have tried to secure it. He did not attempt to search me till the boy came in. I think the man who offered the boy threepence gave him the parcel."
I went in once. I never was in the place before.
Who were you aroused by?
Who locks the wicket gate at night?
Were you aroused in the morning?
I am quite innocent.
In January I had delirium tremens very bad; I was very ill, they did not expect me to live, and the same doctor was attending me that attended my wife  in February I went into Hertfordshire for a week  when I came home I found my wife very dull in spirits  I asked her what was amiss  she said nothing  she scarcely spoke to me for days  I said I was sure there must be something  at last she said, \Will you forgive me if I toll you?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  she said, \"I took too much to drink, and during the time the man Edward Cruise took advantage of me and seduced me; I hope God will forgive me, for no one on this earth can; I have been a true wife to you before this, I will be a good wife to you now, a true one I cannot.\""
Did I ask you for the bayonet?
I did not see the bayonet  there were more bayonets than that up stairs  they were put away when I had delirium tremens.
When I went to Bethnal Green Lunatic Asylum my wife gave me two tremendous black eyes  I was obliged to stop up stairs eight days before any one could see me.
Did not you say that Edward Cruise was a man every inch of him, that you liked him from your heart and always should, but a thing like me you hated the sight of, and never wished to see me any more?
I hope you will give me another chance to regain my character. I have a wife and three young children, and one is dying of heart disease.
At the time I gave the first account I had no idea the watches were stolen, and I was afraid of losing my situation. One evening, while standing at the bar of a public-house in the Commercial Road, a man came in. We got into conversation, and he offered me the watch for sale. I purchased it for 3l. 10s. There were people in the bar at the time.
I got the coats from him and then I lost them.
At this time Were you not ill in bed of a fever?
If you knew I was John Hare, why did you not say so when I gave the name of Morrison?
Did your son ever drive a cab without being licensed?
Did you not say at Bow Street that the man that brought you that horse asked 6l. for it?
Are you sure I am the man that came and fetched the horse away?
I had only lived in the house myself two years, and slept out of it three nights.
I was intoxicated and did not know what I was talking about properly.
I plead guilty to the last piece.
That is the piece I plead guilty to.
All these tickets came into my hands either by being given to me by other parties, or else I have bought them. I have never been in the habit of pawning silk.
Did you count them on the previous evening?
Was not I called over to the church by John Curtis?
They have both taken a false oath against me. I was called across the road, and Curtis gave me the tools to take to Union Street.
What time was it when you left the pony and cart?
Do you not remember my coming to your house on Thursday evening?
Did not she say, \That is the man, he had a drab coat on?\""
He said at first I was not the one.
How should I know anything about this jar?
How long was it from the time you first saw me till you arrived at the station?
You said at the police-court that you had candles in the house?
I had something the matter with my toe, and took off my sock and boot against Mr. Wright's door. The door gave way and let me one or two steps into the passage. I was going to pull the door to, and Mr. Wright came out, and on the impulse of the moment I ran away. There are other persons in the house, and no doubt some of them had been to the drawers. Is it reasonable, if I had been in the house with a felonious intent, that I should leave without taking anything?
You know my handwriting?
You know Mr. Mayhew, don't you?
Will you swear I did not give you my address?
Just at the moment he called me out I was drinking with a friend, and did not know what his business was, and hardly knew what I said.
. It is not very likely, if I was the man that stole or received these goods, I should go and offer them at respectable shops where I was known.
Did I put my hand in the gentleman's pocket?
Is the beer-shop taken in your name?
Had you the coins in your possession when you took me to the station?
When did I use that expression?
. On 18th December I found a small canvas bag in Whitechapel Road, containing the seven counterfeits produced. I met Reed in the evening, and lent him six out of the seven, telling him to be very careful, as they were very dangerous things for any one to have. I never told him to circulate them, and never circulated one myself. The seventh remained in my coat pocket till I was taken.
. These things were found in my pocket, but I know nothing of them.
Am I the one you ran after?
Where did I strike him?
I said that I knew the man by sight, but did not know his name.
. On the morning of 18th December I was at the Effingham public-house, and a man named Harry said that if I would let him bring some goods to my house he would give me a sovereign. I let him do so, and on Friday I let him have the key to fetch them away. The man who gave the information lives in the same house as me.
Did you not give me this acceptance (producing it) in the middle of 1864, and tell me if there was a dividend I might have it?
. I can only say the bill was given to me, and of course I did that which I supposed I was justified in doing. If I have done legally wrong I don't conceive I have done any moral wrong. I was under the impression that I was entitled to get the dividend.
It is quite false; when I came back from the hospital the servant said, \How is your brother?\" I said, \"He is much about the same;\" she said, \"I am very glad my father is not like your father, a stupid old man not to let him know where he lived.\""
. After my brother struck me on the back of my head I had no recollection of what took place afterwards.
How high is the wall?
. I went in and changed a shilling, not knowing it was bad. I am not guilty of the rest.
Did Whelan have you round the neck, and stand about ten feet from our door?
Did not the woman scream just before you saw me standing at the fence?
How far is No. 3 from No. 5?
Did you hear me tell the prosecutor I would not strike him any more?
Was not she making inquiries on the way home?
Was it after I subpoenaed you that you changed your opinion?
Did I have my boots on?
Did you hear me fall?
Did not you say before that I said that I would stab him?
Is it not a rule that if one of us is out late, to come and feel if the other is in bed?
. I went home worse for liquor, and, not knowing whether my brother had come home, felt to see whether he was in bed. He turned and knocked me backwards, got up, got a stick, and threatened to smash me; my father came in, and my brother threw me downstairs by the collar of my coat. I caught hold of a stick. I never attempted to stab him, and never stabbed him intentionally.
. I bought the tickets of a man, and I have been three times to see if I could find him, but could not. If Mr. Ireland had given me a little time I should have paid him; I told him I would pay him in a week, or as soon as I had got something to do. I had no intention of robbing him.
I had turned back with my face towards the station before you overtook me.
. I was almost starving, and a young lady asked me to carry the box to Gracechurch-street, and said that she would follow me.
I do not know whether it was a florin or a half-crown I gayer her.
. I did not know that the one on Monday was bad.
Have you any customer of the name of C. S. C. Bligh?
Were you not sent to Sir John Kirtland's in a cab?
On the Friday, night did not I wish to leave you at Charing Cross?
. In writing that cheque it was not my intention to defraud Sir John Kirtland: I had an idea that it would be returned. It was done with the object of deceiving the people who had emptied my pockets very freely, in a very short time. In the course of three days I spent about 40l. with them. I thought if a person's name was put correctly it was not a forgery.
. I passed the man, and he laid hold of me and said \Have you got my money?\" I said \"No, you can search me.\" She says she saw me pass the money to another man, but there was nobody near me."
I never was in Mount Street.
Did not you put it with other money?
:  I got the money in change for a sovereign.
What did you say to me?\"	q"
A woman came up to me and said, \Will you go into this public-house, because I owe the gentleman some money; I will give you a penny?\" I went in, and she said, \"This is the boy who came on Saturday with a half-crown.\""
Did not I tell you I worked over the City Road bridge, at the manufactory?
When Smith came out he shoved me off the pavement?
:  When I went up stairs, Smith had a row with his wife. I heard her halloa out, \Murder!\" He ran down into the room where I was, with a pick, and I ran to the door to shut it. He shoved against me, and wanted to come in. I shoved against him, and would not let him come in, so he broke the hinge off the bottom of the door, and then called a policeman, who said, \"You must summons him.\" I had no sooner told the policeman than he came up, and we fought."
Did you not leave your window open and the gas alight in the house?
Did you see the state I was in when they kicked me and threw me about the road?
. He kicked and knocked me about, and knocked me down. I had the knife in my hand. I begged and prayed of him not to hit me, but he did fearfully. It was caused by ray seeing him and his brother shooting a hare; they have threatened me ever since.
Some of the other witnesses have stated that I had a beard and moustache, had I any when I came to you?
How long has Mr. Norman been clergyman at Little Stanmore?
Did you over see me write?
I suppose it is not unusual for persons to give a false name when in charge?
Did you ever know any charge of dishonesty made against him?
. I have always denied I was the man that did it, and I deny it now.
On what day did you give me in charge?
Is Mr. Wittaker in Court?
Did any of my family urge you to prosecute me?
Have you not paid similar cheques to this before?
Have I not constantly, for several years past, drawn on you with similar cheques to these?
. The man I worked for gave it to me to hold. I do not know where he lives, he used to come to a public-house and meet me in the tap-room.
Was I in company with those people?
You saw nothing of it.
When the fifth half-gallon of beer came, I would not take any more. This man's beer shop was on my way home, and a bricklayer called me in; he and I went out half an hour afterwards, hearing a row. I was so drunk I could hardly see. The policeman came up and said, \Here is another blackguard,\" and struck me on the forehead and knocked me on my knees, and then gave me another blow with his staff. I asked for a drink of water, and he said, \"Give the blackguard a drink of his blood.\" I was not the cause of it."
Did you see me shove the man down?
Did you not say, at the inquest, that you could not swear to me exactly?
When I was taken before the Magistrate, did he admit me to bail?
. All the money I had in my possession was 21/2d. and the money I took in change. I believe that boy picked up the silver.
. I was talking to some men; one had a small packet in his hand, which he put into my pocket. I went back and examined it, and found that it was bad money. Several of them I threw in the fire. At my dinner hour, when the policeman found me, my intention was to go and find the person who put them in my pocket; I could not find him, and was going back to put them behind the fire, when I was taken. As for the shilling, that was at home, it had been there for three months, as the landlady knows.
. I had been to the boat race, and must have got them there. I am quite innocent of knowing they were bad.
. I got a great deal the worse for liquor, and I gave a female half-a-sovereign to get some drink with; she gave me the change. I went into a public-house after, but I did not know the coin was bad.
I never said such a thing.
What time did I enter your house.
I did not say that I was Henry Coleman, you looked at the notes and said \Henry Coleman,\" and I said \"Yes.\""
Did you not tell me one day after you had committed yourself, to throw your trousers overboard
. I asked him for nothing, and he pave me nothing. He only told me to stop as long as I liked, and he would make me comfortable. I am an old soldier, and have borne arms for the crown of England forty-two years. I served twenty years in New Zealand. I have a pension of ninepence a day. I am us innocent of this as the babe unborn. If I had wanted to act the rogue on a creature like that, I could have put it in my pocket at any time; no one knew anything about it on board but him and me. When I came ashore I got drunk, and got locked up. When I was liberated, I went to this landlord's house; I was under the influence of drink. I gave him the papers, and some jewellery belonging to a lady, to take core of. I remained there I don't know how many days in a stupid state. I went and received my pension, and gave it to him to pay for the grog I had had. When I went to Fauncett St. Mary's he wrote to the authorities there, and had me taken into custody.
Did not I give you a good one for it?
Did you on the first occasion, inform the Magistrate that I said I did not care, for I would not utter another shilling for the next fifteen years to come?
. I received the half-crown in change for a sovereign, and the shilling from my mother, who is here.
I never went into the house with intent to steal; the door was wide open. GUILTY  Twelve Months' Imprisonment .
. It was given to me by a man at the top of King William Street. He said I was to wait for an answer, and get a small parcel. I know no more of the order than that I did not know that I had the half-sheet of paper in my pocket.
How do you know me?
. I was a quarter of a mile away from the house when they caught me.
Did not he push me when he came in?
Did not I drag him out by the arms?
This man was not there at all till I got up in the cart.
. The gentleman asked me to give him a lift. I saw he was intoxicated, and told him to go about his business. He followed me with half a pot of beer. He pushed against me and I resisted. He was going to strike me because I would not give him a ride; that was all.
. I did not take it.
. Someone put it in my pocket: I did not know it was there.
You say I came with a horse and cart; was Hart with me?
You were with me when I went to fetch the goods away?
When did you give the first reference?
You say the goods were sold on credit?
Had you ever seen me before that night?
Did you make a memorandum of the questions you asked Hart?
Did you swear before the Lord Mayor that your real name was Hart?
Mr. Hart was away When I came?
Was I there at the time?
Are you the owner of the house?
Q. When did you supply these goods?
Q. How long had you known Mrs. Hart?
. I never had any quarrel with the man. It is very curious that my knife should not be stained with blood, or anything.
How long have you been a member of the society?
During the time you were treasurer, were you supplied with any money from the funds?
Did I not say I thought I had had a receipt but was not sure?
Did you strike me?
. I am guilty of striking the man, but not of robbing him.
. I did not steal the waistcoat I never had it in my hand.
How many friends had I with me when I came in?
Are you sure it was on the 18th that I came into your shop?
Are you sure I said I only came from the country that morning?
I thought the half-crown was good; I got it in change for a sovereign. As to the other, when the young woman said I had passed it, I told her it was a mistake, for I was in the country. I have a letter here stating that I went to Strood on the 16th, and stopped there till the 20th.
One of those sheets does not belong to you.
When you took me, or rather when I gave myself into custody to you, did I say that I set the rick on fire, or that I see it on fire?
I don't wish to say anything.
I am innocent. There were other people in the shop, who are as likely to have given the money which was in the till, as me.
Did I take your watch from you?
There was a great crowd; I picked the watch up and went away with it.
Did I say that I came from Mr. Whipper?
On Whit Monday I was sent for the peas by a man named Harrison; I was to receive 5s. for taking them. I took them, and the man gave me a half-crown. They were found at the place where they were left.
The delivery note was made out in the name of Harrison, the clerk made it out
I told you where the barrow was engaged, where they were going to, and that was the place I left them at, and where they were found. I was sent by Harrison, the delivery note was in his name; I took the peas where I was told to take them, and got 5s., half-a-crown for myself, and half-a-crown for the man.
Mr. Healey gave me the coat and shirt when we went to the pawnbroker's shop. He said, \There is the jacket I promised you, and he gave me the coat I am in now."
I was very much the worse for drink when I met him.
Did you say you were not disposed to prosecute?
I have given every information in my power. I believe nearly the whole of the property has been recovered, and of course I shall make up whatever lose there is. I was not aware that the goods had been disposed of in the way that Newstead described at the Mansion House I have never been in prison before, and I will make up the loss as much as I possibly can.
I bought the things about an hour before I was taken in custody. At 12 o'clock I was at Hammersmith.
Did you see that the mate had me by the throat, and the second mate by the hair of my head?
Did I say anything when I went up aloft?
They used me very hard when I was in irons  I was lashed in a hot sun, and when I asked for water the captain presented a revolver, and said that if they brought me any he would blow their brains out For twenty-four hours I had nothing to eat, and for six days I was fed on bread and water. My hands were all covered with tar, and the rusty irons made them sore; and for six days I bad no water to wash them. I could not move my head, and my jaws and ribs were swollen from the pain where I had been kicked, and blood run out of my mouth. I was senseless when I had the knife, and do not remember anything about. it The captain told all hands to stand back as he was going to blow my brains out with two revolvers, which he held in his hand. He said, \Do you give yourself up?\" and then I looked at my hand and saw the knife, and threw it down immediately. They did not allow me to change my clothes, which had become filthy with vermin. When we got into cold latitudes, where there where was snow and ice, I could not keep myself warm, as my clothes were wringing wet from the water running down upon me. The captain defied me to look at him, as if I was a robber, and he told me he would blow my brains out if I did; and he threatened to hang me up by the heels, and set the dog on me."
I was coming from the Cambridge Road round towards Stepney Green, and this old lady was coming across the road. I happened to notice her before I was close to her. I had 26 cwt of flour in my cart, and could not go very fast As I halloaed to her, she appeared to be deaf, and walked under the horse's head; the shaft knocked her down, and the wheel went over her. I stopped, and told a policeman who was, and be left another officer in charge of the hone and cart, whilst I and he took the old lady to the hospital.
Did I cut you with the knife at all?
Did you say that the coats were removed from the pegs, and thrown into the passage?
I have never been in trouble before. I did not know what I was doing. I think I must have been drunk. I cannot account for it.
Can you swear that I was concerned in it?
Did you ever see me in the room?
How far is the empty house from your house?
I never carry a knife with me, and I never did such a thing in my 'life.
I am innocent of doing such a thing; I work for my living.
Do you mean to say you were sober when you came out of the Fountain?
Did you not meet the prosecutor at Blackheath?
If he had taken me a few hours before he would hare found 30l. on me. I know nothing at all about it. I keep cattle of my own, and was never locked up before in my life.
I was very much agitated. I. went down to the works to get some money, and I was blackguarded and called an old thief, had everything that was bad; and they aggravated me so that unfortunately I went and got too much to drink, and when I do I am mad, as bad as any madman; in fact, it runs in the family. My mother died insane, and my brother, and I have got two sisters, one is a lunatic, and the other has been in Colney Hatch twice, and I am going in the same way. I never ought to touch a drop of drink, because when I do, ever since I broke my leg, I know no more what I am doing than the stone in the street I never injured anybody. I destroyed nobody's property only my own.
Have you a cheque, on 17th February, for 50l.?
I never drew one for 50l. except for the shares; I ask you to produce it, that I may see that it is my signature.
Was the first day I saw you when I came to attach 60l. which you held?
Did you meet me coming out of the London and Suburban Bank one morning, when a gentleman named Christian was with you?
I will not put the other question.
Did I tell you that I had been badly treated at the bank?
Did I hire a pair of horses and a servant of you
Did I ever pay anything over the hart
Did not you swear, on your depositions, that you had the paper given you, but did not read it?
Did not you say that you would stay proceedings if I would sign the document?
Was not Mr. Barrett the secretary of that company?
Does that not say 14 A, Lime Street?
Was not I with you four years?
I have merely to say that I have done business with Mr. William Henry Chapman, and I had no motive in saying that I had done business with this Mr. Chapman; and does it not seem strange that Mr. Leggett should pay money on policies coming from 14 A, Lime Street when the card he produced had the address 53, Lime Street on it.
I am quite innocent of it.
How long was I in your house?
I met this young man, and I went with him and had a pint of cider. We were in the house an hour and a quarter. I don't think I should have stopped in the place that time if it had been a bad coin; and we were outside a quarter of an hour before he came to us. No bad money was found on me.
I swear I never gave you a sixpence that day; the party I was with gave it to you.
I did not know it was bad.
I did not throw the stones; it was another boy. My little brother and another big boy, with curly hair, as big as me, were with me, and as soon as the man came and catched hold of me he ran away, and they took me.
I heard a great disturbance, and jumped over the wall to see what was the matter  some person halloaed out, that is one of them, and I thought it boat to get away as fast as I could, but was taken.
I did not say Thomas, I said John Brown.
When I gave him the note it was still for 1l. 5s. he came back afterwards and said that I had falsified it.
Do you swear that?
I did not throw the stone; there were more besides me.
I purchased the horse. I did not steal it.
Are you sure I am the man?
Did you see me drop them?
Did she not say \Now you have got the prisoner you shall have the shilling?\""
I received the shilling in change at North Woolwich Gardens. If I had known it was bad I should not have fetched a policeman, but should have gone a different road altogether.
Are you sure I am the man?
Were there a great many people?
Who did he have hold of besides me?
Is there enough evidence to convict me of any crime? He could have seen the watch in my hand if I had it; they searched me when they got me out of the crowd, but they found nothing. They made me undress myself at the station, but found nothing. The other man could pay for a solicitor, and he got off. I could have got the case settled at ford, and should not have got more than three months'; but I preferred to wait in prison a month to be tried.
Had not you and me been drinking all the morning?
I asked for a lucifer; he said, \Take one,\" and I took one out of his pocket. I had a cheroot, half smoked, and the policeman took it away from me."
Were not you in the workshop behind us?
Did you see me take the articles?
Did not you see me after that?
Could I have got out of the barracks unknown to the sentries?
You know the room where I escaped from?
No; it was No. 186.
Have you ever seen the Rev. Mr. Hewlett of Barnes?
At that time you paid the 5s. 3d. was there a secretary, treasurer, or committee at Barnes?
How long were you employed by the society in London before I left?
Would it be my duty, if I received money, as I was appointed to do, to pay it to you or the auxiliary secretary?
You were in the society previous to my being engaged?
I went to Barnes, because I was directed by Mr. Hewlett. I received the 5l. and 5s. 3d., and was going to pay it in one sum to Mr. Hitchin. He has stated that he could not take money unless the name of the society is given with it. I knew that when I took the money, but I did not know that in a few days I should be discharged. I was looking about to find someone to form an auxiliary society, and on the day I left I obtained Mr. Lavington's consent to become auxiliary secretary again. In a short time I should have got someone to become treasurer, and then I could have paid the money to the accountant. I knew I could not pay it in; he had already refused a sum from Barnes, and I had to complete an auxiliary in order to put in the name of the society.
I was not near the shop.
While I drank my ale and smoked my pipe, did not you sell a bottle of Old Tom?
I was not near Mr. Palmer's shop on 14th March, nor within forty yards of the end of the street. I changed a florin at the Murray Arms, but I believed it was good.
Will you swear you did not put the shilling in the till?
I did not know the coins were bad. I waited till the policeman came.
I did not get into his place. I did not know where he kept his money, and did not have the money. I am innocent.
Did I strike you before you struck me?
Do you say you saw me snatch the chain?
I know nothing about the chain. The prosecutor struck me, and I struck him; but as for taking the chain, I never touched it.
The policeman ran after me 400 yards from his beat, and said that I was one that had assaulted a man. I had nothing on me.
At what time did I come to receive the money?
The boxes were all nailed with long nails. There was one on the top of the box; a man asked me for it, and I gave it him, and the policeman took me into custody.
Also a judgment summons for 4l. 11s. 6d.?
I know nothing about the money; it might have been taken before I went there.
When you put the change on the counter, did I touch it?
I gave the sixpence for a sixpence, and wished for my change. The barman said \Do you know what you have given?\"I said \"A sixpence, and I wish for change for a sixpence. \"I looked at him with surprise when he put down change for a half-sovereign. I never touched the change."
He is taking a false oath; I was in the House of Correction for nine months at the time.
Did not you take a Victoria shilling from me?
He is swearing my life away, by saying I was in his place in April.
Was I sober?
Did you find my address right, and where I bad been working?
I was taken to the House of Detention. They asked me my name, and I told them, and two days afterwards they had me down, and said I had been there before. I said I had not They said they would prove it; they had my name down. My arm has been broken nine years, and they said that it had been broken since I had been there.
He was here yesterday to give me a character. I know nothing about the first case, and do not know where the shop is.
If I had known it was a bad florin should I have stopped in the shop full twenty minutes while the woman went out? I showed her the man who gave it to me about two minutes walk from the shop. I asked the man to come with me, and I would show him the man who gave it to me, but he would not.
I never saw you in my life; I once had six months for a false case, as I told the officer, hut I never was convicted as George Austen.
Is there any opening into the back yard?
Was I drunk or sober?
I went there to see a friend; I have been in the habit of going to the house. I am innocent I had just come out of the back room.
I have had connection with you at different times.
I remember being taken to the station; but I do not remember saying what he says.
This day six weeks I met the prosecutrix. She told me she had been out over night, and was refused to be let in, and she remained with me till the night this happened. I took lodgings purposely for her. We all three came away from the brewery together, I, Mrs. Butler, and Hines.
Were not the two men who had been fighting running after you crying \Stop thief?\""
Did I take hold of the prosecutor's watch before he was brought back by the policeman?
I did not see anything of it.
I went into the shop, and I picked up the coat, that I should not tread upon it. The woman said \What do you want?\" and I ran away. I went in to get a situation as porter."
What did you first Bay to me?
I should have thought, if you saw me tying up a bundle, you would have asked me what I had.
I did not say a word to her; it is her husband who has put her up to all this.
I never made such a remark.
Did I apply to you to allow me something towards repairing my room?
That was the change of the half-crown.
I have been in prison ever since the 25th of last month, and I think that is quite sufficient for what I have done  I was never near the house on the 15th.
Did you find me guilty of any misconduct while I was with you?
There was no attempt to rob, the note was found between two sheets of A newspaper I had on the desk.
Did not you give me an invoice in my own name?
Did you ever pay me any commission?
When I came to you what did I tell you?
I think I spoke to you some two or three weeks before 1 sold you the parcel of yarn, and said I was going to leave Mr. Magrove, and start in business on my own account?
When you saw me in the Strand did I not speak to you?
The shirt was not pledged by me, it was a ticket that I bought.
I picked up the watch and ran after the man. I heard a cry of \Stop thief!\" I looked round and saw a policeman after me, and I was stopped."
I was going through Half Moon Passage, with another man, and saw the counterpane on the ground. I picked it up. He said \Don't have anything to do with it, I daresay it belongs to someone in the court.\" I put it down, and started to go home, when the policeman ran after us."
How do you know I am the man who stabbed you?
What time elapsed from the stabbing till I was arrested?
I see that it is impossible for you to come to any other conclusion than that I am Guilty, because I have no defence. I am a stranger in a strange land, 4000 miles from home.
Do you know the field?
Was there not a possibility of the sheep straying?
. Gentlemen, there must be some doubt upon your minds; and if there is, I hope you will give me the benefit of it.
When you sent me after the cattle I brought them to where you authorized me?
I did not mean to rob the man of the money or the calves; I had not time to get the money together to pay Mr. Munro, or I should have done so.
Were there other people in the place?
I said I could not tell.
If I had thought it was anything wrong, do you think I should bare gone deliberately and taken boxes out of the rack while the gentleman was looking at me, and then walk past him down the stairs? It would be just like opening the prison doors and walking in, and shutting them upon you. Of course, when the chap who told me to go and fetch them, saw the gentleman stop me, he was nowheres.
What by?
The second piece was not on me at all.
They are my property; I have had them by me for many years, when I was in business for myself.
With reference to the things produced they are my own property, and as to the shirt buttons I never had anything to do with that class of goods while I was there.
I never went in any other name, and at that time I was employed in France.
When I was asked for a reference, I said if they wanted to know anything about me they were to go to the Hotel D'Italie, in Soho Square.
Did I not come back to your hotel?
Do you remember that I had been there the previous year?
In putting the change before me, did you not count it place by piece?
Do you know if there is a money-changers at Milan in the Piazza del Pionel?
. These twenty-one notes which have been found to be forged were given to me as genuine, and I received them as genuine from the firm of Perelli and Polli, money-changers at Milan, at the beginning of April in the present year, in exchange for a certificate of Italian stock. Later I came to know that one of the partners was condemned to ten years' hard labour for having attempted to put in circulation forged notes. My good faith is proved by being in the company of Mr. Beretta when I changed the notes, and by leaving my address in London. If I had known they were forged I should never have sought the company of Beretta to have them exchanged, especially as he knew me intimately. After two months I returned to London, and continued to frequent the hotel kept by Beretta, who never told me anything about the notes being forged; on the contrary, he received me well; therefore, he could not have suspected they were forged. When I obtained exchange for three of the notes in the City, the clerk went out and returned and said they were genuine; therefore, that confirmed me that they were genuine. I was astonished, when I went to the third money-changer to have two more changed, to be told they were forged. I then gave up all the remainder that I had, my passport, and everything. I had no idea of it before then. If I had been a forger I should have acted in a different way. I should have tried to obtain change of the whole lot in one day, of different money-changers, and I should not have travelled with a passport in my own name; consequently, I protest that I am innocent I had two witnesses I had requested to attend, one of the name of Duncan, and the waiter at an hotel, whose name I don't now recollect; but it appears they are not here.
I will never do it any more.
Did not you jingle it among your silver?
You an making six of it.
How long were you conversing with the female?
Did I conduct myself honestly all the time I was in your service?
I used Messrs. Harris's name for the purpose of obtaining the money, but not with the intention of defrauding them, or the Imperial Bank. I meant to pay back every farthing of the money. If I had intended to defraud them I should not have stated in the letter that the bank were to take the numbers of the notes.
Did I produce a paper when I first applied to be enrolled in the reserve?
How many times did you see me previous to 10th May?
Where was the regiment lying when Williamson took his discharge?
I have got to state that on the day in question I can prove by two witnesses that I was at Gosport; they belong to the regiment to which the sergeant, who has given evidence, belongs  I have no means of bringing them here; they are with the regiment at Devonport, at present.
I never stood with my back towards you; I stood with my face towards you.
We had all three been in the house all the afternoon, drinking, and at night, when they shut up the house, we went out, and they said \Let us come and get some more beer.\" I said \"You cannot; the house is closed.\" They left me and went back; I went to see where they were; the gate was open, and I went in and found them, and Mr. Wood came. I did not know what they were going to do."
What was it I cut you for, did I give you any reason?
This woman has picked up with another man, and she says he is a better man than me.
You knocked a piece out of my eye with a quart pot.
Did not she say she could get a better man than me, and a better looking man?
None saw a knife with me, but I was taking one from my wife.
I asked her where my awl was; she said \How do I know? If she was asleep she could not have said that."
I did not do it, she did it herself. Her finger was cut when we were pulling the knife.
Did you hear him swear positively that his cheque for 150l. would have been honoured?
Is it likely that I should stand at the bar, and pass two bad shillings one after the other? no man of sense would do that I paid 1d. for the rum, but did not know it was bad.
Did you see me take the things out of the shop?
What were the exact words?
I believe you took your references from Smith to give me credit?
I never received any money or goods collusively  I jumped from a baker to a wine-merchant all of a sudden, because I chose to do so  the money came from my own industry  I never heard of Colonel Dawkins  I never took a single farthing, directly or indirectly  Smith and I are not partners, he is out of the business now  my partner is Robert McCargo.
Did not I apply to you in 1864 to give me credit in my Chancery case?
Did not Mr. Bine, the clerk to Burgoyne, come to you fifteen years ago, and tell you that there was 1000 times more than I should live to spend, and that my case was the finest he ever saw?
Did not you take your reference from Smith, as to giving me credit?
Was 25,000l. to be paid for retribution to you and others for kindness?
It was given me by a Mr. Brown, who I was acquainted with, who asked me to get it cashed, which I did, thinking it was genuine, but I afterwards found it was not. Brown has gone to Canada. I am not guilty of forging it, only of putting my father's name at the back.
I know nothing that happened.
Did you give me the shilling back?
. I did not know they were bad.
I bought the things you see there, and gave a sovereign for them.
I picked up the half-sovereign in a piece of paper. I had a doubt about it being good, so I sent the boy with it. I know I have done wrong.
When were you appointed agent to Smith & Co., of Birmingham?
How long have you known Mr. Haynes?
Did you give Simons into custody?
I am not Mr. Haynes' servant at all; I was merely an agent. I did not know the witness Simons was pledging the goods; I gave them to him to sell. Directly I knew it I did all I could to get the duplicates. I am innocent of this charge.
I left Aberdeen for the purpose of going to Hull, in July, and I went from Hull to Hamburg, and was employed by Louis Bache & Co., and then I came to this country, and Mrs. Stewart told me to go to Somerset House, and get a passport to go over and get my things, and she would give me the money for that purpose. That is all I have to say.
On the Saturday night I was coming along Pennington Street, and that man was sweeping in front of the Dock House. I asked him to hold on while I went past him. He swept the mud right over my shoes and trowsers. I said \You might have held on while I passed.\" He said \"Who are you; why should I hold on for you?\" I said \"You might be civil;\" and he struck me on the head with the broom. I have the mark now. I snatched hold of the broom, and got it from him, and struck him on the head. I saw him stagger, and I threw the broom out of my hand. I did not know the man before. The wound on my head was bleeding, and the missus of the house put some sticking plaister on it, and the doctor took it off on the following Monday."
A man named Jones asked me to pledge the shirt, and I did so.
Did you find any bad coin at my lodging?
I was at Victoria Gate, between 8.30 and 9.30  the night before.
I have two witnesses to prove that I was at the Victoria Theatre on Monday night from 6.30 till 10.30  I got the money at Fresh Wharf on Monday evening.
You carry on business at 210, Regent Street?
I suppose it would be the system of the bank to have the name of the bankers on the prospectus before the account was opened?
For nothing in connection with the Company?
When I gave the order for the printing, who did I see?
Mr. Webster sued Mr. Spall in the County Court?
What kind of a screen was it?
You have done business with me before?
When did you take possession?
Are you aware that I have made arrangements with Mr. Reeves since, to settle the account?
Was not one of the squares supplied to Mr. Shelton?
The account has become due to you since I have been in prison?
I can only say that the Royal Scottish was started in May, 1869, for the purpose of doing life insurance business, but it was not prosperous at that time, so we added fresh rules to do the plate glass business. We did business for the first ten months, and Mr. Thompson had four breakages, amounting to 14l. 19s. 6d.; they were replaced after he had paid a premium of 4l.; so that he reaped the benefit of 10l. at least. I am not responsible for the doings of the directors. It is as likely I should be imposed upon as the tradesmen from whom we obtained the money. The shareholders have paid 250l. more than the income of the Company  I acted with no guilty intention.
You struck me on the side of my head, and knocked me down.
. I am innocent. I maintain a widowed sister and child, by selling things in the street.
What can you swear to me by?
I was never in the shop before.
I sold a set of shoe brushes for 5s. 6d., and the gentleman gave me a bad half-crown. I paid it to Mrs. Stimpson, who gave me in charge. I know nothing of the other two.
A man asked me to purchase the greens, and gave me the two half-crowns. I was going back to him when I was given in charge. The second half-crown was never given back to me.
I never made use of any such words, if I had, the prosecutor would have heard me; where was he?
I had the knife in my hand to cut a piece of tobacco and was cutting my finger-nails, when the prosecutor struck me with the shovel. I did not mean to do any hurt with it; I don't know how it was done. The prosecutor had had a row with another man that same night; Mr. Davis's son; and broke his collar bone. I had the knife in my possession three quarters of an hour before it happened.
Two men stopped me in Milton Street, and asked me to move two bales of cardboard, and I said I would do it. They said it was to go to Old Street, City Road. I went to Mr. Wells' for the barrow, and the barrow being outside I took it. The men brought out the two bundles and put them on the barrow, and I was going up Bunhill Row with them when the constable stopped me.
Did you ask me whose they were?
Was the box locked, and perfectly safe?
Did not this man, Furness, lodge there?
On 22nd January, I met two men in Stamford Street, Blackfriars Road. I knew one of them, named James. He asked me to have a drop of beer, and took me to his lodging, at Vauxhall, where he introduced me to his landlady, and said \I wish you would say that this box belongs to you, as I owe some money in the house, and do not wish her to know I am possessed of a box.\" In the morning he asked me to pledge the goods; I have been in custody five weeks; I only know the man by sight; I have given the officers all the information about him and James."
What part of the Deptford Road was it that you saw this party go by with a bundle?
I never slept at your house at all.
I never saw the child at all; I was not there.
I slept in London on 18th March. I took a lodging at King's Cross, and about April I bought this ticket for 5s., and got the watch out from Brown's, in Cranbourne Court. I pledged it again in September, at Mr. Vaughan's. I used to use Mr. Hopkins' house, and I thought he was still in the public line. I was quite surprised when this charge was brought against me. I left the Military Train with a good character.
You did not see me anywhere there?
When you came up to me, did you say you would charge me with burglary?
On the 8th of this month I was going to Plumstead for a job. I saw a basket lying between some furze on the heath. I picked it up, and carried it home to my mother's place, and put the boots in the cupboard, and the umbrella on the bed. My clothes-box would only hold the two small coats. Do you think if I had stolen the property I should have kept them four hours in my mother's house? and when the policeman came and caught hold of me, I was not more than 200 yards from the station, where I was going to give information. I want to know what proof they have, to charge me with the burglary. I was down the town after 11 o'clock, and I can call my sister, and the young woman that was with her, to say that.
When did I come out?
You were in bed and asleep when I entered the room.
It was a hammer that I borrowed, to break some coke with. I brought it up to return it, and stumbled over the corner of the bed. There was not room for the door to open without a person stumbling. The bed was on the ground.
I brought the hammer up in my hand. I stumbled over something, and it was jerked out of my hand; it caught the bedstead, and rebounded on to my wife's head. There was no light there, or it would not have occurred. I went down for a light; I returned immediately, and dressed the head with some water and a bandage.
I was very drunk at the time. I went to the docks and met the party with the truck there. I have a very imperfect knowledge of what happened.
The captain asked me what was the reason I did not obey his orders; you were standing in the passage at the time.
I did not say I would have some of your lives; I said there would be a row first; that was the language I made use of.
The witness held my hand, so that I could not let go the knife, and it wounded me.
When I asked him for the loan of his knife I was not aware I was going down to the cabin; Plummer says \Be quick with the knife;\" it was a good ten minutes before I was asked to go down by the captain."
I never was at Mr. Blyth's before; if I was, and if he gave me 1s. 10 1/2 d. change, what became of it? I should not give it away in the street.
Where did you first see me?
Where did you first see me?
Did not you say to me, \I have got it as big as that for you this time?\""
Last Wednesday I was discharged from seven years' penal servitude; I did five years and eight months. On the next day I received 6s. from the Society. I had 5l. 16s. 10d. to receive from them by installments. I was going to Castle Street to get a lodging, and met the prosecutrix by the \Alhambra;\" she said \"I will take you where there are lodgings.\" She took me to Castle Street, and said \"Come in here, and have a glass of something.\" I did so, and she said \"You have come from Chatham; I know by your clothes; my chap is doing fire years now.\" I wanted to get away, but she clung to my arm, and said \"Come along with me.\" I shoved her, and she caught her eye against the door; I was very sorry. As to the key and the other things, I know no more than you do how I got them."
As I had the hogsheads, so I delivered them, one after the other, at three different shops.
What the officer says is quite correct; I had the pots given me to take to the Blackfriars Road.
I am innocent of the charge of stealing them. They were given to me in Clare Market, to take to the Blackfriars Road I was never in the house, and never saw the lady till she was at the Police Court I can prove I was in the City all the time, and did not go out.
Did you see me climb on to the dust-cart?
The barge was in the Thames, and one could not get there unless they had a boat The policeman says he saw me at 10 o'clock on the top of a dust-cart. I did not see any coffee, and was not in Cinnamon Street when the policeman saw me running; I was in King Street, running towards him.
The handkerchief laid on the pavement, and I picked it up.
I found them.
Did you see me drop the handkerchief?
I heard a cry, and ran, and the moment I got into the court a policeman caught me, and the handkerchief was brought up by a boy, and given to the police. The prosecutor came up and charged me; he did not know who took it I assure you I don't know anything about it.
You are not sure I am the man that spoke to you?
You say you identified me at West Ham, or Ilfold?
When were you brought in to recognize me, at the West Ham police-station?
You say to-day something about changing caps; how is it that you never stated that in any evidence you have given before?
You never stated that till to-day.
You see, gentlemen, I stand here charged with attempt at housebreaking. The evidence against me, I should think, is hardly sufficient to convict me. Out of all the witnesses them is not one person that gives any straightforward evidence against me. If the evidence is sufficient to bring me in guilty, I ask you to bring me in guilty of the charge; but, if you try me fair and just, it is only a case of misdemeanour; there was no entry whatever.
Were not the child's feet in your pocket?
I did not.
Why did not you follow and take him?
Why did not you go to the place I told you?
I found them wrapped up in paper, and put them into my pocket. If I had known the first one was bad, I should not have gone back to the house. I was intoxicated, or I should not have said that I knew where I took it from.
I never was in the shop but once in my life, and that was about dinner time.
I pawned some boots for 4s. I only changed a half-crown once at the public-house, and I did not know that was bad.
Did you have your coat buttoned up?
How far was Harrisson from me?
Did you detect that the florin was bad when I gave it to you?
I received 19s. from Coles, for whom Harrisson and I worked as painters. I met Harrisson by appointment. I had borrowed a shilling of him, and paid him with a florin, which I had received from my master. The coin picked up must have rolled against my feet The coin which was tendered I must have received; I did not utter it with guilty knowledge.
I was only in the shop once that day.
I am very sorry. I hope you will make it as light as you can. I had no work, and got mixed up with bad money.
When did you first know me?
Do you remember the quarrel we had about the money in the smoking-room, when I told you I had fed and clothed Emily Lisle for years?
Do you remember when the bailiffs were in your house?
On 18th March, did not I advise you of having received the five guineas of Mr. Muella?
I only came into Southampton a few hours before; I was sent home by the English Consul; I had taken a glass or two, and have no recollection of it; I belong to the Bard of Avon, and am willing to pay for the things when she comes in, and to lay in prison till then.
I was in great distress; I had been out of work some time. I beg for mercy.
I was convicted at Wandsworth
, and had one month; since then I have tried hard to get work, but could not If you will give me a fresh start, I will try to get my living.
I did not run away, I went away gradually.
I did nothing to the man. He asked me what I was doing, and told me to go away, and I went away; and about an hour after the policeman came, and said \Some of you foreign men have stabbed a man, and I will take you in custody.\" I had no knife, and nothing on me."
Do you know that the proceeds of these cheques ever came into my possession?
You have known me some years; have you ever known anything against my character previous to this transaction?
You have known me many years?
This is the first time I ever appeared in such a position. These circumstances have fallen upon me on account of my trouble, and illness on the part of my wife and children. I trust that mercy may be extended to me.
Why did you not take the watch out of my hand?
It is all false.
This will be the last time, if you will deal with me mercifully. I have not been able to work.
You said at first that I stopped on the kerb for a minute after I took the purse?
I am quite in the dark about it; I don't even know what day it happened.
You say that while I was in the service of Mr. Feist I called on you with another person; where did I call on you?
Do you recollect what I said when you said there was no Mr. Dyer living there?
You remember my calling?
I was at Union Stairs and two lightermen asked me to keep the boat afloat; I did so and the policeman took me, the boat was of no use to me, nobody would have bought it of me, it is very hard to be kept in prison innocent.
I plead guilty to having the bread, but not to uttering the ticket.
I have been under the doctor since I was taken, it was entirely through want and starvation.
I have been in India thirteen years, I left the regiment, and the major gave me three half-crowns. I paid 4d. to come by railway from Greenwich, and took these coins in change, I had no idea they were bad.
I wish to point out that there was no cause for animosity on my part against Mr. Heal; I never had a cause. I have lived there five or six years, and never had a word with him, or with the head manager, therefore, I could have no cause to commit the crime. I am sorry to say it is entirely through drink; it was drink which caused me to give myself up, and my object in doing so was to get into a gaol to get away from drink, little thinking of the consequences, or what would become of me. I am not guilty.
Has it been presented again?
He tore my coat, and hit me in the mouth.
Two or three of the men I don't know at all. I don't understand much English.
I always believed Frances Cracknell to be true to me, and on this night I saw her with a young man, and I asked her if she intended to make a fool of me; she could not give me an answer, but said she would kick me in the road. I did not mean any harm to her.
They never saw me before in their lives; they have got the wrong man.
Is there a bed-room, or an empty room, above your sitting-room, second storey?
I got drunk, and did not know what I was about I laid down, and when I woke in the morning, I found my cap, jacket, and gloves gone. I saw this jacket close by me, and I put it on, and went to see whether anyone had found any soldier's things, and then I went to the barracks.
When I gave you the florin, did you show it to the customers in the room?
Did not I offer you a sixpence?
The first time I went to the house the young man with me paid, as he owed me for some beer. I never uttered the half-crown, or saw it, or had it in my hand, it was the man who was with me. I did not know whether the florin was good or bad, I had it in my pocket with some lucifers, and it looked very blue. The pin which I left as security for the 2d., cost me 1s., 6d.
Is the cheque in my handwriting?
Did I tell you that I was guilty?
Was it I who produced the order?
 I think I have said quite enough, but I did not tell the officer that I was guilty. At the time I was arrested I was in the employ of Mr. Herbert, of 5, New Inn. I wrote to him in the afternoon of 2nd June, to tell him I thought I should be with him in the afternoon, because I was absent on the day previous. Mr. Philipe visited me on 31st May, and told me that a cheque had been presented at his bank for payment of 30l., and asked whether I had done it; I told him I hat, although I knew nothing whatever of the affair. The reason I told him I had done it was because he had a matter of business to settle for my mother; he had known my father and mother many years, and I thought if I denied the accusation he would refuse to act, and thereby put us to great inconvenience and trouble, besides incurring considerable expense. I have been en trusted with several sums of money exceeding 30l. during my stay with Mr. Herbert, and he can give a satisfactory account of my character.
I never was there, and never saw the woman in my life?
\Does it stand reasonable that they should take the gold and not try it? I am a hard working man.\""
When two of you pounced upon me, what was I doing?
I was standing looking at a book, waiting for a female friend, when he seized me. If I had been the man I should not have stood there, but have ran off. I am innocent.
How do you know I gave you the florin?
Did not I make a voluntary statement at the station, to the effect that I was on ticket of leave?
The handkerchief laid on the doorway, and I picked it up. The prosecutor does not swear he found my hand in his pocket. I believe I any indicted for a robbery in Cornhill, whereas it should have been in Gracechurch Street.
I deny being in the shop; if I had been, it is very strange that she did not tell me so.
This florin was given to me for wheeling a truck.
Would it be possible for a person to be seen entering your house at a distance of 100 yards?
Where was it you first saw me?
It is nothing but a police prosecution. I am entirely innocent, the policeman says he saw me on 31st June; he could not have seen me then, at all events. I was not in Duke Street at all, and never entered a house.
Have not I been in the habit of\\ send\\ ing goods regularly into the country?
Have I not been in the habit of\\ send\\ ing to those places by your line?
I think when I was putting down the bad debts, you told me it was useless putting them down?
Atkinson was a bankrupt, at the time he failed I was the largest creditor, for 321l.
I borrowed 30l. of Thomas Heyling, of Castle Street, Bishopsgate, which I owe him now. I don't think he is here. I received 19l. for goods which they left in my place, and which I sold; and I had 10l. from Mr. Green.
I sold everything they left in the place, my own clothing and my wife's, and I got 19l. odd by that; that is the explanation I wish to give to the Jury.
Was I dressed the same at your place as I was at Guildhall?
Where is your brother?
You gave 1l. for that twelve yards, and it was worth 6s., 9d. a yard.
He took me down to the station and never told me what I was charged with, and after they brought the woman down he said \Now I will tell you what you are charged with\"  I am innocent of it."
Did not I ask you to come with me and I would show you the man I bought them of.
I went to Petticoat Lane and bought the coats there  I did not know they were wrongly come by  I paid for them  there are plenty of coats hawked all over London.
You sent me with them?
I was sent by that man, and he said he would give me a good character if I called on him.
When the man ran after me, did I not stop directly?
Did I not pull up when you told me I had run over a child?
Did I not say \I can walk very well, I am not drunk?\""
Where did you see me hit the horse?
I was not drunk. I did not see, the child.
I was in distress. I had no guilty intention.
I only wish to say that the defence which has been maintained in my favour was a just and honest one.
How many were there married on the same day?
At Hammersmith you said I was married by register?
She was so bad I could not live with her, we always used to be quarrelling; she would not keep herself clean, or decent, or the children as well. I told her several times I could not live with her. She said \Go, I don't care where you go, I don't want to have anything to do with you.\" I have been with this other party, and she swore she would do away with herself. If she hung herself I thought I should be on some wilful charge, and I thought I might as well be charged with one thing as the other."
Why did not you mention to the Magistrate that I gave you one before 10th November?
Could you see me on 26th December?
I gave the prosecutor one shilling on 26th December; it was the only one I had; he said it was bad; I said \I don't think it,\" and threw it back to him and he give me the change. I was in a temper when I threw the money away, because I was going to be locked up on Boxing-day, when I was going to have some beer with my friends. I have had money returned to me as bad, which has afterwards turned out to be good; matches will change it."
I am very sorry, I was the worse for drink.
He got me tight hold by the throat.
I never saw the woman before.
I know nothing about it.
I know nothing about it
I know nothing about this, only the first charge of ten shillings, which I returned.
It was not unusual for me to be absent a week at a time?
I took the cheque of a man named Wilson. I had no intention to defraud. I was away for a week on business. My mother lived only 200 yards from his house, and I knew that he would go there if there was anything wrong. I did not know but what the cheque was perfectly correct.
I was very drunk, and she asked me to cut her finger nails.
I never said such words.
I do not know what to say; she caused me to do it; I love her as well as I love my life.
On the 7th December I was living at 3, Little Grove Street  there were two young men there, and they said \Adcock, will you go and pawn us a coat?\"  I said I did not mind  I pawned it for 14s., and brought back the money  they gave me the ticket, and a young fellow there said \"I know where you can sell that ticket,\" and I went with him to the last witness, and offered to sell it to him  I asked him a half-crown  he said \"All right, you call again at 7 o'clock, and I will look at the coat\"  at 7 o'clock, when I got down there, there were two detectives, and they took me into custody."
I was not aware it was a had shilling, I had plenty of opportunity of making away with it.
The man who had the knife is on board the vessel  I did not stab him.
I am quite innocent of the charge  the man who did it ran away afterwards and went on board the ship, and he is there  I stayed back, and some one came and took me.
I had no knife; the man is on board the ship that did it.
Did you see me with a knife?
I was going on board the ship, and I came to a lot of people standing outside the public-house door. Some one struck me on the nose, I received several blows, and then I ran away. They caught hold of me, and took me to the police-station. The man on board the ship had my knife, and I had no knife at all.
Were you called to identify me at the Bow Street Police Office?
Did I hurry you for the change?
You say I was running.
You were not there when I asked for the stamps, you were behind, working the telegraph.
Do you think for a moment that if I was there in the morning with a bad shilling I should go back in the evening  a gentleman gave me the money and told me to get him 4s. worth of stamps, and he would give me 6d.  I was not aware it was bad, or I would not have taken it  I have a witness to prove I was not there in the morning.
McCloud was my mother's name.
I never touched the woman. The prisoner is here who struck the woman; he is in No. 2 E; Frederick Hodson is his name.
It is false. I believe he was one of them.
Did you state at Hammersmith Police Court that the place was saturated with blood?
Did not you inspect my hands after my being remanded one week?
\Have you any mark on it?\""
Did I speak to you in the Elgin public-house?
Did you see the watch in my hand?
Did you see the watch in my hand?
I ran round the corner so fast that I could not help running up against you.
The policeman never found anything on me. I am sorry, and throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I can only say that the pony started off.
I have never been in any trouble before in my life  that last constable struck the female and I said \Don't knock them about.\" I never assaulted them in the least."
Did I give you the things?
Were stamps of that kind used in the Quartermaster-General's office, the office I was in?
I gave the constable my proper address, and so I did the man at the shop. I wanted to get good money for them, but the constable would not let me.
When did I call on you?
Did you receive one letter after that?
I believe there was a liquidation in 1871.
How do you know the property you saw?
Have you refused to take the balance?
Have not I known Mr. Tolkien some time?
What goods did you see at Mr. Such's?
I did not strike him at all, I only held him.
I am sorry for what happened.
With which hand did I strike you with the knife?
Was it not you who brought me to the restaurant?
I had nothing in my hand when I gave him the blow in the face. I did not stab him at all with a knife; he insulted me in the public-house, and said I was a man of no education, because I could not speak English, and because I am a Hollander. He said they were low fellows and were put out of Belgium. That vexed me, and I asked him to go out with me. He would not, and I struck him in the face, and he struck me again, and that was all. I did not strike him with a knife.
I did not wilfully detain them for any purpose; but the reason why I put them in my locker was because they were half not known; and I put them in my locker as I could not find them.
I had no idea the shilling was bad; if I had, should not I have put it by the scraper with the other? I received it in change for a half-crown.
Did your mistress point me out to you?
Do you mean to say that it was six or eight weeks previous to your first appearance at Marlborough Street, or your last appearance?
Not being able to get any proper account of the date of the occurrence, I am unable to bring any witnesses, or I could prove that I was not in the shop at all. I have a letter here from a gentleman at Winchester, offering his evidence, but he cannot get the date.
Are you sure I made use of those words because I can prove I did not?
When I took you into the court did not I say \Wait there until I get my shoes to put them on?"
I don't remember anything of it; I was tipsy  on the Sunday morning I said to the little boy \Where is your mother?  he said \"I don't know; last night she went out after you beat her, and I have not seen her since.\""
What is the reason you paid Watts and Swallow, and not me?
You were not there at the time the iron was bought.
I was standing outside the Green Man and Swallow and Watts came, and asked me if I had seen Sawyer  I said \No  they said \"He promised to meet us here with a truck,\" and at 7 o'clock Sawyer came with his truck  Watts's arm was tied up in a sling, and he asked me to help him  I did not take the iron."
I was the worse for liquor. I really had no intention of knocking him off. I never thought of such a thing. I leave it entirely to your mercy.
I was not aware it was bad.
I don't know how I came by them. I had a great deal of drink, and did not know they were bad.
You sent me for 6d. worth of whiskey, and when I came back you accused me?
I will call the boy  he never left the ship all day.
She was three years older than me.
I do not recollect anything about it.
How many trucks are there loaded, between the place where I brought it from and the wharf?
When Daniels came to you, did you go to see if the parcel was there?
At what time did Rutherford bring me to you?
Look at this thread and say if that is not the same which is used in your warehouse?
What makes you swear that?
Was it not my duty, if I saw a parcel broken, to count the contents?
It was my duty, when I saw the parcel lying there to pick it up, and put it in its proper place  I distinctly deny that I ever mended it.
Was it day-light?
Which way did I run?
Did not I walk down the street?
I told the inspector I was an acrobat. A lot has been stated to-day which has not been stated before, the inspector took him to a private place and persuaded him. The man with the black moustache has got away. The robbery was committed at 3.30, and at 3.30 I picked the coats up. My brother is an acrobat, and I was running to see him; he is the only friend I have in the world; the coat was stolen, and I unfortunately put it on. When the policeman halloaed after me I would not come because I didn't want to be locked up, I only ran for a bit of a game to let him see he could not take me; he knocked me down and made me bleed, then he said I did it myself; he broke the cartilage of my throat, he bled me all over with his staff. When he first came he could not say I was the man.
I was drunk and had the knife in my hand after I cut the rope of the flour barrels  I am very sorry.
I am not guilty. The first time I saw her, she sat on the sill in front of the kitchen window, and she got up and fell in the wash-house, and then she got up and fell near the tub. I went out to the shed, and when I came back I found her in the tub, and I pulled her out. That is all I have to say.
What did you find on me?
I had just come from the London Hospital, from having my arm and shoulders dressed  the papers were torn up when I came here  I left the hospital at 1.50 in the morning, and I was rather the worse for liquor.
Did you notice when you pressed the door back on him, whether he went down?
Did you see him on the ground at any time before you saw the man throw him down?
Would the black eye be anything towards the fracture if he was knocked down by a blow there.
We went there as friends, we never had a wrong word  if I did shove him, it was for his own good, to prevent him from going into the house and getting into further trouble, but I don't remember doing it at all.
I told you I was a married man, and you persuaded me to get married.
You told the Magistrate you knew her, but you would not tell me whether she had come home, and that you defied your daughter to speak to you.
Did not I come and ask you where your sister was?
She had two years before she had the seven years, and out of twenty-two years she has only been with me seven.
As soon as I saw the brother I asked him.
I have made all inquiries about my wife, and if she had been at her father's, about 100 yards off, she could have come to me. The father says he checked her for so doing, and consequently she has kept out of my sight. When I entered into this marriage I had no knowledge of my first wife, and thought I was at liberty. I do not know now whether their words are true, or whether she is alive or not. She has not been brought forward, and she has not been with me seven years out of the twenty-two. She has always been flying about and prostituting, and never staying at home, and taking my things whenever she did come home.
What was there to hinder you from seeing the watch come out of your pocket?
Did you see my hand in his waistcoat?
I know nothing of the robbery  I was shoved against the man, and the watch was snatched from the pocket.
I admit that I had the apartments and did not pay for them  my uncle, Mr. Watson, was in the Bank of England forty-eight years.
The senior clerk would be able to tell my uncle held the position forty-eight years, and had a pension  he has been dead about fifteen years now  I leave it in the hands of the Jury; I had means to pay, and I meant to pay  I could not do so at first  I did not live extravagantly  I know I owe the money.
I can assure you another party done it  I said to the policeman \Don't knock me about, I will go quietly with you\"  I never said I had no watch."
When I tendered the sovereign you looked at it, and bounced it up two or three times?
Did not I say I want the change for my sovereign?
How is it you did not say that on the first hearing?
I received the sovereign for a bet at Croydon races. I had been drinking a good deal. I waited four minutes for the change, which I should not have done had I known the coin was bad.
I had been drinking very heavily.
Previous to your giving me notice to leave, did you find that I was going to leave?
Did you come out of the kitchen with an oath on your mouth?
How far off were you?
Could a blow be given accidentally with a hammer?
Have you had any conversation with any one about this prosecution?
I did it in self-defence. My intention was to take the child where she would get properly treated and made clean, to go away on the following Sunday. I was mending her boots, and the woman wanted to put her to bed. I said \Don't put her to bed, I am going to take her away to-night\"  (the woman had given me notice to quit, because she had found out that I had taken another lodging). The prosecutor said \"Are you, you b  , you shall not go away without a broken head, that is what I will let you have; I have an iron-arm here that will do it; I have let many a man have it.\" I had this iron hook in my hand, and threw it to keep them from me, and it caught him on the side of the head. I was not going away myself that night, but I wanted to take the child away because she was not properly treated. The prosecutor and his wife were the real cause of it. I never thought of doing such a thing. If the prosecutor had not commenced the attack upon me it never would have happened. The hammer was never in my hand."
Did not you say before the Magistrate that you saw the prisoner's back, but did not see his face?
On the night in question I went home, and was in the house till after 10 next morning. I went up the Essex Road, and was taken there. If I had committed the burglary, I should not have gone so near to where it was committed. My lodgings are a mile or a mile and a half from the place. There never was a man more innocent of a charge than me.
Did not the sergeant say he had a good mind to look you up?
I don't think it stands to reason that I could resist a big man without him making some resistance. I am quite innocent of the charge.
Did you strike me inside or out?
Had I the knife open?
How long did I stop there?
The fact of the matter is I was standing in my own defence. I got rather hot at first. I never thought of using the knife; if I had one in my hand it might have been put in. I had no knife about me.
Did not somebody say \Is that him?\" when you were in front of me?"
Have not you had opportunities to take me if you wanted me?
On this night I was not in the Borough at all, I was playing at skittles at Mr. Weleh's. A young man was with me. I never saw the prosecutor till the day he came to recognise me. He might have seen me time out of time going down different parts of the Borough. As for robbing him, I never did such a thing in my life. I was told in Horsemonger Lane that the man who did rob him is doing some imprisonment. I am innocent as a child.
Did you not say it was a bad one?
I came out of my father's house in the morning and passed by the Alderman's shop; a gentleman stopped me, and asked if I wanted to earn 6d. I said \Yes.\" He said \"Will you go into Alderman Waterlow's to get me a sheet of stamps?\" I said \"I don't mind.\" He said \"Lend me your coat, that will make you look like a shop chap.\" I went in, and when I came out the gentleman was gone, and I dropped the stamps and ran away."
I have a witness to prove that I sold a turkey for a half-guinea and received this coin. I was intoxicated or I should not have taken it.
I received 9s. 10d. in change; I work hard for my living. I did not know the money was bad.
I did not know the coins were bad; any working man is liable to take two or three bad shillings. I wag two hours in the house, which does not look as if I was guilty.
Did not you say on the Monday that I was not the man?
Did I give you a good one afterwards?
Was I drunk or sober?
Every time the Magistrate asked this lady she distinctly said that I was not the man, and did not go into her shop at all. I do not remember going into the other shop.
Did you see me at all?
Did you see the watch in my hand?
Did you see me give anything to anybody?
On 26th August I went to my sister's in the morning and remained there till one o'clock. I asked her to pawn my waistcoat, which she did for 2s. at Mr. Cathey's, and gave me the ticket, which was in the name of Ann Driscoll. I stopped at her place till 2 o'clock, and then went to Brick Lane. I saw two men running in Fashion Street, one turned up Fashion Court and the other into Brick Lane. When I got into the court I saw one of them in the arms of the policeman; the other officer came up and said, \I believe you were with this man.\"  I said, \"No.\" I have been at work since that, and was taken on 28th November. I know no more of the watch than the dead. One man has been punished for it already. My sister is very ill and unable to appear."
When Mr. Cox owed me the 20l. he came to me and said \I am not in a position to pay you 20l., but I will give you this bill if you can get it cashed\"  I said I must have the money by Saturday  I went la him on the Saturday with two of my men who were waiting for their money, and he went with me to Mr. Holmer's, and he said if Mr. Cox could not get it changed he would go to a neighbour and borrow 7l., or 8l. to pay me until he got it cashed."
I recollect taking 6d.; I think you have made a mistake; you mean a dozen case, that is what I took the shilling for.
I had 3s. and took 6d. out of it to pay my expenses.
I had two boxes from there, and I booked them in Mr. Thompson's book with Mr. ThirKells, both together, as 5s.
I asked you to send up word to the office when the case was empty, and if there was any mistake I would make it right.
It was a 1s. I charged  I had not got the sheet at the time.
There was no paper required; the box and package were to be delivered to Bell's, the carrier's cart, to go to Hornsey Rise. They asked me what the carriage would be, and I said 2s. 6d.; my charge was 2s.
I did not notice that it was carriage paid, or I should not have charged it; or had I been round the next day I should have returned the money again.
I had a good connection when I came to Mr. Thompson. His cart was not paying, and he said \If you like to have it you can.\""
Did not I say I had just come out of a fit, I had been in a fit?
Is the door about the corner of the street?
Did not I run to you, and say \Did you see a man run past?\""
I was playing at skittles with some men till 1.30, but they won't come up. I bathed my head in the yard because I knew I was going to have a fit, and I came out in the street, and was leaning with my head against the railings, when the man ran past.
You found a good half-crown in my pocket?
Is there any credit to Pyatt?
Do you swear that Rackstraw owes you 150l.?
I made that entry in your presence, and I have never touched the books since; one entry was made in the morning and the other at night, which accounts for the difference in the ink.
What Messrs. Burn have stated relative to my going away without their consent is an untruth. They knew and gave me permis-sion to go, and they knew where I was at the time my Wife received letters from me, and they acknowledge receiving Bromby's security for 116l., which came to my home while I was away. They would have settled the matter if my father could have paid the money. He paid the 50l. security, and was told that if I kept out of the way no proceedings would be taken against me. I did not abscond or go away without their full permission, and these telegrams prove that they knew where I had gone to. Mr. Burn took all the money I had, and I had not enough to go home with, I am very sorry it has taken place. I cannot make restitution, but if my father had paid the money there would have been no prosecution.
That frying-pan was bent like that before.
Were you not going to cook some cabbage, and did you not knock my finger?
I was struck on the head with a piece of iron, and have been in the hospital, and when I have any drink it flies to my head. I promise it shall not happen again. It is the first time I have been charged with knocking her about, and it will be the last.
If they had let me alone, I should have made it up.
I never had a copy.
I was not there on the first occasion; I had a fit the day before, and never went out of doors for sometime.
What do you know me by?
I bought the watch and chain as they are for 9s., of a strange man in a public-house, and it has been repaired; the seconds hands have been altered.
Did you see me counting the silver you gave me?
I did not say anything about leaving my watch;  took it off when the constable came in to search me.
Did not you say \Take off that watch\" when you came in?"
I received 19s. 10d. in change for a sovereign, among it was this half sovereign; I shoved it away, and said \Give me all silver. \"She picked it up and tried it; but she did not try it before she gave it to mo. She said \"It is bad; \"I said \"It is the one you gave me. \"After a good deal of talk, I said \"If you don't give me the change I shall summons you for it. \"Somebody jumped over the counter, and three policemen came and searched me. I gave 9s. for the watch, and had the small hand and the glass repaired."
I was with another man who picked up the packet of coins. I tried one going along, and said they are not good, you will get into trouble; you had better get rid of them as quick as you can; we will put them down this sink, and just as we were going to do so, the detective came up.
I had been drinking all day. There was another party who has escaped. A man came to the station, and said that he saw another man.
Had you not two bad shillings in your hand on the Saturday?
What had I with me?
I was rather the worse for liquor; I had been taken to the hospital from a fall off a cab, when I came back it was about 1.30, I stood at the corner where I lived, the constable came up and shoved me two or three times before I said anything to him; being the worse for liquor I was rather bad tempered, and I suppose I did what I should not hare done if I had been sober. I turned round and struck him. I did not do it with any intention of doing any bodily harm.
Is it necessary to put the number of the book oh the notice of withdrawal?
I bought the horse to sell again; I never stole it.
Did not I have another piece of paper in my hand?
Can you give me a character?
I did not steal the cheque; I found it in the watercloset, on the floor. I had never seen a cheque before, and I took it to the barrack-room, and put it in my kit; but my intention was to give it to the paymaster. I asked his address with the intention of giving it to him. I have a good character, and a good-conduct badge.
How long have you known my neice, Mr. Carr?
It is my letter; were you aware where Miss Roper resided?
When you came to the Thames police-station, you said \How did you like your swim?\" I said \"What are you talking about?\"You walked away, and nodded your head. I was put with seven more men, and Inspector Reed put a plant to you, and you pointed to me in a moment. It is not likely you could know me when you were behind me, with a rope on my back."
One morning I was taken from the Custom House, and got a month's hard labour at Holloway Prison. The constable asked me how I got into the boat; I said that I walked into the water. I had my clothes all over mud that morning.
This is the first time I have been in prison. I have have had to leave my place because I have fits. I was at Mr. Waterlow's three years, and at Mr. Abbot's two or three years, but have not given my right name, as I did not want my friends to know. My name is Humphreys. We are all liable to take bad money. I did not look at it or put it in my mouth.
I have nothing to say; I know nothing about it.
I was very queer with delerium tremens when I got inside and I did not know what I was doing.
I stopped the policeman, and asked him what was the matter. The prosecutor came up and said directly, \You are one of them.\""
I believe the statement made was that the fire broke out at 12.30. At 12.30 I was outside a public-house, talking to my brother; the public-house was closed. I had been sitting in the public-house with my brother, and I could not have been indoors.
I had no knife.
They gave me in custody on a charge and this lady is brought to me to see if I am the man. I was placed with three men connected with the police, very much taller than me, and she was asked to select a man with whose face she was familiar. She said \I don't know, I don't wish to say,\" and then she was pressed by the police and her husband to look again, and then she said \"The second man in the row,\" and I was the third man I am quite sure you will not convict an innocent person. I never took her purse, and there is no evidence to show that I did take it."
MR. SALMON says I was away from work; if the book was produced here, it would prove the contrary, that I was working all the day on Wednesday, having half an hour to dinner; and I never left the house from 7 o'clock in the morning till 5 in the evening.
I bought the boots out of the shop, and they have been mended since I have had them  I have got a witness who mended the boots.
I am guilty of taking a pair of boots and one boot, but she is equally as bad, for when I was taken she hid the boots in the cellar.
In my opinion it is a good half-sovereign, and I wish to have it tried.
Two people sent me into the shop with the sovereign to get some steak, but I was never there before. It is not likely that I should go there twice.
It is false.
I received that money as I did every three months, and got all manner of change  It is the first time I have been locked up  I. get my living by hard work.
I did not know it was bad.
I deny breaking the window and stealing the watch  I believe the constable put it in my pocket.
I am charged with a crime I am entirely innocent of  I was returning home and heard the cries myself; I thought over the wall  I \was catching hold of the wall as the cabman came round the corner  I was looking to see what was up  I naturally ran away when the cabemen said \"Hold the b----\" knowing I was innocent."
I am not guilty; if I was I would own it.
You never were in the room any more than you are at this moment  I went in for a drop of drink and fell off asleep.
I had a drop of drink and went into the coffee-room, a nice fire was burning, but there was no light. My chum went to the bar to get some drink and I fell asleep; I bore a good character in the army; I have lost my discharge, but here is a letter
I had free access to the house, and nothing was disturbed. I unfortunately fell asleep, having had some drink. I had been to the train to see a friend away who is in the Royal Artillery. The officer woke me up by scraping outside and by calling the porter, but he did not come inside.
I was not there.
I never knew this woman till 4th December, when I was locked up, and on the 6th I was let go again. I had been in Laleham lots of times after 6th August, and nobody said anything to me about it.
I never asked yon to have a glass of ale at my expense.
You paid me two half-sovereigns, nine shillings, and 4 1/2d.  I never had such a thing as that in my possession.
I was in Weybridge for a day's pleasure  I started from Laleham at 9 o'clock and never returned till next day with my friend  there was a young man named William Sodlar in the same field with me.
He gave me the book when he was drunk and told me I could go and draw 2 in the name of David Clarke.
. I was going home on Saturday night about half-past 12. I met another sailor. There were a lot of chaps standing in the King's Road. They stopped me. They saw I was top-heavy. They began insulting me and pulling me about. Exall pulled me about. We fell in the road, and that is all I remember about it.
It being rather dark at 9.30, don't you think they are rather liable to be mistaken in identifying me? If they are speaking the truth, why did not they come forward at the police-court and give their evidence? I gave a correct name and address, and my mother and sister came.
. I was quite out of my mind through trouble and did not know what I was doing.
. I told the pawnbroker not to give the fish to anybody but Smith. I did not know it was stolen. This is the first time I have been in trouble, and I hope you will overlook it.
I saw the prosecutor lying down in Neptune Street with three women and two men, and two respectable young fellows were lifting him. I said \What is the matter?\" This constable came up and said \"You must be answerable for what this gentleman has lost.\" I work hard for my living, and have a little sister and an old mother to keep."
. I was taken to the police-court on 10th January and locked up until the Saturday week following, when the woman from the Ship came. A policeman then came to the cell door, and I asked the warder to let me put on my coat. She stood there with the warder, and then they brought me out and stood three more men with me. She did not say I was the man, but walked away with the warder. I was locked up for five weeks and did not know the dates till I came up here last Session, and I have two letters here to prove where I was
I own to giving one of the florins, but I did not know it was bad. Those letters will show that I could not have been there, and that I was working hard throwing up ballast. I could have proved it at the time, but after being locked up Ave weeks the man I was working with might forget the date. I did wear earrings. I am perfectly innocent.
I did not steal the tools. I brought them and Honestly paid for them. I was waiting for them. A young man went to Fetch them. I have not the slidhtest doubt he stole them. He has Absconded.
I had been out on Christmas night, and came home Down Tuilerie street, when I saw this shop was broken into, and these things Were lying in the gutter. I picked them up and walked away with them. The shutter had been broken open by a jemmy. I had nothing in my Pocket but a pipe and tobacco. It is impossible to break open a shop without Anything to do it with. I had only six pairs on me, and 24 pairs were Stolen.
At Christmas I went oyer Westminster Bridge. A man came to me and asked if I wanted money, and he gave me 48 farthings. He then asked me if I wanted to drink. I said I did, and he gave me some brandy. We went over London Bridge, and he gave me this sack to carry. He left me on London Bridge, and as he did not come back in an hour I wandered along Thames Street and I fell asleep. I went along the Wands-worth Road, and the constable came and asked me what I had got, and I told him a man had given me something to drink, and I felt very tired and I lost myself.
I was going over Waterloo Bridge, and picked up a tin box containing these coins wrapped in paper. I thought they were good, but afterwards found that they were bad, and did not know what to do with them.
I was walking up and down waiting for a friend, and a fellow who was along with me went to the letter box and took out one. I said, \You are a fool if you do that; you might take out 150 letters and get nothing for it.\" He said, \"Never mind,\" and asked me to read it. I read it, and he tore it up. The postcard he dropped outside Foresters' Hall, and I intended posting it in the pillar box in Fore Street, when I was caught hold of."
I was called off the porters' stand at Milk Street by a gentleman who said his name was John howell. He asked me if I was a porter. I told him \Yes.\" He said, \"if you will come with me I will give you a job.\" We went across Cheapside and Bread Street, and he said, \"I want you to go into Cook, Son, and Co.'s and get for me seven pieces of George Walton's linsey cloth.\" I said, \"I shall want an order.\" He said, \"Not if you use my name and sign sign in my name,\" They gave me the goods, and I took them to the corner of Cannon Street, where he was waiting, and he gave me a shilling. That is all I know of the goods. I have been thirty years in the City of London as porter and packer, and have never been in trouble before."
I saw the detective and the prosecutor come in and go, but I stopped there, and they came in and charged me. I know nothing of the robbery, and never saw the man before. If I had done it I should not have gone to a public-house close to the spot and stopped there after he looked at me. I am not the man.
I am guilty of being on the premises and resting there from 10 to 7 o'clock, but I know nothing about the tools.
I was up and down the street all day and the day after: it is funny that no one but him should see me take the boots.
The other witness said that it was me who took you by the throat.
I did not know it was bad: I found it where I am lodging when I was turning a cupboard out, and took it to be a sovereign.
The witness said at the police-court that it was Wednesday, and now she says it was Thursday; if she makes a mistake in one thing she is liable to make a mistake in another.
I declare to God I never wrote that miserable letter; 1 could not write an English letter if you were to give me thousands of pounds.
I did not send it with the intention of carrying out the threat, I sent it merely to frighten her  I did not write the letter myself; I sent it, I own that.
I have nothing to say except what I have already said  I did not forge the order myself.
I had had a drop of drink, and fell down, and got robbed of my boots. It is very hard to be robbed myself and to be accused of another robbery which I am innocent of.
I got out of a train at Stoke Newington. Three or four people were running and calling \Stop thief.\" I ran after them and was given in charge."
I did receive this watch from Mr. Hawks. I repaired it. It is nearly three years back. I sent it home by a man named Frank Bonner, who worked with me for six months, and then went to Coventry. I should never have gone to work in Woolwich again if I had known that the prosecutor had not received his watch. I offered to make him another. I sent a bill for 6s. 6d., and the man brought me the 6s. 6d. I asked him who he delivered it to, and he said to somebody behind the bar.
The prosecutor gave me a watch to repair; I examined it and found there was no go in it, and I told him the test thing would be to get it together and pledge it or Bell it I purchased the ticket of a first-rate watch which I thought would suit him, and offered to take his watch in exchange and sell him the duplicate for 12s. 6d., which would give me 2s. 6d. profit. I did not see him for three or four weeks, and he said if I would take 4s. and his watch he would give it to me, but he would not do so then. I afterwards met him in Bevis Marks and asked him to give me half-a-crown off the 4s.  I retained the watch, as 10s. and 4s. would make 14s. I put it together, but could not sell it, and was compelled to pledge it for 10s. I have got the 30s. back, for what I sold him for 30s. it is worth 50s., and I consider that the old watch belongs to me for the 4s. which I have not had.
I was not in England on 13th April. Witness. I am certain you are the person.
I am innocent of the half-crown altogether.
A gentleman sent me in with the money to get him some cheese. I had never been there before.
It is false, I did not try to get away.
I picked that knife up in the road opposite a new building.
When I helped the boys catch the ponies, I walked straight away through Ealing How could I take a pony when I have nothing but what I stand up in? I was walking from London, and going into the country. I never told the witness it belonged to my mother.
What I said in my statement is perfectly true  I was perfectly dumb at seeing the fire  I went down seeing the light; I was certainly unlawfully on the premises at the time, but I don't see why I should be found guilty of setting fire to it  the shavings might have been kindling there for hours, and there might have been a gust of wind did it  it is rather an awkward position to be placed in  the policeman was 150 yards from me when I came up: I did not see him  it was not him that caught me, but the gentleman  the policeman said the gentleman would have to come up in the morning, and what I said was \I dare say you will make up a nice case for me in the morning;\" that was all I said."
What evidence is there to connect me with this robbery? I was in the place on Saturday; so were others. The drawer was accessible to any one in the shop. I had not the key. Six or seven hours elapsed before Mr. Ullman came to look after the money. In introducing a system of bookkeeping to Mr. Ullman's business my life was made a perfect misery to me by his brothers. My system was too strict for those who had to contend with it, and Mr. Ullman abused me in my bedroom between 3 and 4 in the morning. I am innocent; if guilty I should not have stayed in the neighbourhood where my duties took me, and I was taken into custody within 100 yards of one of Mr. Ullman's shops. I left because I was thoroughly worn out with annoyance and anxiety. He claims 25l. from me, and that nearly tallies with the amount I am charged with stealing. I have borne an honest character, and the testimony brought against me is not sufficient to chastise a child upon.
That happened to be Cross.
I was under the influence of liquor, and I did not bow anything of the occurrence till I was taken in charge; there was no remeditation. Of course, as to the wounding, I must admit it; the witnesses rove it I leave it in your hands to be merciful to me.
I was deputy at this lodging house, Early in the morning of 13th April I was in the kitchen, and hearing a heavy fall, went up and saw the  deceased lying in the passage with his nose bleeding. I picked him up and said, \You had better go to bed.\" He said, \"I will go downstairs if you will help me.\" I said, \"No, you had better go to bed, you are so drunk.\" He said, \"No, I have not got my money.\" I left him leaning against the wall. Driscoll called me up and said, \"Rose is lying on the pavement, why not pick him up?\" I said, \"No, leave him there, he has no money.\" McGrath come by, and shortly after the prosecutor come and said, \"Why don't you let him go to bed?\" I said, \"He has no money I did not strike him, and I did not have a broom in my hand; it is not till after the house is closed and the lights put out that I want to use one. There is no reason why I should knock the deceased about. Only on that Sunday morning I had carried up tea to his bed. The bruises were caused by the fall in his drunken helpless condition. Several time before he has been brought home helpless, and has fallen on the stairs, and has been assisted to bed. I do not know where Driscoll has gone to, and cannot call him."
Some militiamen assaulted me and knocked me down and injured my hand; I have not had the use of it since. I never touched the man's watch.
My name is not Edwards, but Parker. I used that name as a blind, because I had been separated from my wife. I believed I had a balance to meet that cheque. I had not used the bank for two years. I have suffered from rheumatic gout and hardly attended to business. My impression was that Hilder lent me the 30s. I had no intention to defraud him. I left Forest Hill because I had had notice to quit, which had expired. I was at work, and could not appear to time. I have been two months in custody, and have suffered enough.
I never touched the woman at all.
I tried to do the best I could to get her away, but could not, as she was so beastly drunk. I never kicked her, but she has kicked me awfully, and I have had marks black and blue for eight or nine months. She chucked the knife at me in the road. I work very hard for my living.
I am innocent. I was sent by two men. I had been helping with a load of stones. I did not know they were bad. I was drunk.
I bought the eyeglasses in the Meat Market. I did not have them till the 12th June, and the robbery was committed somewhere about the Derby Day. I left them at the pawnbroker's because I had been sleeping at a common lodging-house, and did not want it known, as they asked for my address. The witness was serving a customer, and did not ask me a question.
I heard a cry of \Police!\" and went to see what the row was, and the prosecutor said I was one of them."
I had the knife in my hand eating some bread and cheese, and when Holmes struck me I put up my hand and it caught him.
I had come from Edmonton on my way to Barnet. I could get no lodging, and found shelter in that road, where I must have slept for some time. I then went down the lane to search for running water, and saw two policemen; they said nothing to me. The young gentleman asked me if I saw anybody. I said \No.\" He asked if I knew where he could find a policeman, and I said \"You will find two at the top of the lane.\" I picked up this boot, thinking it would fetch me a few halfpence I moved the bush about to reach it. I was taken into custody. There were four persons there, and the policeman never tried their shoes or his own. You will find a similarity in the nailing of boots in any shop, and I think it is cruel that a man should be convicted on this evidence. I saw two policemen at the top of the road, and if I was there I could not be at the prosecutors house, but they have taken care to keep that man back."
If I had been guilty I should not have been lurking about like that, only five doors from the place. If I had been disturbed in the room I should not have been fool enough to wait until a woman lit a candle and held it in my face.
They first had suspicion of my brother, then of my cousin, and the constable came and said I had run away, when all the time I was lying on my bed. I am innocent.
On the night of the 12th July I was told by Abrahams to go to Forest Gate and fetch a dozen chairs  when I came back I told him I could not get them  he went with me to several places till he came to a place, and handed me over the chairs  that was about 9 or 10 in the morning  I took them to the station  I afterwards went and fetched the others.
It was a pure accident, and occurred in less than one second. We had a dispute. I caught hold of her, and being a heavy woman she fell, with her leg underneath. She never said anything to me about the broken leg. When I am turned into the street I have not a farthing. I am entirely at the mercy of the Court.
There were two of them beating me. I had the knife in my hand. It was shoved into me, and I stuck it into him. I did not know what I was doing. I am very sorry for it.
I had the packets given me at the public-house by a gentleman named Tyler to mind for him for half an hour, and before he returned I was taken into custody, and when I saw it was bad money I was quite surprised and did not know what to say at the moment.
It is impossible for a man struggling on the ground to throw anything away. I had this letter (produced) in my hand, and I spoke to several people asking for the address on it, 18, Cross Street  I went up to Thompson and asked him if he could direct me there, I had never seen him before in my life; they might have seen me pull that from my pocket, but nothing else. Nothing but good money was found on me. I swear I bought that packet for 2d.
I am a bricklayer. I was out of work, and had been to Petticoat Lane, where I go to buy and sell when I have nothing to do. I do not remember any more. I do not remember who hit me in the eye and ear. I have four children, and have always borne a good character. I was discharged from the army two years ago, and have been at work at Tooting and at Islington.
I was walking from the Britannia to the Black Cap, when I saw two men running from the prosecutor, who stumbled  I jumped forward to catch him under the arm. He mumbled out, intoxicated as he was, \I have lost my purse.\" I ran after the men, when the constable caught me, and I said \"I know nothing of the purse myself.\" I had 6s. 9d. in my pocket, and was trying to do good to my Queen and country. It is not feasible that I should want to rob him. I have had a hawker's licence for five years, and bear an unblemished character."
I was going home, and went to post a letter, when I was struck in the face by something I could not see, as I am near-sighted. I tried to move it. When the witness came up I stood aside to allow her to post her letter. I went to the lamp to see if the letter was stamped, and then I recollected it was too late, and the police were called. I did not attempt to get the letters away at all. I had no knowledge of the wire. I am perfectly innocent.
I said I got it at Waterloo Station, but I said nothing about the booking-office. I have been waiting 11 weeks for my trial, and it is very hard being falsely accused.
This money was due from Prince, and is a matter of account between him and me. It has nothing to do with Chatterton, to whom I was clerk. Prince promised to remunerate me for what I did, as it was done for him and not for Chatterton; the understanding between Prince and me about Pyman's dividend, was that I was to put in the receipts and pass them through, and we were to divide the money between us, as Pyman had gone abroad. When I borrowed 2l. of Prince I was out of Chatterton's employ, and I did not tell Prince that I was in it. I advised Prince as a friend, with reference to several estates, but I never mentioned Chatterton's name, and none of the moneys were received from him, and I never signed the receipts per, pro, or otherwise, for Chatterton. Prince complained to me, and I said I was sorry for the way I had used him, but would pay him back. These proceedings have been taken against me because I said something about Chatterton's private affairs, and my report of it was sent to his office. (Mr. Ind here stated he had teen a report at Mr. Chatterton's office in the prisoner's writing about a week ago, but he did not know when it came. Mr. Pearce stated it was received about two days before the prisoner's arrest.) When I was brought before the Magistrate no evidence was offered, and I was discharged on my own recognisances to appear on the following Tuesday. (James Sanctuary here stated that this was the case, and that the prisoner appeared on hit recognisances.) When I appeared on the Tuesday I was charged with embezzling these and other moneys. The charges are all brought against me through spite. I dealt with Prince irrespective of Chatterton altogether.
I was on Waterloo Bridge at the time  my father and brother and Thomas Lane are my witnesses (They were called but did not answer) I met a man named Murphy who worked for my father, he had the cab and asked me to go for a ride  when we got down the highway he asked me if I had any money  I said no, and he gave me the rug to pawn and told me to give the name of Henry Davis, and he would be in the dolly shop.
I got the shilling in change for a half-crown, and the half-crown I got from a woman for doing a moving job in Oxford Street.
I had been at work and was going home. I heard a man and woman quarrelling, and the woman was shouting for the police. I asked him what he was knocking her about for, and he pitched into me till I had no sense at all. I must have been knocked through the door by that man. I am no thief, and have never been convicted. I cannot account for being there only by being knocked about by the man I interfered with. I had no intentions of committing a robbery. I paid 3l. 15s. to a solicitor for my defence, who had me in a little box and brought the depositions to me. He said it was all right. I don't know who he was.
I could not tell what happened, I was drunk. It was all through the drink. When they shoved me out of the public-house I became excited, and I suppose broke the window.
I had no intention to make away with them, or I should not have taken them to a public bar, where customers were. My intention was to take them to Maw's, where I had taken them in mistake for empties. On the Saturday morning Mr. Payne called me up and asked I would tell the glasses cheap; I said \What do you call cheap?\" he said \"I dont know, I will leave it to you\"  I said \"They are cheap at 2s. 9d. or they are cheap at nothing at all\"  he told me to call) at 9.30 in the morning for the money  I could have sold them, but I did not want to sell them."
I am innocent of knowing it to be bad; I said, \It is no good your locking me up; you may be placed in the same position as I am.\""
I have a witness to prove that I was not near Leytonstone on the night of the robbery, and that I was white-washing and paperhanging, and did not leave till 9 o'clock on the Saturday  her lame is Matilda Hoy. (Matilda Hoy being called did not answer.)
I am licensed to deal in game and poultry, and I deal in anything I can buy. I went to market, and bought 20lb. of these grapes; there were some white ones among them. I gave a sovereign for them. Nurserymen come. at the market and bring their goods to sell. If I could have got out on bail I might have produced the man I bought them of. I do my business openly, and do not thieve. I stand outside Forest Gate Station, and sell poultry, game, and fish to the public You can go and cut grapes for yourself at 1s. 6d. a pound. I sold them openly, and if Mr. Spicer had asked me for one or two pounds I should have sold them to him. I do not see what there is to connect me with them. Nobody but themselves was there when the police matched the grapes. Instead of being taken before a Magistrate, was taken before one of Mr. Spicer's intimate friends and neighbours, and 'not allowed to say a word, and he said that instead of being prosecuted I ought to be acquitted. The Magistrate said that it was for a Jury to decide, and I said I thought so too. As to matching grapes, people come from all parts of the country with them, and who can say that they have not been tampered with. I hope you will consider my explanation a truthful one, and that I shall leave this Court without a stain upon my character. A reward of 20l. has been offered; lots of people think the police do not get the reward; they do not get it directly, but they get it indirectly.
I have not been in Stratford for the last six months. I have worked for Mr. Green. Nearly all the people in Stratford must know my face from passing backwards and forwards. It is the first time in my life I have had a key turned on me. I am not the person at all; I am quite innocent. Rogers is mistaken entirely. I went on a pleasure party to Epping Forest at the time, so that I could not be there; and I was working for Mr. Gates in the Kirton Road\\ send\\ ing furniture off in the country.
I found the pocket-book. I looked in the papers to see if it was advertised for. Mr. Johnson is mistaken entirely. I dined at his house when I worked in the neighbourhood. It is not likely I should do such a thing 15 yards from his door. I should like the Jury to see my character for 29 years.
There were 14 of us who had been working together. I had a pennyworth of pickles, and gave them all some. I am innocent, and have a wife and family.
What I said was that I gave the landlady the half-crown, but received no change.
I own I gave the lady the half-crown, but I did not know it was bad.
I went to meet my young woman. She left me a few minutes. A chap came up and said \Did you see that bloke)collar a sheep in front of the butcher's shop?\" I said \"No\" I went to Mr. George and asked him if he had lost one. He said \"Why?\" I said \"Because I am a detective,\" and the reason I aid that was because Inspector Francis said to me two or three times if I looked out for him he would give me something for it. I said it more for talk than anything."
There is not the slightest doubt the detective put the two coins under the seat to crush me. Anybody is liable to take one coin.
I have taken it all upon my own shoulders. I have given all the information I could for the apprehension of the other man and the woman that obtained the medicine. When I went in the shop I was intoxicated; I deny signing the receipt. I was in the shop at the time it was drawn, and Twells was in the counting-room.
